totoro_7 [info] Thanks a lot for your interest in my case!&gt;I don't think there's mucus in the stool but I never checked properly. &gt; Almost all episodes (except one) have happened at nighttime, after I'd eaten dinner and was already lying in bed. &gt;Never tried keeping a food journal. Episodes have happened after eating big and small meals, with and without lactosis, with and without gluten, etc. They once happened straight after eating just a soy yoghurt.&gt;No accid reflux but excessive fatigue is definitely present. I need 9-10 hours of sleep in order to feel rested (and still sometimes don't). I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder about 8 years ago. &gt;Episodes are very irregular and unpredictable. Last year, I had about 6 episodes over the course of 10 weeks. Then they were completely gone for over a year. Had an episode last May, nothing since. &gt; No weight loss, abdominal pain is only present during episodes, blood in stool happened twice, the morning after an episode. &gt; I had my stool tested six months ago, but I'm not sure what they tested for. I remember the only positive thing was Escheria Coli. The test was done shorly after an episode and after a week of taking Flagyl and Oflocet. &gt; No fevers, no eye redness, no joint pains, some mouth ulcers but not often. &gt; Stool looks solid and brow, not greasy. Frequent gassiness, frequent bloating, frequent gurgling sounds. &gt; I have had iron deficiency anemia twice before, it was attributed to my vegetarian diet. &gt; Haven't tried completely eliminating lactose not gluten nor sorbitol. Doctor said he didn't think it was food-related. &gt; Still have my gallbladder. &gt; No swollen lymph nodes (that I notice).&gt; Never travelled outside of Europe.&gt; No HIV.&gt; No stool incontinence.&gt; No history of bowel disease in the family. &gt; No known thyroid issues. &gt; They did biopsies during the colonoscopies. I don't know the results.  [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1511881166
sundancesyd [info] My psychiatrist won’t listen to me So I (F22) was diagnosed with BP2 about 8 months ago. The whole time I have been on lamictal which I have noticed a moderate improvement. I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 13. I have asked my psych to prescribe me anti anxiety medication the whole time I have been seeing him to which he responded that the lamictal will also take care of that. He also suggested another anticonvulsant on top of the lamictal but I’m hesitant to add another mood stabilizer instead of something to help my anxiety directly. I know my anxiety has increased surrounding COVID and I have been experiencing paranoia about being sick and having intense panic attacks so much so that I think I’m dying, have extreme nausea, and I shake uncontrollably. I also have been experiencing graphic and disturbing visions whenever I close my eyes or it is dark and it is making me terrified to go to bed. I don’t know what to do or how to convince him to help me. I do have an upcoming phone appointment to talk about the new issues with paranoia and panic attacks. Can I demand a prescription or will that make him think I only want something like Xanax to use recreationally? And before you say find a new psychiatrist he is the only one in my town that is covered under my insurance. I can’t afford to pay out of pocket. I have a hard time asserting myself with my medical providers and would really appreciate some advice! [info] None [info] 1587498752
givemeaholler2 [info] Hmm maybe you’re right. I have no gotten a teeth cleaning in god knows how long (American health care amirite). I have been diagnosed with anxiety (emotional issues) and perhaps I over reacted. [info] None [info] 1568491597
superfantasticclub [info] How Do I Talk to My Dad About His Comments Starting this off, I don't hate my father or my parents for that matter. However, something about him as bugged me for a while. He has a tendency to be very judgemental when it comes to my tastes in pretty much anything. This ranges from my tastes in shows, clothes, and probably the biggest one music.The main problem is these comments stick with me for a while and I have a hard time enjoying things because he comments on how stupid they are. I also have a hard time because when i try to enjoy things he doesn't like my mind replays his comments over and over. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so I don't know if me replaying these things in my head is normal or not.I want to talk to him about this and figure it out because it's making it hard to enjoy things like music and movies. I don't really know how to go about bringing it up. How should I start a conversation about this? [info] None [info] 1492927411
piercedfreak [info] Am I stupid? (19F) I don't want to sound ignorant or offend anyone, I've just been paranoid for a long time and would like some advice.There are traces of ADHD and autism in my family (2 cousins and my grandad) but I've always had trouble concentrating, learning, talking to people, staying still, building relationships with people etc. My brain never settles, there's always so much going on and loud noises and big crowds are very problematic. The only thing I can focus on is music. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so they could just be symptoms of that, but since learning about my families history I've just been super paranoid. Any tips or am I just terrible at focusing on things? [info] None [info] 1464038752
kapone3047 [info] I avoided getting my license for years because of anxiety, and even after getting it continued to find excuses to have my wife do the driving (this is back before I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder).The trick to improving this situation was two fold:* Do as much driving as possible in situations where I would be more comfortable (quiet country drives, driving on Sundays, short drives going only a few blocks)* Give yourself some more challenging drives, but have another person in the car who can take over if it becomes too much. By putting yourself in a situation that is confronting, you're also going to prove to yourself that you can do this. Over time this will increase your confidence.To be honest, nine years of driving later, and I still freak out at the thought of driving in busy traffic and will avoid it, however I can now take drives that would in the past have brought on severe anxiety, and can even find some drives to be enjoyable and relaxing.Full disclosure - I moved to the country two years ago and as a result have been forced to spend considerable amounts of time driving, however on extremely quite roads. This has helped me immensely. [info] GAD &amp; Depression [info] 1416671281
Waluwuigi [info] I’ve had tics for 8 years, I’m experiencing a mix of motor and vocal tics, OCD has been running in my family, and i show symptoms of it but i haven’t been diagnosed, same with ADHD. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and have had it since i was 9, none of these are being treated. I want to know how long the wait is, what the process is, and how i’ll get diagnosed. [info] None [info] 1556081375
TyphoidTerry [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety from a young age, but I never did anything about it. I figured awareness of it was the key, and that worked for the most part. I was able to keep myself from freaking out, because mine usually manifested in anger. I'm pretty chill, as a result.Then a few weeks ago I had an actual attack at work. I noticed my breathing was weird, and I felt panicky. My heart seemed to be going faster, so I timed my pulse for a full minute and got a rate of about 125. It didn't come down for almost two hours.A few days ago, I was on the borderline, and I knew it. I was twitching and snapping at the littlest of things. Had to apologize profusely to my girlfriend a couple times for kneejerk reactions. I yelled at my dog who just wanted to go out, and I felt my head tingle (physically, like on the top) when I did it - that used to only happen when I got into fights with my mom and I said something I knew I'd regret.I'm hoping that it was just a fluke that this last episode was circumstantial and not related at all to the stress of NoFap. It'll pass, I'm sure, but man does it suck. [info] 2 days [info] 1423515169
AmishBodyguard [info] Another CO poisoning. Not in any immediate danger and even though symptoms are consistent with CO poisoning, my PC won't order bloodwork and I can't get any appointments. Help? Hello, first time homeowner, long time idiot. Also 30y male in good general health, until now. I was admitted to the ER 5 times from last week through yesterday[monday]. Once was by ambulance last week. Symptoms kept disappearing by time of release. Chest xray and ECG monday showed nothing out of the ordinary. Symptoms from various trips:* Headache* Short, rapid breath* Nausea, dizziness* Rapid heartbeat, palpitations* Slow thoughts* Very emotional, angry. Not normally* Frightened and paranoid. Not normally* Red rash on thighs. * Partial facial palsy[ambulance]* Numbness in groin/leg[ambulance]* Swelling, loss of sensation in feet at different times. Never had swollen feet before. BIG swelling.[On my 4th ER visit I asked for ultrasound on my legs for DVT due to red rash and swelling. Nothing out of the ordinary]A few weeks before all those ER visits, I had a visit with my doctor and I could not precisely articulate what was wrong, I just felt like something was wrong with me[bad sleep habits, loss of appetite, odds and ends]. I was diagnosed with anxiety and given some lorazepam which I still have because I'm wicked scared of getting addicted to the stuff. Since anxiety is on my profile, every trip to ER resulted in same diagnosis, even the one by ambulance. After yesterday's trip, I called sheriff's dept and had my house checked by the firelords/ladies and they found this: https://imgur.com/50aTeKR. Their detector showed no dangerous level of CO since I'd aired it out. The furnace was currently running so wind direction/backdraft or something else probably plays a part.Contacted my doctor to order a blood test and she said **"no bloodwork is required at this time. Get your carbon monoxide detectors checked."** Tested CO alarms, they are/assume were since I replace the batteries twice yearly and they are all hardwired, working condition and never went off. This leads me to believe it is likely low level CO poisoning over a long period of time and spiked from high furnace activity over the period my symptoms spiked. Is is now my understanding that if I receive more CO dosage before my system is clean or possibly ever, I am much more sensitive and could die. I just need a diagnosis to make sure and to get treatment. And to get that I need bloodwork, which my PC won't order. I called and asked for a second opinion. All local hospitals are in the same network and they don't have anything until late next week. As I understand time is of the essence to protect my brain.Any advice on how to get bloodwork[Carboxyhemoglobin]? I can't get an appointment and the ER just thinks I have anxiety. It would be good to avoid another ER trip but if that is the only way then I will. [info] None [info] 1516780041
DevilsHand130 [info] Started meds a few months ago I started taking Zoloft about 3 months ago. I am 32 and the first time I was diagnosed with anxiety I was 9. My battle is in my head I am never enough. As a kid my dad verbally abused me and now that he no longer does it I do. My therapist is always telling me to think positive but Im finding a hard time not beating myself to be the best mom and wife to my 3 kids and my husband. The Zoloft is helping some what but I am having a hard time with being confident enough or having the sex drive to be intimate with my husband. I'm not sure on how to get past all my insecurities about my looks and calm my mind. Any tips other than staying positive? [info] None [info] 1555268577
mako-jaeger [info] Hmm, it's hard to say. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder in February, and I'm still trying to figure it out myself. I think you have to make peace with who you are and who you where in the past, and then take the proper steps to becoming the person you want to be.It of course won't be easy. In February after I went through the darkest period in my life, I realized a lot of things about myself. I think I had to just let go of all the bad things that had been holding me back, and embrace the good. For too long I was tied down by worrying about all the negative things people thought about me, and not appreciating the positives.I'm not sure if being "chill" is exactly the goal. I think being forgiving is a much more applicable goal. Being chill is good, but we will all have times of anger, uncertainty, and sadness. Trying to force those things out will only increase anxiety in my opinion. Instead forgive yourself if your anger, uncertainty, or sadness causes you to do something stupid. And investigate into why you are angry, uncertain, or sad.Also don't confuse eustress with distress. Putting it simply, eustress is what makes you feel like you have to get out of bed to fight the stressor, and distress is what makes you feel like your bed is your only safe haven from the stressor. Make sure your doing things out of eustress. Let it push you up. And accept that you will be stressed. It is hard for me a lot to accept that I am stressed. I don't always like it, and sometimes I want to ignore it. But the bright side is there is always a cause for stress, whether internal or external. Find the cause, investigate it, decide on how to act on it, confront the stressor, and move on.And as a final piece of advice to bring it all together, accept the bad days, because you'll have them. That's life. This semester has punched me in the gut so many times, I'm surprised I'm graduating in such a good shape. I think the key was accepting what happens, forgiving yourself and others, and moving on. Remember you can't change the past, but you can change the future. I live by this phrase in a lot of things: "Late, but not too late." Meaning essentially that sometimes you'll be late to a realization or doing something you should have done a long time ago, but it's not too late to make things the way you want them to be. And when it is (because it will be), accept it, forgive, and move on. [info] None [info] 1524878990
forloveofscience [info] Oh *man*, before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I spent three months only being able to eat from about 10 in the morning until 3 or 4 in the afternoon, because I would literally throw up if I tried to eat earlier or later (when my anxiety was the worst).  I had just switched mouthwash brands, so I stopped using that brand, thinking that might have something to do with it.  When it didn't make a difference, I stopped using mouthwash entirely.  When that didn't help, I tried asking all the nurses I knew (several of my friends' mothers were nurses) if they knew of some kind of flu that last over a month (it had only been a little more than a month at that point).  When friends invited me out for dinner, I would have a mini-anxiety attack worrying over whether I should actually eat or not, and if anyone would notice if I didn't, or if I could get away with just eating very lightly, and, if my body didn't let me, what they would think if I ended up puking in the bushes outside afterward?  Managing my eating schedule felt like a full time job in addition to the full time job I was already working.At the end of three months, the nausea mostly went away because I was having difficulty holding onto thoughts long enough to feel anything about them.  They just whirled around in my mind like scraps of paper caught in a tornado, and trying to catch and hold on long enough to read what was there was a Herculean task.  That was worse than the nausea, but not by much.Stupid anxiety. [info] None [info] 1411271404
saddleshoes [info] [Help] Job searching is terrifying me. Hi, everyone. I'm a long-time subscriber and first time poster. I was diagnosed with anxiety NOS in the fall of 2007, and until last summer had been seeing a therapist at my university.I graduated last summer, and although my therapist has a private practice in addition to being on staff at the college, I haven't seen him since July. I've been thinking of going back because I'm having problems with job hunting.While I desperately want to get out of my retail job and know that I need to just keep looking up places and applying, I find the whole process terrifying. I didn't get an internship, and the industry that I'm in (broadcast) is very much connection based. Every time I go to Monster or LinkedIn to look at things, I feel nervous, and if there's something that looks promising, I will do an application and then fret until I don't hear from anyone. I've done about ten applications since I graduated and have heard nothing from anyone, and it's stressing me out and scaring me. What should I do? [info] None [info] 1400691618
melbyz1980 [info] Sound and Anxiety I’ve always been sensitive to sounds, I was diagnosed with anxiety at a young age. There are sounds that other people don’t notice that are distracting, and drown out other sounds. They drive me crazy. The fan on the stove hood is a regular source of frustration as an example.Shopping can be maddening and I fully understand that feeling of not being able to hear myself think.I’m wondering if anyone else gets anxiety from sounds, and if they have found any effective ways of coping or managing it? [info] None [info] 1552758009
RoseBladeX [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder at 10 so.. [info] 19 [info] 1575059646
Artisticbutanxious [info] I always felt that the reason I been feeling tense on my throat is because I'm the type of person who stays quiet and doesn't express how I feel ( I been receiving therapy for this issue). And maybe my throat chakra is unbalanced as well. I seen a video about Theresa Caputo discussing her anxiety during her 20's. In my early 20's I was diagnosed with anxiety and IBS, I guess things happen for a reason?Yes, I would like to book a reading with you, I seen your videos before! Please give me the info on now to book it. [info] None [info] 1438979106
Iridaeth [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder. It just seemed so different than other forms anxiety has taken with me. I will be going to a psychiatrist as soon as I possibly can. Just trying to figure some stuff out beforehand. Thank you for the reply. [info] None [info] 1554664413
MachineGum_throwaway [info] &gt; Thank you very much. Although I fear that I am BPD a lot, I know that being aware and actively fighting my issues is something to be relieved about in that aspect. I don't deny nor hide the fact that I have issues. If you have BPD, then you'd recognize something inside of you that is more than just the external symptoms.Your friendship issue is just one thing, but BPD is many other things. Do you feel like you constantly need to defend yourself because people say things that critisize you? Do you feel like people are disliking you? Does you sometimes have periods where you hate your husband because you feel he did something bad/wrong? If you found out you were broken, could you accept it?&gt; I read articles, I and I buy self help books, I've read a few, and I tend to get too analytical of myself, so maybe my husband needs to read them with me. Maybe try meditation. Meditation is not a treatment for a specific condition; it is the discovery of one's self.Successfully analyzing your symptoms requires you to go really deep in your mind, something that some of us can achieve simply by washing the dishes and mowing the lawn (mindless activities) while others need to work to be able to go deeper within themselves.For example, when I am in therapy, I will often give answers based on what's on the surface of my mind because I am interacting with someone, however the therapist's job is to ask further questions to go deeper. The therapist can't connect dots (the "whys"), but can help you find which dots to look for.When I am alone, I don't stop on the surface answer; the surface answer becomes my next question and I push for more until I start connecting so many dots until I have small moments of epiphany (The dots all lead back to 2-3 major external factors in my childhood).&gt; I know some people in our situations tend to be a little off in relationships. My relationship with my husband comforts me in that I am normal with him, and he tells me that I overthink how I act too much. (I have been diagnosed with anxiety.) If the feeling of comfort with your husband has been consistent for a long long time, then I wouldn't be worried about BPD what-so-ever.You most likely have something causing you anxiety and you can only feel safe with people who really know you.  [info] None [info] 1480525926
ackthisisamess [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety, however I also find it a bit difficult to understand where the line is between "normal" and not-"normal" anxiety.... I personally see it as a bit nuanced? [info] None [info] 1569980247
booksblanketsandtea [info] Every year when I was a kid my family and my god parents and their kids would go on holiday together. We usually went up to Nelson or Picton area (top of the South Island, NZ) and stayed at this holiday home we rented for a few years running. This one year (which was to be our last year at this home we rented) we ended up going to a beach a few bays around from where we were staying. I must have been about nine or ten at the time. Anyway, so we get to this beach and I have to say, it was the worst fucking place we could have chosen. The car was up a hill and you had to walk down a track in the bush to get to the beach. The beach itself was right against the flowering native plant life, so there were wasps fucking Everywhere - and I'm terrified of the little wankers (I like bees, though am still scared of them). Normally this would be fine, I'd just go swimming and wouldn't be bothered by them - but nope. Jellyfish. Jellyfish everywhere. So, I'm sitting on the beach hunched up trying not to cry from fear - my Mum and Dad think I'm being a whiney little brat and are ignoring me. My sister, brother and god-sisters are all frolicking around having a great time. I am Miserable and on the verge of a panic attack (I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and this is the earliest panic attack I can remember having) - so I try and do what anyone would do in that situation: I try to get out. I tell Mum that I want to go sit in the car (not wanting to ruin everyone else's fun). She says no. Every few minutes I ask when we're leaving, flinching as bees and wasps fly around me, keeping a good distance from the ocean and the blue bottles swimming there.Eventually a wasp gets caught in my (then, waist length) hair and I decide 'fuck it, I'm not dealing with this shit anymore' - so I just get up and walk up to the car on my own. It's locked of course, but the window is open so i spend the next few minutes with arm in the car trying to unlock it- and suddenly I hear a noise and turn to see my Mum stalking towards me. This was my 'oh shit' moment. Never in my life have I been more scared - the jellyfish, the wasps and now my own mother is bearing down on me with a look on her face that says she is ready to Kill. She grabs me by the arm (still in the window) and drags me away from the car and starts giving me a hiding - I've already been crying from the fear and because no one had taken me seriously when I expressed that fear (which was honestly probably the worst part about it all) - now I'm crying because Mums giving me a few good wacks round the arse for (in my mind) simply being scared. I was grounded like you wouldn't believe - had to stay in my room, wasn't allowed to see my friend (the daughter of the people we rented the holiday home from) and we only ever saw each other once a year - and as I said, this was our last year renting that place. I wasn't allowed to play my gameboy or even read my books. I basically stayed in bed for the last four days of our trip and had to think about what I had done. It still makes me furious and scared to this day - I still have the odd nightmare of feeling trapped on a beach. I never really told my parents that I was worried or scared again after that, because it just felt like they didn't care.  [info] None [info] 1417138845
username_throw-away [info] Dermatophagia I had no idea this sub existed, and I'm glad I stumbled on it, because I have been dealing with something my entire life that I think you guys will be able to help with. After a lot of research, I have found that I suffer from a form of dermatophagia. I bite and pick at my nails, and more specifically, the skin around my nails. I've been doing it for as long as I can remember. I've tried countless times to stop, and have yet to be successful. My last attempt involved a product called 'No Bite' from Amazon. Not only did it not work, numerous people were actually drawn to my nails because they were extra shiny, and asked if I had gotten a manicure - extra embarrassing to have to tuck them away and say 'no' and try to change the subject. As I'm sure others who suffer from this condition will agree, over time you become very stealthy in how you use your hands. You never get involved in anything that will heavily involve your fingers - peeling labels, eating food with your hands, etc. Its to a point now where I subconsciously tuck my nails away doing everyday tasks, but I don't want to live like that. I was diagnosed with anxiety a while back, and was given Celexa as an aid. I didn't find much success in that. After doing more and more research, it looks like dermatophagia may be more of a sign of OCD than anxiety (or a combination there of). Have any of you experienced this? What have you found to help? - Both for the OCD/Anxiety and for the dermatophagia. [info] None [info] 1388435478
t4mmi [info] It’s different for everyone, and can manifest differently for individuals at different times so I can only tell you how I experience it. I am diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. I am a rational person and I know my “concerns” are nonsense but something in the back of my mind just overrides all sense. I fret about everything and overanalyse situations thinking of every possible thing that might go wrong. “But what if...” is my brain’s absolute favourite. I catastrophise. Minor things feel much worse than they are. This all causes me to take extreme and irrational precautions against unrealistic threats as well as to avoid ...  a lot.As far as panic attacks... For me, sometimes I feel like I need to hide (at times I literally have) for no good reason or escape. Sometimes I am paralysed with it and just freeze. I cry. Sometimes I have difficulty breathing, my heart races, I have excruciating pain in different parts of my body (usually my neck), pressure in my head, sometimes dizziness. Basically all the things you might imagine being an appropriate reaction to immediate extreme danger with either minimal or no stimulus to justify it. See a therapist, it helps. ETA see a therapist sooner rather than later, I know the money and time is an issue but it is really, really important. I wish I had addressed my anxiety sooner, not doing so led me to habits and thought patterns that made it much worse.  [info] None [info] 1543285006
AntiSpedicey [info] My first panic attack (Mild trigger warning: if you are triggered by reading the experience of others please stop here)Today I had my first panic attack. I was diagnosed with anxiety over a year ago now and although I’ve had my fair share of anxiety attacks that have lasted an hour or so (even days in some cases) I’ve never experienced a full-on-struggling-to-breathe panic attack. Never have I felt such a lack of control over my own body. My breaths were short, frequent, and shallow. My air intake was at a minimum and the fast inhaling made me extremely light-headed. I was crying at the same time which made breathing even more difficult and there was a overwhelming silence in my ears accompanied by a strange white noise that seemed to hover in it. I expected my heart to be beating out of my chest. But it wasn’t. I could barely feel or hear it under my breathing but the beats were slow and irregular, some far apart and others closer together. It was as though it had given up; it was too exhausted to beat anymore. I tried my best to hold my breath to slow the rate of my breathing and eventually it faded back to its natural rhythm. But it wasn’t over yet. Every part of me was numb. It felt like there was a weight on my chest becoming heavier with each passing breath, daring me to hyperventilate again. I continued to breathe deeply until I had fully regained control of my own respiration but I was frozen. My body hadn’t moved since before the attack. I stared out of the windscreen at the blurry road in front of me but everything that passed by was just a shape; a blurry shape. No structure or form, just shapes. I couldn’t look around and I couldn’t move or speak. I was a in a state of paralysis inside my own mind. I couldn’t even think. Not a single thing went through my head. There was an odd tranquility to it. It took me a while to come out of this trancelike state. Once I did, my head hurt and my eyes were red and puffy from a hysterical crying.I new what it was like to panic, to be nervous or scared. But I have never felt so trapped inside myself. You can read about what panic attacks are like but until you truly experience one for yourself, you will never know how mentally exhausting and draining it is. [info]  [info] 1521917865
msgirl84 [info] I was diagnosed today. Today I was diagnosed with anxiety and BPD. I wasn't surprised at all.  I just don't know how I feel about it. I thought I had it,  and thought I would feel relief at it being confirmed with a therapy session soon so I can work towards dealing with it.  I do.  I do feel relief,  but I also want to curl in a ball and cry, which I can't do because my husband is at work and I have to be strong for our daughter.  I don't know if any of that was clear,  just needed someone to talk to. [info] None [info] 1475017487
sunmissesflowers [info] I need to get this out. I created an account for this for obvious reasons. I just can't risk anyone in my personal life connecting any of this to me. This is a super sensitive subject for me and I don't want it associated with me in RL at all. I just. Feel so alone and I have such big trust issues that I just... Can't seem to talk about it. I know I'll be judged. I think maybe just writing it out will help. Maybe. I think I was in an an emotionally  abusive relationship. I think I've been in emotionally abusive relationships for most of my life. But sometimes I'm not sure. That probably sounds stupid, but I can't tell if I am just crazy. Is it me? Am I just a terrible partner? I should mention that when I was sixteen I was in a relationship with a twenty seven year old man for almost two years. We'll call him R. He was very manipulative and was heavily into drugs (ecstasy, acid, ketamine and meth being his preference). I also started using a lot of drugs and alcohol during that time, though I avoided doing the heavier drugs. He raped me twice. I finally left after we got arrested and the police called my parents. To this day they have no idea how bad it really was. I finally left him a couple months after that (yes I stayed and yes I thought it was my own fault). I had just turned eighteen and was realizing how screwed up our relationship was. Believe it or not, while that *did* fuck me up for a long time. It was the second relationship that did the real damage. We'll call him 'M'.I wouldn't meet M until I turned nineteen. During that time I partied a lot. I abused drugs and alcohol heavily. I got myself into bad situations and acted like a 'huge slut'. I was taken advantage of more than once when I was beyond incapacitated for consent. I often only felt good about myself when  I was getting sexual attention. And I would always feel like absolute shit about it the next day. The only way to feel better was to do it again and again and again. But I hated myself. I thought about suicide. I wanted to try being a normal person, so one day I started dating this 'G' who seemed nice and genuine.And for awhile things were okay. But I was only eighteen and I wasn't ready for a serious relationship. And 'G' wanted more. And I couldn't connect. And then I met 'M'. When I met 'M' I was mourning the death of a close family friend. I was drinking that night pretty heavily. I blacked out. And apparently slept with 'M's friend, and at least made out with M and was generally promiscuous. There were these four guys who were all living in a hotel. They were just in town for work. At this point I had started university and didn't see G very often anymore. I started partying with these guys. And I started to develop feelings for M. I never really had feelings for G. I never fell in love with him and never told him I loved him. And I had never dealt with what had happened with R. I found it kept bubbling up and out and I kept hating myself. I know what I did was wrong. I recognize now that I shouldn't have been in a relationship at all. But eventually M and I started sleeping together and I broke up with G. For awhile things with M were crazy. He was passionate in a way I'd never experienced before. We had sex four or five times a day. We had sex everywhere. At my work (I often closed), in my car, in the hotel, outside, everywhere. We even broke into a community centre once (just used a credit card on the lock I mean really) and had sex on the table. He made me feel so desirable and sexy and amazing. And I talked to him. We talked about how fucked up our lives were and our relationships had been. He'd been in an abusive relationship too. I thought he was my soulmate. And then I got pregnant. At this point I was just barely nineteen and very much not ready for a baby. But I wanted it. And M seemed excited. But during this time a lot of other things were happening too. He and his friends were partying all the time and ended up losing their jobs. Which eventually led to them losing their place to stay and having no money. I was going to uni at the time, living at home and working as a waitress. I tried to help him as much as I could but I had almost no money. He stayed with a friend for a bit, but he had decided he wanted to move back home (which was across the country). He had started arguing with me. At me. I was scared because I was pregnant and he was going to leave. During one of those fights he left me in the car crying. He left me there for almost an hour. When I went to the washroom later I discovered I was bleeding. We went to the hospital but there wasn't anything they could do. Just told me to go home and have bed rest. I lost the baby that night. I woke up at three in the morning. To this day I wake up at three in the morning and cannot go back to sleep. I woke up to intense cramps. I knew what it meant and started to cry. I didn't want to wake M. I don't know why.. I was scared to ask him for comfort. He so often reacted violently to strong emotion. And I couldn't support him then. So I lay there and cried silently and prayed that it stop until the pain stopped and went to the bathroom and that was that. I told M I thought I lost the baby. I didn't tell him the other part. The hospital confirmed that day. He cried for a bit but then said it was for the best. And that was the end of our happiness. He was leaving to go home but didn't have any money. He was talking about hitchhiking so I borrowed money from a cash advance store and drove him across the country. We tried to do long distance from there. It was awful. We fought all the time. M started accusing me of lying, started thinking I'd cheat on him. Started bringing up how our relationship had started. Said it was for the best we'd lost the baby (it was true but it seemed so callous to say it the day we lost her and then he wouldn't talk about it after that). For example : I called him to say goodnight. I'd had plans to go out that night but I decided I wanted to stay home (because I thought that was what M wanted). But the girl I had made plans with showed up at my house anyway and I had decided then to go out after all. The next day I called M and told him what happened. He was furious and talked about breaking up and told me I lied to him and he had trust issues because of his ex girlfriend who attacked him with a knife or hatchet or something. And it was one thing after another like that. Often about things that I didn't think were 'lying'. The next thing I knew I wasn't going out anymore because he'd always get mad for some reason. I didn't see my friends. One good thing I guess is I stopped abusing drugs and alcohol. I thought it was all because of the long distance. I thought it would get better if I moved there. He did too. So after a couple months I saved up and moved out there. I got my own apartment. M was always threatening to leave me in fights and I was afraid to move in with him. We had even fought about that. He had brought it up and when I hadn't instantly agreed he'd threatened to leave me for it. He was mad at me for 'hesitating'. And when M got mad at that point it didn't matter what I did, there was never any making it better. But when I got there things only got worse. He would do things like look through my computer/phone and then find things to get mad at me about. I had some 'nudes' taken before I met him. He was furious I'd 'kept' that from him. I had considered doing cam modelling though had never gone through with it (again before we even met) . He accused me of lying and keeping things from him. On top of that, he still expected sex all the time. I still liked it, but I was so stressed from the move and from the constant crying and fighting that my libido was down. And this obviously made things even worse. I should have left. I should have let him go. But he would keep texting. Keep calling. And I loved him so much. One night when we were fighting. One of his friends had said they slept with me before M and I were together. I didn't remember. During that time we all drank and partied pretty hard and I didn't remember a lot of what happened. I didn't think we had but I didn't know. He accused me of lying. He said 'what, did he rape you too?' And that was the last time I've ever talked about that. M also started drinking. Sometimes I'd come over after work and he'd already have finished a bottle of whiskey. I remember one time I came home at 7pm. He was passed out on the bed. I woke him up (not knowing he'd been drinking) and he flew into a rage. He looked at the clock and saw it was seven and thought it was seven in the morning and I'd just come home. He screamed at me. And I just cried. Being with M was like that every day. I felt like I was constantly walking on eggshells. I never knew what he would get angry at me for next. He would tell me things like insecurity is very unattractive when I was being insecure. He would call with his ex girlfriend and tell me he still loved her even when he wouldn't tell me he loved me. He didn't say it until one night we got into the worst fight we'd ever had and I was going to leave. And eventually I became so unhappy and depressed that I did leave him. I moved to a new place and cut contact completely. Why do I still feel guilty? Why do I still feel like I somehow abandoned him? It's been six years. Why do I still think about it? I am married. I have kids. I have a wonderful, beautiful life. So why can't I shake this? Last year I had an anxiety attack so bad that I went to my doctor. I was diagnosed with anxiety and referred to a social worker. I tried a few sessions but I couldnt bring myself to trust her enough to talk about any of this. What's worse is that there aren't many mental health resources where I live. I just want to move on and stop thinking about it. Well if you lasted this long thanks for reading. I feel better getting it off my chest at least. [info] None [info] 1505152902
magicjem [info] I have anxiety and ADHD. I was diagnosed with anxiety first and took Prozac. Prozac and other SSRIs can take up to six weeks for full effect, but you might start to feel something within a week. I took Prozac for two years before I was also diagnosed with ADHD. Prozac is wonderful and really changed my life. My anxiety completely went  away, but some of my ADHD symptoms, like impulsivity and  difficulty with concentration, got worse. I was then diagnosed with comorbidity ADHD and when on medication for that. What I'm trying to say is if you take the anxiety medicine, it will absolutely take care of your anxiety even if the root of the anxiety is ADHD. Unfortunately, anti-anxiety medications can take a while to work unlike stimulants that that work immediately. It know it feels like a long time and can be frustrating. Believe me, I've been there. But once your anxiety medicine kicks in you'll wonder how you ever lived without it. Just be sure to keep an open dialog with your psychologist. Make a log of how you feel each day. If you don't feel like you're making progress, ask your psychiatrist to adjust your dose or switch to a different SSRI. Everyone has a different body chemistry and only you know how you feel. The psychiatrist knows this too and she is there to help. [info] ADHD-C [info] 1464220896
daydreamingtoomuch [info] Can you help me figure this out For as long as I can remember, since being a teenage up into my adult life I have been a day dreamer (for lack of a better word) It started with trying to fall asleep when I was younger, throwing some music on and getting lost in thoughts about myself and life... Not random floating thoughts but a very direct day dream. Almost like picturing myself in a movie for the night. One night i would just spend an hour thinking about winning the lottery and just very specific fantasys on the day to day life. Another night I'm saving the world. Another night I'm picturing my life with the cuttie I saw when I got coffee that day. This is gone on for years  and was always a way to cope. But I have been diagnosed with anxiety and biopolar when I was younger, have been dealing with mental health stuff my entire life. I'm not recieving any treatment or help right now. But I think this constant fantasy day in and day out is digging me into a hole.The way I interact with people and everyday life is affected. Instead of just responding to a question or issue, I play it out in my head. I imagine both ends of a conversation before it happens. Instead of reacting and living in the moment, im trying to play out a script. My mind can never just be quiet. Any "dead air" such as standing in the shower or whatever, I just start to day dream. If i try and focus on not thinking of anything music or random head chatter will pop in. There's a lot going on in my life right now, one of the few people I trust and could be honest with is leaving my life... and it's kinda been a wake up call to how unhappy I am in my day to day life. There are definitely other issues that I have, but I do think that what I'm asking about plays a huge role in my mental health and makes everything else worse.I don't know if this is something that a lot of people have, if its called anything, i just need to get myself healthy and don't know where to start [info] None [info] 1436125933
assume-youre-wrong [info] Same thing happened to me when I was diagnosed with anxiety and an eating disorder when I was younger. I had allowed the “demons” in my head. [info] None [info] 1570038478
peasm00sh [info] Health anxiety/obsession with health? Does anybody else obsess that they might be ill?I have been concerned for a while that I am unhealthily obsessed with my wellbeing. Every time something slightly out of the ordinary happens I Google it, terrify myself and then spend days agonising that I’m sick but can’t bring myself to call a doctor. I stay awake at night reading all the symptoms, make myself so upset, and worry so much that I end up wanting to kill myself because it never has a good ending. I don’t know what to do about this because I’m too scared to call a doctor. For background, I was diagnosed with anxiety about 2 years ago and underwent counselling. I was pretty much okay until January when I had a traumatic experience. [info] None [info] 1565117577
Avannar [info] Anticipatory anxiety used to be crippling to me. It was the main basis for my disabled status when I was diagnosed with anxiety. I overcame it in part with words like these:&gt;-Never let the future disturb you. You will meet it, if you have to, with the same weapons of reason which today arm you against the present. &gt;-For a man can lose neither the past nor the future; for how can one take from him that which is not his? So remember these two points: first, that each thing is of like form from everlasting and comes round again in its cycle, and that it signifies not whether a man shall look upon the same things for a hundred years or two hundred, or for an infinity of time; second, that the longest lived and the shortest lived man, when they come to die, lose one and the same thing.&gt;-Remember that neither the future nor the past pains thee, but only the present. But this is reduced to a very little, if thou only circumscribest it, and chidest thy mind, if it is unable to hold out against even this.&gt;-Is any man afraid of change? Why what can take place without change?&gt;-Nature which governs the whole will soon change all things which thou seest, and out of there substance will make other things, and again other things from the substance of them, in order that the world may ever be new.&gt;-The universe is change; our life is what our thoughts make it.All from Marcus Aurelius.For me, it was important to realize that those events, most of which had either not yet come to pass, or had occurred in the past and were thus behind me, would not, and could not, reach through time to harm me in the present. What, then, was causing me distress? Only myself. Only my own thoughts could be the culprit. I wondered, "Why am I self-harming in this way?" And that put an end to it. I realized the absurdity of allowing my mind to tear itself to pieces over things that hadn't even happened and chose to put a stop to it. [info] None [info] 1496628320
grittex [info] You can condition yourself out of that too. I was diagnosed with anxiety a while ago and decided, essentially, this is bullshit, I can see patterns of things that cause me to have these reactions and I can also see that the worst thing about every such situation is my reaction, not anything external (unlike your shock example). I embarked on a concerted course of doing things that I found terrifying and that evoked such a reaction, concentrated on minimising the reaction (because I *knew* that the situations themselves weren't so bad), and eventually retrained my brain not to freak out nearly as much. Having realised this I'm now working on other irrational fears like spiders. (And guess what? It takes time, but it's possible!)It's helped everything. I don't find much terrifying now, and even if I do, I cangenerally power through it. I don't think there's much it isn't possible to work through with enough willpower when it comes to anxiety. It's awkward talking to people who say they have anxiety problems because while I'm sympathetic to the feeling, I'm not very sympathetic to the lack of desire to work through it.  [info] None [info] 1460584118
jeanguardian [info] Fear Of Throwing Up On Stage (With Open Mic Approaching) Hey guys,My first open mic will be this Tuesday. I am prepared to only do moderately-well, but that's not the problem... My issue is that I have this irrational fear of throwing up in public. With the open mic coming, this has been transferred to it happening on stage.This strange phobia surrounds all aspects of my life... Even something as simple as riding the bus, or going to work can be a struggle because of it. I am diagnosed with anxiety and it feeds off that. However, my dream is to do standup and I will be going up no matter what. I have never thrown up in public other than once (and that was alcohol related). What can I do to get this idea out of my head? I really want to go up and experience this without having an abnormal amount of anxiety. Thanks. [info] None [info] 1426963717
allofthebeards [info] I should add that I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders and have taken anxiety medication in the past but have been very successful with my therapy and meditation this past year, and I'm happy not to be on the drugs while pregnant :) the drug I was on is not safe for babies  [info] Aug 22 [info] 1455050862
SillyBlackSheep [info] Years Long Coping Mechanism Not Working Anymore? (Confession) Alright, gonna be a longer one because I'm trying to still sort things out.Bit of information, I was diagnosed with anxiety at age 13. Had previous PTSD. I am 19 as of posting this.Since I was 8, "outside time," was a way for me to cope with things. Up until 14 what I did was pace in circles outside (or inside when weather was bad). I always did this in 4 hour intervals, sometimes 2 hours if it was a bad day, and I would often stay outide for 30 minutes to an hour. After I was 14 my parents built me a swingset that could support adult weight so I wasn't pacing so much. I still use it. Sort of. Get back to this in a minute.Why did I do this? Honestly, even as a kid it has helped me sort my thoughts out. I was always anxious, at least for as long as I could remember. My mom swears up and down that I was the opposite as a kid. Anyways. Doing such always helped me sort out thoughts and understand myself a little better. If I was lonely, I went outside. If something bad happened, I went outside. If something good happened I went outside. It even became a normal occurrence for me to be out at 3am. For some reason it helped me stay calm when things happened and it helped me understand my own emotions better.Now, I got into a serious relationship a few years ago. Even before this relationship my time outside dwindled slightly. Those 4 hour intervals became more like 5 or 6. Now, I love my man. Very happy in my relationship and he encouraged my outside time, as it was decent exercise and it kept my head on straight. But later on in the relationship my time dwindled even more. It soon became me going out about once a week before it completely stopped altogether. Not sure as to completely why, but I chalked it up to my heart eyes and new job on night shift.Well, I went out for the first time in 4 months. At first it felt like I was catching up to friends that didn't exist. After about 20 minutes though, I felt super depressed. I started criticizing my current stance in life. I wanted to cry. I looked around and felt disgusted. Now I am very confused. Yes, I have gone out while depressed or super upset before, but going outside is what often resolved it or at least let me feel better about it. Now going outside IS the issue? I feel scared. This has been my way to cope for YEARS and I have no other way to cope than this. What if this never works again? I can't afford to be in a terrible spot again. I've also noticed sleep is very difficult for me now.Help? I feel very alone in my ways to cope and I feel alone in my situation altogether. I need someone to talk to. [info] None [info] 1551090448
unofficialmoderator [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder. [info] None [info] 1576387188
throwaway04053242 [info] What age are you? Reading this, I identify with so much. I've convinced myself I'm suffering from a mental illness or a personality disorder. I have been diagnosed with anxiety...but listening to other people and listening to my friends and how they're feeling I'm starting to think this is how life is in our wonderful 20's?If you would like to talk feel free to message me.  [info] None [info] 1444598757
parisofpeople [info] Presentation Anxiety Tips? I'm a college student, and I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder since high school. I have a group presentation later today that's 30-40 minutes long, with me speaking for about 5 minutes of it. Problem is, I have severe anxiety with presentations, to the point where I shake, stutter, and forget everything I've said. I'm putting everything I need to say on notecards in case I totally blank (since there's about a 90% chance I will and I'm not prepared - this is a last minute presentation) but I'm tired of this happening for every presentation. Does anyone who has dealt with this problem have any tips or advice? [info] None [info] 1492441549
Sh4me [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was eleven years old, and after that did I learn that my dad and grandfather both had it as well. It came as a surprise, and I had no idea. I doubt that I picked it up from them either considering my dad didn't live with us, and I didn't spend a lot of time with my grandfather.  [info] None [info] 1376316684
veinpain [info] Yes! I've finally been officially diagnosed and am being treated. I first saw a terrible psychiatrist who tried to pin my pain on a past sexual trauma and then attempted to pawn me off on a psychotherapist (with no anxiety treatment). I didn't buy that because of years of imaging and diagnostics from specialists that clearly show a physiological basis for my pain. I wanted help for the severe anxiety I felt as a result of my pain. After that frustrating experience, I had a procedure using conscious sedation. The medication didn't work and I had a full blown panic attack during the procedure. It was horrible and humiliating. Thankfully I was scheduled to see a new psychiatrist right after that who was more willing to listen to me. I was diagnosed with anxiety and given medication to help on a daily basis and one for if I felt an episode of panic coming on (mostly social situations where I fear pain coming on). Just knowing I have it helps. I rarely use it now. I'm just glad someone took me seriously and listens. But, yes, pain and worrying about your pain and its effects can truly cause anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1501860291
Ginger29 [info] Yeah, I'm sure it's different.  It's always made me uncomfortable, too, way before I was diagnosed with anxiety, but I really didn't socialize with other kids and didn't learn how to behave "properly."  So now I'm trying to learn how to do all that stuff everyone knows how to do and it makes my anxiety insane.  But yeah, I'm basically uncomfortable with eye contact, which my loved ones know and allow, or I'm staring at strangers like a crazy robot.  It's awesome. [info] None [info] 1544423382
Vivian42069 [info] Considering dropping Vyvanse (30 mg) I started Vyvanse 5 days ago, and so far the side effects have been pretty bad, but I quite like it as a drug for what it offers me. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, if that assists in anyone's understanding.It was going perfectly fine, other than my mouth being dry almost constantly, occasionally having issues 'getting it up' , and not being able to tell when I was hungry or thirsty, until day 4. On day 3, I had a very stressful day and experienced gag-inducing nausea. Long drive home, bickering with friends, getting into a very yell-intense argument, and then day 4 approached. On day 4, I felt like I was dying. I checked my heart, and my heart-rate had almost doubled, and my pulse had increased by about 40-50%. I sat in my desk-chair nearly the entire day, called out of work, and my heart-rate never went down.Today is day 5, and my heart-rate and pulse is still awful but not as bad, and as a result of my dry mouth one of my lip-piercings got infected.I'm getting very seriously tired of this drug, I want to continue it but it just gives me problem after problem, and it's starting to put my health on the line.Do these symptoms fade away in your cases? How long was it until most of the side effects (if any experienced) wore off? [info] None [info] 1545449119
gateface970 [info] Getting ready to do something I never thought I was capable of! Ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety at the age of 12, it’s ruled my life in one way or another. As a young teen, I had a hard time going out to eat, as I was terrified at the thought of my food not being properly prepared. Traveling was always really difficult, and I’d almost always have panic attacks on the way to the airport, as well as on the first morning of my trip. As a high schooler, I didn’t ever consider going to college out of state, as the idea of being more than three hours from home was too much to handle. In college, studying abroad was always something I dreamed of doing, but I was too afraid to go to another country all alone. I failed a lot in college too- my anxiety stopped me from admitting that I was struggling, even though I knew that I would do better if I just asked for help. I’m 22 now, and in less than seven weeks, I will be packing up my car, driving 1,100 miles away from home, and starting my dream internship. I’ll be living in a new house, in a new state, with people I’ve only talked to a handful of times. I’ll be away from my family, my friends, and my pets for three months. I’m leaving everything I’ve ever known behind, and I couldn’t be more excited! If you told me four years ago that I’d be doing this, I would have laughed. Never in a million years did I think my anxiety would allow me to do something like this! When I received the email offering me this position, I started crying, because I was so proud of myself for the progress I’ve made. I know I’ll still have my anxiety when I’m down there, and I know it won’t be easy, but I refuse to let it rule my life anymore! [info] None [info] 1574241252
dancing-jukebox [info] hello :c im rlly sorry that u have to go thru all this and i just wna let uk that im taking up a lot of courage to speak up abt this as wellI've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder since sec two and I've been struggling with mental health since then.first off I wna rlly say that I'm proud of u for even taking a step in seeking help even if it was through an online platform bc that takes a lot of strength to take a step even if it's small to youi may not fully comprehend whatever you are going through but I hope these words can at least make u smile or pull through that few bits of time in a daya lot of ppl will tell you to suck it up and deal with it but im not gonna do that. for me bc im surrounded by a lot of realistic friends who give me pep talks, ive been accepting of this alr. but I think I'll try to empathize with you &lt;3I know it's rlly hard to cope and sometimes life can be a b*tch but uk what? ure a badder and tougher b*tch okay 😤😤😤 life will be tough but you know who's tougher? you!! whatever it is, I think that u shld prioritize ur health first but give urself small little goals to achieve every day to push urself and strengthen ur abilities.but trust me ik it's easier said than done. sometimes I can't get out of bed and I have to cancel plans. Sometimes I get anxiety attacks while studying. sometimes I don't even eat. but all these are part of the process and progress where YOU are gg to be better. it takes steps. even small ones, even if u end up taking a step back. it's okay. bc it's still progress. try to perhaps read up a chapter a day that's at least better than not trying. and ik u are trying very very hard and ik it's not easy. but sometimes when life hits u, u gotta hit it back. how so? by thinking-no. by knowing that YOU ARE BETTER AND YOU ARE STRONGER THAN YOU THINK YOU ARE. you are something. you are worth it. you can. and you will.i know this might sound stupid, but I used to talk to myself like that. and repeat "I can do this" every morning. anxiety still tackles me back nowadays and I do get relapses but uk what? I tell it to f*** off bc I'm gonna do whatever I want no matter how it tries to stop me.and I know u can do it too. I believe in you even if there are times u don't believe in yourself.I'm not the best motivator or the best person to seek comfort but I do care :') either way, no matter the results, u did what u can. and that's more commendable than getting straight As.just tryna spread love here, hope ure feeling a bit better after this ❤️ [info] Secondary [info] 1572116742
hlangley1996 [info] I can't say for sure because I'm not licensed. But I would say you are probably starting to show some signs. I know this because I have been diagnosed with anxiety and those are some of the things that I do.  [info] None [info] 1513949191
FlacOrGtfo [info] I switched from Vyvanse (40mg) to Evekeo (10mg x 2), since Vyvanse gave me side effects like some increased heartrate and anxiety, as well as agitating crashes and a little acid reflux.For me, Evekeo, which is instant release 50/50 d-amph/l-amph, kicks in after about 45 minutes, (gives me like 15 minutes of euphoria) and has about 1.5 or 2 hours of focus. Then I have a crash a few hours later and causes me to be perhaps worse than before. I actually have worse anxiety, longer periods of increased heartrate, and worse acid reflux. But the effects are going to vary a lot from person to person. Like, for me, I'm diagnosed with anxiety. At first, the crash effects made me feel sick like a cold or something and then settled down after a couple weeks.It is a temporary anti-depressant, I suppose. And it is energizing and helps me focus for a bit. But ultimately I want to find something else since I find the limited benefits and excessive side effects to be annoying... isn't Evekeo just a revival of benzedrine? [info] None [info] 1446471898
music_boy93 [info] I have not been diagnosed with OCD but I think it's possible I do have it. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder NOS and social anxiety. The reason I think OCD might be at least slightly probable is because of the poisoning fears when I was little, my social anxiety takes the form more of obsessive thoughts (I go over everything I had said and done in my mind after a social interaction to look for anything embarrassing or stupid I may have said/done), and I kind of have a very irrational fear of becoming a pedophile or being accuse of being a pedophile. I've had this fear for the last 5 years and it's slightly worsened over time. I have absolutely no attraction to children and pedophilia disgusts me so I know *logically* I'm not a pedophile and no one has any reason to think I am one. It wasn't until recently that I found out that Pedophile OCD was actually a thing. The only reason I'm not more certain that I have OCD is that I don't think I spend hours a day obsessing about the pedophile thing. It's more like short durations off and on during the day. I've never really kept track of how long it lasts and I feel like if I did, it'd only get worse.  [info] None [info] 1432007941
ConstipatedUnicorn [info] Can confirm, only place I go to for preventative care is my eye doctor.  And that's just once a year for updated prescriptions.  Only time anyone goes to the doctor around here is if something is already bothering them.  Our healthcare system is a bullshit scam.  But god forbid you mention anything even close to healthcare for everyone and suddenly everyone gets all bent out of shape because "socialism".  It amazes me how thoroughly brainwashed people are to think that what we have is a good system....When I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder several years ago it was due to a 5min ride in an ambulance my college called for me because I nearly fainted from a panic attack.  That ended up costing me 2000k.  I was 20.  What 20yr old college student has that kind of money?  I sure as hell didn't.  It took me nearly 2 years to pay that off. [info] None [info] 1555977242
weekeegan [info] In light of the pandemic, can my gallbladder surgery be postponed? And for how long? 25F, 5’5” 273lbs, 6 weeks postpartum. I don’t smoke or drink, no other health history or conditions. At 4 days postpartum, I went to the emergency room with chest pain. I was diagnosed with anxiety and sent home. The following day, I still had pain but it was more localized to the right side. It hurt to lay on that side, hurt to breath deeply, and hurt to walk. I called my OB and she had me get an ultrasound done on my gallbladder.  The results were: “tiny nonshadowing gallstones are suspected layering dependently. No secondary sonographic signs of acute cholecystitis”. I was referred to a general surgeon and was scheduled for surgery at an ASC last Monday.I ended up cancelling my surgery. The Thursday before I was supposed to go in, my husband (who is immunocompromised/on biologics for IBD) was sent home from work on paid leave at the advice of his doctor because he is in the high risk group for developing complications if he contracts the virus. I panicked and promptly cancelled my surgery because I was afraid of going out in public and bringing the virus home to him.I have not had pain like I did when I first went to the ER. However, I also suffer from Costochondritis so it is hard for me to determine if the mild discomfort in my ribs/sternum is related to my gallbladder or not. I feel nauseous after almost every meal, even though I am eating a low fat vegan diet. As I type this, it has been almost three hours since I last ate and I still feel sick and am belching a lot. I have also lost 30lbs since I gave birth. My question: Can I continue to postpone my surgery? Should I go ahead and reschedule it? I hate feeling sick every time I eat, but I do not know what the right choice is to make for my husband’s sake. My state is currently under a stay at home order (my surgery would be excused) and I was just furloughed, so things are very serious here. I don’t know if I fully trust the opinion of my doctor because ACS’s are currently limited to urgent cases only, and I’m afraid I might just look like a paycheck to him in these desperate times. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1585612084
thealbinoemo [info] Thanks...I was diagnosed with anxiety and I'm still trying to get through that, but it's tough.  This helped though, thanks again  [info] None [info] 1469567078
OnshorePlaysYT [info] Like 2 or 3 years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. But I got rid of it. Now it’s back and I haven’t been to the doctor yet to see. I go every 3 months. Last time was like 1 or 2 months ago. [info] None [info] 1567736442
Kephrii [info] Absolutely! I definitely need to address my own insecurities. I am diagnosed with anxiety which makes it quite difficult. I am seeing a behavioral health specialist and am trying to work through my issues. Unfortunately, it isn't something that I can just magically get over overnight. [info] None [info] 1531382767
girlwiththebeetattoo [info] I'm not sure how this would hurt your app? Schools won't have access to your medical records. I was diagnosed with anxiety and it was a non-issue because I didn't have to disclose it anywhere. If its really something you're struggling with, you should seek out a diagnosis and help, because its better to treat things like this early than to wait for it to get worse.  [info] MS1 [info] 1536799756
throwaway002288 [info] I have googled CPTSD which actually includes that you may suffer years of abuse that cannot be linked to one specific event, so I felt more that I may be suffering from this. I didn't realise that there is a CPTSD subreddit till I have posted this. I have episodes of crying and panicking due to my past where my boyfriend has to hold me, I was diagnosed with anxiety but not stress (the center diagnoses stress disorders too).  [info] None [info] 1551966981
DragonLordOfCookies [info] Is something clinging onto me? I get panic attacks. A LOT. I am diagnosed with anxiety and know the precautions and signs of them coming,but then theres... something else. A cold feeling runs down my spine. It digs metaphorical claws into me. I freeze. I sink. I sink into a vortex of everything I fear. Its out of the blue. Ill wake up and suddenly it shall consume my thoughts. Sometimes I feel a presence around,part of the room is covered in shadows more then usual,synchronicities stop when its around. I question everything I believe in,Nothing helps. I cant call for guidance,Family members cant calm me down, the only way to get rid of it is to fill my mind with something else. Ive talked to plenty of people before,even a psychiatrist and psychologist. None of them understand. No one seems to relate to the feeling... besides one person. They were a wiccan and suggested a cleansing with gems and candles (my only possessions at the time for any form of ridding myself of... it), and it was gone! For about a week. Thats all I ever get. A week here and there without it. Does anyone... have any clue what to do? Im usually a sane person who loves evidence but... all thats thrown out the window when I spiral. [info] None [info] 1527264923
HiMyNameIsThrowawayy [info] I Think I May Have Given Myself Anxiety I used to be a confident person; I was never hugely outgoing, but neither was I an introvert, per se. I was living my life pretty happily.But, over the course of time, I started to develop little tics. Well, not tics as such, but I'd do this thing where I'd rub my hands together whenever I was nervous. I also lost my ability to speak well. I used to be a good speaker, but now I sort of stutter. I don't actually have a stutter, but, if I'm nervous, I will trip over my words and sentences, and have to start them multiple times in order to actually get them out.I have been diagnosed with anxiety by a counsellor, which would be fine (more or less), but my problem is that this started occurring when I was doing reading into mental illnesses.I'm worried that my knowledge of anxiety gave me a sort of psychosomatic anxiety that then morphed into actual anxiety, and I don't know how to bring it up with anyone because I'm afraid they'll say I was bullshitting about the whole thing. [info] None [info] 1508060196
noelle1990 [info] My mother is literally the devil So I am fairly new to reddit but I thought I would write something here in hopes that you all have any advice for me or anyone who can relate.My (29F) mother (50F) has been a terrible parent for my entire life. She was relentlessly abusive both mentally and physically for my entire upbringing. When I think about her and the memories we shared growing up, I cannot think of one memory that I had around her when I wasn't in a constant state of fear. She would do cruel things to my sister and I. Things your wouldn't do to your worst enemy let alone your children. Mommy dearest type of stuff.Throughout my life I also noticed that my mom was a habitual liar. She is the only person that I know that has had 5 different types of cancer  (including brain cancer) and has never lost a hair on her head let alone die from it. Ohh and not to mention the time she had HIV from some guy she was messing with and then I go off to University all confused and then I come back and she has a new man who seems to know nothing about any of her illnesses and she never spoke of having HIV ever again. One time I tried to bring it up and she hushed me super quickly as if I said something wrong. Both me and my sister have terrible mental health issues. Mine showed up later in life and my sister has been dealing with her mental health ever since we were children. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD. I am 100% positive that the PTSD stems from my mother.I haven't spoken to my mom in years up until sept  2019 when we bumped into each other at my great grandma's 100th bday party. I knew she would be there and I was scared to death of her walkijg through the door. My grandma who doesn't have a relationship with my mother either reassured me that if she tried anything she would be right by my side. We all got through the ceremony and I wasn't sure when I would see her again so before she got to her car I mustered up the strength to walk up and tell her I love her no matter what and hug her and the only response she could give me was "Ok thanks, aren't you going to say hello to Brian?" Brian is her 5th husband and she said all of this with a straight face. I of course said "No" and walked away annoyed that she couldnt put me first for one moment. Again it was all about her man.  And I forgot to mention that she also has 2 new children 1 of whom she obtained by taking my sister's young friend to court claiming she is a bad mom after my sister asked my mother to help her friend get on her feet. My mother of course obliged and took this poor young girl to court knowing she comes from an immigrant family and knows nothing about court systems. I have no idea how she acquired the other child but I pray for both of them. It weirdly feels like some sort of sick way for my mom to try to do parenting all over again. Down right creepy. To wrap up I guess I just need advice on what to do because I just found out that apparently my mother really is sick this time but it's hard to believe because she has lied so much about illness in the past.  And on top of that on the same day that I found out she could really be sick this time, I also found out from a childhood friend who's mom knows my mom, that my mom has been going around telling people that the young boy she got custody of by lying on his mother in court is actually my lovechild that I had with the heir of the ford fortune and that I gave him to her because I couldn't care for him. Keep in mind, I am a huge LESBIAN! Like a dominant lesbian. Not to say I wouldn't have a child but a lovechild is pushing it. And if I had a child I certaibly would never leave them with my insane, manipulative, highly intelligent, evil, lying mother because I know there is a chance I will never get him back because she is just that smart and diabolical. Im literally not making any of this up. Im torn and not sure what to do. I kind of just hope she is really terminally ill this time so all of the madness can stop.I am open to your thoughts. [info] None [info] 1580209703
foodcourtdruide [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was younger. It's similar to any addiction, in that it never actually leaves you, but you learn to manage it. As an adult, I have some rough moments, but overall I'm able to live a very normal life.I have no sympathy for Fez. His anxiety is just an extension of his extreme narcissism. Everyday Fez chooses his own safety and comfort over everything else in his life. He goes to a job where he literally stares off into space 90% of the time, where he's not growing as a person or improving others around him. When given opportunities to grow, he denies them and hides behind his anxiety. When he has a conflict with someone, he always looses control of his emotions and uses any power he has to hurt that person. He has no remorse or guilt in doing so, either. In 2015, we use terms like "anxiety" and "narcissist" to make excuses for the fact that Fez is just an asshole. He's an asshole that believes since he's been doing this for so long, he shouldn't have to try hard anymore. He's mentioned several times that "Shelby is like me, but I wasn't this way at Shelby's age." Meaning that Fez's behavior is acceptable because he's "paid his dues".  [info] None [info] 1426686272
FXWare [info] You just described my situation. The feeeling that everyone is judging me, stopping myself form saying what i'd like to be able to say, second guessing every possible move. It's like life is passing by and i'am too afraid to get in it. I've been diagnosed with anxiety troubles a few years ago, medication helps but I still haven't figured out how to change my own self, how to be the person i used to as a kid.I know you may be afraid to go see a professionnal, but seeing a doctor is the best advice i can give you [info] None [info] 1432523341
justdumbthoughts [info] Really Messing Up Let me start off by saying this.  I'm 17, a junior in high school, have a job, a car, a beautiful girlfriend, but I struggle to feel "right".By this I mean, I wake up every morning, and I feel like I'm in stuck in a dream I can't escape.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and currently being looked at as "depressed", but even the therapist is having a hard time confirming this.But this leads me into a problem.  I'm struggling in school.  Bad.  My GPA for this year is probably below a 2.0.  I am also dyslexic, but thats not what seems to affect me.  It's the fact that, I have no motivation to do work.  I know it may seem like I'm lazy, and hell, maybe I am just lazy.  But as soon as I'm handed a work sheet, I stare at it, and tell myself to do it, over and over again.  It just never works out, I find something to distract me, so I have an excuse for myself not to do it.So far it looks like I'm not getting into any colleges I want, and may not even pass this year.  This is killing me, because I'm also freaking out that my girlfriend and my friends are going to look at me as the idiotic kid who knows nothing.  I don't really know what I'm asking for here, but just anything would help. [info] None [info] 1484201055
hollywoodshowbox [info] Believe it or not I was diagnosed as being in a depressive state three weeks ago. I suffered from disordered eating habits (reading: anorexia &amp; bulimia, not at the same time) for four years (recovered now for a little over a year). I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder... last year? My motivation is to be the best possible version of myself (BPVoM), whatever that is. Sitting on my ass crying because life didn't work out the way I thought it would is *not* something the BPVoM would do. Moping about in an eternal grey is *not* something the BPVoM would do. It's really, really hard to develop this attitude and has taken a while to turn it into a habit -- but now that I've locked it in... it's just easier to cope with shit, you know? Find whatever works for you and go off of that. I was never a believer in the "one size/rule/belief fits all" thing. Discover a philosophy, mission, whathaveyou -- and make it your own. Good luck! You can do this.  [info] Female [info] 1398840183
Uhhlaneuh [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD.  I’m on medication right now. I already take tons of meds (allergy meds, adderall, celexa, birth control, asthma) the last thing I want to do is get more meds. I was hoping for something therapeutic or a mental exercise I could do.Currently wedding planning and I obsess everyday about losing weight (although I’ve been like that for 15+ years) and gained 60lbs between 2014-2015.  I’ve never been this big. But as my plate gets fuller as I start accumulating more responsibilities, my brain just shuts off. All I want to do is sleep.  [info] None [info] 1507220869
goldinkstar [info] Struggling with my anxiety disorder I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and have had it for near 8 years. I know that the gospel tells us to worry for nothing for God is our provider, which I whole heartedly believe in. But, sometimes I am wrought with fear and am flooded with so many "what if's" and that everything is going wrong and I wonder if I am really doing what God wants. After lots of crying I usually calm down, it's a typical panic attack for me. But I am embarrassed that as I christian, I suffer from anxiety. Of all people, wouldn't it be thought that christians would be the least likely to suffer from anxiety? And is my anxiety a product of me not trusting God enough or perhaps a product of sin?  And should I share the fact that I have anxiety with others? Thank you [info] None [info] 1419232213
cahleeeen [info] I want to know what it's like to live without worry of falling into hole or flying into the sky. I would kill to know what it's like to not have anxiety over everything. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorders since I was 14. Ten years has been enough, then BP came into the mix two years ago and finally diagnosed in April. I want to live a quiet mind life where you can focus and not worry and completely free yourself from the grasp of chemicals in your brain without taking nine pills a day [info] None [info] 1437139698
Europe2014 [info] I made it till 37 days sober...had 1 drink on Friday... :-( Looking for tips on how to deal with high anxiety/stress in a mingling/work situation without self-medicating with alcohol? I have just requested a badge-reset. I must unfortunately confess; I had 1 drink on Friday at an event at work. I know there is *NO* excuse for drinking... I shall still tell what triggered me to slip, because I'm looking for advice on how to handle it *differently* in similar situations in the future... On Friday I was really stressed, I was late, and very nervous, for a meeting in a restaurant with my boss and a client...  I stuttered as I greeted the client, my heart was beating, my palms sweating, my lips shaking, anxiety attack creeping up on me stronger and stronger.... I just could not resist the urge of taking a drink with my boss and the client, and the moment I took the drink, I felt calmer, my anxiety disappeared after 5 minutes. (In hindsight, kind of bad, because drinking "helped" me *there and then*). I stopped after 1 drink, so I did not get drunk. I still woke up the next day **really regretting**... I thought to myself "37 days sober, and now I'm back at 0 days, that sucks!". I will get back to doing my best to stay sober of course!.. I will also post here more often (I read often but don't post much)!The 37 days I managed to go without a drop of alcohol were actually *not* difficult! During those 37 days I barely thought about alcohol, and I only slightly craved it about 5 times, 3 of those times were at work (alcohol is *always* served at meetings with clients at my work, I love my job, but there is pressure from my boss - and temptation - of drinking to close sales and deals with clients etc.) The other 2 occasions were I craved alcohol the last 37 days were during high levels of anxiety/stress, and I craved it not to "unwind", but just to calm my nerves, because I was late to meetings/deadlines, and/or I was afraid that people would see just *how* stressed I felt on the inside... **In the past I've used alcohol mainly as a way to put on a mask**; to be able to appear calm, carefree, outgoing and smily, both towards my boss and clients, but also in social settings with friends... I've actually not had any negative social experiences with drinking, never blacked out, puked, or made a fool out of myself (as I know of...I know alcohol can make you blind). **My main motivation for quitting alcohol is my health**. I've not been a daily drinker, "only" about 1-4 times a week, yet enough that I got a mild attach of pancreatitis last fall, and I don't want to ever experience a real pancreatitis attack... :-(**Any tips on how to deal with stress/anxiety without self-medicating with alcohol, please?** I'm open to all tips except from "quit your job" (that would be chickening out, and being unemployed and unable to pay rent and become homeless won't be good for my sobriety either.)  By the way, I am diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks by a doctor, I have been given Benzodiazepine by my doctor, but somehow they don't work on calming me at all, they only make me sleepy and unable to focus at work tasks. I'm not using any drugs, and I don't really want to either... The only thing I've thought about testing is Beta Blockers, because they don't create physical addiction but can help with racing heart and shaking... (By the way, my shaking is not a withdrawal symptom from alcohol, I never drank enough to be physical dependent, and I even had these shaking attacks before I turned 18, before I started drinking alcohol...)Thanks for reading. :-) [info] 438 days [info] 1393264176
Ballistic87 [info] It's pretty much on my record so any doctor I go to will see that I've been diagnosed with anxiety. But it's really wierd and affecting my day, for some reason it's worse when I keep a regular sleep scedule.  [info] None [info] 1478028210
Mr_Belch [info] I used to get this a few years ago before I was diagnosed with anxiety. Never put two and two together now that it was probably caused by the anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1541344064
seagull19 [info] Same thing happened to me when I was diagnosed with anxiety. It took me a long time to finally ask my mom to get help, but after my first therapy session, she wanted to know all the details about what I was going through, and what I talked about in my session. I did the same as you, told her I didn’t want to talk about it. She cried and cried and cried and tried to guilt me into telling her what was going on. Like you, it didn’t make me want to open up to her. I moved out about a month ago. Best thing to have ever happened to me. I wish you the best, you are not alone.  [info] None [info] 1540085494
reggspregg [info] I completely understand this, but I have to disagree. People who are actually diagnosed with anxiety disorder usually go to therapy, take medication, or both. Me on meds versus me off of medication are two completely different people. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a few years ago, and no one that I have met in recent years could tell that I have anxiety. The people who are outgoing and claim they have anxiety usually are ones that have been treated for a while or are complete liars and attention seekers.I understand that a lot of people fake mental disorders, but don't assume that every outgoing person who claims they have anxiety is lying. [info] None [info] 1539883294
CrazyToastedUnicorn [info] As someone who has anxiety and family members with and without it we've discussed it a lot. It's tough for people without anxious thoughts to properly grasp what it's like, their brain just doesn't think like that. You may be able to explain things to them that could help them understand what you're going through. For example my dad is prone to anxiety but my mom is not so she wasn't really of a certain mindset about it either way until I was diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd. Now she knows that yes I may be having irrational thoughts and I probably know that truly they're just that but in that moment my brain is convincing me that yes that bridge will collapse the moment our car starts across because fear is all too powerful especially to an anxiety prone mind. She knows that I will not be talked out of those thoughts and that I don't need to be told that I should just think of something else. I went to a therapist and it helped but it's still something I continuously deal with but my parents are there if I ever need them. Parents most often times are our biggest supporters and they like to know that sometimes we still need them, if you let them feel like they can help you in dealing with what you're going through even if it's just a shoulder to cry on or a hug or to talk to them to take your mind off things it could help them grasp a fraction of what you're dealing with. This is long, I'm sorry. Just know that you're not alone in your anxiety, there are tons of us around who get it. If you feel that you want to ever just talk without any judgement I'm willing to listen and that goes for anyone. I know what it's like to struggle and feel like the people around you couldn't possibly know what your dealing with. It can get easier.  [info] None [info] 1497521984
Christophk412 [info] I’m lost I genuinely don’t know if I’m depressed, and I don’t want to put off the impression that I’m depressed and all fucked up since I don’t really know. I was diagnosed with anxiety at a young age and it eventually turned into a panic disorder. I would have horrible panic attacks where I thought I would die, medication helped me suppress it and eventually I grew out of it. I’m still a slightly anxious person, I don’t have panic attacks anymore though. But recently I’ve been feeling very off. I guess I would call it depressed. I have a severe lack of motivation, low self esteem, very little passion, and no hobbies. I know that I’m not living right, I’m doing something wrong, but I don’t have the motivation to help myself. I’ve become careless, I’ve started using drugs recreationally and making choices I know aren’t the best. I’m scared for my health but I don’t know if I’m depressed or if I’m in a funk. Most of the people around me have some type of mental disorder. My girlfriend is very anxious and a bit depressed. I wanna be there for her, I wanna make her feel better. My friends are depressed and anxious. Nobody is ok at this point. Maybe I’m doing the best out of all of them, but I feel so lost. I don’t really have anyone to talk to, and I wish I have no guidance from my parents or any adults. I’ve just been venting a lot here today. [info] None [info] 1549859279
mariel_j [info] At 15 I was diagnosed with anxiety and dysthymia. Worked very well with Prozac and Ativan for about 15 more years. CBT therapy is still very helpful. Don't get discouraged! [info] None [info] 1484146566
GiraffeJaf [info] HIPAA violation? Recently I went to a dermatologist for acne treatment. I ended up just seeing his RN, who wanted to put me on Accutane. After I agreed to it she got started on the process was asking me medical history questions, including mental health. I told her I was diagnosed with anxiety in the past. She then paused and told me I needed to see my psychiatrist and get permission from her before starting Accutane.  I complied and my psychiatrist told me it was fine. I thought that the nurse wanted my psych to send a note to the dermatology dept but then I found out that she instead went through my psychiatric health information to check if my doctor wrote anything down that would indicate if it was okay or not for me to take Accutane. Is it a violation of HIPAA for a nurse to access my medical records like this? I don’t feel comfortable having a derm nurse looking through my psych notes, but I’m not sure if it’s an actual violation.EDIT: I am located in California! [info] None [info] 1571161547
HamiltonLBBH [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety. I'll have to schedule an appointment. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1567238818
djmor [info] Great post, thank you very much for your explanation.What about "fun" things? When you're doing something you find enjoyable, are you able to focus? When I went to college in Biotech, I absolutely loved it. I loved being in the lab, I always memorized every step of everything I needed to do. However, when it came time to writing down lab reports, english papers, math, it would take hours to get a few pages done, even if I did nothing but sit in front of the work. I'd start thinking and writing, and then my imagination would just slip in and start singing music, or slideshows of what I did in the lab, or play situations over and over in my mind and before I realize it ten minutes passed by and I'm only a sentence further. I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues, and I hear that those are often symptoms. Unfortunately, my anxiety meds that would quiet the voices would also cause me to become incredibly lethargic, enough that my creativity was stifled and I was unable to write anything other than short robotic sentences.I find it quite insulting that people would claim you had "an easy button" for work. But that's the nature of humans, they don't normally understand something without living it themselves. Mental disorders are horrible and complex things, and being "lucky" enough to have to take ritalin, or in my case valium, is a common thought for people who have no qualms abusing prescription drugs. In a way, it's also unfortunate that the drugs are so good at what they do that those that don't need it feel they want it. [info] None [info] 1402318091
Maraude8r [info] Got 13 points, but I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder too. Honestly I feel most of these questions are really difficult to relate to. The schizoid answer to most of them is probably "I avoid getting into a situation like that to begin with, but if I have to I guess I'll do it" and then the anxious ones among us will be concerned with the results just because theyre anxious in general, not because of the emotional rejection. [info] None [info] 1520209401
CyanHalo [info] Yes, I've been diagnosed with anxiety/adhd for 15 years and was diagnosed ptsd from witnessing several overdoses and near deaths of my ex husband. My daughter is only 4 but she does display similar symptoms that I had when I was a child with both anxiety and adhd. I'm not jumping to conclusions with her and it hasn't gotten to the point in which I feel like she needs to be checked out for it. I'm lucky to be able to work from home the vast majority of the time so I would be there to make sure that the animals had exercise and training. I'd also like to have both of them trained to be service animals. I'm willing to invest in it financially for both to get them trained correctly. I'm picking out not "favorite" animals necessarily but I have had this planned since 2012 with the pig and was just waiting until both of my dogs had the end of life with no new animals being spoiled. I have wanted a pig due to the intelligence and longer life span. My daughter has wanted a husky since she first saw one. I hear what you guys are saying and I get it. I am sure that its an imposition to not only have me and my kid there but my animals there for them. Even if they don't have any responsibilities for them, its the principle I think you're really meaning that is the issue. In my brain, I'm all justifying it because I'll be there or bringing them to the office with me 100% of the time. I also justified it because my sheepdog was massive with even more hair and the most hyper dog that I've ever encountered until late in life. I understand by hearing your feedback that regardless of the justifications, its the principle and a respect thing. So, if I was to get 1. The pig would certainly be smaller than a husky and I'd be able to litter box train or adopt one that already is. In my head that means it would be the better option. However, I think the pig word for the parents is an unknown and that is more of a concern.What do you think is the best compromise for the time being? You are right and I should compromise. I'm picking out not "favorite" animals necessarily but I have had this planned since 2012 with the pig and was just waiting until both of my dogs had the end of life with no new animals being spoiled.  [info] None [info] 1523371230
BlackOmegaPsi [info] Found myself in a career trap I landed myself in a really shitty spot concerning my career, so this is going to be long post.&amp;#x200B;I’ve had a successful journalism/PR career of over 10 years. Started as a journalist, then an editor, then transferred to working as a press relations officer in a large IT company, where I’ve worked for almost 5 years. I was in charge of all press-related communications, did some branding work, a lot of copywriting. I had a great boss, and was the public figure of my company. We had free gym, the commuting was nice, and I had friend there.The only downsides - no room for promotion, and the pay could’ve been better. I’ve a small credit, but it still entails monthly payments. In November, I was approached by another IT company with an offer of almost 2 times my salary at the last place and the position of a PR Director. I was to manage all of the company’s PR as a lead. This other company belongs to a much more prestigious holding than my last one, I was promised interesting press and brand strategy projects, so, with a heavy heart, I took the offer.See, my mother is battling a serious illness, and even though me and my family (father and mother) are financially independent, I figured it’d be better if I had additional security just in case. Well, the job turned nothing like was promised. I’m not a lead - there’s no PR team, and the tasks are on a level, if not lower, as with on my previous place. I’ve risen the question of the team, and I was met with a resounding “no, we don’t have the capacity”. The worst part, is that this company’s PR slant is in a whole other direction - instead of press/branding, the company is focused on events and HR-related communications. I’m forced to do the full-spectrum work of a whole PR AND event-management department. I have to do a shitload of buying and coordinating purchases, something that was below my position and pay-grade at the other job.Ergo, there’s an overwhelming amount of entry-level, menial stuff, instead of the promised lead and creativity. My boss is chaotic, heaping an inordinate amount of tasks, forgetting to set deadlines for half of them, then demands accountability.The cherry on top? In 2011 I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, was successfully medicated. The next bout of the anxiety happened in 2015, that too, was successfully dealt with. I feel like the illness is returning - the combination of a lot of stress, surgery in late 2018, my mother’s problems, house renovations, etc, coming to all of this.Now, I feel horrible. I hate not only this new job and feel like it’s a mistake (I cry every day before and after work), I hate my career prospects and the whole profession as a whole. The mere thought of doing what I do makes me physically sick (I even had full-blown nausea and vomit over it). Even thinking that I somehow change and apply to a new, but similar job, gives me the same awful response. I dread every day, and what’s worse, I’m saddled with a huge amount of guilt:\- my parents were very happy with my new job. I’ve tried to talk to them about my feelings, and well, it amounted to “suck it up, everyone has to deal with not liking their job. What can you do other than PR for a respectable pay and your credit obligations? Nothing”.\- being unhappy about my career makes my sick mother unhappy as well, and I don’t want to contribute to any possible negativity my situation brings to here health.In 1 month my probation ends, and I almost want to fail. Sure it could hurt my reputation on the market, but thing is, I don’t want to do this anymore. I feel utterly trapped. [info] None [info] 1579499762
voidkilla [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and agoraphobia. I was stuck in my house for a year and half. With faith, hard work, and citalopram I'm out in the world again working 70 hour weeks, paying bills, married, and HAPPY! [info] None [info] 1467833091
digitallambs [info] The problem is I absolutely love and am super passionate about everything  I'm doing and I want to take more and more complex classes but my brain has recently just stopped cooperating and thats the most frustrating part of it all. I'll talk to my advisors and plan to figure it out over the summer. I'm just hoping it clears up like the crippling anxiety in the beginning (like taking 3-4 hrs to get the courage to drive 3 mins to the grocery store for bread bad) but to be fair I've been diagnosed with anxiety and thats why I was originally put on SSRIs bc my doc didn't believe I had migraines even though when I went to a neuro they were so severe she rushed me into an MRI to make sure it wasn't a tumor (don't know if thats common but it wasn't all in my head that's for sure) [info] None [info] 1492610996
painfanatic [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety before discovering and being diagnosed with ADHD. The major difference between people with anxiety disorders (especially OCD) and people with just regular anxiety (all people who are not psyocopaths experience some anxiety!) is long-term irrational fears. Like being incredibly afraid the door is unlocked, even though you have already checked it is locked three times. If you have the Netflix there is a show called Obsessed that will give you tons of insight into people with chronic anxiety disorders and OCD. This will help you know if you have it or not (very possible to have ADHD and an anxiety disorder).That being said, people with ADHD are prone to having more anxiety than others. This is because our ADHD causes us to make many mistakes or failures in life. We are constantly worrying about the consequences or repeating the mistakes. We are also worse in social situations which can lead us to be anxious as parties, in group settings, etc (making such symptoms worse). However, I have found focusing on my ADHD and coping with life from an ADHD perspective a million times more effective than trying to treat an anxiety disorder was. Now I don't think I had an anxiety disorder at all ( though I used to often have panic attacks, nightmares, insomnia, etc). This is because my anxiety was/is justified (not irrational). My anxiety symptoms of have improved drastically since I started medicating and learning how to cope with ADHD, even though I really haven't done anything to treat anxiety since I was diagnosed with ADHD.If you feel like your talking therapist is not really listening and understanding your point of view , dump them and try someone else. It's one thing to disagree, it's another to not listen. That's pretty much 80% of their job! [info] None [info] 1429314388
catnipdealer16 [info] Does your school have a health clinic on campus? You could try seeing a psychologist there. I recommend going to a doctor. Like the above comment, it's true that anxiety can become so intense that it's obvious something is wrong with our chemicals. Don't live in constant fear when there's great medicines out there that will help!Also just tell your parents "I was diagnosed with anxiety" - I find saying I was diagnosed means to other people that someone medically trained informed you and so there's no skepticism that you self diagnosed (which can lead to people not believing you or taking it as seriously). [info] None [info] 1480768034
Cetrinite [info] Anxiety vs Asthma I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder recently and have had asthma since I was born.  I am having difficulty distinguishing between the two. Is it safe to use my inhaler even if I don't actually need to? How can I tell the two apart? [info] None [info] 1441891679
frieswithketchup [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder by a psychiatrist.I tried telling my mom about it, and now she thinks that I was molested or something equally bad happened to me. But it didn't.I went on a date recently with a really great guy. And when he tried to hold my hand or lay his arm around my shoulders I was in total panic mode. Interestingly, I don't have a problem with crowds, when I know any touching is unintentional. [info] None [info] 1438605870
bann529 [info] Why do I pick at everything? It's not my skin it's everything else. For example, my phone cases has to be the solid silicone with no edges other wise I shred them. I destroyed an otterbox case that had the rubber inner case and hard plastic outer case within a couple weeks of getting it. Even with solid cases I still pick at the edges like pulling them away from my phone. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder, not specified and adhd but that diagnosis might be changing. I understand that it's probably a nervous habit but why manifest as picking? And how do I get myself to stop? I've gotten better about just walking away from something before I destroy it but stuff still ends up torn from constantly messing with it. [info] None [info] 1541224006
throw_it_away_2000 [info] I [30 F] have been estranged from father [59 M]for years and he is now very ill. Not sure how to feel. Father was/is an alcoholic and chain smoker since I was born. He was mentally abusive but not physically abusive towards my sister, my mother and I. I moved out at nineteen once I had enough money to support myself and have had very limited contact with him since. My mother had a very ugly divorce from him after my sister and I had moved out. He had hidden money from her and was able to afford a better lawyer so he basically took her to the cleaners and she has been struggling since. He moved into an apartment and eventually bought a house with the money he got from the divorce. My mother and I have been to AA meetings and have tried to support each other the best we can, but she was never able to cut off ties with him.The past few years he has turned into a recluse due to his drinking. Thankfully he does not drive while drinking, but that means he would not leave the house to get food and supplies for long periods of time. During all this time he is getting sicker and sicker; losing teeth, becoming emaciated, etc. But still my mother would call him frequently to check up on him and help him in any way she can. Last year he reports to her that he thinks he had a mild stroke. We all agree that the symptoms sound like a stroke, and I finally get up the courage to see him and ask him to see a doctor but he refuses and has not seen a doctor since. Since then he has gotten significantly sicker and my mother confesses to me that for the past few months she has been doing all his grocery shopping and chores since he can barely move around the house and can barely speak. Now he is telling her that he finally thinks it's time to go to a doctor or hospital since he thinks that his body is finally failing him. I want to be there for my mother since I know she still loves him, but I have had a lot of anger and resentment towards him for a long time and I have tried to distance myself from him for many reasons. He was always very selfish and cruel towards my mother and has done things in my eyes that are unforgivable. I am being pressured by the rest of my family to be a, "good daughter" and help out more since he is probably dying, but I have no desire to be a part of any of this. I am not close with my extended family so I don't really have anyone to go to for advice. His drinking and illness was always kept very private and only we know what is going on. I feel as though I should have written him off long ago, but now I am in a very hard place. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and thinking about dealing with all this is bringing me close to a panic attack. Any advice about how to deal with all this would be greatly appreciated.---   **tl;dr**: Estranged alcoholic father is close to death. Do I force myself to be involved during what could be his last days or do I keep my distance? [info] None [info] 1415657800
cryms0n [info] There is a lot of fear and worry about being addicted to these medications, and rightfully so. You cannot just stop taking a medication, you become dependent on it. But that is because it is supplying your body with what it's currently lacking - serotonin (in the case of SSRIs). I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder/panic disorder at the young age of 12, and was given 20mg Paxil. Sure, I could have not taken it, especially because at the time they had no idea what the hell the long-term effects were (and they still don't, really). But therapy wasn't helping, my anxiety was too severe. I could not leave the house, live a normal life. Is that really a way to live? Another redditor stated it very clearly - if you had diabetes, would you stop taking insulin? Anxiety D/Depression are all physiological problems. They can be managed mentally of course, but if you are unable to even function as a result, then that balance needs to be treated medically. Paxil worked for me amazingly for 14 years. Only recently has it not been enough to sustain my anxiety (I spent the last 4 or so years playing with doses, bringing myself to as low as 12.5 mg), and now I'm up to 30 mg, the highest I've ever been in my life. I tried everything I could before having to up the dose, but I finally decided that it's not worth living in constant fear of death and a negative future. The doctor told me that these pains won't go away overnight. I've put my body through hell for three months, and my body is telling me now it's not very happy. I have to be patient, and control my anxiety before my symptoms begin to dissipate. Ativan/Valium and other benzodiazepenes work in a different way, they simulate a depressant effect on you in a manner very similar to alcohol - you become numb, slightly disoriented, and don't give a f*** about anything. They are short-lasting and HIGHLY addictive, you develop tolerance to them quick - and lastly, they are not solving your problem, they are merely half-day crutches to take the edge of things. [info] Health Phobia | Panic D. [info] 1354992637
NCTrumpFan [info] Does anyone else use desipramine? Hi. I was diagnosed with anxiety with obsessional features (after getting diagnosed with IBS-mixed). My new PCP gave me 25mg desipramine (once a day before bed). I've had an easier time getting out of bed in the morning and getting on with my day, but I've also been getting constipated. I'm also still my usual self (agonized over a $9 meal at McDonald's, finally ordered, then chickened out after they took so long to get to me, and walked all the way to Dairy Queen). Does anyone else use desipramine? If so, what are your experiences with it? [info] None [info] 1571514412
cfabbro [info] Ditto... I'm not allowed back into the USA because I'm on a list (they wouldn't say which one, but I suspect DHS).  Supposedly since I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder, until I can prove that I am "not a threat to [your] country" I cannot get passed the border.  This, despite the fact that I was diagnosed while living in Florida, and lived there for 3 years afterward.  Go go gadget indifferent Bureaucracy! [info] None [info] 1223092271
LeviosaLeviosah [info] Hi everyone, I'm a 23 y/o F kinda new to Reddit, just looking to find a community and get support. I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2013 and have had a recent bout of health anxiety. I've been doing okay this week, and have had a few breakthroughs and faced 2 of my fears. although old time fears of mine still hang in the background. I play a lot of video games but lately mostly maintaining my world of warcraft character, and recently gotten into this game called stardew valley. Really gretful for subreddits like this :] [info] None [info] 1468642352
edwardsamy1984 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I get something like that but on my right side it's a horrible thing and I sometimes wonder with the horrible thing that anxiety is it puts it there on purpose  [info] None [info] 1523732742
guppy89 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD after having a particularly toxic person in my chain of command. [info] None [info] 1555102969
lets_talk_aboutsplet [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety (not on Reddit) without any of those symptoms. [info] None [info] 1551927158
tokiistheking [info] Dear god I was just diagnosed with anxiety (my dad also has GAD) but I've been having a ton of weird head stuff as well. Sharp stabbing pains, tingling on the head and face, kinda like numbness....  should I worry or is it just anxiety? The world may never know.  [info] None [info] 1506041893
urbanwolf [info] Do you have a therapist or psychiatrist? It might help to have someone to talk to, and they can also help you figure out what is going on and whether you do have aspergers or possibly another condition. Figuring that out can be beneficial. If you do have Aspergers or possibly something like social phobia there are things you can do to work on your social skills which could help. A therapist/psychiatrist/etc can help with this. You don't have to struggle alone. I also think I might have Aspergers, or something else going on. I'm planning to bring this up to my new psychiatrist when I see her soon. I have been diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder and social phobia but I feel like there's something more going on. [info] None [info] 1483783878
givemecookies456996 [info] Got me braces sooner, had my wisdom teeth removed when the dr said to, Dad to not have drank so much, Mom to have gotten me a decent mattress when my orthopedist said to, took me to a real therapist when I was diagnosed with anxiety, took my animal allergies seriously instead of getting more dogs, offer me the same monetary help in high school and college they offered my other siblings. However I love my parents. So much about my childhood was amazing. I don’t blame them. Being a parent can be fucking tough.  [info] None [info] 1514235793
barcelonatimes [info] In high school I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.  I was prescribed .5 MG of xanax, twice a day.  Once i graduated and went to college, I decided "I don't need this shit anymore!"  Well, for about two weeks I would constantly catch something moving out of the corner of my eye, catch a flash of light from the side.I thought I was losing my fucking mind, and I had no idea that just taking one of those pink pills would make it stop(luckily.)  That shit is completely normal.  Anytime you are imbibing a GABA inhibitor, you will experience things like this during withdrawals.  Just keep trucking...you're the exterminator, and the varmints are decreasing by the day! [info] None [info] 1394513301
MommyDrinks [info] They have an obligation to accommodate you if you have something from your doctor in writing saying "butterandsage is under my care and requires a stool in order to properly and efficiently perform their job. butterandsage is currently being treated for XYZ and is capable of completing their job duties under these accommodations.  If you have any further questions please contact my office at..." and then make a shitload of copies. One for your boss, HR and yourself.I just quit my job today because of the awful and toxic behavior I've been subjected to. I was diagnosed with anxiety and my doctor wrote a note asking my workload be reduced until April 15th. HR gave me the run around. My boss demeaned me in a meeting on Friday. I'm aldo 7 months pregnant so I'm HORRIFIED about how the transition of my medical benefits to my husband's plan will be handled. Thankfully I have a family member that is a lawyer (and vicious one too) that is willing to speak for me.Anyway, I'd get a hold of my doctor and explain your boss is being a real asshole and you'd like something to that affect. [info] None [info] 1521508778
liamlongy [info] Amphetamine addict Hi it's my first post in here I've been addicted to amphetamine for 2 years taking it almost every day the effects have caught up on me and I've been diagnosed with anxiety and panic I've lost so much to this drug at only 18 can't bare anymore shame/guilt just want to be me again does anyone have any advice for quitting ? [info] None [info] 1494993946
ohnoxenio [info] I agree with you as well. People need to stop self-proclaiming themselves with these illnesses for attention/pity when they're not really ill. Thanks to these people, I used to think people would fake these things or that these illnesses weren't that big of a deal. They are a HUGE deal. I was just diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder about a month ago. It affects my quality of life and messes with me so much that I break down at times. I don't want attention or pity from my friends and family because it makes me feel like a burden to be around and less of a man. I also don't broadcast it to everyone. I try to keep people who don't need to know from finding out really. I would imagine people who actually DO suffer from these illnesses would feel the same. I just want my old quality of life back, not attention or pity.  [info] None [info] 1394669175
fenixVerde [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety issues and high functioning Autism last month. Yesterday my mother called to discuss her maybe being Autistic. I knew it was only a matter of time.  [info] None [info] 1491633127
zergling50 [info] Yeah, I was diagnosed with anxiety at the age of 6 and had no severe problems with it until college. It basically opened the floodgates and I was suddenly struggling with so many mental and emotional hurdles and feeling like I was going crazy. I'm doing a bit better now but I'm still recovering and trying to just finish. [info] None [info] 1496867815
rc1025 [info] My first pregnancy was a 20 week loss, my second was successful, and I am here again now. All the worrying in the world could not prepare me for the pain of that late loss, it was so useless. Worry is such a useless exercise. I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD after that, and my next pregnancy I was on zoloft a bit and had appointments every two weeks, mostly to manage my anxiety. I would talk to your doctor about your levels of anxiety. Tell her it is impeding on your day-to-day life. When it gets to that point, I think something needs to be done. Also, if you are anxious, get off these boards. Stop reading about incompetent cervixes and PPROM and stuff. I wish I had taken that advice myself. I'm doing better this pregnancy so far- the other day I was reading about something horrible (like you are doing) and freaking out and then was able to tell myself "stop it. stop worrying about this rare, unlikely thing. you'll deal with it if it happens". And then I just...stopped. It was a huge moment for me, brought on by therapy, drugs, and doctor's help. You will deal with it if it happens. Until then, you are okay. [info] 21 week loss 5/16, rainbow boy 4/17, #2 due 10/1 [info] 1519329281
ravenwarriorgoddess [info] I have dermotillomania now. I started pulling my hair in grad school. I have stopped pulling my hair now that I have finished grad school, but I keep pulling scabs off my scalp. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I saw a psychiatrist who thought I had OCD. I recently stopped going to my therapist and my psychiatrist and stopped taking antidepressants because a) my psychiatrist was too far away and I couldn't get to her office and b) I felt like I lost all my motivation when I was on antidepressants. I am thinking about getting back to therapy/psychiatry but I am really embarrassed that I just didn't show for my appointments. My academic and work career are related to trich which is very tricky for me (haha did you catch my terrible pun? lol). I really want to find a cure. It's a frustrating situation to be in. Its one of those "I really empathize with people who suffer from this condition because I do too so I want to learn more about it so I can help them/us."  [info] None [info] 1483852476
Ankaaan [info] Anxiety of taking meds Hey buds,I have been diagnosed with anxiety for many years now and gone through several years of different therapies. I have apart from panic attacks, severe health anxiety. I get really anxious about taking all kind of meds, because of how it changes how I feel. I have been adamantly against being prescribed anything due to this, but I was recently prescribed Atarax anyways and I haven't stepped up and had the balls to take it yet. I feel horrible today and I know I should take it, but I just can't force myself to it. Did anyone experience the same thing? How did you get past it?Thanks. [info] None [info] 1474217012
ThrowAway1000B [info] Severe Anxiety about doctor visits Hi r/Anxiety I spend a lot of time browsing the threads here and I find this community to be very helpful. Thank you!A little background: I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago, and I'm currently seeing a talk therapist once a week. I take Xanax when I have anxiety attacks (no more than 1-2 times a week), and I feel like the Xanax has been very useful for that purpose. My triggers range from financial problems, to relationship problems, feeling like I'm falling behind in life, sometimes even sitting in traffic will make me freak out. I'm working on these issues with my therapist. We've identified that I am stretching myself too thin; I'm overworked, I don't sleep enough, I don't have time to relax, and so on. She is helping me find ways to handle this, and I feel like she is very helpful.While this all sounds like great progress, I am damning myself because I'm keeping a secret. I am absolutely terrified of doctor visits. Just thinking about going is enough to trigger an attack. I've spent weeks writing this post because I don't want to provoke an attack. I haven't told anyone about this, not even my therapist, because I'm worried that I will be pressured to go.I am a 30 y/o female and I haven't been to a GP since I was 15. I refuse to see an ob/gyn. I don't like being touched or examined by doctors, especially if it might involve any sexual organs. I had a UTI last summer and I feverishly drank cranberry juice for a month before I finally dialed into my company's doctor on demand service and complained about a sinus infection to get antibiotics. Despite my comprehensive health insurance, I go to planned parenthood for birth control and pay full price for the appointment because they don't require exams for contraceptives. I have IBS symptoms (common for people with anxiety), I won't go to a gastroenterologist. I am also terrified of hospitals and being anesthetized. My sister-in-law had a baby and I didn't go see them. I made up a work related excuse. I need to have my wisdom teeth removed, but my dentist told me it would require being put to sleep. I won't do it. Interestingly, I have no problem seeing my therapist, my psychiatrist, my dentist, my optometrist, even my endocrinologist for hypothyroidism (all they need is a blood sample).All of this makes my anxiety worse because I'm constantly worried something might be wrong with me, but I won't go to a doctor to find out.I want to start a conversation about medical anxiety, and see what the reddit community thinks. Does anyone else feel this way? How do you deal with it? [info] None [info] 1476115598
futuregovworker [info] You can easily ask for it though. When I was having anxiety issues I just asked for Xanax. Got one prescription, didn’t like it. So I never got it again. I have never seen a commercial either, but if you ask for a specific prescription, it’s actually not hard to get. Especially if a parent was prescribed  to it first. I said my mom got this for this issue. I want it as well. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd but still, I don’t think I should be able to ask for specific drugs from a doctor [info] None [info] 1542631201
wildgreengirl [info] I was just thinking. ...is it bad I feel I fit all but the last of these...I'm diagnosed with anxiety and am on an SNRI I thought has "helped" but I also think it might have intensified some things like irritability and making me more reckless (like driving) [info] None [info] 1407734063
lonelyanxiousfreak [info] It will be difficult to type me since my medical condition influences my emotions and hobbies. It is a mobility-challenged related disability. And my other medical condition gives me self esteem issues as a female physically.• How old are you? What's your gender? Give us a general description of yourself.I am a 17 year old soon to be 18 girl. I play video games, read on science, and love human anatomy.• Is there a medical diagnosis that may impact your mental stability somehow?I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. And my disability (condition) makes me bitter toward abled people.• Describe your upbringing. Did it have any kind of religious or structured influence? How did you respond to it?I was abused as an infant, my feet tied together and never given toys or talked to, only when I needed food and water (poor orphanage). When I was adopted at age 2, I became part of a Catholic family. We rarely practice and only pray on holidays. I personally don’t believe in a higher being.• What do you do as a job or as a career (if you have one)? Do you like it? Why or why not?I have none.• If you had to spend an entire weekend by yourself, how would you feel? Would you feel lonely or refreshed?I would be refreshed despite wanting friends for once. I need my alone time often since I am energetic in public or am overwhelmed by crowds, smell, touch, sounds, etc• What kinds of activities do you prefer? Do you like, and are you good at sports? Do you enjoy any other outdoor or indoor activities?I like video games and drawing but due to neck pain they are burning out fast. I want to like sports, but am banned from the ones I’ve always wanted to try (why I resent those who play them). I would love outdoor walks if my skin wasn’t hypersensitive. But for now I am an indoor person due to medical reasons. I love music though. Music sparks my vivid imagination and distracts me from my pain.• How curious are you? Do you have more ideas than you can execute? What are your curiosities about? What are your ideas about - is it environmental or conceptual, and can you please elaborate?Let’s just say people are extremely annoyed by me because I ask “why” to everything. And I do have more ideas than I can execute. My curiosities are why people are being nice, ask how I am, how the universe works, how animals relate to each other, etc.. My ideas are conceptual and about the universe and the far future of it and earth.• Would you enjoy taking on a leadership position? Do you think you would be good at it? What would your leadership style be?No. But yes, I think I would be fairly okay. I first would assign a task for each person and expect them to do it regardless of circumstances unless physical problem.• Are you coordinated? Why do you feel as if you are or are not? Do you enjoy working with your hands in some form? Describe your activity?I seem to get into arguments a lot, so probably not. And I enjoy playing with clay. It makes my sensitive skin feel nice. Ceramics or simple clay is the activity.• Are you artistic? If yes, describe your art? If you are not particular artistic but can appreciate art please likewise describe what forums of art you enjoy. Please explain your answer.I used to be very artistic but am not anymore. I draw my original character, a transgender shapeshifter trying to fit into a human society.• What's your opinion about the past, present, and future? How do you deal with them?I think of the past and future too much. I hate thinking about the past and can never move on until I get closure. And I think about the far future because it’s fun and you get to make up depressing scenarios of the earth ending. The present is fine but I believe in those who are competent should be alive and anyone who fails constantly should be discarded. If I was a ruler I would be like the government in the Harrison Bergeron short story.• How do you act when others request your help to do something (anything)? If you would decide to help them, why would you do so?I hate when others ask for my help. It’s not my problem. I do it anyway to appear good or expect something in return.• Do you need logical consistency in your life?Yes. Dear god.• How important is efficiency and productivity to you?It is not that important unless I was a leader of a company.• Do you control others, even if indirectly? How and why do you do that?I correct people or point out flaws, but that’s as far as I go unless someone’s incompetent in-game sensitivity is pissing me off because it’s too high.• What are your hobbies? Why do you like them?I play video games, draw, and read online. I honestly don’t like them that much besides video games. It’s painful to do pretty much anything except breathing, so video games are the least painful hobby therefore I’ll do it.• What is your learning style? What kind of learning environments do you struggle with most? Why do you like/struggle with these learning styles? Do you prefer classes involving memorization, logic, creativity, or your physical senses?I memorize. I am too stupid to truly understand a concept. Math, I struggle with a lot and hate. Numbers shift or disappear in my head, even like simple 5+7 I can’t solve in my head unless I use my fingers. I prefer classes that use memorization and logic like biology, chemistry, physics, any science or history related class. People say I have an abnormally good memory for my academics or trivial facts.• How good are you at strategizing? Do you easily break up projects into manageable tasks? Or do you have a tendency to wing projects and improvise as you go?I am good at it but never take action using it. I break up projects according to what I think I can do in a certain period of time. This is for school only. For my own projects I improvise.• What are your aspirations in life, professionally and personally?I want to be a radiologist! I find anatomy fascinating. And personally I want to be happy and true to myself.• What are your fears? What makes you uncomfortable? What do you hate? Why?A lot. Tardigrades, spiders, ants, etc.. But seriously, those who are younger than me and smarter, abled people, girls (have another medical condition that makes me kind of jealous of “normal” girls), and anyone who makes me look handicapped or stupid. I heavily rely on what my mind is capable of since my body is useless. I hate fake people who just smile to be nice. I want a damn conversation where someone replies with something other than “okay” or “cool.” And who won’t mind my partial hearing loss and repeat something maybe four times.• What do the "highs" in your life look like?Video game victories unfortunately and also overcoming 17 surgeries. In general though, figuring on my own what medical condition someone has from an image alone, getting a math problem right because of possible dyscalculia, and being called “smart” to boost my nonexistent self-esteem.• What do the "lows" in your life look like?I never talk about negative emotions. At worst I talk about anger. I have never discussed deep sadness with anyone in my life. I put emotional walls up and bottle up my feelings since I don’t think crying is rational. And I get annoyed by those who cry anyway (could be projecting). I would prefer to keep my funny, outgoing, friendly and happy image alive.• How attached are you to reality? Do you daydream often, or do you pay attention to what's around you? If you do daydream, are you aware of your surroundings while you do so?I am attached to it fairly well, but only due to hypersensitivity and easy distraction externally. If I wasn’t then I would be daydreaming endlessly. I wear music for sound sensitivity and usually I start daydreaming. And I am aware of my surroundings usually. But I get startled if someone touches me while I daydream.• Imagine you are alone in a blank, empty room. There is nothing for you to do and no one to talk to. What do you think about?When will we all be killed and what will our dystopian civilization look like?How long do you take to make an important decision? And do you change your mind once you've made it?If important, a few days. And usually I change my mind and have endless alternatives I worry about.• How long do you take to process your emotions? How important are emotions in your life?I do not process them. I reject any hint of sadness and put it in the back of my head. I hate emotions. But if a subject intrigues me I will be grinning the entire time shouting about it.• Do you ever catch yourself agreeing with others just to appease them and keep the conversation going? How often? Why?Never. It’s not my problem if you disagree. I will argue until I get closure like a good discussion and conclusion or am declared right.• Do you break rules often? Do you think authority should be challenged, or that they know better? If you do break rules, why?No. They should not be challenged usually. If I do break rules, I want to experience what others do on a daily basis like doing sports I am not supposed to do (basketball or dodgeball are examples). Or I break rules ironically to do academic work like homework during school mass in the bathroom secretly. Hey, free hour and a half study hall, okay?• What is the ideal life, in your opinion?The ability to exercise and play sports without pain, middle or higher financial class, having friends but also mainly being a loner, and being happy in your own skin. [info] None [info] 1565092019
justanizfamouz [info] Constant pressure or tension in my right temple with no pain in that area. Is this normal? I've been diagnosed with anxiety since April and over the last two months I've began to develop physical symptoms such as forehead tension, headaches on my left side, neck tension, and the biggest concern is a pressure/tension feeling in my left temple that doesn't ever seem to go away occasionally briefly or when I go to bed is the only time it stops it is painless but very uncomfortable and triggers health anxiety even though my Dr is led to believe it is tension related to anxiety.My question is does this happen? And if so what are some things to help rid the problem? [info] None [info] 1540241575
itaraki [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder pero true to my illness... naiilang ako humingi ng recommendation from my psych for a pwd card.. pano to ?  [info] None [info] 1546172362
jeremyfirth [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADD. My doctor prescribed wellbutrin to see if it would help with both. It helped a lot with the anxiety, but not so much with the ADD. after a month of that, I talked to my doctor about it and he kept me on wellbutrin, but added methylphenidate ER for the ADD. i think I've lucked out and found a really effective treatment on our first try. My life is considerably less frenetic and overwhelming. I feel so much better, and I feel so much more control over myself. It's very empowering. [info] None [info] 1410625435
throwawayr4r1000 [info] 17/M L4 IF preferably W/ Anxiety Using a throwaway because my friends know my usual username.Hey guys, I am a typical American teenager in a decent neighborhood, good friends, not too smart, not too dumb. I should be feeling better than I actually do.I've always been a worrier. I've always been a little quieter than the average Joe; my parents knocked it off as me just being a turtle in my shell. I was diagnosed with anxiety and paranoia disorders when I was 10 or so after my school's guidance counselor suggested a doctor check me out. I talked to a counselor and she helped me a lot, and I had the tools to keep my anxiety under control for a while. Now that I am in high school I am constantly being compared to others like an animal. I feel so inadequate in every aspect of my life. I have great friends, but they just don't understand how I work. I panic about stuff I can't control. It's ruining my high school years that otherwise would have been fun. Hobby-wise, I enjoy listening and playing jazz music, longboarding, movies, and video games (feel free to PM for steam.) I don't care if you're male or female or how old you are, you probably have some story to tell or advice to give! Maybe I can help you with what you are going through too! Thanks a bunch, guys. [info] None [info] 1391566815
Stell2020 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as a child, you sound similar to me study wise, I had to work so much more than my peers to achieve the same grades (I did well but man I worked and worked). Hit my mid 20’s and life became too much (maintaining a home, sustaining a job, attempting to cook every night, exercise, then have enough energy and motivation to socialise or at least be pleasant and intimate with my husband). I went to a therapist because I was sure I was depressed, she suggested adhd (to which I laughed, come on I wasn’t that hyperactive kid who was always in trouble and failing school), saw a psychiatrist who diagnosed me with adhd, started stimulant medication (to which I was worried would increase my anxiety) and within 2 months my anxiety had all but gone! Treat the adhd, so I’m organised, can prioritise, and enjoy life, bye bye anxiety! (It does still effect me when I’m overly stressed/ busy but so much better than before). There is success either way you go, just depends what you and your therapist believe is having the bigger impact on your life.  [info] None [info] 1553320770
es127 [info] Hi everyone, I am 24/F, I was diagnosed with anxiety about 4 years ago. I started having severe heartburn and throwing up regularly and was then diagnosed with reflux disease and the cause of that was my anxiety, I apparently carry my stress in my stomach! I used things like yoga, cooking, music to cope and it worked well but within the last year or two I've noticed things getting different and worse. This year I had an ldr break up because he was unsure if this is what he wanted and was stressed with school, dealt with a few panic attacks, insomnia for about a month and pushing people who are closest to me away. I've come to a point now where I don't know how to cope anymore and make myself feel better. It feels like a daily struggle and check in to see how I'm feeling and if I'm off or not. Although i struggle with this can anybody relate when I say although this is something I struggle with so many people have it harder so I don't feel like my symptoms are "severe" enough to get help? And I shouldn't be wasting therapists time because "I'll get over it" right?  [info] None [info] 1452319805
address-unknown [info] I’m so sorry you’re going through this. This isn’t really advice, just an anecdote. I was diagnosed with anxiety as a very young teenager and took various benzodiazepines pretty regularly (never more or more frequently than prescribed) until I was in my early 20s. I went off of them due to headaches that gradually developed after taking them for several years. My dosage hadn’t increased, and it was consistent between Xanax, Ativan, and Klonopin. Without fail, as soon as the effect of the benzo ended, I would get a CRUSHING headache. My GP and psychiatrist both insisted it wasn’t the benzos but were happy to help me get off of them. Immediate relief. I still get migraines but after that medication change and identifying a few triggers they’ve dropped from 1-3 per week to once a month. I still have an Ativan prescription because sometimes the beastly headache is better than the panic attack but I take it extremely sparingly.  [info] None [info] 1554311432
JimsSFWaccount87 [info] Anxiety and low self worth are ruining my life I've reached a point where I need to reach out and ask for help and advice. I'm in a 2-year relationship, heading towards a wedding in November. I love my fiance more than words can describe. If she were religion I'd convert is what I usually say. But at the same time I'm so terrified of losing her. It's driving me crazy and I think it's driving her crazy too.Absolutely horrified that eventually she's going to realize that she's not happy with me and either leave me or stay and be miserable. That I'm somehow not what you thought I was and that she's hitched herself up to be unhappy. I just can't think of 0 reasons why she would want to be with me. I don't have high opinion of myself at all.This is something that's always in the back of my find it but sometimes it's better than others. This morning I woke up and it was so intense I broke down crying in front of her. It set off because last night she wanted to mess around and I was too tired oh. I didn't want to disappoint her though so I didn't tell her to stop and as a result we had a rather disappointing sexual experience. So I felt doubly ashamed and upset. On the one hand up I was upset that I had satisfied her but I was also upset that I hadn't been in the mood when she wanted me to be. I should point out that she's not pressuring me or telling me anything bad about me. She told me that I don't need to worry so much about it. But I just can't stop.A big part of this stems from a previous relationship I had that was very long term it emotionally abusive. The woman I was with made it very clear over a long. Of time that she wasn't happy but she still stayed with me and I was so afraid of being alone that I stayed as well. All the while knowing that I was the cause of her unhappiness. She never stopped telling me. I was just terrified that is going to happen again.A few relevant pieces of info I've been diagnosed with anxiety, with obsessive compulsive characteristics as well as aspergers and adhad. Currently taking Cymbalta, and adderal. [info] None [info] 1565966102
bigsoupgirl [info] Weighed down It’s hard for me to put this into words. I’m not exactly sure these feelings can be accurately portrayed through words but I’m gonna try. About three months ago my four year relationship ended. Three weeks later he had a new girlfriend and was posting pictures with her all over. I’ve been seeing these pictures for about three months now and I won’t lie, it’s been one of the hardest things I’ve ever had to go through. I feel like I lost the only person in the whole world really understood me and knew me, I’m left feeling so empty. Every day I try to fill my time with distractions but as soon as I’m alone I sink into this deep void of sadness, I’m just drowning in it. I’ve having sex with this guy (who I do have some feelings for) for about two months. I’d say it makes me feel better when I’m with him, but I think I’m just using the relationship as an emotional crutch because I’m in so much pain emotionally. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I’ve been on medicine (Effexor) for about three years. I don’t think that’s cutting it anymore and I don’t know what to do, I feel so helpless and useless and like a burden to everyone around me. I just want peace and I want to feel light. But I feel like there’s someone sitting on my chest and keeping me from breathing every second that I’m not distracted. [info] None [info] 1563573685
foxhill1996 [info] Inpatient care and OCD Hello, I’m a 22 year old female in the London area. I suffer from severe OCD and agoraphobia, with anxiety and regular panic attacks. I’ve had these issues for many years. I was diagnosed with anxiety and started on medication at 15 and later diagnosed with OCD at 17. I’ve gotten through rough patches and for a while I managed to function well. I’m entirely self dependant and have held down a job for two and a half years, taking medication and having therapy to deal with my issues. Yet the agoraphobia has come back and I’ve lost myself in a major way. I’ve been off sick from work for two months and I don’t even know who I am anymore. I’m struggling beyond the point of self help. I’m looking for a reset. Something intensive before I really spiral back into suicidal tendencies. I have attempted before due to these issues a long time ago and I’m afraid that’s back around the corner. I have seen a treatment programme, inpatient for 16 weeks, CBT and occupational therapy included with full time support. It may seem extreme, given two months ago I was functioning fine, but I know how fast I can get worse. My job and my relationship are basically ruined due to this relapse. What are my options in the uk, primarily around London, for inpatient care? I can self fund as I have savings. Are there private options? Does anyone have any experiences with inpatient care in the area? I’m struggling to search around for myself. I’m overwhelmed and I keep short circuiting. [info] None [info] 1562300242
mariposa-indigo [info] Obsessive-compulsive disorder and zen Hi!I have some very recurring thoughts and get worried by them. These worries are accompanied by songs that get stuck in my head frequently, all the day, with anxiety too. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. I used to practice compulsions, but now is more the obsessive part. I wonder if I'm attached to this "diagnostic". When I breathe, it seems that I can let go this thought of "worried, worried, worried" that keeps coming, but it's for short moments. "What if" thoughts with the "worst case scenarios" keeps popping all the time, like something very bad is about to happen. Then it becomes hard to breath, pains starts to appear and I get stressed. Mindfulness helps me a lot.Sometimes I feel very negative and somehow... something! arises and I calm down. I don't know what is... love, peace. Them I get distracted by the obsessions again.Is that an identification? Like, my mind is creating the same structure of conflicts? Creating conflict so I can calm down... Creating conflict so I can calm down? I don't have panic attacks, though. Even getting peaceful is a reason for the mind to argue about it "you are too peaceful".Thanks for the help! [info] None [info] 1502489809
nespid0 [info] My boss laid me off four days after I told him I've been diagnosed with anxiety attacks [info] None [info] 1552144946
throwaway040816 [info] I'm (27F) tired of my friend (27F) using me to lie and general immaturity. Been friends for 15 years. Harder to address than I thought Jessica and I have been friends since childhood. She has seen me through quite a few difficult times in the past and I love her dearly.I've noticed a change in her. As this is a long friendship and I am at least a little bit aware of the context that needs explaining, please bear with the length of this post:1) When we were 12, she was *extremely* introverted. She had a handful of friends, me included, who gave no shits but otherwise, our entire school year used to pester her about why she was so quiet.2) She was very beholden to her family while we were young. Often the reason she couldn't come out with us growing up was because of babysitting various cousins or one of her younger siblings. This carried on long after the "no, I'm busy" age - she was never forced, she just kinda viewed it as her responsibility.3) Fairly crippling shyness + always being indoors looking after people = not losing her virginity roughly at the same time as everyone else.Over the last few years, there has been a very slow process in which she has gone from the family childcare to a young woman trying to enjoy her life. In the beginning, everything was great. However, a few years later, it has descended:1) She's become really vapid and self-centred. It's got to the point where I avoid her phone calls sometimes.2) She lost her virginity shortly before her birthday in May, and has been lying to her older sister with whom she lives (28), saying she is at mine when she is at her "friend's" - I live about 20 miles away from them and she actually barely visits me in real life. She also doesn't warn me before her lies - I could easily post something on social media inadvertently that would get her otherwise astute sister's suspicions up.3) even the fact that she doesn't want to tell her sister makes no sense. Not my life and I haven't nagged her to say anything, but it means every single little banal thing that could be researched on the internet comes my way.4) Some of her tales sound borderline rapey until I say "so did you want it or not, you sound like you didn't" - "\*giggle\* No no I do... I mean *\giggle*\ ugh I'm so silly xD" The other day she went out, got a lift from a mate, who turned out wanted oral off her. Instead of at least saying something like "no" for a start, never mind actively leaving the car (which was parked and unlocked, outside her house), she ummed, ahhed and used the "I'm on my period" clause. Aged 27. Having heard all the horror stories from her friends, sister and cousins.I'm jumping around, but there's a horrible deja-vu that all of this is bringing up. I remember being impatient with the hushed, scandalised, self-gossipy conversations that used to take place when I was a 14-15-16 year old kid. I remember friends acting coy about a boy they liked/had done stuff with and even then, saying essentially "for fuck's sake you either like him and are sure you wanna bone, or you don't like him and don't want to bone, or you like him but you're not sure, in which case don't until you're sure". To have to experience these tedious conversations again, with someone nearer to 30 than they are to 16, acting like nothing she does is from her own desire while simultaneously being smug and circular about the whole thing leaves me numb. This is on top of the fact that this girl has barely taken any real interest in my life and the shit I've had to go through for at least a year.With all the moaning in this post, I still want to be friends with her. She is one of my 2 best (and at times only) friends. I don't know if I'm comparing the relationship I have with the other friend, with whom I can be blunt and honest - Jessica is extremely defensive if you even attempt to point out a flaw and I'm terrible at maintaining patience if someone tries to jump down my throat and needs "pacifying". She's also a "princess type" - she isn't very independent at all, not really, and plays dumb in a lot of scenarios. So I've kept it to myself. But my patience is slipping away fast. I had a horrible time at the beginning of 2015 when my ex employers were trying to make my last few months there unbearable. I have missed an ex terribly. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and attended therapy. I've moved out of my mother's house finally. I've decided that the sector I've devoted the majority of my short adult life to is the one I need to run away from the fastest, and I am figuring out the right path. That ex has made contact with me recently and thrown me out of whack completely. And this "friend" knows hardly any of it, because if I spend more than 55 secs speaking you can see her glazing over, before she interrupts with yet another banal story about "how much sex hurts and how big the guy's dick is".Has anyone experienced a friend whose maturity and general personality levels have taken a nose dive as they've aged? Also, how can I approach this in any way that might salvage the friendship while maintaining my sanity?**TL;DR**: Friend has become vapid and self centred. It is becoming more and more apparent as I realise my potential as a friend to her has been much greater over the years than hers to me. However, don't want to lose her as a friend, I want to be honest. [info] None [info] 1470317767
jbug8 [info] I had a miscarriage in November, recently I was diagnosed with anxiety associated with ttc again. sometimes I feel like a can’t breathe, it’s not easy and I hope your able to take care of yourself in this journey too ♥️ [info] None [info] 1550987248
ConfessionStation [info] My mother's hall BACKSTORY: I'm from a country in the Balkan peninsula. I am diagnosed with anxiety, which is sadly very common today. My mom lives abroad and is currently facing some financial, professional difficulties. I am very close to her, despite living so far away and I am very saddened and stressed out about her situation, and I'm unable to help her out and it drives me crazy.In a dream I had, two nights ago, I was in a tall room, with dimly lit arched ceiling. At first on the linoleum floor there were few small stacks of gold and treasure. The golden coins seemed old and faded. Then there were books. From old, leather bound tomes to some cheap paper back books printed in the 80ies. The paper back books, looked like textbooks and instruction manuals of sorts. I explored the room, and in the middle of it there was an old plaid 70ies style couch with small tables and lamps on either sides. There I found a black rope with big, dice sized black lettered cubes. (like those lettered cube beads but bigger). They formed a word but I could not read it for some reason. I was notified by an inner voice that "ALL THIS BELONGS TO YOUR MOTHER". All of this did not amaze me or amuse me. Neither the sight of treasure, nor anything else.And as I was fixing to leave, a large panel opened, containing filigree jewelry of all shapes and sizes, most made in the traditional Balkan and middle eastern way. Then I woke up. Any interpretation would be welcome. Thanks guys! [info] None [info] 1547992731
OwOMaster10000 [info] Suddenly depressed and have severe anxiety? I'm 16I use to be strict on when I'd feed my betta and now I'm slacking, I don't remember when to feed him or have motivation to. I've been having to force myself to get upI have 25mg Hydroxyzine pills from the hospital when I went for panic attacks a few days ago but it worked the day before yesterday, and didn't yesterday even though I took two (5 hours apart)I don't remember if I ate or not but my anxiety is making me feel nauseated and I don't know what to doMy mom has been staying home to make sure I was fine but had to go work today (Instacart deliveries) and I don't feel safe aloneI can't stop thinking about the fact I'm going to die some day and it's making me have panic attacks constantly We figured it was from me staying home more often but I think about it when out of the apartment too, I had a panic attack in the car on the way to the storeI can't be left alone right now but my mom has to work and I'm freaking out I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder a few years ago but it's never been this bad. I'm not suicidal, it's literally the opposite [info] None [info] 1587657705
LemonadeLion2001 [info] Do I have anxiety? I'm a 17 y/o female, I've had this fear of germs kinda of manifest and grow over the last 3 years or so. Things regarding germs freak me out, huge fear of getting sick, the whole shebang. Things that my friends don't see an issue with, like people not covering their mouth when they cough / sneeze, not washing their hands, sharing food or drinks, stress me out majorly and all I think about are the germs. I also don't directly touch doorknobs anymore. I have to use a shirt or a paper towel.But in the last two years or so, I get this major anxiety when that stuff happens. It only goes away if I wash my hands or clean. When my brother doesn't wash his hands after using the bathroom (he touches the lightswitch, doorknob, etc.) All I can think about is the germs growing and I can't focus on anything until I disinfect all of the light switches, and doorknobs in my house. I have the same thing with cleaning. If my room is messy, I can only think about the mess, and I can't focus until I clean it. My friends have been picking on me about the germ stuff, and I just want to know how to fix this as it's gotten in the way of my life. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was younger but I don't know if this is the same as before. I would really appreciate any advice as I want to get help for this. Thanks. [info] None [info] 1557510081
littlebits23 [info] Cause of anxiety My husband and I have been married for 10 years. A few years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and I know what the cause is...it's himWe work together, live together, sleep together, eat together, shower together and I never have time for myself to just breathe.I tell him I'm taking a bath and lock the door, he is texting me. If I unlock the door he is sitting in the bathroom with me. If I need to go anywhere he is right next to me. If I have headphones in or am reading a book, he wants to o have all of these nonsense conversations.He is constantly seeking reassurance of our relationship because I've asked for some time for me, months ago. I've given up due to him needing constant attention. I'm going to explode and I don't need that to have him further up my ass. I'm at a point where Xanax isn't taken as as needed (once or twice a week) and just becomes part of my daily routine.  Please help. [info] None [info] 1548806070
toxicskiamachy [info] I am so sorry for all of your struggles.  I was diagnosed with anxiety at 15 and Fibro at 25 and I’m a 27F so I’ve been living with it for about two years.  I agree with you that you would understand how your anxiety manifests and trust me that you know your body and it’s NOT in your head.  Do not let anybody insult you in that manner by making assumptions like they know your body better than you do.My fibro started after I developed mononucleosis for the second time.  I was diagnosed within 6 months of onset which is a huge relief but now am getting neurological symptoms so I’m kind of on the same boat as you with ruling out an additional condition that pops up acutely about once a month.  I know what I felt like before fibro and it’s not in our heads.  I even lost weight and it has nothing to do with weight or being in/out of shape.  I have to really watch my activity level and get about 12 hours of sleep a night.  I mostly push through pain to be able to work and go back to school.  The crashes are becoming less frequent this way but they still happen and I’ve ended up in bed too.  I’ve been in bed where I literally have to have a cup of soup brought to me that I can drink and where I have to physically crawl to the restroom.  Fibro can be managed and just know you aren’t alone.  Feel free to DM me if you want to talk.  [info] None [info] 1528653212
mattbernss [info] Yes, I've also been going through this for the past 9 months. Always nauseous in the mornings, I don't eat breakfast, maybe only something that goes down very easily like watermelon. Missed a lot of school, got blood tests, an MRI and endoscopy, and nothing. Noticed that the only times that I got nauseous was at school and around SO. I was diagnosed with anxiety 2 and a half weeks ago, and I've been taking 50mgs of Zoloft prescribed by my psychologist.It's comforting to know that I'm not the only one having this. [info] None [info] 1530770226
Gopnik_Cat [info] Automatic breathing troubles Hey lads,I'm new to this sub and I've been diagnosed with anxiety for 3 months now,it's been meh until.about 5 hours ago I felt like I couldn't breathe anymore ,and now I can only breathe manually and can't sleep [info] None [info] 1574375940
violent_amethyst_13 [info] 1. i've cut my leg from my hip to my knee before 2. i'm diagnosed with anxiety 3. i haven't self-harmed in the past 4 months  [info] None [info] 1511457840
Water_Poles [info] Massive space outs In the past few weeks I've noticed that I've been "spacing out" for lack of a better term a couple times a day. I'll be sitting, watching a YouTube video or something when my mind will go essentially blank, and twenty minutes later I'll realize that the video has ended.I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a few years ago, maybe this has something to do with that? I'm not on any medication. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1430390485
medicalquestionanon [info] Inconsistent lower abdominal pain for two weeks ... a cause for concern? [18F] TL;DR at the bottom. Age: 18 Sex: Female Height: ~5’ 5”Weight: ~155 lbsRace: WhiteBackground history: I’ve never smoked, consumed alcohol, or done recreational drugs. I’m not currently taking any prescription drugs but am taking melatonin regularly and have taken Advil a few times in the past two weeks. I’ve never been diagnosed with a physical illness other than colds or a mild flu, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety and mild psychosis. I haven’t been on prescription drugs for either of those for more than a year.  I haven’t made any recent dietary changes (vegetarian for ~10 years now). I couldn’t be pregnant.About 2 weeks ago I started having sharp pains followed by dull aches near the center of my lower abdomen. I was due to start my period in the next few days, so I thought it might be some kind of weird cramps. However, these felt very different from any cramps I’d had before and I usually get them for 2-3 days after I start menstruating (not before). My period was slightly late and is now still going on (2 days longer than usual for me). The pains have now continued off and on throughout my period (along with a normal intensity and duration of cramps), but they’ve gotten gradually more painful (from maybe a 3 to a 6 on a scale of 1-10)  and seem more localized at maybe 4 in. to the right of my belly button now. I can’t feel stiffness in the area if I press with my fingers. I’ve also had lower back pain, bloating, and loose/frequent bowel movements during this time, but those all also sometimes accompany my period so I’m not sure if that is related to the pains or not. Is this worth being concerned about or going to a doctor for?  Is there anything serious it could be?I feel like if it was something serious the pain would be a) more intense and b) more consistently there.  Is that generally a bad assumption to make? TL;DR: I have sharp then dull pains intermittently before and during period (in addition to usual cramps) during that have gotten gradually worse. Seems odd, is unpleasant, but is it a cause for concern? [info] None [info] 1531885267
biomech36 [info] My issue is/was I would bring up to people that I thought I had an issue and I always got "there's nothing wrong with you, mentally" and I would just write it off.  Maybe I was just being an asshole for no reason.  Maybe I was wrong about something.  I dunno.  But, I was diagnosed with anxiety by a physician last year.  And in true INTJ fashion, I decided to do something about it a year later. [info] None [info] 1509980760
Seeeab [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety so whatever man. I put plenty of caveats and expanded in other posts to make clear I have no real advice. I also added caveats that there are many factors (including genetic and biologic).But fuck off lol. Anxiety can for sure be learned. If someone is raped as a child and it makes them anxious around certain dudes when they're an adult that's not a genetic issue. And sure enviornmental scenarios can trigger biologic changes too. So idk what you're doing except having upvote envy and trying to be the dude being a random sense of reason on a popular post Edit: happy cake day tho [info] None [info] 1498869495
mmoritz80 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety order and do take medication for it.  It's been a while since such a small conflict has bothered me this much.  I would guess that I felt defensive. [info] None [info] 1375908153
EnclaveLeo [info] Just graduated with a BA in Comp Sci and wanted to add to the already great advice here - sophomore year in Comp Sci is definitely rough so don't get down on yourself. A 4.0 your first semester is amazing, and I understand how it feels to have a "slip" but it's okay to slip. Especially after transferring in, Clemson kicked my ass my first semester I transferred in. Don't feel bad about having to withdraw from a class and trying again next semester - most Comp Sci students I know took an extra semester to graduate (like me). I was diagnosed with anxiety my junior year and had to find ways to make my coursework manageable. I definitely know what you mean about needing a routine schedule and reminders, I'm the same way. Definitely get your professors to work with your accommodations.I really hope you feel better and please feel free to reach out to me if you have any questions or just want to chat!  [info] None [info] 1550105193
Ngonzalez_01 [info] Please pray for me to stop being so scared of suffering for the Gospel. “Whoever is ashamed of me and of my words in this adulterous and sinful generation, of him will the Son of Man also be ashamed when he comes in the glory of his Father with the holy angels” (Mark 8:38).“Yet if anyone suffers as a Christian, let him not be ashamed, but let him glorify God in that name” (1 Peter 4:16).God has put so many people in my life that I believe He has called me to preach the Gospel to. After all, if not me, then who? The problem is that whenever an opportunity rises to mention Jesus, I get scared out of my mind. My brain goes 100mph and my stomach feels like it's about to explode. I was diagnosed with anxiety as a kid, and by the grace of God I've been able to get better at controlling it and talking to people. But when the Holy Spirit convicts me to tell my friends the Gospel, I lose all sense of calmness. Some of you may remember my post about me being the only believer in my family. Last time I tried to preach the Bible openly, they took away my Bible and even compared my religion to an addiction. Thankfully they've "calmed down" a little and started letting me read and go to church, but since then, the thought of preaching has scared the living daylights out of me. In the parable of the 4 seeds, Jesus mentioned one seed that falls on thorns only to be choked out. Often I worry that I'm the "thorn seed" rather than the "good soil seed". So I ask, please pray that God will make me strong enough to preach the Gospel once more. TL;DR: I want to preach the Gospel to my friends, but I'm too scared. Please pray that God will make me strong enough to overcome this fear. [info] None [info] 1564943821
thisisallsoreddit [info] For sure, I was diagnosed with anxiety a couple years ago. I still use a ton of avoidance techniques but the doc prescribed me some beta-blockers and they seriously changed my life. they let me keep control [info] None [info] 1493148276
RobAlly [info] Similar to me. I've had anxiety for 10 years. I was diagnosed with anxiety. But it wasn't until recently that I realized I have agoraphobia. I've also know that I had it,  just didn't know it had a name.  [info] None [info] 1451284914
Adreduc [info] I know that feel, I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 13, I'm 29 now and that shit stopped me from doing things, you just have to try to act faster than anxiety does, sometimes it doesn't work but sometimes does, and that's when you star having nice things and nice stories to tell [info] None [info] 1541956850
ThisIsNotAConspiracy [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety by a regular doctor and every psychiatrist accepted it as a real diagnosis.  [info] None [info] 1486604150
BoosterBooty [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I was given an antidepressant. This is very very common. Something like xanax is more for panic attacks or emergencies, not for treatment, like you said that you wanted them for. I understand that and I went into the doctor with the same view. However, using an antidepressant and taking a pill every day is something that will help with attacks, making them less frequent or even non existent. When I first started taking my antidepressant I was given xanax for attacks and for falling asleep. I took at least once a day. After about 6 months, I was taking it once a month. Sometimes not even that. In summary, give it a chance and some time. You may be surprised. Good luck to you. :) [info] None [info] 1436234046
gangie95 [info] I'm in my final semester of college and it has a been a tough and rough journey to get through it. I struggled in school my first year at a different college and when I transferred to OSU my jr. year I was diagnosed with anxiety. I also felt so lonely because I didn't live on campus, only knew a few people here, and my classes were so big and felt impersonal. I still feel that way sometimes, but what has helped me get through is a support system, for me it's my family. My recommendation would be to find your support system, it could be a friend, family, it could even be a dog, they will help you get through. I hope you don't act on this and that you are able to get the help you need, because you are worth it!!!! [info] None [info] 1540340599
lilwoodzey2013 [info] IWTL how to stop grinding my teeth and clenching my jaw when I sleep!! I have been diagnosed with anxiety, so I know that’s probably the main issue. It’s causing me to grind my teeth down and even a bit of receding gum lines. I have a mouth guard I wear at night, but does anyone else have experience with this and have any tips?Thank you :) [info] None [info] 1511356894
Floor-sugar [info] Yes I agree. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders and I have been medicated for it in the past. I just got off of medication this time a few months ago. I'm not really interested in going back down that route at the moment though. I was just hoping there were others out there that deal with the same thing that maybe would have some advice. I feel like for the most part my anxiety is at a pretty manageable level right now. I don't even bring it up all the time with my girlfriend when I have these worries. I just hate that the thoughts are there. This relationship I'm in really couldn't be any more perfect and my stupid brain has to try to ruin my happiness.  [info] None [info] 1480904041
YControlHer [info] PA resident here also! I thought about getting my card after they added anxiety to the list, but with this Tom Wolfe stuff going on about recreational use, I'm not sure if it's worth it. Nor and I sure how I would go about that (I have been diagnosed with anxiety). If it's not too much to ask, how were you able to obtain your card? I live in North Eastern PA and am not really sure what kind of medical dispensaries are around. [info] None [info] 1571844783
HopefulThinker [info] Vyvanse and Zoloft, any tips? I've been taking Vyvanse for about a year and a half, and about 6 months ago I was diagnosed with anxiety as well. My first psychiatrist prescribed cymbalta and I started experiencing daily headaches. He ended up moving, so I was sent to a colleague of his. The new doctor took me off cymbalta and put me on zoloft. Even though I stopped taking cymbalta, every time I take a Vyvanse I get a huge headache that lasts from 2 hours in to the pill till I go to sleep. It's gotten so bad that I can't seem to get any work done, and I've taken Tylenol and other pain killers to no avail. Should I talk to him about taking me off Vyvanse or is this a common side effect with taking an anxiety medication with Vyvanse? [info] None [info] 1423253971
crazynekosama [info] Never to both. I will, on very rare occasions have the odd drink but I think it's been well over a year since my last one. I used to drink all the time and then I was diagnosed with anxiety and I started taking meds and I found drinking on my meds wasn't the same (it just made me feel tired) and my doctor warned me that because alcohol is a depressent it can effect my anxiety. So I decided to not bother and I honestly don't miss it.   [info] ♀ [info] 1522463089
winnie_bago [info] I work in a similar role and also have anxiety, for which I take 2 medications.  Do you take any meds or have you ever considered it?  They have been my saving grace since I had debilitating panic attacks a few years ago before I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD.  I don't have the same type of feelings you have about your job, and perhaps that is because of the environment and the people.  Rarely do I have to assist a disgruntled or unpleasant person.  Most people coming to my workplace are professionals.  What kind of company do you work for?  Maybe doing reception in a different industry would change your outlook. [info] None [info] 1440957954
mysteriam [info] Share your tips for phonebanking for those of us with (social) anxiety I tried phonebanking today but just as the HubDialer connected, I got freaked out and closed it. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but I am trying to overcome it so I can help through more than just donations. Does anyone have any tips on how to do overcome this anxiety and get phonebanking? [info] California [info] 1456759475
AsaKurai [info] Hey, not that you're an expert, but is feeling "foggy" also a symptom? I definitely feel like insomnia, heart palpitations and feeling bloated have been prominent since I first felt like I was diagnosed with anxiety and I guess those symptoms come and go depending on when I take Xanax, but this foggy feeling has been persistent for weeks now. Almost feels like i'm tipsy or have done an all-nighter, but I kinda push through and go about my day anyway. I'm assuming it's because of my sleep? But I try at least on the weekends to catch up on that, just wondering if it's a symptom people go through... [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1535173681
ForgeFinder [info] Do you experience this too? First time posting here. March of 2018 I was diagnosed with anxiety, and have been taking a prescribed medication, lorazepam (.5 mg) a day for the past few months. Months before I was officially diagnosed with anxiety, there was many internal family issues going on, which included my parents ultimate divorce. My major problem with my anxiety is the excessive sweating in my hands and feet (hyperhydrosis). First my hands would get extremely dry and inflamed, then when I would touch certain textures or objects my hands would become hypersensitive and eventually my hands would begin to sweat profusely. For awhile, over summer break, my hands had stopped sweating and all the other symptoms had just stopped. I stopped seeing my therapist, but am still on the medication to this day. So my question is: do any of y'all experience this as well, and what are your ways of dealing with it? [info] None [info] 1546753600
havoc_unit [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety before and have already gotten treatment for it, which works pretty well. This feels more like I need to learn coping mechanisms for this type of situation. I'll certainly bring it up to my doctor again. [info] INTJ [info] 1454837615
orangemochafrap17 [info] Like I said, I don't think the two are exclusive, but anxiety should be treated with therapy, it's not a personality trait, it's an illness that holds you back. Not wanting to interact is far different to being **afraid** to interact.As much as introverts like alone time, humans are social animals, we need it to SOME extent, no matter how slight. You're talking about a minority of introverts who actually need that much alone time, compared to a large number of people with anxiety, that again, gets mixed up with introversion on this sub a lot.I don't think it's perfectly understandable for **anyone** to have no friends at all, it's in our nature to want human contact to SOME extent. Very few people are that introverted that they can't have friends, I'm going off the majority here.It's not that they shouldn't be in this community, it's that they mightnt actually be introverted, if they are solely fearing social interactions, they might very well be extraverted but have anxiety.I thought I was very introverted for years, but then I was diagnosed with anxiety, as I learned to manage it I realised I actually enjoyed social events sometimes, but I did still need to be alone most of the time. A lot of people mix the two up, or conflate them together like they come hand in hand, they don't, you're not stuck with anxiety, thats why I tell people if I think they actually have it, because I don't want to think of them going they're whole lives misattributing anxiety as some uncontrollable part of their personality. [info] None [info] 1551136932
mauvemoth [info] You may want to consider talking to a therapist or psychiatrist. You sound a lot like me before I was diagnosed with anxiety. I remember feeling so guilty and upset that I couldn't fall asleep, sometimes hurting myself, and sometimes crying. Going to therapy and taking medication has helped me so much. I haven't had a bad night like that in a while. You really need to be taking care of your mental health at your age. [info] None [info] 1506217208
mondragonmma [info] Help I don't know what is happening to me. I'm 20 years old and lived a normal live , (stress-free most of the time), up and coming mma fighter   . And out of no where I started to have panic attacks .. To the point where I can't think and I'm scared and I feel that my life isn't real, chest pains (heart pains) . I was diagnosed with anxiety. My heart tests ekg came back normal but I still suffer from the pains here and there. I got put on sertraline hcl 25 mg and it helped at first but now I'm getting nightmares, stress and pains a lot more. What I'm asking is what do I do? What are ways to control my anxiety? One big point: my family doesn't believe in anxiety , panic attacks or mentally illness. They think it's just "weak " minded.. ( I used to think that way too). Thank you in advance This is my first post on Reddit and I'm writing this at 3:03am. [info] None [info] 1464940673
Stevienines [info] bro I've been diagnosed with anxiety, I have a history of it in my family. Please don't assume you know me [info]  [info] 1542222896
mrs_sugarlips [info] Yup. It sent me to the ER twice before I was diagnosed with anxiety by a GI specialist. The meds helped me. Therapy (CBT) helped me. Having a husband calm me down and remind me to do the CBT and to remember that it is anxiety and not me being sick helped me. [info] Panic Disorder, PMDD, Specific Phobic Disorder [info] 1434859529
pjbacelar [info] Actually I'm diagnosed with anxiety and had a moment where I developed panic syndrome (messy shit happening in my life those days). Treated that for a while, took some medication. When the panic attacks stopped happening, I was released from medical treatment and did not do any therapy since (been 6 years now).I never managed to be open and sincere with my therapist, always told her I was okay even though I was in a dark place. I have a hard time talking to strangers about my inner issues (doing that for the first time here). [info] None [info] 1553601243
MaBoiMarki [info] I told my EX about my anxiety I'm 15 and very homosexual for some context.So I was diagnosed with anxiety recently(and I'm getting treatment sorted) Me and my EX are good friends so i asked if i could rant to him because I trust him. So i ranted and he seems annoyed with me and just telling me to "calm down" and "get over it" during a break down. I don't often talk to people about how I feel and now I feel shit because I feel like I have just annoyed him. I love being a burden. And now I'm panicking even more. Please help me! [info] None [info] 1566939118
Shamrck99 [info] Coffee is for the corporate slave. I’ve just finished reading caffeine blues and decided to kick the habit I’m 2 days in with some mild headache, I had already cut down to 1 a day with maybe one more some of the days. I can feel my blood vessels opening as he describes in the book Caffeine restricts blood flow around the body the extremities and brain most effected.It has thought me that the science of caffeine is heavily flawed how most research is based on epidemiology and not on directly what caffeine does to the body on a mechanistic level (Your kidneys and shit) the research is sometimes old or flawed, they omit important factors, they study about coffee as if everyone is drinking out of 6oz cups and not eating chocolate or drinking coke. I did his calculations and found that I was consuming much more than what my fitness calculator and Starbucks had me believe.I always wondered how people my age could be so chill and I was always rushing around ready to kill someone for using a stapler wrong , it’s the caffeine which targets your adrenals to push out cortisol, push fat and sugar into the blood, restrict blood flow and engage the fight or flight response. The constant stimulation of your adrenals whilst also blocking adenosine causes your body to try and upregulate the adenosine receptors, this is why you get such potent withdrawal adenosine is responsible for sleep and blood vessel dilation so you just want to lay down and your head feels like a pounding erection.I thought I used to suffer with anxiety but I realised I was taking in more caffeine than Nestle , of course you are going to think your about to die when your throwing back this neurotoxic run run fluid, I remember I used to drink about 600mg+ of caffeine in school when I was diagnosed with anxiety I would walk around with those Starbucks “very very large posh Italian word used by an American company “ sized cups and I would sweat like I was after coming back from a run and wonder why so I went to the doctor and he tried to throw medicine at me so I spilled the coffee on him.Caffeine is a natural pesticide that is designed to overload the CNS of small insects and cause panic in smaller vertebrates. If you think it’s not dangerous caffeine can cause death in small dogs and cats just by one or two teabags alone and we slam back cups of it.Caffeine is one of the pillars of corporatism I believe, caffeine spikes you with enough buzz to be more productive but not enough to kill you and have you flopping on the floor like a fish that just got wired out of nemos backyard, in all seriousness caffeine blues talks about how we’ve all been brainwashed into thinking we **Need** our morning coffee or we can’t function. And it’s only to the benefit of 24 year old marketing graduates that we keep knocking it back.I realised also on a fitness level that my craving for chocolate was not an actual craving for it but a craving for the caffeine it contained  when I hadn’t had a cup in a while ( Don’t worry sugars my next enemy ) seeing as sugar consumption can predict violent crime https://www.sciencemag.org/news/2009/10/sugar-gateway-drug-violenceOn a health level you don’t have to be the professor of “health-ology at the institute for all things healthy and not bad” to understand that dumping fat and sugar into your blood **CHRONICALLY**can lead to diabetes and weight gain and that drinking fatty sugary frappa wappa cappas doesn’t help either.Coffee is one of the highest traded commodities in the world, the conditions for some bean farmers were terrible and some still are and it all goes to fuel our own insatiable craving to be a corporate drone maybe if I pound another 20oz and eat a whole bar of Columbian dark I can write more papers than that asshole mark, stop it. One of the most profound parts of the book was how it makes you lose most of your nutrition one of the basic core needs for existence, Magnesium, Calcium and potassium are all pushed out, B vitamins also that’s not good the “institute of all things healthy and not bad” would not approve.Stop reading counter articles talking about how caffeine is an antioxidant, stop talking about moderation is the best form of action and just get off it, wean off if if you want to avoid significant withdrawals, but just stop it https://miro.medium.com/max/324/1*HI4kj-TPAQrfQkAdrw2KTA.pngAnd check his book out. [info] None [info] 1583895123
Brindy11 [info] I've been tested for autism it came up negative I was under in each category of the least and from what I'm told it was just under for the school requirements to get help. But I am diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1544370376
owoifier [info] A wittwe backgwound, I'm 23 yeaws owd, and I was diagnosed with anxiety in high schoow. I have a smaww gwoup of fwiends, but I wike to stay in the same woutine. I was tawking to one of my fwiends about my daiwy woutine, because we wewe having a deep convewsation about both of ouw anxiety issues.He said, "Do you have OCD awso? Sometimes I have to wash my hands fow minutes aftew I pee befowe I feew cwean." I had to teww him my biggest secwet, someone that I've nevew towd anyone. I said, "I've actuawwy nevew peed befowe. I know it's something you'we supposed to do, but I guess I just kinda nevew had the time." He was stunned by my wevewation. "You've nevew peed befowe?!?!" Maybe it's because he had a fascination with uwine ow maybe it was just because I had nevew towd him that befowe, but he was amazed that someone had not expewience uwinating. “You NEED to twy it. In fact, wet’s go to the bathwoom. I’m going to teach you how to pee.”He wawked me into the bathwoom, and taught me how to wift up the toiwet seat. He took my hand and awwanged my fingews on the stem of my cock. “Wewax, it’s easiew than it wooks. Hewe, watch me do it.” He puwwed out his cock and stawted pissing into the toiwet. “Just wewax the muscwes in youw cwotch, and focus on the sensations inside the penis. Whenevew you feew a fowce coming outwawd of the penis, focus on it but don’t twy to contwow it. If you feew it moving inwawd, then wecognize it, and wewax the muscwes again untiw it’s moving outwawd.” I fowwowed the instwuctions and nothing happened. I said, “I can’t hewp it. I feew the fowce. It’s moving back up. I’ww nevew pee, I shouwd just give up.”“You got this, just wewax. Don’t pway mind games with youwsewf, you wiww pee befowe I wet you weave this bathwoom. If you don’t think you wiww pee, then no pee wiww come out. Twust me, you just have to bewieve in youwsewf.” I twied again, and pee stawted spwaying out of my cock. "I'm doing it! I'm uwinating!"I peed fow 5 stwaight minutes. He said, "How do you wike it?" I powitiewy asked him to weave the bathwoom so I couwd be awone with my piss stweam. I wiped the tip of my cock with a singwe squawe of toiwet papew, and fwushed. "I am a new man today," I thought. I wan ovew and hugged my fwiend in the most intense dispway of pwatonic affection I had evew expewience. My pants wewe spwinkwed with wet spots and uwine continued to dwip down my weg. My fwiend saw the uwine mawks on my pants, "Don't wowwy about that. You'ww get the hang of it soon." We feww asweep togethew on the couch in his apawtment. [info] None [info] 1553724128
SurturOfMuspelheim [info] Man, I get angry so easily.  I used to just be prone to it, went to counseling for it as a kid.  Ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety... it's even worse.  I never take it out on others, I mostly just wanna beat the shit out of soft objects and scream, maybe throw something (like a plastic water bottle) but never anything more.  My moms BF used to literally punch shit, break shit and throw stuff at my mom when he was mad, so that made me control mine a lot better. [info] None [info] 1509171800
veggie-berger [info] Struggling with symptoms, any advice? TW: medical anxiety&amp;#x200B;20/FHello! So, I have been suffering over the last three days with shortness of breath. I have been diagnosed with anxiety about 5 years ago but never followed up with much treatment(the therapist I saw was way too expensive for my family to afford, much less the psychiatrist who was going to prescribe meds). Now, I do not FEEL anxious right now.. besides worrying about why I am short of breath..but overall I do not feel anxious. Though, I have had a lot going on in my personal life as well as starting school again. I called the doctor and the nurse told me it sounds like anxiety.. but I do not feel anxious at all! So, I guess my question is: do I have to feel anxious to be having anxiety symptoms? If so, then any tips to help me cope with this before my appointment with my doctor on Monday?  Thanks [info] None [info] 1578619643
relicater [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety over 4 years ago, it's different  [info] None [info] 1551990184
haddcxndy_ [info] How can I deal with my anxiety at my 9-5? Hey!I suffer from severe performance anxiety (perfectionism, procrastination, doubt, low self-esteem). I was diagnosed with anxiety in my final year of university and I was put on medication and had therapy.After 2 weeks of graduating, I started a high intensity internship in the city and immediately experienced severe anxiety again. I work at a consultancy. I would stay up till midnight working, cry in the bathroom, forget to eat my lunch, shake and sweat uncontrollably. I dread working and I count down the days till the weekend. I never know what I’m doing, I don’t have any confidence in my skills or abilities and I find tasks so difficult. I never know where to begin or what to do.  I went to therapy again for 3 months but I had to stop as it got too expensive. My manager is aware of my anxiety but he has anxiety too (he told me).I ended up being promoted 10 months into my internship, but I’m so codependent on my coworkers to get any work done. Whenever I get a new request from a client I feel sick and I have no idea how to handle it. I just burst into tears. My job is to do consultancy work for clients so imagine how many times I cry... It’s really effecting my well-being. I feel like giving up. I can’t apply for new roles right now because of the whole coronavirus situation. The thought of starting a new position remotely and not in person makes me even more anxious as I’m quite slow.I honestly feel so stupid! Any advice would be great please. [info] None [info] 1587973003
nomipaige16 [info] Could it be Conversion Disorder? Beginning in May 2019, I started to have numbness (pins and needles sensation) in both arms, neck, and jaw. This soon evolved into chest pains and numbness, similar to the tightness you experience when wearing a corset (like physically feeling like you can't expand your lungs). I went to a cardiologist, who ran an echo, EKG and had me wear a heart monitor. They found nothing. The feelings progressed to two-three times a day, every day. I saw a neurologist and had brain scans done, and they also found nothing. Everyone told me it's anxiety. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and have been on several different medications, none of which I felt worked. I've been in and out of therapy. I went off my meds and antidepressants in April. I also vaped an ecig for three years, which I quit in August. Upon hearing about the mysterious vaping illnesses, my symptoms worsened severely to the point where I had to leave class, quit my job and went to the ER. After many blood tests and chest xrays, they found absolutely nothing wrong. This past week I went to a pulmonologist, after being convinced it had something to do with my lungs. They did another chest xray and a breathing test. Nothing was found again. Everyone is telling me it's anxiety, but I get these horrible feelings of numbness and chest tightness all day every day and it's not triggered by anything in particular at all. I'm so exhausted and so terrified. I'm always petrified that I'm going to die in my sleep. My doctor thinks I have conversion disorder. Does anyone have any idea as to what I might be experiencing or think it aligns with conversion disorder? Many thanks in advance. &amp;#x200B;I've had my B12 tested, tested for Lyme Disease, blood tests for any STDs or clots. [info] None [info] 1571542384
ageekyninja [info] As someone with both disorders, ADD and anxiety have similarities but ADD doesnt cause you to be super nervous to the same extent anxiety disorder does. ADD causes nervousness and irritability for different reasons, especially if its sensory related. Anxiety itself is a bit of a different ballgame. Anxiety is just plain nervousness for no reason. ADD interacts with that in how it distracts me and how it effects me handling it but doesnt cause it. So its really a matter if your experience is something like that where you are irrationally nervous about a lot of things or if this is just one insecurity you have. If its just a matter of insecurity in relationships thats a different issue of course.Any time I was tested for ADD the doctor was only ever focused on what he was specifically testing for, not what other problems might exist. Like the doctor would suspect ADD and so he would just focus on if the test would confirm it. At least thats my experience. It wasnt until later that I was diagnosed with anxiety and that was after specifically asking the doctor about those specific symptoms. [info] None [info] 1523833300
Martes_De_Jair [info] Guys I'm afraid and confused I've been randomly having hallucinations, it mostly happens when I'm trying to focus on some school work or stuff like that. It is stuff like tiny black feathers falling in front of me just to disappear when I look at the place it should have fallen, I also sometimes hear people say my name (the voice varies as well as the volume) P.S. If it helps I am diagnosed with anxiety and disperse attention disorder (idk if that's the english name but in Spanish it's called "transtorno de atención dispersa" wich isnt the same as ADD or ADHD) [info] 14 [info] 1569686448
ILoveNarwhals [info] ;___; You're my other half! I've been diagnosed with anxiety, been on Prozac for yeaaars and this exact same thing happens to me. Especially talking to people who have authority over me. Man, I don't know what to tell you besides you're not alone because if I knew the answer I wouldn't be in the same boat.  [info] None [info] 1272942843
handwritten_emojis [info] Yes, I was diagnosed with anxiety in 6th grade (age 11) [info] None [info] 1557002149
maq0r [info] Former blue badge here: no I didn't. Worked in retail, on the tech side of things. It was a ruthless environment where only whites and Asians would thrive and create their fiefdoms and kingdoms to go for that L6, L7+. Further, frugality is fine when you need to be conscious about resources you use, is another thing when SLU is being rebuilt from the ground up with 40 story high buildings and not one gym for the employees or subsidized food. "There's plenty of options around town" said Bezos during an all hands, but what they don't say is that most of the gyms and restaurants around campus are owned by Amazon execs so of course they're not going to offer anything for free. It felt too mining town for me. Also, crying under the desk? Yep, checked here, 11 hr days, sev2s (like FIX IT NOW tickets) left and right. I did NOT have a good time. "oh but it depends on team" sure, but the gym/food story isn't team dependant. I left a year ago when I was diagnosed with anxiety due to work. Can't recommend.  [info] None [info] 1528870578
Jenny-Thalia [info] I'm a bit late to this but... When I was younger, I was in blatantly abusive relationships. I mean, I knew they were. Sexual and physical abuse are obvious aren't they? Then I got help and got much better mentally and emotionally and had healthy relationships. Then he came along. This one was so much harder to see what he was doing. He was amazing for three years. In year four, things got weird. I found some suspicious texts (truly by accident, they popped up on his screen, I never ever checked his phone). It spiralled. He spent months telling me to stop seeking reassurance about us, while simultaneously cancelling our plans on the regular and just being straight up cold towards me. He stopped bringing me out but always had excuses like he was too tired. He stopped letting me see his friends or family, again "too tired," or "I don't see them much anymore." He'd drop out of contact for a night, telling me a relative was sick or his mom was needing help. He all of a sudden never had money anymore so I'd "lend" him money that he'd feel so so guilty about. But never paid me back. He never bought me a birthday present (not even  a card, I'd  be happy  with a card) and I had to pay for him to come for dinner for my birthday because he had "no money." The worst part was I'm diagnosed with anxiety and was always so honest about that. So anytime I questioned how things were, how he was treating me, if he was cheating, he'd tell me my anxiety was making me paranoid and to stop being crazy. It got so bad that I spoke to my doctor about going back on meds and to therapy. She actually told me I didn't need either but that therapy might help me because I was somehow perfectly happy and healthy in every other relationship or friendship in life. Guess she knew what was up. Turns out he was cheating. Even when I saw the proof, I was crazy and he loved me and I need to stop being so anxious. The effect being mentally abused has had on me has been profound. It was so slow, so sly and so unlike what I'd experienced before. It's only been a couple of months but I'm a different person. I don't even speak to male friends now, fearing ulterior motives. I hide all of my feelings and don't share my emotions with anyone in case they're ever used against me again. I'm very quiet and reserved now and keep to myself. Before I was bubbly and fun to be around. And it fucking sucks because despite what he did, I love him and although I'd never ever take him back, I can't just write off those three years where he treated me like royalty. And now I'm stuck wondering was it all a lie?  I thought I was stronger than this. And he doesn't care.  [info] None [info] 1542909810
nokalica [info] From my perspective, HRT is essential medical care that I should have been receiving from a pretty young age. I didn't know I was trans then, because it just wasn't something I had a concept of. But I was diagnosed with anxiety and a long list of other things, and I was given I don't know how many drugs, even if it really should've been clear that I was likely trans and needing help. When I finally took estrogen, it was really the first time that I felt better of some level of dysphoric anxiety and just feel "normal." For me, I consider an aspect of my trans identity to relate to issues with my hormonal system. The state of medical knowledge and care in trans medicine is still appalling bad, particularly given how many people are trans overall. I want doctors to do better, and I think we are owed more research just so better care can be provided. What happened in my youth was malpractice and forced on me, and the medical system is only causing harm and wasting money when it isn't trans aware and affirmative.My identity is mine through self-identification alone, and I don't need a medically proven category to fall into to be real.  No one does. I don't want to see doctors telling kids they are trans because of brain scan, but now there are gender-specialist child therapists are just helping kids figure themselves out, and there should be more of them. If medicine can better answer why someone is trans, it might mean better tuned HRT, quicker and younger referrals to good doctors, and just on and on.We are pretty well medically proven to be real already, and that understanding will just keep getting better, but there are still going to be invalidating assholes. If it is just about the hormonal care, it is still positive. [info] None [info] 1562905359
sloveene [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder early this year and was prescribed lexapro for my panic attacks. I'm off of it now since I've been better. Taking B complex and switched on a vegan diet. Which other supplement I could take for long term use? [info] None [info] 1508286376
foxmom2 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety for years and only this year did I get a diagnosis of PVCs.  Not anything worrisome, unless you're in the midst of an episode in which case you become convinced this is the end. ;) [info] None [info] 1544399989
roleoco [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety order by a doctor (i have to specify since many tell people they have anxiety lately when they don’t know what it is really like)So yeah.. probably a reason why i feel like this [info] None [info] 1561057836
mynsfwself [info] I feel like I may be a textbook "black box warning" case, but life is just weighing me down I'm 18. And it looks like I have it all figured out. Amazing boyfriend I'm planning to marry, top-20 university, lots of money, the works. But I'm miserable. I've had chronic pain since July, and it wore me down so much last semester I ended up with a 1.23 GPA for my first college semester. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, a panic disorder, and OCD. I'm on zoloft and a birth control which make the bad thoughts go away, and don't numb me emotionally. My parents are getting divorced and selling my childhood home. I was raped in June. I had a miscarriage in December. All of my old friends have drifted away, and keeping new ones is just too much work. I barely leave my room- this morning I took a piss in the sink just to avoid going out into the hall. I keep having idle thoughts of suicide. I picture hanging myself in the teacher that almost failed me's office. I imagine OD'ing and going to sleep and no one knowing. I don't have a constant social life, none of my classes have required attendance, and I don't have a roommate because she moved out. If I died in my room, the first person to realize would be my boyfriend if I didn't call. He is the only thing that keeps me from it. I love my social activities, and I socialize occasionally. I love my major, love to learn. But I just want to give up. I go to therapy once a week, but I don't tell her because I'm afraid I'll be locked up. What do I do? I don't intend to act on these fears, but I'm so afraid I won't be able to control myself. [info] None [info] 1329167242
Overyonderway [info] I don't mean to sound insulting if you have already done this, but have you told your mental health provider your concern in plain language? I've always had good luck plainly explaining my problems to the doctor. Like "I know I am diagnosed with anxiety but I also have xxxx going on. Is that related or new?" [info] None [info] 1458772429
Surr07 [info] I recently had a breakdown with my ADHD, anxiety and hypersensitivity. I am diagnosed. However, my medicine is slowly starting to not work as effectively as it once did. So until I can get that fixed it is going to be an uphill battle. My suggestion is to allow yourself to feel those emotions. My problem seems to be keeping all of what I like to call my asshole feelings (really it is just honesty) to myself for a good portion if not all of my day. Becomes a sincere task that occasionally I am unable to overcome. I would say try going and getting diagnosed. That is what it took for me. My first trip, I was diagnosed with anxiety, my second trip I was diagnosed with ADD and ADHD. It sucks not being medicated for it but it is do-able. Just have to tell yourself you are taking steps in the right direction to better your current situation. Good luck, hope this helps in one way or another. [info] None [info] 1531486077
elrabb22 [info] Yes in the past definitely. It got pretty bad again a few weeks ago. I experimented with visualization to see what it looked like that was disturbing my morning. I settled on a heart meditation and could visually “see” all of these attacks and negative thoughts that were just below the surface. So each day I imagined calling it dish and tending to my invisible wounds. After one month I woke up without any stress or anxiety. It took quite a bit of work I don’t want to lie to you. Full disclosure I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past and used to suffer full blown panic attacks. I really hope this helps, feel free to dm me. [info] None [info] 1559158733
Isrozzis [info] So I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder this week. Really explains a lot of things that I've been struggling with for awhile. Panic attacks are absolutely terrifying. Going from chilling out to feeling like you're having a heart attack is 0/10. It doesn't help that I'm either a hypochondriac or real close, so I'll worry about small things in my health until they become a problem. I've seen some doctors and got some medication which has helped, but it takes time to fully get going. Of course life style changes are important too. The weirdest thing is that after a big panic attack normal things that I love will make me panic. Like I looked at a gochiusa gif and was just absolutely terrified for no reason. That's been a really weird experience, but I've been able to convince myself that the anime girls won't hurt me. The brain is a hell of a thing sometimes...It's been a rough week. I feel like a used rag that's been tossed aside.  [info] http://myanimelist.net/animelist/isrozzis [info] 1483774101
abduayoub_ [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago and maybe that's why no girls are into me, not coz of my looks its coz of how weird I am :/ [info] 1 Day [info] 1490288259
quietanatomygirl [info] "you have nothing to worry about." - exact words from my mom when I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1404855457
Zaitlinspf [info] How did yall push past your anxiety to be able to talk to new people? Currently a college freshman and struggling with making friends. I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 5 but my family never really did much besides tell me I was just being being anxious and needed to get over my shyness. (Family is better about mental health though as I've gotren older).I had a hard time in highschool making friends till highschool where I found my clique and we all stuck together. Now I'm on my own and have 1 new friend and 1 from my highschool. I try to talk to people in class but feel myself hold back as I feel like the person isn't interested or feel like I talked to much or that they think I'm weird. I also started catching that I lightly stutter or slur my words now and I have no idea how that started or how to make it stop. And I just feel like I'm holding myself back from something so easy. I really want to meet new people so I've tried to join clubs and just didn't like the vibe of the groups. I'm now trying to talk to classmates to try and make a friend. But I suck at keeping a conversation going without feeling weird and anxious.How did yall get over your social anxiety? Or at least push through it? Any tips to stop feeling like the other person isn't intrested/bored when they aren't? [info] None [info] 1582007589
fiver_gotacrucifix [info] Hi Everyone! So this is my first post for this group and I hope others consider joining and sharing their stories/thoughts. Currently also have a [small Facebook group](https://www.facebook.com/groups/1003848139806616/) that's part of a grass-roots organization of the same name as [this group](https://www.facebook.com/Caregiver-Compass-410827466148449/?modal=admin_todo_tour). Hoping people will like and visit both, but being Facebook and its privacy issues, totally understand hesitation. Anyway, came to Reddit because it seems like an easier place to share things. But onto my story. I'm a semi-informal caregiver.&amp;#x200B;I'm an older millennial, no children of my own but am...the most responsible of my siblings. My parents are senior citizens and are currently taking care of my niece because her parents are currently incapable (not ready to go into the whys of that situation). Anyway, it's been super hard and challenging. I live a few cities from them, so I try to visit on a weekly basis to give support and relief. My niece is young and super sweet, but because of her upbringing, there are challenges. Plus, she's young and my parents are seniors. It's hard to watch them try to muster the energy to do all the things one needs to when you have a child under 10 in your home. I am not married and not financially able to care for a child and truthfully, I've never felt stable enough in any capacity to be a mom. I was diagnosed with anxiety in my twenties, PTSD, and have been in recovery for an ED for several years- not that people like me can't be mothers, but I just don't feel with all my challenges I can guarantee a stable household for my niece which is why I didn't take her when the courts called.&amp;#x200B;When my parents took her, I begged them to strongly consider all the challenges they would face and wanted the entire family to discuss the best way to handle the situation. This didn't happen and as I've mentioned it's been a challenge. My parents are wonderful, but sometimes I don't think they can handle children. All of me and my siblings are half siblings. Growing up, it was usually just me and with the exception of myself, my parents have had to deal with being "full-time, having a kid in your face 24/7 parents." I was a very independent somewhat introverted child who kept to myself. They didn't need to help me with school projects or many "kid" things, so it's been a shock for them to now, in their golden years, be working on book projects and new math. I feel horrible for them, horrible for my niece who is a victim of the circumstances she was born into, and honestly, a little for myself because I feel forced into witnessing this horror show by just being involved as much as I am. Of course, I could just severe ties with my family, but I love/like my parents, adore my niece and it's neither of their fault this has happened. The courts have not been helpful in holding the responsibly parties in this mess accountable. When I think about the situation too long, I become physically ill. Mostly, I try to be pragmatic and have a positive attitude, visiting for movie dates, helping with homework and just being an ear for my mother, who is doing a lot of work, since my dad isn't retired yet. If anyone is going through something similar please feel free to share. When we hear the word caregiving, we often thinking of caring for someone older (and I do a lot for my parents, though they are still self reliant and, grace of God, in good health), but it's also really hard to care for a young person who is just getting their start with so many odds against them and the people who created them won't step up. 'sigh'. Thanks for listening to this really long, self pitying (sorry!) post. [info] None [info] 1555956449
hahabyeeee [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 9, ADHD when I was 11. I took an SSRI and adderall for 8 years. Adderall never caused anxiety.  I now am 20 and take Wellbutrin and adderall and my anxiety is horrible. I took 25mg when I was younger. The past year I took 15mg, and now I’m down to 10mg due to the bad anxiety it causes me. I can only take it on days that I have to do school work because it just causes unnecessary anxiety for me. It was giving me chest pains at 15mg, the 10 is better but the doctor said that we can lower it to 5mg if necessary. I’d ask the doctor if you could try Strattera which is a non-stimulant adhd medication. It does not increase anxiety, but i think it takes 6 weeks to get into your system. But, if you’ve managed the adhd symptoms for the past 9 years I think an extra 6 weeks wouldn’t be too bad to wait for medication to take effect. Your doctor also might want a new diagnosis. I started seeing a new psychiatrist this year and my adhd diagnosis was 9 years old so he wanted me to get a new one before prescribing any controlled substances. Good luck!  [info] None [info] 1553802629
fgsixtynine [info] This happened to me. I didn't eat for the first month of a 3 month internship because I just didn't have the appetite. I was diagnosed with anxiety induced gastritis when I got home and saw my doctor. Apparently the longer you let it go, the worse it gets. I was able to not starve by drinking a lot of my calories. Smoothies, chocolate milk, milkshakes, etc. Probably not the most nutritious but it helped me hold on! [info] None [info] 1500089897
thegrandkameron [info] Does adderall help with anxiety? I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder by many different doctors. A lot of general and social anxiety. I have tried different medicines but I never really felt a difference. I have also been diagnosed with ADD before. I tried taking meds before but after a while I just quit because I never felt a difference and I really don't like being on medicines in the first plac. Lately my anxiety has been getting worse due to the fact that I have a 5 month old, my husband got orders for us to move to New Orleans soon and I will be starting college as soon as we get there. This has led to anxiety attacks almost everyday, constant worrying, and absolutely no motivation. Well today I needed to get a lot done, so I tried taking one of my husbands adderalls. I've got to say, I haven't felt this good in a very long time. I actually got up and took a shower before noon! Like I said before, I have social anxiety, but not today! I called my friend and talked and I also ended up bringing my neighbor something that I had been meaning to but was too scared to actually go over there. I want to know if this is common while taking adderall. I don't want to go to my doctor sounding like a drug addict asking for it. I just want to feel normal again and enjoy the time I have with my daughter before I have to go to college. [info] None [info] 1385520520
mrpookie27 [info] Please help me 24. Male. Am in pretty decent shape.I have been to the doctor 4 times since last November (once was for my yearly physical). I was diagnosed with anxiety and am on meds but hasn’t really helped.Symptoms: -I initially went to the doctor because I had been seeing a decent amount of blood when I wipe (Dr said this is hemorrhoids. I do believe him on this one because a few years ago I had an external one go come and go) - stomach bloating ( I have been feeling bloated on and off since November, (Dr said he couldn’t find  any enlarged organs or anything out of the ordinary when doing a physical exam of my stomach)- pale colored stools (this has only happened a couple of time)-not sure if they are fatty stools but I can see some undigested foods. - awful indigestion and heartburn (Dr gave me some medicine I take everyday for this and it has worked wonders)   - no weight loss or jaundice    I have been terrified I had colon cancer at the beginning and he reassured that I was fine. I didn’t get a colonoscopy but he did do a CEA blood test and it came back well within the normal range. Now I’m terrified something is wrong with my pancreas. My doctor said the bloating was muscle cramps in my stomach because it comes and goes but I’m still really worried. My complete blood test was normal (all bilirubin levels were normal, the only thing that was high was my cholesterol and not by much). Should I go see a different doctor to get a second opinion, or go back to mine and push for more tests? I’m definitely looking into therapy right now. [info] None [info] 1557634268
thisisappropriate [info] Also UK, took nearly a month off of my weekend job having to call in on Saturday with assorted sickness/headaches every week until I was diagnosed with anxiety and given two more weeks off. Mine said "anxiety state" typed into the section, I just told everyone it was the stress of uni when I went back, handed in my notice and made a few counselors appointments, the pay was nice, but not worth it. [info] None [info] 1395702072
zitjohnson [info] Same. I drove myself to the ER when I was 20 because I felt palpitations and have a history of heart disease in my family. While 20 is super young, I had never felt that before and the worry only exacerbated the rapid heart rate. Turns out my ECG was fine for the most part, only one abnormal wave but the doctors said that happens to most people time to time. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder by a professional and while I rarely talk about it, the times I feel like an attack is coming on, the people around me dismiss it as general paranoia/attention seeking. Tbh, before I experienced real panic and anxiety attacks I may have thought the same way, so I don't take it to heart, but I try to inform them it's not as simple as feeling nervous. I don't even need the person around me to do anything, simply a presence is enough to get me through. [info] None [info] 1534734849
heberton100915 [info] I [22f] heard my co-worker [50sF?] calling me lazy at work. I was recently hired as a phone clerk at a law office and from the very beginning I was told that there would be a lot of down time (nothing to do except answer the phone). The office manager literally said "I hope you don't get to bored with the position sometimes it gets really quiet". Originally, when I had no projects I would just wait for the phone to ring or play on the computer. (This is something that a lot of the entry level people seem to do at my job. I often see my co-workers on their cell-phones or on Facebook.) I asked the person who had my old job (she moved into a higher position) if this was okay and she said its pretty much understood that some days I won't have much to do. Eventually, I ran out of things to do but I still wanted to be productive so I started to bring in LSAT prep material. I started studying a couple days ago. I've been working there for a month roughly. Today, I was studying and one of my co-workers brought me a small project. I finished it pretty quickly and I gave it to her and told her that if she had anything else for me she just needed to let me know. She said thank you and I walked back to my desk. As I was sitting down I heard her say to another co-worker (who happens to be her family member) something along the lines of she gets paid to do nothing she just sits there and reads her book. I was really uncomfortable so I avoided her for the rest of the day. Anytime she pasted by my desk she would give me a dirty look so I made an effort to just avoid her glances. A couple lawyers came by my desk and saw me studying and gave me compliments. The first one told me I was smart for studying on down time and the second one just sort of gave me a thumbs up and said she could see I was studying hard. I was being encouraged to study by people in the profession I hope to one day work in.I made an effort to ask the co-worker (her family member not the person who made the comment) she had anything she needed help with. She didn't have a project for me but thanked me for asking. I also asked the office manager and she did stop by to give me a project but the phones started ringing so she told me to wait until there was a phone back up (tomorrow) to learn how to do the project. She basically left me to go back to studying.Still after hearing that I had asked for a project and was not given one the women passed by my desk at the end of the day to give me another dirty look. This is not the first time she's made these types of comments. This is the second time but I suspect that she will continue to do this if I stay at my job.What should I do? I don't want to report her and end up making it worse. As it is now I'm dreading work. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so this is really stressing me out. I could barely hold the tears in at work and when I got home I couldn't hold it in. I've been in tears since then.   ---     **tl;dr**: My co-worker has been making nasty comments about how "I don't do any work". I'm a new receptionist and I've been told to focus on learning the phones and worry about projects later. The office manager told me that there will be times where I won't have anything to do. Still, I'm being labeled lazy for studying for my up coming exam. [info] None [info] 1477965478
bear_ios [info] Paranormal things since I was a small kid changed my entire life, and I have no explanation The paranormal activities that changed my whole life started in 2006, and I was only a child.Ever since I was a small girl, I only remember the things that happened to me with my so called “ghosts”.As really as the age of 3, I used to have recent sleep paralysis and odd encounters with either humans or inhuman things.The first one I remember is what I call the shadow man, and I’d love to hear if any of you guys had something like this.I woke up one night in cold sweat, unable to move my body except for my head.I looked over to the door, about to scream to my mom but then I saw a tall shadow, just looking at me from the slightly-open door. I just looked at it for what seemed like hours and it gave off this unexplainable energy.It wasn’t violent but I didn’t feel safe.What felt like hours later I finally managed to sit up and the shadow suddenly came closer as I tried to scream but couldn’t and after that I believe I might have blacked out.That was the point it all began...I remember having sleepless nights, just staring into air with a blank expression and my body not moving but somehow not being exhausted, going to different places and suddenly feel the need to get as far away from there because I feel like I’m followed, like I’m being watched.Because I was a kid, living like this wasn’t really normal in the quiet neighborhood I grew up in, so my parents took me to see a psychologistI was diagnosed with anxiety, not so severe that I had to take meds, but still as an anxious child.And so on, everything continued like that, me being stressed and losing friends because of what I was experiencing.When it peaked I was in 6th grade, no friends, barely talked and never got my head out of my book, the complete opposite of the lively kid I used to be.I fell into a depressive state and kept blaming the ghosts and demons in my life.My memory was wiped, I don’t remember anything from age 12 or even 13 and down, only my encounters and a few happy but random moments from my life, and I have no other memory problems, just this complete wipe.After four years I got out of that depressive state, and thankfully during my recovery not a lot happened in the paranormal field of my life.But not long ago I visited a graveyard for the very first time, to see my mom’s family.I truly believe, as ridiculous as it sounds, something followed me back.Weird noises, knocking, whispers of my name and doors opening and closing are the things that lead me to believe that.I got so scared I recorded myself one night and listened back to it, saving every weird noise or knock I hear.And so we come to now, where I am afraid of going places and I don’t even feel safe in my own room.I tried to find an explanation to everything, talked with everyone I can get my story to.My friends really don’t believe me and while listening to the recordings I tried to be as skeptical as possible, sharing them with other skeptics and we found no explanation.I haven’t checked the area for paranormal activities because I don’t think I heard of basically any of them.I want to hear other stories, people who had similar or even same encounters and how they are doing because I am just lost at this point.I am sorry if my English is a bit weird or if I have some mistakes since it’s not my first language. [info] None [info] 1549977500
billbobb1 [info] So once you have anxiety, does it ever go away? I had my first anxiety attack, in my mid thirties, five years ago. I was diagnosed with anxiety soon after. I dived right into therapy, doing all the work I was told to by my therapist. I had successfull results.  I thought I was fine. Then had another anxiety attack two years ago while swimming. I just had my third anxiety attack driving across a bridge that I have driven over at least 100 times throughout the years.  I was with my family and in laws and it was humiliating. As my mother in law is old school Peruvian and no considers me as less of a man and calls me a scaredy-cat. We’ve never had the best relationship. I am use to living an active life. Before this happened, I was studying to get my pilots license, now I’m heartbroken and afraid to follow through with my training because I’m afraid of what might happen in the air. My point being, once you have an anxiety attack is it just a matter of time before another one hits?  Once you have anxiety, do you always have it?  For the rest of my life, is it just about managing anxiety?  Does anxiety ever completely go away? [info] None [info] 1514868267
RedBeard94 [info] Yeah. There could be something small that causes them, it could be something that you don't really notice. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was in second grade, so 7 or 8 years old, and had anxious thoughts routinely until around high school. Right as I returned to school for my sophomore year of college, my anxiety started up again. There was not much that changed between my freshman year and my sophomore year. It just started again.  [info] Our Anxiety Does Not Define Us [info] 1445202381
blueberry_deuce [info] OP basically said that because of reddit she has come to fear and distrust all men, even going so far as to question as to whether her male friends are REALLY her friends and assuming that her mistreatment by her male boss is a "normal" thing and something she would experience everywhere she goes. I was just explaining that reddit demographics definitely don't reflect real world demographics and that she shouldn't be fearful of men.Of course you aren't the intended target of this post. Your positive voice is valuable and helps turn the tide of negativity. I hope it didn't sound like I was bashing those with social anxiety - I am diagnosed with anxiety myself, so that would be rather silly. Sorry if any of my word choices came off that way. :( [info] None [info] 1427051157
shortkid113 [info] No, that's very helpful. I was diagnosed with anxiety years ago, but brushed it under the rug and wish I hadn't.  [info] None [info] 1550029507
The_wiZZard69 [info] Horrible with money is it possible to be financially sound. Here is a list of my income and expenses. I know this is stuff that I should be able to figure out myself but I am horrible at it. I have been diagnosed with anxiety that stems from finances. I can't go a day with out worrying about money I am coming here to hope some one or people can help me create a plan. My base pay without overtime comes out to 1550 bi weekly so about 3100 a month. I live with a child and fiancée and we rely only on my own income. Here is the list of our expenses. -rent 1250 a month (as of aug 1 it will be dropped to 1100. - truck payment is 316 bi weekly 632 a month -insurance is 125 a month -phone is 150$ a month if we stay in the plan and no overages. -internet cable is 150$ - utilities are 75$ a month.  That is the hard numbers. The rest goes to gas groceries and other spending. - I have a credit card that is at 7000$ My problem is I never pay bills on time I always am 2 months behind on phone bills and can never pay on time. I'm basically living pay to pay. I find we eat out a lot and have been slowing down on that. I never miss car or insurance payments. We do have our wedding coming up in two weeks and be able to pay off the credit card at the least and be able to start saving. - I am able to work overtime and possibly get 1 a week at 300$ per overtime but I cannot rely on that. So safe to say I can almost guarantee 2 a month. My goal is to build a 5000$ nest egg by next year alone and any extra if my fiancé is able to find a job. Is this possible how can I attain it? Thank you. [info] None [info] 1499039229
ant105 [info] I know, it's just a damn bloody shame the system is so messed up. Like you say, the doctors and Parma are nicely tucked up in bed together. They don't really give two shits about us in the grand scheme of things. As long as they keep pushing the most profitable drugs, it's win win for them. I seriously think in a few hundred years, they'll look back on psych meds and the whole treatment of mental health issues with utter horror. I really do hope you get yourself sorted out, what I would do is try to go for Temazepam (not sure of its brand name in the US, halicon I think) as that is one they specifically prescribe for sleep. I don't fully understand the way your insurance system in the states works, but if you have the insurance and a good doctor, surely they can't turn you down? You know the really depressing thing, is that had no choice but to obtain them without a doctor/nhs. I have a real illness, I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and there is so little help over here it makes me so angry. They push all their SSRIs on me which do absolutely nothing but give me awful side effects and turn me into an emotionless zombie. It hurts that I KNOW benzodiazepines work, plus with a medically supervised schedule, they would change my life and allow me to live like a normal person. But no. UK guidelines won't allow that, hence why I turn to other sources to self medicate myself since the doctors don't give a shit.Sorry, it makes me feel emotional taking about it.Listen, if you want to PM me, I might be able to help you. [info] None [info] 1505083034
kirby__000 [info] What's your story?&amp;#x200B;I'm a business student but I'm very curious about studying computer security and reading good books, not to mention that I can't see my life without studying.&amp;#x200B;What is your dream?&amp;#x200B;my import business is finally certain, i am working to keep it on track i have always had a dream to have my own business and be against all kinds of status quo&amp;#x200B;What's your biggest challenge?&amp;#x200B;at the end of last year I was diagnosed with anxiety, it was one of the worst recent phases of my life, I hadn't realized that I myself was, breaking up with me I didn't have a base of physical activity, I didn't socialize, my import business hadn't been created yet, that time was where I studied the most, very heavy things, and I was finishing my business school, being so all attention was turned to these independent study that I liked, and learned a lot of things, but also left me very anxious yet, I did not return to my college, to finish today some people say to me that my business will not work but I know how to filter that negative opinion in positive is only so that your business will have exodus never give up. [info] None [info] 1566063460
ShitPiss69 [info] Heart pain after coke So I am 19 years old in pretty good health.  However, every time I do Coke I feel this pain in my chest and get kinda worked up.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety so could it be that?  I don't do it so much where I consider it a problem, I just worry that it is severely hurting me.  I just did some right now and feel chest pain.  Is this killing me? I have a normal heart rate if that matters. [info] None [info] 1489286837
benjazio_xd [info] My anxiety and my girlfriend I've been on a relationship with this beautiful girl about a year ago, and it has truly been the best time of my life. I love her with all my heart and soul, she really cares for me when I'm down, and we've had really good moments together.I was diagnosed with anxiety about seven months ago, and for the most part it hasn't strained our relationship, she has anxiety too so she understands me really well when I'm feeling down. However, the past month has been really tough for me. If I start to panic, i start thinking that she does not love me anymore, pushing me further down the spiral. I know for a fact she does love me just as much as I do, but that thought sticks with me and I can't seem to be able to get rid of it. I don't want to end it, it's a beautiful relationship, but it's really starting to take a toll on me. [info] None [info] 1503198055
allthesnacks [info] Are misdiagnosis of Anxiety and OCD common for folks with ADHD? I have no diagnosis for ADHD myself although I display many of the symptoms which are identical to my brothers who actually was recently diagnosed with ADHD. However, when I went in displaying the same symptoms I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. I'm 29/F and I'm wondering if others also had this experience. I'm on Zoloft which has helped with the anxiety but nothing else. I'll be going in for a second opinion soon. [info] None [info] 1506899125
nerdularATX [info] Thank you. I don't have OCD but seeing people throw that around like it's a cute little quirk is disgusting. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder in third grade and went into a really bad spiral not long after my older child was born that took months of therapy to get out from under.  As someone with anxiety, I can't even fathom why people would want to draw so much attention to it. I want nothing more than to hide it so people think I am "normal"! I think it has at least helped my performance at work. I am so on top of things because I'm terrified of missing or forgetting something. And my dreams are trolls. I never have pleasant dreams.  [info] None [info] 1453244378
ace_detective [info] My mom thinks my medication "made" me ace. What are good resources for parents? I accidentally came out to my family over the summer. My mom didn't react well, and kept saying things like that I only think I'm ace because the media shoves teenage sex down our throats, that she doesn't want me to end up alone. Yesterday, she suggested I look up the side effects of the anxiety medication I've been taking for the past 2 years, and that I may want to consider trying different medications because it may be causing side effects I don't realize. I looked them up, saw some very minor things that I'd noticed but am completely fine with. Today, she told me that decreased sexual desire is one of the side effects, that maybe it was causing my asexuality and maybe I wanted to try a different medication. This got us in a bit of an argument. No, the medicine isn't making me asexual, I just am. I don't look at sex how my friends do. She made the point that she didn't look at sex the same way as other people until she was in her 20s, she was a virgin until her 20s and that I don't need an excuse to not have sex. No, being a virgin isn't why I'm ace, it's not an excuse, I just don't experience sexual attraction. What the hell do I do now? I know I'm grey-ace. It's not the anxiety medication-I felt the same way about sex and relationships and how I feel towards other people 2 years before I was diagnosed with anxiety, even if I didn't use the word "Asexual" to describe it. Do any of y'all have experience bringing parents around about this? I didn't even want my mom to know that I'm grey-ace, but now that the cat's out of the bag, I want her to actually understand. Do you have good resources for parents, links I can send her?Thanks /r/asexuality [info] Grey [info] 1420834595
especi4lly [info] What’s wrong with me? 19F , around 130lbs , 5’2” For the past few months I’ve been having really bad headaches and pressure in my head that makes my head feeel so heavy. It’s almost a constant feeling, but sometimes will go away for a little.  It sometimes almost comes with a dissociative feeling as well.  When I lay down the pressure gets worse as well and can make sleeping a bit annoying. I find that during my period the headaches get worse as well and the pressure. I also recently have been tracking my heart rate because I’ve noticed while working out my heart rate would increase up to 190 while using the elliptical which I thought seemed a bit to high. My normal heart rate is anywhere from 60-85 laying down but when I stand up it can increase up to 120 sometimes even higher and then just moving around and walking around my house it increases to 140. I notice I generally feel a little fatigued ALL the time and dizzy here and there as well. I find standing up straight for long periods of time uncomfortable as well and make me feel kinda out of it and make me feel like I just need to sit down. Standing in the shower is also SUPER dreadful and  I tend to have to sit down after awhile.  I sleep fairly decent but do suffer from the occasional sleep paralysis , and I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder but it feels pretty controlled for the most part and my stresses in life.  I have iron deficiency anemia and I am not on any medication currently as well. Sorry if it’s a bit all over the place but have any ideas what’s going on? Feel free to ask any questions [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1581195433
mademoiselle93 [info] If your school has like educational services to help people when struggling academically. When I was diagnosed with anxiety, it helped to sit down with someone who could talk to me about everything I was experiencing and trying to pinpoint problems. If she hasn't done this, I would suggest it. [info] None [info] 1459912371
Anxietybullshit [info] Are physical symptoms normal? A little bit of history, I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year ago when I started complaining about chest pains and being constantly on edge and terrified. To be clear it does not feel like my heart, it is more the whole chest area that feels kind of inflamed and really uncomfortable with some sharp pains now and again. The pain would be near constant. I was put on Urbanol for the anxiety and another medication for inflammation, I had to take both for six months. The anti-inflammatory didn't really do anything to make the actual pain go away. After about five months I noticed that when I took the Urbanol, I actually felt way more anxious so I stopped taking them. Things got better and I would occasionally have a really bad day but felt fine on most days. Never had an actual panic attack until about a month ago when I had one that was really bad. Haven't had one since so I do not know if that is a good thing. Whenever I do have a particularly anxious day, I get physical symptoms which obviously makes the anxiety worse. My chest area and back start hurting again, I have body aches all over kind of like when you have the flu, my fingertips go numb, I get really moody and irritable and I just feel like my body is sick all over making it really hard to function without crawling into a little ball and wishing it could just end. Is this normal? Does anyone else experience it? And if you do, what do you do to make it better?Sorry about the wall of text, I just really need some advice.Thanks for reading. [info] None [info] 1464248807
Ronology [info] I [M18] am 98% my NMom [F47] will refuse yet again to sign the 2019-2020 FAFSA that comes out October 1st, 2018. What can I do? The relationship between my Mother and I has been horrendous. I can't even call her "Mom" because of all the things she has done and called me. I have done some things that I'm not proud of too but I feel like I emulated my Mother's actions. I lived with my grandparents for my whole childhood because I felt that they loved and cared for me more. Unfortunately, my Grandfather passed away nearly a year ago. That and other circumstances led to my Grandmother and I, to move in with my Mother.My Mother is not an agreement with me moving from New York to California. I explain to her the benefits from the FAFSA but it seems like she doesn't care. Everytime something goes wrong, it can be as little as a spill on the floor, my Mother will scream and keep going until the birds chirp in the morning.I feel like she is one of the main reasons why I've been diagnosed with anxiety in the first place. Anyway, back to the FAFSA. Like I stated previously, she will use her leverage as a mother and threaten that she will not do anything for me whether it's in New York or California. My college plan is to go to a California Community College and then transfer to a California University. I graduated with a HSE Diploma in June 2018. I want to start college in the Fall semester of 2019.I recently changed my first name and took out my middle name, which is her last name. I kept my deadbeat father's last name because it's a reminder of what not to be. Plus, I like it, a lot. I love my new name; it gives me confidence to start a conversation. I'm also taking care of myself more, ittle by little. She doesn't care though. It's all about her.I understand that the less power you give a narcissist, the less they impact your functioning. My Grandmother lives on a pension and my Mother is middle-class and of course, most likely not going to help. That's why I'm asking for advice.What can I do to go to college without her help? [info] None [info] 1537674182
yoyoman54675 [info] I Feel Like My Brain Is Wired Wrong I feel as though my brain is wired wrong, please help me. I can think the logical thoughts and realise when I'm spiraling, but it's as though the two sides of my brain are constantly at war with each other. I constantly overthink about things that I know the truth of, but I cant help but to think that some how it's bad. I just wish my thoughts would stop.      I trust my girlfriend with my life, so why is it that I think she could be cheating when I know that that's not true at all. I know it to be true, but I cant stop thinking about it when I cant talk to her. It's like I need the reassurance from her constantly, and I hate that. I do love her, but I want to be able to be independent in the relationship as well.      What the hell is wrong with my head? Why dont the thoughts ever stop or at least slow down? Does it ever stop? I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD, and tried medication for a while but it felt like I had no control over my own life while I was on them. Help me, please. [info] None [info] 1577899468
manicsuppressor [info] Looking back I always wonder that myself. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorders now, so maybe I had it before and the weed brought out my symptoms ten-fold. I think it used to alleviate my symptoms initially, and I suffered rebound anxiety whenever I went more than like 6 hours without smoking, so I had to constantly be high or I would start feeling this super horrifying feeling where I felt nauseous and extremely depressed, anxious, uncomfortable, and just terrible all around. I felt like my brain was "damaged" and scattered. I jonesed for it like a heroin addict. At the time I thought I had just built a strong dependance to it or something, and I was always confused why I was the only one that felt that way, and figured I had a unique brain chemistry or something. All my friends just thought I was a pussy.Anyway, I personally would strongly agree with your decision to just stop it completely and never look back at it again. And even without the panic/anxiety problems, there are so many other reasons you're better off without it too. I think the anxiety was the only thing though that could have ever motivated me enough to quit, so sometimes I think it was a blessing in disguise.EDIT: I should also add that although it took me 2 months to fully "recover", I was like 90% better after the first month, but it took another month for the anxiety to completely go back to normal. [info] None [info] 1347809749
flogGNAW9 [info] I used acid far too often for a few months and now I feel really out of it and get bad anxiety sometimes. I haven't tripped in the past 3 months. How long will it be until things get back to normal? I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder before I ever tripped but I'm not sure if or if not I actually have it.  Before tripping I went through times where I would feel really stressed out without a good reason.  After tripping 13 times over a 3 month span I started to feel really out of things for a while.  Around 4 of those 13 trips were bad trips.  I started to feel somewhat better after not tripping for the past 3 months, but things still get weird sometimes.  I do not plan to trip again.  I get paranoid sometimes, and I've had the three worst nightmares of my life within the past 3 months.  How long do you guys think my mind will take to get back to normal? [info] None [info] 1396550316
Belsu [info] Anxiety has returned as a result of my relationship. Some background: I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2007 and was on several different medications until 2014. Following a move and a change in doctors I decided I wanted to take a more therapeutic approach to managing my anxiety. About 7 months ago due to a change in insurance I stopped seeing my therapist; but felt like a had a good handle on things. Currently I am engaged to a man who I love but can also be quite difficult to be with. In fact I have mentioned to him on multiple occasions that he would benefit from talking to someone. Anyway, the point of this post is that today, for the first time in years, I had a full fledged panic attack. I've felt it coming for awhile now but now that it has finally happened it scares me.  I have finally gotten myself composed and I just needed someplace to vent.My fiance gets very angry and today he was following me around calling me a bitch, telling me I was crazy, and telling me that I was lucky he was here because he could "f*ck" any of my friends. Just typing it makes me feel a little shaky. I know that there are a few other stressful things going on in my life but this was the main reason for the panic attack. Even with me repeatedly asking him to leave me alone he continued to follow me around the house escalating the situation.  I guess this is the point where I know I should get out. It's detrimental to my mental health now. As we've been together though I have talked to everyone in my circle less. Which is why I guess I am regailed to posting on a website anonymously. I just don't know what to do and don't know if any of our mutual friends would believe me, he presents such a good front in public. I just needed a place to get it out. Thanks for listening internet. [info] None [info] 1512066772
kimininegaiwo [info] You've found the right place! I was diagnosed with anxiety recently as well. Welcome! [info] Health Anxiety, Emetophobia [info] 1467782597
Clay-Helmet [info] Missed Multiple Classes - May Face Severe Consequences I am on my way to a meeting with my supervisor in 2 hours. I am extremely scared, not sure if I might get suspended. I haven't attended my hospital placement in the last couple of weeks.Had no motivation and feeling so anxious. I came see my doctor because I want to join the army in the future and if I'm diagnosed with anxiety again I'll not be able to enter the army ever in the future. They are very strict on their health requirement.All of this is completely my fault. The placement is great, all the staff are fantastic but am unable to find any motivation. If you've read this far, thank you. [info] None [info] 1580391872
EarlyEnglishSpeaker [info] ironically the fact that I've been diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1570302086
NotSoDivineMissM [info] Damn You Zuckerberg! Okay so my JustMaybe in laws just left, and things were good as they usually are. Their passive aggressive behavior always gets to my husband but even that wasn't as bad as it could've been. So it was a win in the in law book. Unfortunately while they visited we went out to eat with them, my husband's cousin and her family, and my MILs cousin. A very nice meal with plenty of laughter and margaritas. We all decided a nice picture with everyone would be a great way to commemorate the experience, and my MIL decided to post said picture on FACEBOOK. My relationship with Facebook is complex and varied. I don't have one, and I really want one. It's how my family makes plans, how my in laws communicate with everyone, and how my brother shows pictures of my niece. It's a great tool there. But I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD because of my abusive childhood, and Facebook can be a major trigger. Well due to wedding stuff my JustNoMom and my MIL are Facebook friends. I didn't know until yesterday, but she hadn't seen the harm as she didn't know the full situation. My MIL posted the family photo and all hell broke loose. MIL: Spent some time with my eldest son, grandson and son's new wife! Great times, wonderful family. Everyone Else: Awe, what a sweet photo! Glad You had fun.My Mother: I hope you and your son are happy. You stole my daughter and I won't have any relationship with my grandchildren because you raised a vile, horrible man who keeps my daughter from me! MIL: Excuse me? My son is great man who supports his family, and has allowed his wife the freedom to do what she likes since day one. At that point the Facebook convo was finished, but because my MIL is from a much more polite generation she didn't unfriend her. My grandmother, aunt, and brothers have all decided to call me and inform me that my mother is upset, I should call her, my mother in law is a rude cruel woman etc. I blame ZUCKERBERG! [info] None [info] 1500984973
ChickenPupper [info] I'm a POS HLM My SO has denied me sex for a year since I don't clean everyday or earn as much as her. I don't have a drivers licence and I'm unemployed. She says her friends tell her that it's understandable that she withholds sex and tell her to leave me. She also today said that I'm mentally abusive.She's a person that thinks that problems in relationship lead to no sex, while I think that no sex leads to problems in relationship. She is depressed also.Now the reasons for these things comes from the beginning. I stayed a lot at her place when we didn't live together and she wanted me to clean there or pay rent. I was diagnosed with anxiety that year. I didn't want to pay rent since I didn't live there amd she wanted me there, but cleaning was tough since coping with anxiety wasn't easy Also we did have sex then and my anxiety medicine made me LL and she really made me feel bad about it, so I stopped taking the medication to regain libido.Then she found a place really far out in a small town, which was affordable and had space for us. So I decided to move there to make her happier. Now I didn't have a license and getting one is difficult while having anxiety. The busses have poor connections over here. Now it's really hard to get work without having a car out here. I'm in a program where I do carpentry and sorts for 5 hours a day from wed to fri. I get paid for this and I pay half the rent and the internet. It's still only half of what she earns. She pays her half and also our home insurance. But she feels that I don't appreciate her enough and don't do enough around the house. This is why she doesn't have sex with me and doesn't desire me. Now I have tried to reach terms and do as she asks but I can only keep it up (no pun intended) for a week or two and she won't have sex with me ever. It was my birthday yesterday and the last time I had sex was last year on my birthday. I tried to ask her to have sex with me to make me feel like 10x better and maybe that would motivate me to keep the pace up and hopefully fix our db. But she just won't do it.When I do get stuff done she rewards me with not fighting and arguing as much and hugging or being near me.The reason why she called me mentally abusive was today while arguing with her, I said that maybe I'll have to take advice from this subreddit and leave her. She said it sounded like blackmail and it is abusive to say.Now I really don't know if I actually am a POS or does she just make me out to be one. Right now I feel like crap and don't know if I should apologize to her for saying that I might take your advice or what...Thanks if you read all this and sorry for no tl;dr.EDIT: I also wanted to mention that me moving away from my friends and family to near her family and friends means nothing to her since I did it myself and wasn't forced with a gun to my head.EDIT 2: Forgot to tell that I cheated on my SO by kissing a girl and texting with said girl. This made my SO not want sex even more. [info] None [info] 1530660757
Calisayshey [info] MDMA. Changed my life. But on a more serious note, anxiety. People around me always talked about test taking anxiety, but never were serious about it. Not to long ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. Yes it sucks but I never thought it'd be this bad now that I have after going through rough times. Though it all it only made me a better person. I feel like I know how to communicate better and It made me want to pursue psychology. I know a lot of people bash it for having little to no employment opportunities but fuck it. I know where I wanna be and what it'll take to get, but till then I look forward to going to my classes and doing my own research. [7] [info] None [info] 1447147052
lethargic_cat [info] I did :/ went through multiple medications and therapists and tried to make it work but they're useless where I live. Told me I was depressed because of abandonment issues with my father even though I speak to him almost daily and have a tattoo dedicated to him. I tried to explain this and was told  I'm wrong as if I don't know my own life.  Gave up on medication because I felt more depressed and suicidal after trying it, and was given no professional support in my choice to do so.  I was forced to take it into my own hands to stop because after three attempts of telling my doctor/therapist (she was both) that I would like to stop and her refusing to help me. I was given a child's pamphlet on how to stay calm (marked with for children) when I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I got told that death threats sent to me by a person who has attempted a murder before were not serious threats and the worry was unnecessary and all in my head. I am disgusted with the way I was treated for my mental health and I have given up on professional care because I felt belittled and brushed over.  [info] None [info] 1508959421
ImThatMelanin [info] My mother died last year because of a disease called sickle cell and a medicine allergy reaction and I also have a disease called sickle Cell and I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and I get bullied at school and I was molested by my uncle at age 7. yes I'm a teenager but my problems are far from crying for attention this sub is for support people who don't have it at home but you're here bullying people who are probably already being bullied🖕🏾 [info] None [info] 1513575258
gimmenutella [info] Yes, but I'm so used to them now that I don't notice them... Or I don't get them as much, not sure. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I for sure thought I had some kind of heart issue, and went to a cardiologist and everything.  [info] None [info] 1421770347
hurtstobealive [info] I get the point of this post but I don’t think it’s right to downplay someone’s mental illness because you think you have it worse. It’s kind of like a spectrum, sure everyone has anxiety (as long as you have a nervous system) but everyone’s is different in terms of strength and in different situations. Social anxiety can also make a person rude or defensive because when ur anxious ur body is literally in defensive mode so I also disagree with your point there. I am diagnosed with anxiety but I knew I had anxiety way before I was ever diagnosed so I don’t think a diagnoses really matters. I mean it’s not like doctors really do anything special to diagnose you they just ask you like a few questions. Lots of mentally ill people can’t afford doctors or even know that they need help. [info] None [info] 1573748556
YoloReally [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I just didnt see talking as something that would help me. I spent entire summer living in this peripetual state of hell. Magnesium helped control it, but it was still there. I also have insulin resistance. At one point I decided to measure my blood sugar before and after eating sugar. 45 minutes after eating this I got a really strong anxiety attack. It was something that I didnt expect. Over the next week I realized that I would get these anxiety attacks almost 45 minutes after eating something high in carbs/high GI. I researched reactive hypoglycemia and adapted my diet and since that point, I didnt have a single one. Its so weird that this is overlooked by some doctors when bodies reaction to sudden lowering of BG(because hyperinsulinemia in my case) is to produce adrenaline as it then increases BG. [info] None [info] 1514558221
Jcshamte [info] Decided to follow my dream.. Hello! I’m 23. Just finished my first year of university studying psychology. I was diagnosed with anxiety and couldn’t attend school because of it for a number of years. I was only able to go this last year because I had a friend in every single class I’d taken. However, I’ve always wanted to go into biology and study animals. So zoology actually.. but now that means I’ll be without my friend and I’m honestly so worried about going to labs and  meeting new people. It freaks me out. I’m scared I’m not going to be able to keep up with everyone and no one will want to be my partner for lab experiments, I’ll have to go to class alone, etc. So like high school all over again.  I thought I could stick with psychology but the more I think about my future the less happy I feel.. I feel like I’ll regret not trying for zoology. Has anyone else had an experience like this? Any advice? TLDR; anxious about starting new program at uni, just wanted to vent about it [info]  [info] 1522078183
rushedblue [info] I grew up pretty neglected - my parents were both young work and alcoholics. When they did give me attention is was always negative; they would yell at me and make fun of me and frequently throw things at me. I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD at 11. Despite wanting to not be alive, i never did anything to actively end my misery until recently..  i was suck in a mentally and physically abusive relationship for about 2 years. I was gas-lighted and made to feel awful everyday. If i didn't do what he wanted me to, he'd slap and hit me and yell at me until my ptsd triggered and i'd go into fight or flight mode - he'd then call 911 and have me section 12'd (when you are sent to the psych ward). I would always try to leave him but once i did, he'd call the cops on me, and even if I did get out, i didn't know how i'd live because i didn't earn enough money to pay rent and all my bills myself. Back in the summer, my now ex abused and beat me so bad i had to run from our apartment to a neighboring gas station seeking help; I was covered in blood, eyes swollen shut and a few teeth knocked out, an ambulance was called and I was taken to the ER and he was arrested and he is still being held in custody. The months following the incident were incredibly hard - i was suffering survivors guilt, and even getting a second job, i couldn't afford rent and bills and i was evicted.  I became homeless, with no family where i am and very few friends. One day i said fuck it, i got a hotel room a handle of vodka and a large bottle of sleeping pills. Next thing is remember was being in a hospital bed - apparently my vomiting was so loud and obnoxious, the people in the room next to me complained and found me blacked out covered in vomit* and they called 911.  6 months later, I'm doing better, i moved in with a good friend and have been trying to get better. Things are looking up, but it's hard. I still have a lot of court dates i need to attend and it's very stressful, but i'm taking it one day at a time. [info] None [info] 1510859709
daniellemx [info] Thank you, I've been diagnosed with anxiety which goes away and comes back. My life currently isn't very functioning. [info] None [info] 1417211164
brittaleonard [info] Yes! I had what I thought was acid reflux for almost three years which caused me serious nausea and frequent vomiting. I tried avoiding foods &amp; drinks that caused it, exercising and weight loss.. anything I could do but nothing worked. I was prescribed every acid reflux pill up the chain and it wasn’t until I was on the top shelf $350 a month prescription called Dexilant that my GI doctor suggested I seek therapy, stating that if I truly had acid reflux Dexilant would work. In therapy I was diagnosed with anxiety and prescribed Sertraline (Zoloft) by my primary care doctor. This about immediately stopped my acid reflux/nausea and constant vomiting so it turns out it was anxiety after all. I don’t have alexithymia but I don’t know the two are related. I remained on Sertraline for about six months and I’ve recently gone off of it and my acid reflux symptoms have definitely reappeared to a much smaller degree but now knowing it is anxiety I am able to stop it from getting to the point in which I throw up. I hope that helps! [info] None [info] 1561404536
germanshredder [info] I am very new to all of this and don't understand much. Two years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. I took meds and did the therapy. Now I take Ativan just as needed and learned to manage to anxiety most days. I am so confused since being diagnosed with ADHD. A lot of the symptoms for adhd, I feel like go for anxiety. I felt like a lot of my issues were caused by misunderstanding my triggers. Now I feel like I'm starting over again. I didn't really believe I had adhd until my Dr (he is amazing) prescribed adderall and I took it to see if it would help anything. I took it as directed and it hit me like a ton of bricks. What I thought were anxious thoughts all went quiet and I feel calm enough to sleep for days. I did actually have to go lay down for a bit because of it. I'm hoping that part evens out. I'm still sorting through all of the info so any advice, experiences, or general words of wisdom would be appreciated. [info] None [info] 1469165729
IslandPanda [info] Typically just pack a bowl for myself, haven't smoked anything rolled in while because i haven't really needed to and it's way to harsh on my lungs anymore. I'd prefer to be smoked up then out, I don't like getting uncomfortably high. I'd love to have a favorite lighter and at times I have had one but more often than not they get stolen or misplaced, so typically I just use the one that's closest. Sooo hard to choose I like them all and all really have there intended purpose, anything rolled is better for groups. I typically smoke a bowl but find them super hard to pull. Bongs are excellent and a lot smoother and waste a lot less I feel. I've never done a dab, though I am curious. We don't get them around here often. My first time was with an edible, it was a brownie a friend made. I was stoned for a good few hours, playing video games and laughing my ass off. That's a hard question to answer I used to like smoking with people but anymore I find most of them annoying (because of other reasons) and I just get really uncomfortable at times. I like smoking alone because more often than not it's to go to sleep or unwind watch a movie in peace and quiet. I love riding around or going to somewhere with a lot of nature, it's more peaceful. I feel more tired now, relaxed, can honestly say I don't get the munchies really anymore. I like to smoke in my bed wrapped up in my blankets ahahah. But when it's nice the patio is my preferred area. I loved having a grinder got rid of it so now I'm forced to use the tools god gave me. I cough constantly I cough before I hit the damn thing. Hey my best friends dad always said you gotta cough to get off. I used to all the time, but because of work and everything else it's a rare occasion, but every now and then a wake and bake does occur. I like to smoke at night that's one thing that hasn't changed ever since I started smoking i loved smoking at night, I just think it's a little more relaxed and yes a little less inconspicuous. Stash: elephant bowl, cool bowl I got for only 5 bucks and is really nice pink and green, lip stick bowl, clear one hitter, cigarette hitter, dugout, pipe cleaners, papers, container, extra lighters. I've had a lot of piece and a lot of them i've given to friends because i've quit a few times or because of my living situation at times I couldn't have certain things. I definitely double on papers why I don't know because I rarely use them, but never have them when I need them. 12 I think, I just bought a huge pack so that's why I have so many but rest assured in a week i'll have 1. It used to and it was definitely a perk but now and I think it has to do with how you use it and what strain, it pretty much makes me the exact opposite. It really depends with friends blunts on blunts, by myself and depending on what time I have to be up a 1-5 bowls. If I have a rare thing called a day off I'll smoke hitters all day. Most of my friends and family. I try to hide it out of respect not that my parents really care anymore. It was an issue in the past for separate reasons, but now things are different. Yes i've been using it as a medicine for about 8 years now, it helps with a lot of issues I have. I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues and I am still currently on prescribed medicine and I take them and smoke (not that I'm saying someone else should) and I find it works very well together. I feel like it is my multi-vitamin in a sense because the prescribed medicine is just for anxiety while weed takes care of all the other things as well. I felt a little dependent on it when I was younger, but that was more circumstantial than anything. I've had to stop for jobs and just for tolerance, I've quit for up to 6 months before and i've had spurts of quitting for a month at time because of finances and what not. It really wasn't difficult at all. I'd say the first week is the "worst" and it's more being around it or being bored. I'm really glad you did this it will be kind of interesting to see what everybody thinks and says and their own personal opinions.   [info] None [info] 1461532702
Daniaximehc [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety a couple of days ago. What now? [info] None [info] 1548195120
goldpanda23 [info] Hey guys so my story is below.. I am diagnosed with anxiety OCD and today I wanted to get something off my chest as well as relay a mistake and an actual accomplishment I made today. The sweet sixteen party was at 7pm and I was going bonkers about writing a speech that I didn't think was good enough. I couldn't get all the words on the paper and the thoughts were intrusive and coming in my mind were extremely irrational and annoying like "invite these kids from the park to party, maybe they are bad so actually just tell them to wait but in reality its that most of them appear bad.. Maybe they like having fun you know. Maybe the fact that they want to party with me is that they can use me for my money or maybe the fact they want to party with me is because the ring leader of there group wants to make money off of me. So many random thoughts and different fantasies start to get created in my head.Another weird thing is that back in high school there was a bully I had but I had called him out on instant messanger and he was apolgetic but in the back of my mind I wanted to clear the air out as well but I had a grudge because I took the pain of the verbal abuse he gave me for a while we were in our small classes everyday but I endured it. A year later all of a sudden I started to recall all of this that occurred and I was thinking of messages to send him. he did apologize and I appreciated that but than again in the back of our minds us humans have a tendancy to preconceive, be bias, and have the same perception about people from a long time ago especially if you haven't seen them in a while. So all of a suddden I was trying to write this speech and the overwhelming thought of me just saying these words to him over messanger" I dont want to be your friend anymore. Looks like I have moved on honestly and I have made new friends so thanks though for reaching out. have a nice life" It was a great message and my mind was cleared of this thought and right now I look at this thought I typed above and I am content about it whereas if it was a thing I was tensed about I wouldn't feel comfortable to share it with you redditors. Whatever ik lots of you are out to help each other and I am here to help everyone as well who goes through this. In conclusion there was a friend who wanted to come I invited him and last minute I said no. Why? because I thought I would have to introduce him and my mind was racing with overwhelming thoughts like "He is an F boy." "Hes just in it only for the girls and parties thats all" "this kid went to west point military academy, was peeed on and endured alot of trauma and whenever the fuck I hangout with him and one of my close friend's whom I introduced him too he would always talk like a negative person. Alaways down. Idk why? idk what its like to be peeed on. I told him last minute not to come and than later on after having so much freaking fun at my sister's event where I said hi to everyone in there, each and EVERY person out of the 400 people there I was a bit upset with myself. Because deep down we all know who the truly caring people are but our minds always tend to stray off well atleast mine and I tried to prove to my mind that I can be a strong indepedent person(attractive) but deep down inside these intrusive thoughts hit me and it may have cost my friendship between him and I. I told him to come but than negative thoughts came into my mind and I told him not too. So I will def look into CBT for sure. Also btw its 4am at 2:30 am along with some family friends who i enjoyed with at the party i told my close friend we would pick him up and also the other kid(Kevin lets say) Kevin he can come and we'll have fun and I WILL MAKE UP FOR MY MISTAKE FOR NOT INVITING HIM. So i did and he was just extremely negative and I felt the disdain and negative energy within him, I didn't understand I thought it would all be alright but little did I know he was infuriated and he had this tone where everysingle time I tried to make it up to him he would just say something negative like "Nah well I couldnt go." "Im a real good guy". I was so decent afterwards to drop both them off home at my close friend's home and when I do i still feel that coldness from him. My close friend and I have our inside joke where he says to me " Claire had an amazing time."(the girl we were both competing for) and so i didnt mind that from him well I did a little because it blew my self esteem but I was like whateer I shrugged it off. On the other hand his friend Kevin calls me than and starts talking about how he wants to hangout with my little sister, and how she is athletic and I get wierded out and tell him to fuck off.So today I messed up and I regret it. But i had a blast at the party, I was shaking before giving the speech and even shaking whilst writing it and I didnt have the focus to even finish it so my cousins helped and boy am I so grateful to thm. It was just an amazing day and just one bad aspect but when it comes down to it I am glad I wrote this. Took alot off my shoulders or chest and I would love to hear your guys feedback. Thanks [info] None [info] 1465632907
Cperry6 [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and OCD, I worry about the tiniest things even now I worried just posting this and I can't even think about how dangerous being pregnant is, what would happen if the child had special needs or a fatal illness. On top of that I hate change, a tiny interruption  in my schedule and I start to freak... Yeah kids aren't for me.    [info] None [info] 1355229388
Simon442 [info] Hmm maybe the first part but not the second one. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I used to have panic attacks that lasted few hours. This wasnt a panic attack as I was completly normal, just amazed. And I felt it going past me  [info] None [info] 1522240561
AnnaMolly1007 [info] I'm still prescribed it, I only take it when my back is unbearable. And no I don't get high off of klonopin. That's the exact reason I had to stop Xanax because I was so sensitive to Xanax and I hate feeling high. And yes it's a hard core drug haha. I've read about the people that have been on it years as presribed and how they HAVE to ween down or risk seizing and/or dying. If that's not a hard core drug I don't know what is. All benzos are hardcore up there with pain killers on risk of physical dependency and withdrawing. Everything I read, people still get bad withdraw symptoms even when weening as ordered. But unless the mri I'm getting says otherwise, it helps because I have extreme muscle tension. Because I was diagnosed with anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1479664067
MattTheProgrammer [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder but before I knew that's what it was, the first time I had a panic attack, I had my wife drive me to the emergency room at 2am because I thought I was going to go into cardiac arrest. It happens. [info] None [info] 1473941698
BlueReflection0 [info] Enneagram 3 or 6? I'm glad I've found a group for 6s :) henlo!! For those who know enneagram well (I dont tbh) could you help me work this out?I'm not interested in success much. But I've always had a really strong pull towards needing to stand out and needing to be seen for someone unique and special, sometimes it stresses me out because this feeling gets me on everything, even organising folders I'm just like I need to be the best at organising! I'm not a 4, I've checked a lot. I like a bit of sadness, but I'm afraid of going too deep into melancholy, I find it easier to be positive most of the time. I've always had a built in need to be true to myself, except it's running in the background behind my other wants, like wanting to be liked and accepted, and admired. Sometimes i get into inner conflict between these two things :0. I'm not ambitious either tbh, and I'm more idealistic/romantic than pragmatic.I'm diagnosed with anxiety so I often show up on tests as a 6w5/6w7. Whats confusing is that, yes, I definitely have the need for safety and security somewhere inside of me, but I feel like the most important thing to me is being liked by people and loved, and standing out as someone unique, special and admirable. That FEELS more important than safety. but my actions never show it much. Also, I'm a loner. I prefer to be by myself than with others, yet i want to stand out and i want to belong at the same time. Confusing, I know. I'm a loner just out of choice - I dont have distrust in people at all, i just prefer my own company most of the time. [info] None [info] 1572974554
BrownAndyeh [info] For me, I am glad I figured out my triggers.  I did not mention that I have been diagnosed with anxiety, which presents when I am angry or unreasonable during arguments.  Turns out this is how I dealt with insecurities related to health issues I had growing up..my mind was blown when I learned this.  You are trying to get this figured out, that is the first step.  Hold yourself accountable and let people in your circle know you are trying..be vulnerable.   Those closest to you will understand and support you. [info] None [info] 1566603065
idontknowanymooooore [info] Magnesium! I was diagnosed with anxiety but, really, years later as things got worse it came to light that the blood circulation through my left shoulder was being constricted (thoracic outlet syndrome) due to repetitive stress injury. It caused vague nausea that progressed to anxiety "for no apparent reason." Magnesium did wonders! Massage fixed the rest.   [info] vegan newbie [info] 1437851135
flightoftheswan [info] Dream's about being back at high school I have reoccurring dreams of being back at my high school (Private, read context below). I always ask myself the question while I'm in those dreams; "Didn't I already finish high school Already?." Does anyone have an idea of the meaning behind these dreams? It always seems to be set in the first high school I attended and not the second one.  So a little context. So I'm 23 now and I went to 2 different high schools. I went to a private school for about 4 years and had trouble with my grades and didn't really pay attention in class, I ended up changing to a public school for 2 years and completed it. I did not do well but at least I passed with very low marks. This was 5 years ago and since then I have not attended University or anything and feel as though I have wasted the last 5 years partying and achieving little. I have been diagnosed with anxiety by a therapist and quite stressed with where I am in life at the moment [info] None [info] 1580215547
idntworkinthisvan [info] I used to cut my hair every time I felt overwhelmed, joke was on me when I was diagnosed with anxiety 🙃 [info] None [info] 1565076141
throwlkjhaway [info] I just wanna rant. It's okay if no one reads this. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was in the third grade, and it never really went away. So I've basically lived my entire life with a lump at the back of my throat. I'm 19 and in college. With finals around the corner and big papers due, I feel especially panicked and stressed out right now. With thanksgiving and Christmas here, my eating disorder has gotten out of control. I spent last night alone in my boyfriend's apartment crying over the toilet because I couldn't purge my thanksgiving binge completely. It was so acidic that I just choked on it and experienced a burn that still hasn't gone away. This is making my tonsillitis worse. (I'm stressed out because I have to get a tonsillectomy over break and have watched too many procedural videos). I wonder if my boyfriend notices that I smell like gross vomit. I wonder if he notices that I sometimes cry myself to sleep even though I'm safe in his arms.  Anyways I just feel like a complete and utter failure. I have few friends and basically nothing going for me. I'm alone in my apartment at the moment because all 4 of my roommates are at home with their functional families. I'm just sitting here struggling to breathe. I just ate a lot of Christmas chocolates and hotdogs. Purged it. I'll just pretend I'm not wilting on the inside. [info] None [info] 1448688614
queenbleepbloop [info] This reminds me of my mom’s very helpful advice when I was diagnosed with anxiety in grad school: “but you didnt *used* to have anxiety so why have it now?!”.  It’s almost like people’s minds (in your case) or people’s mental health can change (in mine). But I guess since the TSCC has never changed, we can’t either!! [info] None [info] 1524419342
faithful_infidel [info] &gt;How hard is it to pick the right answers here?I mean, for a person on the autism spectrum, it could actually be quite difficult as they often struggle with how others percieve social situations and emotions.  I'm not autistic but, I do sometimes struggle with social reasoning.  And I don't  know the right answer to "Do you get angry at people you care about?"The first answer that comes to mind is yes.  Because literally everyone does. So answering no would indicate a dishonest person.  Overthinking it?  Probably.  But I am diagnosed with anxiety which is basically overthinking these things... [info] None [info] 1572125670
MoKix [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety. AMA. [info] None [info] 1402289312
jtk289 [info] Am I at risk of addiction? Hello all, 4 months ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and was put onto a mixture Cymbalta and Klonopin. I take the Cymbalta daily and the Klonopin on a as needed basis.My question is, right now, I used the Klonopin about once a month (.5 milligrams). If I use it that occasionally, do I run the risk of addiction? I was using it a lot more at first, but I think the Cymbalta has become effective. That being said, I still do have bad days in which I get pretty anxious. Just wondering if anyone else here uses klonopin sparingly, and if they have good experiences. [info] None [info] 1581591201
BraveChipmunk3005 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, so not so good ig [info] None [info] 1564175952
davidh219 [info] I smoke weed pretty much every day. I also took prescription benzos off and on for a year after I was diagnosed with anxiety. I'm too afraid of having a bad trip to try some of the harder stuff, tbh. Like I love the idea of LSD in theory, but I'll never have the balls to do it. Even weed gives me panic attacks sometimes if I smoke too much, but at least I'm used to weed and can very easily bring myself down from a weed induced panic attack. I feel like a panic attack induced by any other drug would be just like going back in time to before I knew I had anxiety and thought I was actually dying every time I had a panic attack and I never want to be in that place again. Nowadays panic attacks are pretty much just involuntary physical sensations I have to endure and let run their course but they don't actually scare me anymore.  [info] None [info] 1513763289
vijadukt [info] Fear of taking blood tests/needles Well I am diagnosed with anxiety. A way to describe this phobia is it feeling like an anxiety attack (dizziness, lightheadedness, anxiety lol), but with additional unexpected symptoms; fainting, throwing upI didn't have this phobia as a kid when you have to get your vaccine shots, it only developed when I had to treat my anaemia when I was 14 years old. I would always blackout. I remember throwing up on a nurse once. It only happens when I'm sat in the chair. Looking away doesn't really help lol I was always referred to getting blood drawn from the finger by the nurses when they noticed I was unable to go through with it. I'm okay with that type of blood work. I'm not sure, but I've been told you can't do every test that way. I'm not sure whether my phobia stems from needles or just getting blood taken out. or both. I remember going with my friend for him to get his ears pierced and I felt similar symptoms but I was able to control it.Well, I haven't had any blood tests done in 5 years now. I would like to check my hormone levels. I would like to overcome my fear as it's an important thing to do, considering they're mandatory for your health. I'm not sure how I'm supposed to do it. I am aware it's a rational thing to do. But I can't control it. I just can't get into the headspace as the anxiety totally overpowers me. I'm not sure how to go about it. I'm sometimes ashamed of telling people I have this. Having a person around is helpful, but I don't feel as if I'd have a person to go with me every time. I also don't feel comfortable when people are watching me struggle. There's not much they can do but sit in the waiting room. I'm also afraid of becoming dependant of having a person around when doing it, and that's just not realistic. The thought of something happening to me and ending up at a hospital with needles stuck in my hands makes me feel bad just thinking about it. It also seems that none of my doctors I've told this to take me seriously. Looking at videos and pictures doesn't really trigger my problem. Thinking about it at this moment doesn't make me queasy. I'd prepare myself before every blood test, but it's always been useless. It's only moments before I'm supposed to go through it that everything goes downhill.Does anyone have the same experience? Have you gotten over it? Have you noticed any methods helping? [info] None [info] 1588076887
jadedwine [info] I've had this pretty much all my life...seriously, I remember being a little kid and being constantly worried about getting sick/dying. There was nothing traumatic in my childhood, nothing that should've triggered those kind of thoughts. But I worried about *everything*, and it was only much later that I was diagnosed with anxiety.Health is a big one for me, too. Unfortunately, my anxiety tends to manifest itself through physical symptoms, so that makes it even harder to deal with. I constantly have to try to figure out if this symptom I'm experiencing is just caused by anxiety, or if it's something I actually need to see a doctor about. And getting anxious about the symptom just exacerbates everything and makes me experience more symptoms! Ugh. Anxiety is the worst. [info] None [info] 1459392574
Lambeau_Analytica [info] Came here to say this. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ~~dissociation~~ derealization. I recall in my H.S. years being in a perpetual state of ~~dissociation~~ derealization for around 7 or 8 months. I'd wake up: *Am I cool? I'm cool. Wait, why would I ask that, I must not be cool, that's why I'm asking, 'cuz I'm still fucked aren't I, or maybe this is how reality used to be, or is it?, oh fuck oh fuck* BAM and it's like everything becomes a dream.        The best way I could describe it to my parents and doctors is, imagine looking at the world threw a backwards pair of binoculars. Everything seems so far away, you feel distant from everything in all directions. Even sensations like touch can take a second to register. You feel like a passenger in your own body. Familiar places look completely foreign.        For instance, I was having an episode so I walked around my apartment complex's parking lots. On my way back I had trouble finding my place because nothing looked familiar. It's the worst fear I've ever had in my life. It's literally a civil war inside your brain.          Lucky for me I figured out ways on how to never have this happen again. And it hasn't for about 10 years now? Now I can openly talk about all my experiences with it, but back then just hearing the word would instantly throw me back into the dream reality.         I could see where it'd be a fun experience if you're taking a drug. You know why it's happening and how long it'll last, but when it happens for reasons unknown to you, you lose all hope that you'll be able to live in that old reality again.  [info] None [info] 1540232486
just_1_more_thing [info] Yes! But it's because I'm diagnosed with anxiety. What kind of work do you do? [info] None [info] 1561295750
saramew [info] Yeah, I was diagnosed with anxiety and it does make me freeze up sometimes, not hit the notes, or hit it too early.. especially for those easier hard songs that you mentioned. Sometimes, even some normals!! ;n; So it might be unrelated to your DCD.You must be doing a good job playing this game with a motoric disability. I wonder if games like this help your fingers function better? [info] ユリの迷路 [info] 1430718850
meagicano [info] Yes - definitely! Time estimation is one of the big areas where I struggle, especially because I know what I can get done on a tight deadline. I'll reply to the OP first, then add some details.I also want to say that it's important that people realize they don't have to take on the battle of reducing the stigma of ADHD. It's a noble intention, but sometimes you have to look out for #1. This is something I've only learned through experience - I influence what I can directly, and I've had to let some things lie because I can't keep fighting. It takes up a lot of energy."Patience" isn't really an accommodation for work because there are often reasons why things need to be done on a certain timeline. Deadlines are often set for a reason - you could need to get something to a client, you could be part of a process and someone is depending on you to do your part so the next can go, you might need to have the response in time for payment processing, etc etc. It's hard to tell without knowing what the OP's job is, but an accommodation should be something that can help you get things out by an agreed upon deadline.If the deadline is completely arbitrary - that's hard from a mental perspective. I always try to figure out WHY a deadline has been set if I'm struggling with it. I don't ask my boss, but I look to the bigger picture. Like "ok, it has to be done by Tuesday noon so that X person can review it, then they can turn it around to me by the end of the day, so when I come in on Wednesday morning I can work on their comments..." An accommodation for "patience," based on how the OP described things, could be flex hours where the OP works for her agreed-upon eight hours a day, but with more flexibility. Instead of 8-5, she could work 8:15-5:15pm or something similar, depending on when she gets in each morning. I used to work for a company that had a "core hours" policy of 9:30-3, but outside of that you could work however you wanted.If the five minutes thing is for meetings, etc., OP should take a look at that. Why are they late? Are there Outlook reminders? I have Outlook reminders at 15 minutes, then I snooze until 5 minutes before, and then I snooze that until the meeting itself starts, which is when I join. I make those alerts pop up right in front of me. Anytime I leave my desk, I check my calendar. I live and die by my Outlook calendar and usually I've been really lucky. I'll set other reminders and timers as necessary.Taking on new projects - are you putting your hand up to volunteer? Is this at work or in your outside life? An accommodation associated with this would be that you're not overscheduled. You could ask to put any new projects on hold for the time being. Part of the challenge in this is the ADHDer's quest for novelty... doing the same thing over and over again, or being stuck on a project for a long time can be the worst. Depending on the work you do, you could ask to just be support on projects, so that you're not doing it from start to finish, or seek one project (instead of three) that lets you challenge yourself so that you're constantly learning from that instead of jumping from thing to thing.As for me....I was diagnosed at 33, in 2017. My aunt suspected I had ADHD when I was in my early 20s, since her kids had been diagnosed, but there wasn't a lot of information out there about women and ADHD and I just always kept it tucked in the back of my head. Babysitters would call me "hyper" and teachers always told me to be more ladylike, since the boys would be able to run in the mud, etc. and apparently it was the wrong way for girls to burn off energy. I never paid attention in class... I had years upon years of teachers complaining to my parents that I was reading books under the desk. I never really put a lot of time into homework, and while there are some massive gaps in my education, I was smart enough at the time to slide by without having to put in the work. I struggled with Calculus in high school, but dropped the class with 30+ people and took it in summer school instead with five others and got an A.The fact I got good marks was enough. I struggled in my jobs, especially when things became repetitive and boring, but never put 2 and 2 together. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was leaving the military, and the psychologist said that all of my past experience was likely due to anxiety, but a social worker I saw said she didn't think that was a fair assessment. I did fine in my MBA program, and at work, until things started to get overwhelming. During my MBA I had randomly read about women and ADHD, and how the symptoms are different for women than men. I went into a research rabbit hole and tried to get diagnosed, but my only option was paying out of pocket or spending years on a waitlist. I pushed it aside until things at work were really challenging for me. It all came to a head after something happened at work and I was thrown off my groove, and I just couldn't focus or get anything done that I wanted to do. I was in a different financial position with difference insurance, so I did a multiday assessment that ended with the psychiatrist being like "yeah... you definitely have ADHD and you've gotten where you are because you're smart".SO. Long backstory, but the overview is important (I think).Time estimation is HARD and it's something that I really struggle with. I have a VP I work with who makes promises to clients and I've started having to disagree with him in front of the clients to come up with a reasonable timeline.If I've done the work before, or something very similar, the time estimates are a bit easier. I always add in ADHD time - a buffer in case I can't focus, or in case something else comes up - that gives me a bit of breathing room. We've also updated our branding guidelines, so I've been adding in a buffer to account for updating to the current standards. If I don't have time, I'll send very plain content out so that I can get feedback on the "meat" of what's been presented. The challenge is that sometimes I don't know just how much work will go into something. I developed a two hour workshop for a client over the weekend - I had thought I'd be able to get it done in a few hours, but I didn't realize how much research and tweaking I would have to do. I ended up cancelling a ski day to get it done. I should have started working on it first thing in the morning on the Saturday instead of around lunchtime... but even that might not have been enough time. The partner saw it and thought I put in about 30-36 hours of work - which is definitely more than I did - but it shows how experience can help with time estimation.When I come up with a workplan, I try to break things down into details so I can better estimate my time. I don't always share this with leadership because I don't want to be held to it. But it lets me plan my time and I'll know that if I have an hour or two I can knock off something with a shorter time frame than deciding to tackle a bigger piece.I also struggle with things like, taking a shower and getting ready and knowing how much time it takes. Or how long it takes to get to work (our office location changed and it has doubled my commute - and made it so much harder for me). I have the timing estimates down perfectly on some things, like my commute to the airport, but the day to day stuff is a lot harder. I add buffers to almost everything. I also set alarms at weird times to everything. Like, 8:28am instead of 8:30, since it makes me think a bit when the alarm goes off in the morning. If I think something will take me two hours to turn around, I tell whoever is waiting I'll have to them in three. I've been trying to overestimate, especially if it's a deadline negotiation, because it's better for me to under-promise.OH and I use trello all the time (for me). I have colour coding for current projects, upcoming, personal things to do, other work things to do, etc. and I use that to set priorities. Traditional to-do lists don't work for me.Did that help? [info] None [info] 1563303346
xxcover01 [info] Appetite loss and nausea possibly due to heavy weed usage, I need your help! I am currently 4 days away from starting my first year in college and for the past year, eating (especially in the morning) has become a major challenge. I smoke every day sometimes as early as 2 pm and multiple times a day depending on work/school. I've never been a big fan of breakfast or eating in general as I'm a super skinny guy only weight 120 at 5,7(note I do have a crazy fast metabolism that runs in the family). When I began smoking, it helped me eat more but now I'm worried as I increased the amount I'm smoking I am eating less. I experience nausea, lack of appetite every morning and sometimes can lead me to even throw up in the morning if I'm super stressed or anxious about something going on in my life. If I have less then 7 hours of sleep it can also make it 10 times worse. I can only eat protein bar an hour after I wake up and don't have a solid meal until about 4 hours after I wake up. It's also really important to note I am diagnosed with anxiety(I take no medication for it) and IBS(I take Prilosec every day which helps a lot). Even on the days, I wake up with no anxiety or just have nothing stressful going on I still feel my symptoms. I've had bad enough anxiety to lead me to not eat all day but that's very rare and usually, my symptoms are gone about 3 hours after waking up. Sometimes they can persist throughout the day and weed is the only things that will calm them down. I consulted a doctor and he told me it was probably acid reflex which lead to my usage of Prilosec every day(after trying 2 other medications that made it worse). About 2 weeks ago I got an endoscopy and I came back clean on everything. I don't know if you can tell if I have acid reflux from an endoscopy because I have yet to be able to talk to my doctor, I just know nothing crazy is wrong. I had all these issues before I started smoking heavy amounts of weed (which to me is about .5-1.5gs of quality weed a day). I can remember as far as 3 years ago (when I haven't even tried weed yet) waking up with my same symptoms but these past 6 months have been especially terrible. Here is the climax of the story haha. I am currently traveling in South Korea where obviously I can't smoke weed. I have no symptoms of withdraw, other than missing it a bit. After getting over jet lag I've woken up the past 2 days with no nausea and been have starving in the mornings. During spring break I traveled to Morroco and had the same feelings. Note that on these trips I'm super relaxed( cause its vacation and I've got nothing to worry about) and I love eating non-American food. These trip definitely ruled out my nicotine addiction (Juul) because I bring it. Overall I just don't know whether its the weed, anxiety, acid reflux, or some metal game that's causing me to feel this way. When I'm back home I work out 3 times a week and eat relatively healthy. My goal has always been to gain weight witch is impossible if I can't get over 2,000 calories a day. I don't want to be affected by this in college and If I'm putting in the effort to work out 3 times week weightlifting I want to see some results. I know to gain weight haft of it is working out and the other haft is eating. If I was able to eat a solid breakfast every day It would change my life. If you have a similar story please share, it would help me a lot to figure out wtf is wrong. I did do some research before writing this but found nothing similar to my story so if you have links please share them. Thanks! [info] None [info] 1566695771
Shareenmarie [info] Thanks.I just ordered the life extension brand you mentioned, jojoba oil to increase growth, and some bitter nail polish for good measure. Hopefully it will help remind me when I go to put my fingers in my mouth mindlessly. I’m constantly chewing without even noticing, and when I do or someone points it out I just can’t stop. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but I think it has more to do with my mind constantly racing. I’m fairly young so everything I go to a doctor for is usually dismissed, but that’s a whole different issue. I read that inositol can also help with PCOS, so I’m hoping it’ll be a double whammy to help me calm down and get the cysts a little relief or treatment somehow? Thanks for your post, I’m glad I stumbled upon it. I’ve never even heard about inositol and I’m really glad it helped you. Nail biting is by far my worst “habit” and I look forward to recovery. I look forward to any of the many benefits I see in reviews! [info] None [info] 1542140112
Grape72 [info] If it helps any I was let down because I was diagnosed with anxiety but I was not taking medication for it at the time. The Army only lets you in with anxiety if you are taking medication, which I refused to do at the time.  [info] None [info] 1506989140
AnxiousTornado [info] Anxious for standing my ground Ok I need to vent a little about something that's been bothering me for a little while ;Long story short :I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder, post traumatic disorder and panic disorder . I'm 27 y/o. I'm a girl.I foster cats. I am not paid to do this. I put lots of time into rehabilitation and took difficult cases and found them nice families to go in. I find alot of pride in doing this and every adoption is a pat in my back saying ' you did great! good job ! ' I also love to see the happiness in the adopter's face when they come  to adopt a cat from me. So, it's easy to understand why I'm so passionate about it.I live in a small apartment. I care about my neighbors. I'm a people pleaser. Always want to be nice to everybody and not bother anyone.I took in an adult cat that my local rescue organization found outside. When he was in my apartment the first night , he kept meowing all night. Loud meows. It woke me up and I instantly got a panic attack because I was so stressed that neighbors would knock at my door and complaint. The cat was scratching the walls . I got sick from being so stressed and no matter how hard i tried, the cat would keep meowing and  jump in the window , trying to get out. ( it was a stray cat, not used to indoor life ). I was up all night and had work in the morning. It also woke my boyfriend up, (who was not very happy either) but he knew it wasn't my fault. Because of my medication and my ptsd,  I cannot wake up in fear during the night , otherwise it's a mess of emotions the next day and im unable to function properly. So i contacted my local rescue and told them about the situation. I told them that for health reasons, I needed to give back the cat to them. One of the three people that runs the shelter was crazy mad about the fact that I wanted to give the cat back because I couldn't let that affect my professional life at work and my mental health. I really liked that person so her being harsh like that with me affected me deeply. I saved countless cats in the past for them and I felt like all I did for them before didn't matter anymore. I cried alot because I'm also learning to stop trying to please everyone and stand my ground when something bothers me ( Also, i was polite in my way of talking to them so I felt it was just unfair ) .I don't know what to do. I kinda feel betrayed, but I don't feel bad for choosing my mental health and making it my priority. I love being able to foster cats but I'm scared that everytime something bad will happen , I will receive the same treatment. What should I do? find a new shelter ? Talk with the person? Thanks for reading my story [info] None [info] 1550635696
levyreb [info] Irregular heartbeat followed by illness Okay, I normally stick to my car or lizard’s health, but I have a sinking feeling that I need a second opinion about my own. I’m an 18 year old female (5’4”, 145lbs) with a family history of non genetic heart problems and mental illness from both parents. I have had on and off events of irregular heartbeat since I can remember. Sometimes it’ll happen once a year, but sometimes it happens multiple times a month. It’s almost alway when I’ve sat down for 20-45 minutes. My heart will ‘skip a beat’ and then the top of my heart will beat followed my the bottom. It’s EXTREMELY painful and it will normally only last 10 or so minutes max, but it’s always followed by me getting flu like symptoms a week or so later.In the past two years I’ve had a lot of life stresses. Homelessness, disownment, eating disorder, ect. I’m not trying to bore you with my life story, but I was diagnosed with anxiety, and my heart issues were passed off as panic attacks by two different cardiologists and multiple PCPs.Today, I was in class at Uni and It started acting up again after 5 months of normal. Except this time it lasted 45-60 minutes. I called campus police to an escort to my dorm, because I wasn’t able to walk without feeling like I was going to pass out because I wasn’t able to breathe deeply enough, but they required an ambulance be sent because it was a medical call. I refused the trip to the hospital (health insurance does not cover that kind of expense) and I was cleared by EMTs after receiving some aspirin. One of the EMTs said she could ‘feel’ my heart ‘skip a beat’ in my resting pulse after all was said and done. I was told maybe my IUD and the new hormones might be the cause or anxiety because I take medication for it. I’ve been on my meds for a year and my IUD was implanted in November of 2019. Should I go to another cardiologist? Or is it panic attacks and I’m just insane. Are the heartbeat issues related to me getting sick afterwards every time, or does it just coincidentally happen?TLDR; Am I depressed and anxious, or should I be worried about my heart? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1581638029
heyheycel [info] My flatmates trigger me. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year, my flatmates treated me so badly and that triggered me incredibly so I moved out. Even though my new flatmates are nice people I guess, overhearing them triggers my anxiety because I always think people may be speaking badly about me when I'm not around, so I spend the whole day sitting in my room listening to music so I don't hear any background noises. I can't concentrate anymore and my grades are shit this year. What should I do? I wish my self-esteem wasn't this bad. I always am nice to them but I'm so introverted and maybe they think I'm sassy about them, but I just feel is so complicated talking to people and stuff. Also one of them once made a comment like "see? You scared her, that's why she only leaves her room to go to the bathroom" and it felt horrible. I'm worse since them. I've tried to explain I suffer from anxiety but nobody understands. [info] None [info] 1492974020
Maxiexty [info] Been learning how to cope with anxiety recently but shit got out of hand when I discovered dark secrets of my family. I need help! Just read and I hope you can give me some confort and tips of how I should control my anxiety. Hi there, I'm new in reddit and I've never made a post for myself before... so here I go:I've been diagnosed with anxiety very recently (about a year or so). During my sessions I've been uncovering some hard and shitty things about my family and I recently discovered the truth about my father's mental health for drugs abuse and alcohol. I lack of feeling towards my father's family and to my father because I met him consciously when I was 12 y/o. He was a nice guy though, but drug abuse fucked his head real bad and sometimes it was scary when he got angry or violent by no reasons. I'm now 24 y/o and I'm having therapy to control my anxiety due to my obesity and eating disorders. I feel it helped me to understand my condition and how to avoid panic attacks (I tend to have them when something goes really wrong or not as I wanted things to be). My psychiatrist told me I should use some meds to help me get more relaxed. My family and some friends disapproved them and I also got scared to depend on those pills. The medication is called Escitalopram (if anybody is taking them please I need to know the experience and if it could help me). I also got more scared about the side effects and decided not to take them.But now I feel I can't fight with my anxiety anymore. Neither the guilt.I found out around 3 days ago that my dad got in a psychiatric ward in Venezuela. He's been having violent episodes and hallucinations (he sees my face on any women around him). No one has told me what diagnostic he's got. For what I've been told it could be psychotic and depressive disorders. They have mentioned *schizophrenic* illness. Nobody from my father's side told me anything, since I've moved out from Venezuela 7 years ago I didn't have the need to keep contact with him due to my college studies. They decided to keep me out from this and I felt hurt and not loved by them. I talked with my dad's sisters (my aunts) and they explained me more about the situation. On the other side, my mother's family told me that they wanted him dead to keep his properties and money in Venezuela and that I should go there and intervene legally. My head got messed up with all the versions and even as a journalist I can't be sure who is telling the truth or if they keep hiding me stuff. I've been  away for so long and nobody wanted me to do something for him. I can't even feel love towards my father but something inside is breaking my heart constantly. I feel guilt and I didn't have the power to do something and I still don't have it due to my economic conditions.I'm trying to talk to my dad on WhatsApp every day to help him feel better and so he can take his meds without feeling helpless and lonely. But his mental state has worsened due to my aunt and grandfather visits (I wanted them to visit him to talk to him and distract him). The doctor told us that he will not receive more visits and I can't do much while I'm in another country working as a Freelance and not having much money to send him for his meds or any little gift he wants.More context: When I was born my mother's family took care of me and kept me away from my dad due to his mental health condition and his bad life choices about drug use and alcohol abuse.  My grandmother took COMPLETE care of me, she didn't allow my mother and step father to live with me away from her and she also forbid my father to meet me until I said I wanted to met him consciously. When I was a baby he left Venezuela and lived in Europe for like 10 years (he kept his drug habit and alcoholism). He got back when I was 12 and we met as I said before.I know that I can't change anything from the past and that my family did everything for my wellbeing and mental health. If it wasn't for those decisions I could never be who I am now. I'm a professional and I live outside from Venezuela and the nightmare some family members are living there. But now I'm suffering a lot with every little thing I learn from my past and my father's past and I don't know what to do with all this feelings inside. I burst out of tears and I hear voices telling me bad things and fighting with me.I feel my anxiety is getting worse as I constantly bite out my nails and fingers and harm my face a lot, even having bad thoughts and feeling lonely. I have no self control and sometimes I don't eat (and when I do I eat a lot). I've been crying a lot at night and I have insomnia sometimes. What should I do? How can I explain this to my therapist and family without feeling helpless? I feel I'm alone and no one will understand what I'm going through in my head. I haven't received a hug or soft and caressing words from my mother and stepdad without telling them I feel bad. My friends can't do anything and they are uncertain of what should I do now (most of them are in Venezuela).I want to end it all. End this pain and the pain of others. I can't feel but helpless and a burden to everyone I love. Sometimes I wish I never knew what was happening with my dad and keep myself away from all. But I wanted to heal and be a better person. I needed to know the truth and fill those holes inside.Now I'm fighting with my thoughts and feelings. Feelings towards my dad and my father's family I have never felt before, feelings of confusion and hatred. Feelings I can't even explain because no one told me how to call them or control them.The anxiety is taking over me and I'm losing the grip. I really need help... [info] None [info] 1579462487
Dango223 [info] Ty for writing this, it is very helpful but you got me so confused tho. I was learning about asexuality lately because I think I am somwhere on the spectrum. The think is I hate touch but I love hugs from people I trust. Yes, I am diagnosed with anxiety and I have trust issues. I have no need for any physical contact with others, more I need trust. Because of this I thought of me as a demisexual... I feel like I need to first be romantically attracted enough to somebody to be able to feel sexual attraction..So I would love to have second opinion on this. Do you think my case could be demisexuality or I am wrong? Or I have to first experience some serious relationship to know? [info] None [info] 1560029090
annieyayarawr [info] I have dealt with this for ages. Ever since I was 8. The thought of me existing has freaked me out. The thought of me eventually coming to pass and being unable to think gives me the worst anxiety. I have been diagnosed with anxiety for about 4 years now but nothing has been done about this, or about my phobia.  [info] None [info] 1481384561
nyaa7000 [info] Can’t sleep/afraid of dark I’m 17 and I’m afraid of the dark. (I am diagnosed with anxiety)When I’m laying in bed or when it’s dark I always get really bad thoughts or paranoid thoughts. It’s gotten to the point where I stay up until it’s light outside. I will get scary images and thoughts  in my head. (Could be about anything, like monsters, scary figures, bad stuff happening, going insane, nightmares ). If this happens I always turn on my lights until I’m calmed down again. Me turning on the light will happen a few times a night. Is this normal? I’ve always been kinda scared but it’s gotten worse I think. [info] None [info] 1560248991
TripleGenesis [info] I’m going through that right now with my ADHD. My medicine has slowly been less and less effective since 7th grade. That’s when I was diagnosed with anxiety. I was put on Prozac and it made me (what I think is) high. So I disregarded his diagnosis. Just yesterday my doctor told me that Anxiety can effect ADHD and make it worse, and I was diagnosed again. Hopefully when the medicine starts to work, I can focus again. [info] None [info] 1548781952
anxiety-throaway [info] Ashtma or anxiety? I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but I'm having a hard time believing it's only anxiety.My symptoms are essentially feeling like I can't take deep breaths, and even when I try to calm down and breathe slowly it doesn't pass.  I had a spirometry while having the symptoms and it showed good results, oximeters always show between 98 and 100 sat, but I feel like I'm not getting enough air. Various doctors have told me that it can't be ashthma without wheezing, but I've read that you can have it even if there's no wheezing.What do you think of it? Thanks. [info] None [info] 1528390456
I_think_I_forgot [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 21, and ADD when I was 26. It's a weird experience for sure.  [info] None [info] 1493880260
littlelamb0814 [info] When I was in high school I was diagnosed with anxiety. I took medication for a while, but went off of it when I was a senior. I wanted to go to college without meds. And I did! But I also sorta thought I was "done" with anxiety. I thought, "I don't want that to be part of my life anymore", so I thought it wasn't.Sometimes that works. But sometimes it doesn't. I definitely have problems with it again. I sort of wish I paid more attention to that anxiety earlier on so that I could deal with it better now. I don't like the feeling of having been "beaten" by it, and going back to a counselor to pick up some better strategies and just have someone to talk with about it who understands is also stable themselves. I mean, I look forward to finding ways to cope, but I just wish I had done the leg work earlier.I get super obsessed over little social things that I feel I did "wrong". Ruminate on lots of things, even things out  of my control. I have these unrealistic expectations for myself and don't even realize it most of the time. And I feel super guilty about the possibility of doing the wrong thing or making someone feel bad or worried about them thinking bad things about me. I wish I could just not give a fuck but I do not know how. [info] None [info] 1492738233
OpSecLead1 [info] The Wonderful Dr. Lloyd Had a great visit with Dr. Lloyd from Veriheal today. I haven't been to a doctor in 5+ years and talked about this upon first meeting Dr. Lloyd. By the end of the visit, I was diagnosed with anxiety and told him that if all doctors were as friendly, caring, and funny, I'd visit them more. Total time from walking in the front door of the office building to walking out the same door was 9 minutes. I'd be happy to answer any questions anyone may have. But, there really shouldn't be many. Just book Veriheal at KOP or Allentown (I think Dr. Lloyd even does Philly for them) and you'll meet the best doctor you've ever seen. [info] None [info] 1567810526
imconfusedhelpp [info] I was having a panic attack and for the first time, my sister actually thinks that it would be best for me to go to the doctors. I have shit attendance and their gonna give my parents a fine because if we don’t show medical proof why my attendance was shit so would they let my parents off if I was diagnosed with anxiety (if I do actually get diagnosed) because that’s the main reason why I miss(ed) school.Edit: The second line did NOT make sense sorry but idk how to fix it I don’t wanna use my brain to hardSecond edit: I just need to get rid of the words ‘of’ and ‘that’.Third edit: It still doesn’t make sense lmao Fourth edit: Why tf am I writing out my edits? [info] None [info] 1562830287
Marked2Test [info] Yes I’m a current employee. Why would they say that my team deserves more and then start asking me these questions. The context was not in a helpful tone. It started out in an attacking tone. I’m not convinced HR was trying to help me. It was with HR and my boss. Honestly, I’m not lonely and not depressed. I have been diagnosed with anxiety due to work and other personal events but my performance at work is still successful. [info] None [info] 1545486524
grrawritsjordi [info] I never knew why I was always so angry and flew off the handle at the smallest things until I was diagnosed with anxiety. Now that I know why I feel the way I do, it would be so easy to say "I was a bitch because of my anxiety." However, I know that I should be able to better control my anxiety, specially since I am on medicine.There are some things that I do blame my anxiety on, such as when I have attacks that I cannot control (which will cause me to not want to see people or go out in public), but when I'm just being a bitch, I know I'm being a bitch and my anxiety has nothing to do with it.  [info] None [info] 1448784090
Trilllvana [info] Anxiety and flying. Help! Hello all! I am new to this community because I was just diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks. I am having the hardest time controlling it or making it go away when I am in the middle of an attack. And most of the time it just happens randomly, it doesn’t even have to be triggered. I am flying today, and I can feel me become the anxiety ball that I am just thinking about it. Do you have any tips or tricks to help me through this flight and just through every day life?? Thank you all so much, it’s been a real struggle. [info] None [info] 1537980448
kaupa_lupa [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks just 2 weeks ago; and 2 days ago I found out I have a 1 inch tumor in my breast. [info] None [info] 1552233921
WhenInDoubtDab [info] Medical Marijuana has helped combat my anxiety astronomically. Hello everyone - I’ve been suffering from heavy anxiety for a couple years now and I just wanted to reach out and offer some advice to anyone who might be seeking refuge through medical marijuana. First of all, I live in Pennsylvania, which is one of many states that accepts Anxiety as a reason to be prescribed a MMJ card. I highly recommend researching your state to see if you can get access to one. I’ve had my card since August. This being said, marijuana, much like other traditionally prescribed medication, isn’t for everyone. It took me a few weeks to get used to it as I was not a heavy weed smoker prior. Now, before I started taking MMJ, I was prescribed lexapro, which worked for a little bit but caused me to gain over 20lbs of excess weight and did not cure me of my regular panic attacks. A friend of mine got his medical card for chronic pain, and said I should look into getting one for anxiety. So, I did exactly that. The process was easy. I showed up with my medical paperwork showing that I was diagnosed with anxiety, and that was it. Got my card a couple weeks later in the mail. For those of you who are unfamiliar, there are two different kinds of weed for the most part; Sativa and Indica. Sativa is more of an “energetic” high, which is not good for most people with anxiety because it can cause paranoia. NOW, Indica on the other hand, is excellent for combating anxiety. It provides a “body high” that makes you feel calm and relaxed. I smoke a little bit of Indica at the end of the day each day and it reduces my anxiety astronomically. I get better sleep, and I wake up the next day with no anxiousness, feeling fully refreshed. So all I’m saying is, give it a try if you can. Remember to be responsible! I hope this helps anyone who might be curious in seeking treatment via marijuana. TLDR; Try getting your medical marijuana card and see if it helps your anxiety like it did for me [info] None [info] 1577454643
ihateapplepie [info] I have never felt important to my parents. I've sadly come to the conclusions recently that my dad who I thought used to be on my side is an enabler and kinda bad himselfMy dad and I used to sit and cry in the car with how NMom treated us. We would vent to eachother, we would talk things out. He would listen to me scream my frustrations and I would do the same for him. Then one day I was venting and he just says "I think you should stop saying these things about your mother." And I felt i had the air sucked out of my lungsI feel like my parents never took me seriously or cared about me. I've literally never, not once, been to a dentist and I thought that was normal. I broke my ankle once and they took me to the doctor and then hid it from me, acted like everything was fine. I control my doctor stuff now and saw the after visit summary from all those years ago indicating a break. My ankle has serious damage from not getting that break taken care of. I was diagnosed with anxiety and adhd in middle school. They literally refused to take me to any doctors. My mom is a fucking nurse. They both had a lot of meds. All of my brothers had meds. Just not me. I begged them because I had nightly panic attacks. My dad always said "okay I'll do it" and then when it came to me they would never schedule. When I was finally brought in and given a medication, he never took me to the follow up and my meds ran out. Then he wouldn't take me because next time we went he would have to pay a fee for missing it with no notice or something. My brothers were fully medicated and regulated. Due to my adhd and other problems I seriously struggled in school. My parents never cared and just blamed me for being lazy. My teacher sat me down and was like you are struggling why are you not in an IEP or something. I told him it was because my parents wouldnt allow it. He was shocked. (Considering my brother was in 3 IEP classes) They had the IEP teacher secretly take me to her math class and he would just give me the grades for how I did on that work instead. He was a fantastic teacher.I don't really know where this is going. I guess its a vent? [info] None [info] 1540126478
JessicaRoyy [info] I do this all the time. Certain sentences get stuck in my head too and I get frustrated trying to remember it exactly as it was said or what I should have said. It only started after I was diagnosed with anxiety disorders so I figure that's what it is. [info] None [info] 1548510529
vanjs [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety but thankfully (for this case) it's more mentally than physically. I was shaking so much I dropped the post-care paper they gave me (they made me sit up once to rinse my mouth after anesthesia/before the actual extraction) so I was close to my peak for anxiety. I listen to some good music, hummed a little and didn't know my tooth even came out until they started working on the bottom one (I kept saying 'huh? huh?' since I couldn't hear well due to my headphones and the assistant kept yelling 'it's out! it's ooooout!!!!!').Still no pain, but lots and lots of drool :(And I know how you feel man. I've been pretty healthy (physically) my entire life so I've only gone to the dentist to get scaling done and the doctors to get immunized. It's my first time getting 'surgery' so I was terrified but now I'm just sitting here in my own drool, packing away... you'll be fine :) [info] None [info] 1502938801
TheDimensioner [info] Not sure what to do I've been diagnosed with anxiety for many years now, but it's only recently that I've started to have suicidal thoughts. I moved to the place known as the UK nearly 6 years ago now, and if I'm honest, that's probably the point where my life started to turn south. I was quite shy and struggled to make friends (still struggle with that, but that's not the point) which probably caused me to feel alone, especially with my brother moving out and my parents never really there (at work). I really don't know what caused me to feel like this recently when I managed to cope with everything for years before this. It's having an effect on other stuff as well, mainly my grades, which is causing my parents to worry even more about me which I don't want them to be. Therapists I've been to have never really helped, but I don't think I can carry on trying to help myself while my physical and mental health deteriorates. [info] None [info] 1582746661
yaen [info] Exactly. I used it for anxiety pre-preg, but I quit when I got pregnant. When people hear 'I used it for anxiety,' I wonder if they think I got a little anxious now and then and used it as an excuse. No. I'm diagnosed with anxiety, and panic disorder. It's terrifying and dibilitating when it's bad.Fortunately, I'm a lucky person for whom pregnancy hormones have helped me feel the least anxiety I've felt in years. But I fear for what will happen after the birth, with my hormones going crazy. It's still my goal to manage my anxiety with no drugs of any kind, but when it comes down to it, if I need something, I'd 100% choose smoking a tiny bit a couple times a week rather than starting a crazy SSRI regimen and having to quit breast feeding. That sounds both worse for me and the baby. I've been on almost every anti-depressant out there over my lifetime, and I'm never happy on them. I don't just feel numb with cannabis, I feel happy. That is to say, during the periods when Im not actually high, I find myself happier and more calm. I'm grateful for it. [info] Mama to Ev, 14 month, and pregnant with Baby September, 32 weeks [info] 1328624582
dragonattack [info] Good luck! I actually have "Don't Panic" on my wrist as an Adams tribute and reminder to not sweat the small stuff. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 8 years old, so it's been a long ride for me and I'm finally sorting things out.  [info] None [info] 1365861048
LinkALynx [info] I'm never doing another drug again. I have anxiety. It's bad. So bad that it impeded me from completing every day tasks that are deemed necessary in the society we live in. Driving was impossible, especially with a seatbelt. It felt as though I was being suffocated, like someone was in my backseat pulling the seatbelt tighter and tighter across my chest as I travelled to my destination. Staying in between the lines is a chore too. It takes a lot more concentration than it should.I'm veering way off course here. The story isn't necessarily about the anxiety itself, but where I ended up. I'll speed through the backstory: I visited a primary doctor before I was diagnosed with anxiety, and she's the one who did so. Diagnosed me that is. She gave me a low dose of benzodiazepine that didn't really help. I got into a car accident. The dose went up.I had a full on panic attack driving the work vehicle. The dose went up.I had a seizure from a panic attack. The dose went up.I started going through tolerance withdrawal. My doctor left her practice.They said the seizure was due to lack of oxygen to my brain, an indirect result of the panic attack. Little details like that are irrelevant I suppose. Either way, my doctor was gone. My NEW doctor told me to go through all of these steps to find a psychiatrist to re-diagnose me, it was going to take months and my NEW doctor was cutting me off of the meds. Anyone could tell you that's a recipe for disaster, especially when you've had tolerance withdrawal already.Left with a handful of options, I checked myself into a detox center after a family intervention. The only detox center my insurance would cover within driving distance. A detox center comprised mostly of federal convicts.I know what you're thinking, I got harassed, perhaps physically assaulted by the center's populace, right? Well, no. Somebody got stabbed with a fork, however. It certainly wasn't me, but that gentleman probably has a story all of his own.This is where the real story begins.Now, I was there for a pill addiction, a majority of the patients were there for a Heroine addiction. A problem that's been spiraling out of control in my area as of late. The treatment was all the same though. You take a specialized synthetic version of the drug you're addicted to, the dose is gradually lowered until you're safely weened off. Symptoms include, but are not limited to, uncontrollable vomiting, hallucinations and loss of consciousness. Possibly death, but they don't really advertise that. The second on that list is the most important to this story.Hallucinations.It's a very strange feeling to be in a dark room, the door to the only exit opening and slamming shut over and over, shadows seen under the doorway, hands pressed against the bars on the outside of the only window with no human body connected to them. It's even more horrifying when the door opens for real and all of that suddenly stops. It doesn't matter if your bunkie (that's what they called “roommates”) is actually in the room because you're alone and horrified in your own head.I was there for four and half days, as covered by my insurance. The first day was normal. As normal as it could possibly be given the situation. I met my bunkie, ate lunch, took a nap, ate dinner, played chess with a guy who was much better than me, then lights out. The second day was about the same with a narcotics anonymous meeting or two thrown in there for good measure.I'll spare you all the tiny details, as interesting as it is to me to retell the story given to me about the man who discovered his girlfriend was a prostitute while he was on a cocaine binge (he shoved her in his trunk, angrily drove her back into town as she crawled out of the door between the seats and into the front of the car. He forgot why he was mad at her half way home and they constructed a treehouse at 3 in the morning when they arrived), I'm fairly certain it doesn't belong in this particular subreddit.Sorry. I get sidetracked sometimes. So, that second night I was laying in bed. The overnight staff was required to complete nightly bed checks, so it wasn't uncommon to be woken up from a deep sleep by the *click* of the door and then seeing a shadow walking further down the hallway. Another *click* of the next door. Another *click*, until the *clicks* were so distant you couldn't make them out anymore. This happened every hour on the hour. Every night.My door was the first one in that hallway. I usually woke up to the first *click*, opening my eyes after the door clicked shut and watched the shadow move underneath the door. I listened to the *Ttp Ttp Ttp* of the footsteps walking down the hallway. The florescent lights would burn my eyes if I opened them while he was still peeking in. This is an exciting recount of those events:10 pm – *Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp. Click.* Lights. *Click.* No Lights. *Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp. Click... Click. Ttp Ttp Ttp.*11 pm – *Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp. Click.* Lights. *Click.* No Lights. *Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp. Click... Click. Ttp Ttp Ttp.*Every hour.12 am – *Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp. Click.* Lights. *Click.* No Lights. *Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp. Click... Click. Ttp Ttp Ttp.*1 am – *Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp.* No click.No click? I got up from the bed and crept to the door taking care to not let the distinct click be heard. I pulled the doorknob seemingly further toward the floor than it was supposed to go before gently pushing it open. I opened the door just enough to squeeze my big head through and peered down the hallway. The overnight staff was walking with a man dressed in flannel and carrying a visibly empty garbage bag. They were walking to the nurse's station. The nurses went home at 8:55 pm, five minutes before lights out. I had only been here two days, but the place seemed to run like clockwork and this oddity wasn't part of the routine. A man out of uniform going into an empty nurse's station with a garbage bag? At 1 am no less.I silently closed the door and returned to my slumber until the 2 am *Ttp*s and *Clicks* came back around.The next day over lunch I heard one of the patients in the kitchen talking about going home that day at 4 pm. The patients who were fully detoxed but not permitted to leave yet all had jobs. Trash duty, kitchen duty. Ect. Ect.When someone got to go home it was all anyone talked about.“Hey man, give this note to my girl when you get into town.”“Yo, when you get out, pay Jimmy for me. Hundred bucks is what I owe him. I'll get you back. I get out in 11 days.”“So, who's picking you up?”He expressed that he didn't have a ride. If someone didn't have a ride they were picked up by someone. The center paid someone to take patients off the premises and to the bus station if they didn't have a relative or guardian picking them up.4 pm came. Everyone exited the building to go to a gazebo for a cigarette break, we got one every two hours. The man who was commissioned to drive the patient to the bus station showed up in his 90-something Buick. I'm sure you can tell where this is going.It was the man from the night before. The man in the flannel. In fact, he was wearing the same clothes he had on 15 hours ago, minus the garbage bag. He didn't look at me funny like he knew who I was, he didn't even look at anyone, he just peeled out and took off down the street when the kitchen worker got into the car.The third day and night were just like the first. Nothing interesting, just the usual hell you'd expect from a building full of detox patients.The forth day my bunkie had moved from detox to residential. The place you go when you're done detoxing, obviously. He took all of his items except for a few pieces of contraband he was going to pick up the next day. He put them in a hole on the underside of the mattress. He also left a few bags of chips and candy bars in his nightstand as payment for keeping quiet about the stuff in the mattress. The food was definitely “contraband” as well in that you weren't supposed to have it in the rooms, but food certainly isn't what you think of when that word is brought up.9 pm came. Lights out.10 pm – *Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp. Click.* Lights. *Click.* No Lights. *Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp. Click... Click. Ttp Ttp Ttp.*At this point my ears were so sensitive from the stress that I woke up when the footsteps started.11 pm – *Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp. Click.* Lights. *Click.* No Lights. *Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp. Click... Click. Ttp Ttp Ttp.*12 am – *Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp. Click.* Lights. *Click.* No Lights. *Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp. Click... Click. Ttp Ttp Ttp.*1 am – *Ttp Ttp Ttp Ttp. Click.* Lights... *Creeeeeeeeeak... Creeeeeeeeeak...*Now, I was stressed, anxious and scared. My mind tried to keep its cool. What I **WANTED** to do was slowly open my eyes to see what was occurring around me, then probably close them and ignore what was happening until it stopped. That's what I **WANTED** to do.What I **DID** do was throw myself upward into a sitting position, my eyes practically bulging out of my head from fright. The moonlight was shining through the bars on the window, illuminating a man's face. The man in flannel, garbage bag in hand setting my bunkie's mattress back down after presumably peering underneath. He was staring right at me. I took a very deep breath, not to scream but to regain control of my brain. Anxiety, racing thoughts and fear were overwhelming my already fragile body and mind.I'm assuming he thought the former was the case because he threw his hand over my mouth. The smell of cigarettes and unwashed dog flew into my nostrils as I failed to finish the breath I was taking. My body was overcome by tightness and heat from the overwhelming sensory stimulation. When I say I've never had a panic attack like this before, that's because I have no idea how to otherwise explain it. This man could have been stabbing me for all I knew because I couldn't feel anything, my body was numb with heat, pins and needles, and adrenaline.Suddenly. Blackness. That's all I remember.I woke up at 11 am, three hours after I was supposed to. There was a very skinny 20 something putting his things away in the draws next to the bed on the other side of the room – a new bunkie. I thought the previous night's events were a dream, perhaps a hallucination, until an hour later when I was in line at the nurse's station for my last dose of medication.The kid in front of me turned around and asked, “You get out today right?”“Yeah.” I replied, I couldn't even articulate anything beyond that at this point. My mind was almost broken.“Stay clean my man. Your track marks are starting to clear up.”I gave him a puzzled look. At least I'm assuming I did based on the facial expression he returned to me. He grabbed my wrist between his pointer finger and thumb and extended my arm. He pointed at a needle mark on the inside of my elbow and raised an eyebrow.“I'm in here for a pill addiction, I've never shot anything.” I declared that with such authority it was as if just saying those words would make the needle mark go away.His face turned pale. I'm pretty color blind, and I could tell how white he looked. He faced back to the nurse's station and didn't say another word.4 hours later the staff came to the gazebo and told me it was time to go home. I put my cigarette out and grabbed my items, walking with the staff to the office. On the way there he asked me if I needed a ride to the bus stop. I never answered him. Out of fear I guess. That was the longest walk of my life. I was frightened opening the office door, I was frightened signing the papers, and I was frightened opening the door to the parking lot. And the biggest sense of relief I got was when I saw my sister standing next to her car in the lot.Thank Christ she remembered to pick me up.I know this isn't the most exciting or well written thing you guys and gals have ever read. I don't fancy myself a writer. The irony is, after lurking on this sub for so long I had always wanted to try my hand at writing on it. When something finally came along to write about, I was too afraid of recalling it to formulate the post.Yes, this actually happened.No, I'm never doing another drug again. Prescribed or otherwise. [info] None [info] 1491460360
PumpkinSpiceAngel [info] So sorry that you had to go through. I've been diagnosed with anxiety since High School, so this transition has not been the smoothest for me. I've mostly made peace with the fact that I don't know about a god, but I'm still worried about telling people. Best of luck during this time in your life. [info] Ex-Protestant [info] 1565616364
Raiden1156 [info] Started smoking weed at 14. I'm turning 24 in February. I just realized after seeing this post its almost been 10 years. Initially started due to constantly feeling like I was angry or panicked ( I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues since). I havent felt any affects as far as breathing, but i have noticed that my sense of smell seems to be weaker than others. But I still prefer to smoke a little every now and then, than take xanax a couple times a day and be a zombie all the time. [info] None [info] 1475766337
Bunny_Larvae [info] I feel overwhelmed I have had problems with anxiety for years but lately it’s crippling. I was diagnosed with anxiety years ago during my husband’s first tour in Iraq. Which is so absurd he was the one in actual danger but I fell apart. I was afraid to answer the phone, the door and eventually go outside. I got treatment and a puppy. It helped. Over the years I had bouts of anxiety again but never so overwhelming until now.  Three-ish years ago I had a son, he almost died when he was born. He’s everything you could want in a child; loving cheerful, and confident. I feel like my anxiety is going to ruin his life. I’ve started smoking again, I feel so much shame. I need to get him into school but the idea of leaving him with someone else makes me feel like I can’t breathe. We’ve had to move repeatedly over the last several years (multiple continents type moving) for my husbands work; I’ve lost my support system. I’m lonely and isolated and I don’t want that for my son.  I don’t want him to have a mother he’s ashamed of.  I don’t to be burden to my husband and I know I am. I can’t sleep at night, I’m tired and scared all the time lately.I need to do some things that scare me today.  I guess I just need to hear some kind words from people who’ve been there and are getting through it. Thanks for reading. [info] None [info] 1546019891
sephy_s [info] is there any hope? before i start this post i do want to make trigger warnings apparent. if suicide, self harm, anxiety, family situations, transgender topics, etc. triggers you, i’m very sorry.i’m a 15 year old trans guy(he/him pronouns to make it clear) as well as being gay, i am diagnosed with anxiety, i have very bad trust issues, i have constant suicidal thoughts, i self harm on a daily basis, and have on multiple occasions attempted to off myself. i do not believe that my self harm and suicide attempts are unjustified. i’ve talked to my mother about getting therapy, and she usually says that she will make an appointment, but never follows through with it. she constantly bashes my view on gender identity and laughs at anyone who thinks that gender dysphoria is real, as well as making fun of the whole lgbtq+ community. this makes my mental state worse. i sit inside all day playing video games and drink soda and eat. i refuse to go outside. interacting with people scares me shitless because i’m scared of judgement. being alone in a room without anything to do scares me because i usually end up hurting myself if i am not distracted. it’s been 2 years of this on and off. i don’t know how to stop. my ex boyfriend recently told me all i ever do is hurt him and he doesn’t want to talk to me for a while. i don’t want to hurt him, and i feel he is my only reason to live. the last thing i want to do is hurt anyone. i feel that my mental state gets in the way of all of my relationships. whenever i feel i’m getting better, shit starts going down hill and i’m back to where i started. i feel as if i am just a burden to others, and i just want to find peace. suicide and self harming is always on the back of my mind, even when i’m smiling. my hope for a good future is slowly slipping away. i was looking forward to my future at first, but my mental health is going down the drain. i’ve also thought about running away or contacting authority figures (e.g, the police, suicide hotlines), but my anxiety hinders this. if anyone is listening, please tell me there is some hope, and/or give me a way out of this shit hole other than suicide. [info] None [info] 1559924572
syllu [info] Worked as an administrator at hotel. Told my direct boss that i had panic attacks while working and took what we call a "sick-leave" in Estonia for a couple of days since I was diagnosed with anxiety and started taking new medicine. He completely ignored my doctor's orders and wrote a really angry email to me.  [info] None [info] 1531605679
peeps_queen [info] I don't know if it's the same for anyone else. But I'm a compulsive skin picker (there is a sub if you're curious). But when this started being an unconscious act and I was tearing my skin apart without realizing it, I was diagnosed with anxiety (10 years ago). Bipolar came recently. I think your desire to pick is normal but if your concerned always check with your doctor. I have to stay aware of my hands to keep from doing it. A fidget ring helped me bunches. Hope this helps.   [info] None [info] 1426577916
coolsnail [info] Yeah, mine was right in the sternum. WebMD told me I was having a heart attack and red pop-up told me to go to the ER. lol.Also I told the ER doctors that I was diagnosed with anxiety so they instantly said "oh yeah then it's just your anxiety doing this". One doctor said I'd probably live with it for another 30-40 years.Finally I got some proper tests and an ultrasound done and they realized my gallbladder needed to be removed.Also, my mum had hers removed a few years before I did. She felt it in her back (I think she described it feeling like golf balls stuck under her ribs or something) [info] None [info] 1446692813
4dham [info] As I am sure you are aware, ADHD is often comborbid.I was diagnosed with anxiety alongside my ADHD and to be honest, it's gone away with medication. I think therefore that anxiety was probably just a coping mechanism I developed for dealing with the aspects of ADHD that I found most difficult - it's difficult to deal with racing thoughts all of the time, so mild anxiety helped me to anchor my thoughts on a single (but usually negative) thing that might happen because of my ADHD e.g. running late, might blurt out the wrong thing in a social situation, might find it hard to sit still etc.It sounds very similar to this?&amp;#x200B; [info] ADHD-C [info] 1541837633
_its_ok_yo [info] Nothing really matters in the end It's an idea that I can't seem to get out of my head. I've been diagnosed with anxiety which has somewhat evolved into a mood disorder. I almost feel as if I have cared too much for too long, and now I have stopped caring at all. Although I suffer from specific phobias that suck the life out of me, I also have intense anxiety over the future. I'm fat. I can't be bothered to pay attention in school. I have a fear that no one really likes me, and the people I know have stuck around for as long as they have because they pity me. I'm afraid that I'm not good enough. I dread waking up, I dread going through the notions. I dread imagining how my GPA will be too poor to qualify for a scholarship, and how I'll end up with an unfathomable amount of student loans. How I'll barely be able to make ends meet. I guess I'm just tired of life. People have told me to focus on my priorities. I want to lose weight and get in shape, but I use food as a coping mechanism. Whenever I look at amazing diet before-and-afters, I don't feel motivated. I feel anxious and I feel like I'm a horrible person for not just being thinner already. I've really only considered suicide because it doesn't sound all that bad. At least when you're gone, nothing matters, right? You don't feel anything, because you simply no longer exist. If I left, my family might feel icky at first, but they'd eventually get over it and forget, and that's okay.  Sorry about the pointless rambling. Basically, there isn't really a point to anything, so why not? [info] None [info] 1447306042
georgialouisej [info] No, I wish he would have. I was very young and had (at the time) undiagnosed anxiety. Our relationship didn't start out terrible, at first he was lovely and all that but after a while he started to become controlling and manipulative which is awful anyway but worse for me at the time due to previously mentioned anxiety problems. After finding out he had cheated on me I tried to break up with him but he threatened to kill himself so I stayed. His behaviour then got worse by tenfold and he would openly do terrible things but I would stay because I thought that if I left and he killed himself it would be my fault. About 6 months before I broke up with him I was diagnosed with anxiety and started receiving treatment, we broke up after he did some extremely awful things and I finally realised that if he did kill himself, while that would be terrible, I am not responsible for his actions and it wouldn't be my fault.  [info] None [info] 1509194229
Zahkrosis [info] From homeless to (near) success I had a pretty bad childhood with an neglecting mom and a dad so affected by an abusive marriage that he took up drinking and forgot his duty as a father. Most of my childhood was spent indoors or with my grandmother from my mothers side. I've been homeless before in 2009 and became so one day before Christmas (23rd of December), however this was before what the story is leading up to.Time went on, my mother and I got a new place to stay, however what came with the new remained the same old. I was only allowed outside to go buy groceries (as my mom stopped doing that), walk the dog or if I snuck outside at night in order to go for a walk. I made my food, collected bottles for money so that I could afford my own private needs and I had no friends or family to talk to other than my borderline mom.There is so much of my story that I want to share, I will however for the sake of the story leave aome out and skip ahead.Skipping ahead to September 2017, I was minding my own business waiting for the weekend to come as I was finally allowed to go visit some friends I haven't seen for almost 1½ years, but when the weekend came my mom demanded that I stayed at home to take care of the dog while she went out partying (she did that almost every weekend with a "Facebook single group".I normally never spoke up against my mom because I was scared shitless of the consequences, as I had seen how my older brother and sister was doing in life, and it wasn't particularly good. It should be noted that I am the only one of three kids from my moms side that never ran away from home, as I had a hard time feeling safe unless I'm with someone I trust.I still got the safety issue as of today.Anyways, this day I decided that enough was enough and spoke up against my mom saying that we already agreed to that I could go and we've already made plans. I even collected bottles enough to afford using public transportation to get there.In the midst of the argument I decided to record everything on messenger using the voice message function and send it to my favorite cousin, just in case my mom attacked me, as she has attacked my older brother a few times before over the years, one time she got so violent that she slapped him and scratched his eyeballsHis literal fucking eyeballs.But after some yelling back and forth she ordered me to give her my key, my sim card and pack up and leave. I looked her dead in the eyes and said "Fine."She noticed that I was texting my cousin (using the WiFi), and when she saw that she went into the living room to turn off the router.Before I gave her my sim card my brother managed to call me and told me to come to him as he was with my cousin at the time and felt that it was his "duty" to protect me, aaaand that he could cash in on me being under 18 by having me stay at his apartment. Not the perfect family, but my brother did actually help me quite a lot and even though he isn't on the right path of life, I still to this day feel like I owe him (I helped him pay off a few things to the wrong people, but I wanna do more).I packed up as much as I could carry and took all my important documents (I had around 3-4k baht in our kitchen drawer which I sadly forgot to bring). My mom then tried to push me, which pretty much resulted in me putting my hands on her arms and giving a small push back.She tried to fake the force given by walking like a hunchback over to the sofa and jumping on her back in it. Pathetic, I thought to myself.Last thing I told her was that she wasn't a mother to me, she had negleted all of us (her children) and that on the day she died I would lay a black rose on her grave (black roses are sometimes considered ill omens for the dead and my mom didn't want flowers on her grave as the flowers would die and therefore mean dead love).The last thing I heard when she slammed the door behind me was "I hate you!".(Skippetiskip)I slept here and there, train station, friends etc.I managed to get to my brother where he then helped me get a below minimum wage job at a government owned workshop (literally one sixth of the minimum wage of where I lived, but it's the government and they have been shitting on the native populations back ever since the "refugee" crisis. I even worked there illegally since I was under 18 and therefore needed my moms signature to start.At this point my mom tried to get me home as after a meeting with the local government I was told since I am not at home under my mom, I should receive the child support money.It became clear to me, the government and the rest of the family that she only kept fighting for the rights to take me in order to keep that money.A few meetings with the local government and my mom later she finally signed the paper to release me from her "care". They then ordered my mom to give me the child support money, however that never came. The government said they didn't want to bother doing anything about it and said that was for the police to handle. I never called the police on my mom, as I never felt it was right and I overall didn't feel safe with it.I managed to save up money to begin going to school again and thus got a bigger paycheck for being a student under special needs for economic support due to my past from home.Fast forward a bit, I was forced to life at my grandmothers house and pay 1k a month for a 2x2 meter room, provided I also pay my own phone bills and internet.The apple never falls far from the tree, and my grandmother was almost as bad as my mom, even threatening to kick me out because I hadn't lifted up my own mattress from the floor the day after a friend came to sleep over.I began looking for my own apartment as my grandmother lived in filth, mice and mouse shit everywhere in a broken house with all the problems calling for it to be torn down and build anew. I continued to study to become a metal worker and I soon got my own apartment (my grandmother rushed me out and I didn't even get help to move other than my uncle driving my stuff to my new apartment where I currently live).I then got a job at a new government owned metal workshop for people under education with a horrible boss. Let's call him Kataq.Kataq don't really follow rules and is a power hungry one, and he knows that in his position, he can end and education with a snap of his fingers.I've had panic/anxiety attacks in the past and I began having them again. I told my boss as I was worried it would affect my ability to work.Kataq then broke the rules and appointment me directly to a school psychologist of which I am not even allowed to use. Time went on and my health was getting worse due to starvation due to the lower income from working at a government owned workshop and stress from my boss due to my condition.Fast forward a bit more and I had already gotten 2 written warnings. One of them was justified as I forgot to call in sick, the other was just my boss not liking that I had to go see the doctor to follow up on the thing with the psychologist where I was diagnosed with anxiety. 17 long years of neglect, beatings and isolation apparently does that to one.Kataq never tried to understand and only listened when people with higher authority than him or someone who could threaten his position.I thought things were going great until last week Wednesday where my boss called me in to a "talk" with my papers in his hand where he stopped me in the middle of work, sat me down and fired me due to absence.All of my absence was completely legal, but he said it was because he had "lost his patience" with me. I didn't go see a doctor for small things (I was dealing with a bad stomach attack the time, still am) and said I wasn't normal for not doing so.Keep in mind that his job is to prepare and train people to work with metal and to support us with our education.He then asked if there was something else I wanted to work with because he didn't want me to become a metal worker. I said no, and I refused to sign the papers as they were not legit in a legal standpoint, and I countered a lot of what he said.But with power comes the ability to lie on a report, and my colleagues always told me to record every conversation with him, because they knew he was like that. I regret that I didn't.But after my points was made he then said that he already made the decision and that all he could do to was fiddle with the document changing the reason for my "resignation".I now stand anxiety struck, jobless and no hope to make enough money for January as I won't have enough money to pay any of my bills or my rent. I don't even have enough to buy food.I had to go back to school in January, but that has been canceled due to Kataq throwing me away.I've lost a total of 2 years of my education because of both my mom and Kataq.If I don't find money to pay off next month, I will go homeless for a third time in my life.I just wanted to share some of my story before things get worse, as I got to admit my mental health has been declining into something I promised my now current LDR girlfriend and myself I would never try to do again.I have been struggling with suicidal thoughts before and attempted my life three times by hanging in the past, two of which failed, the third time a friend came and got me down before it was too late. Lucky he came at that moment.If you managed to read through it all, please know that I really appreciate you took the time to read my story and I hope you understand my situation. I might make a post about my mental health and what I am dealing with on a daily basis.I feel better letting this out for people to read, even though I hide behind a screen name. I wouldn't really feel safe making it public with my real name on it due to my anxiety. I feel ashamed of myself for not getting further than where I am now, but I don't wanna give up on life just yet.I do apologise for the holes in the story, I just felt like some stuff was better to be left out as I didn't want to make it way too much to read, even though I think it kinda already is.Again, thank you for reading, much love-Z [info] None [info] 1545281940
jazz4 [info] Anxiety is horrible in the morning. I coped really well as a kid and teenager - got up for school absolutely fine, but I remember dreading every single day I had to go to University and work and it's when it started. This was before I was diagnosed with anxiety and knew what it really was. Anxiety keeps me up all night, especially if I know I have to get up early or have a tough day.Cognitive Behavioural Therapy has helped a lot with that. Trying to live more in the "now" and identifying triggers, but these physical symptoms are brutal. I might try meds.  [info] None [info] 1454366361
dejvidBejlej [info] Nothing to worry about! And I've been diagnosed with anxiety 2 years ago so I know exactly how you feel. Pain usually isn't too bad but it's just very unsettling. Every once in a while it'll be actually bad.. Again, don't worry, your comment was helpful :) [info] None [info] 1544407133
funessen [info] Disclaimer: I'm really really tired, and English isn't my native language, so I appologize for my poor spelling and grammar, but I'm too tired to think clearly, and to read this through and check for errors. I'm sorry :)When I was diagnosed with anxiety and social-anxiety more than 10 years ago, the first shrink I spoke to said something, that at the time wasn't something I liked hearing, but turned out to be true. What he said was "You'll never be cured, but you'll learn to live with it." At the time, I took this as "Im going to feel like this forever, and how can I live my life like that?".But "you'll earn to live with it", didn't mean that I would never get better, and just adapt to feeling like I did. I ment that you learn to accept it, and stop trying to fight it like a disease.Eventually, I learned to ignore my anxiety almost completely. When I was diagnosed I was afraid of riding the bus, or any other public transportation, I didn't speak up during classes, or any social gatherings if there was just one person there I didnt know, I feared calling people on the phone, even my good friends, and the list goes on.At some point along the way, I decided that my anxiety could go f&amp;"% itself. I learned to tell myself that these things weren't scary, and I could convince my brain of this after a while, but my body to this day, still reacts sometimes, by shivering when speaking to people I dont know, or my heart races if I do something I once were scared of. But now I do things, and instead of being scared of doing so, I kinda look forward to doing them, to be able to give my anxiety the middlefinger over and over again, and show it that I'm in charge, and making my body shake, or giving me nousia, isn't enough to let the anxiety win. I even manged to convert the feeling I got when my anxiety starts kicking in, to a "positive" feeling. I kinda feels like an adrenaline rush, so when I get I, I just play pretend that I just got a free trip on a rollercoaster, and I didnt even have to pay for it, or go to the themepark to get it.When you get to a point where you can actually do some of the things you're scared of doing, even tiny things, the feeling afterwards is amazing. You feel proud, even though you think it's silly to feel proud of things like taking the bus, or other "normal" things. But allow yourself to be proud of every little thing, and it will help you in the long run.I'm still not cured, but like my shrink told me, I learned to live with it, so it rarely bothers me at all. I can do all the things I didn't use to, like using public transportation, making phonecalls to anyone, be it friends or the buscompany to file a complaint, you name it.2 years ago I decided to give my social anxiety the definitive f&amp;#-finger. I started researching, studying and preparing, and a year later, which now is about a year ago, I went to an open mic in the capital of my country, and preformed stand-up for 5 minutes, in a room with 70+ people (which went well btw), and I felt on top of the world. Now I don't feel theres anything I can't do, cause I can't think of anything more scary, than stading infront of so many people, and trying to be funny, and I already did that. So when I get nervous, I just think of that, and suddenly, nothing seems that scary anymore :) [info] None [info] 1433630346
thoraway1232 [info] Anxiety with gf's drinking (X-Post from r/relationships) My girlfriend (17) and I (17) have been dating for well over a year and a half and its great. I only have one problem.I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year ago, and it isn't a severe case by any means, but it is definitely there. It is by far at its worst when my girlfriend is out without me, and she is drinking. This happens maybe once a month, but it is starting to happen more frequently. Due to what I guess is just bad luck, I cannot go out with her when she drinks. Whenever I try to drink with her, something always comes up, so we still have not together (this is one thing we have discussed to try and help my anxiety in this situation). I know she will not cheat and she never has, but I still get incredibly anxious in the week or so before she goes out. Do any of you have any suggestions on ways to cope with this? I tell her about it every time, and she assures me everything will be ok, but it does not make things any better. TL;DR my girlfriend drinks without me, I get anxious, need help [info] None [info] 1380496322
Bkliop [info] I don't know if I should seek for help Hi everyone. I think I might have PTSD  and I don't know what to do... When I was a kid I was sexually abused by family members (other older kids) during a span of a few years. I can't remember much. I hate to think about it, I hate to talk about it (nobody in my environment knows this apart from my partner), I'm actually hating every second I'm writing this post... But I need some advice. I don't know if this is affecting me in the present. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder but I can go through my day to day life without much complication apart from some intrusive thoughts sometimes. My question here is... should I talk with my doctor about this? Should I seek for mental health? Wouldn't that just make the issue reappear much more often in my mind which would make it worse? Or should I just keep on ignoring the intrusive thoughts and hope they disappear? [info] None [info] 1499268443
throwaway1923859 [info] i don't know what to do anymore. i think school might kill me. (I know this fits better on /r/anxiety but this sub gets more attention. my apologies.) First off, some background. I'm a 13 (going on 14 in 2 months.) year old girl, so I'm only in eighth grade. I've been having a very hard time recently, particularly in school. I was diagnosed with anxiety at the age of 5. No doctors would put me on medication until a bit over a year ago, and honestly it doesn't do anything at all for me. Obviously my anxiety really affects the way I can perform in school. I usually only am able to go 3 days a week, and I don't think I've gone a full week yet this year. Even when I do go, I usually end up having a mental breakdown in the bathroom and hiding there until people realize I went missing and have to go and get me. I also have misophonia, so if I don't have an anxious breakdown, I'll have a literal meltdown from ignorant people chewing loudly because it's "cute". My speaking and listening marks are incredibly low because I can hardly speak out loud in class, and my marks for all classes are in the 60s-70s (some 80s if I'm lucky) because I often don't pass in work due to my fear of being wrong. I don't have too many issues with other students, besides the chewing thing and arguing with them because I "get extra privaliges that I don't need". The only thing really keeping me attending school is seeing my only friend at lunch, and she's leaving for highschool next year so I won't be seeing her in person at all for a year, except for the rare weekend. Homeschooling and online schooling isn't an option. I really can't escape this. I don't want to kill myself or anything, but I just can't do this anymore. I really can't. It's torture. I can't be around people. Literally nothing helps, and I'm sick and tired. I just want to stop going to school, but I'd hate myself if I ended up a dropout. I'm not a strong person who can deal with things like this. I love learning and I hate that something so precious to me has to be ruined by something I never had control over since I was a young child. I desperately need help, so if anyone has any advice for how to actually get my ass to school and to try to speak and deal with having to do work, I'd appreciate it more than I can ever type. [info] None [info] 1517972773
oneeyedpete94 [info] My fiancé (F 23) doesn’t know if she wants us to be together or not despite loving me (M 23). Everything went downhill so fast. Yesterday she kissed someone else (M 21/2?) This is a little bit long, but I *really* need help.We’ve been together for almost 7 years, engaged for almost 3 years and are meant to be getting married in May.  Everything seemed okay, we weren’t behaving abnormally or anything - still talking, bickering, having sex, flirting, doing the cute little things that get overlooked.  Then a couple of weeks ago, we had an argument about nothing, and spent a good few hours jokingly arguing about breaking up.  The week after, she told me that she’s not been able to stop thinking about breaking up and needed some time, so I went to my family for the week to give it her.  I came back 2 days ago and she still has no idea, except now she won’t act like a couple with me.  We’re talking as normal, she’s saying I love you before she leaves for somewhere, but not cuddling, kissing and certainly so sign of sex so far.She doesn’t want to talk because she doesn’t know the answers. But I know one of the problems is us not doing things out of the house more. We do things, but the last few months we’ve mainly been inside, she had a fall out with her friends so it’s mainly just been me and her.  I know this is a problem, I was diagnosed with anxiety problems in 2013, and have “overcome” them pretty much now but they still effect me with new/bigger things so sometimes my old habits make me put off doing things.  I’ve told her I’d changed, gave her options of a place to start by going on holiday but she thinks it’s for the wrong reasons even though I’ve explicitly explained that I *want* to do these things, I want to experience life with her, just sometimes need a push.  I think she knows that, though, because she really gets my anxiety and me usually.She also said she thinks we’ve have no spark, although I disagree.  We make each other laugh a lot, when we’re flirting before sex it’s like we’re lighting a fire, and our conversation just clicks usually. Now I just feel like I’m on eggshells.There’s been a guy flirting with her since Christmas at work - like heavily flirting and she said he was just a flirty person and she likes attention so it didn’t bother me. However, then she said she liked him a little - crush level like -  but again, fine.  We’re human, liking/fancying people is natural.  However, the night I got home, he kissed her and she kissed back multiple times.  She refused sex with him and has said she doesn’t know what it means. I’m more bothered that she’s refusing to kiss or cuddle me. Albeit she was drunk that night.She also has no idea what to do with her life and she feels lost besides our relationship. I’m worried she’s doing all of this in the hope it’ll change life, when obviously our relationship doesn’t restrict that. But I don’t if she can see that.Finally, this is unlike her.  She’s not open with everyone, she’s very closed off with everyone but me.  But if I’ve ever been upset, she’s cared and comforted like you’d expect, however, I was talking about us and have cried, and I talked about my mental health issues and cried and she didn’t really flinch.  Normally, she’d be supportive.We’re graduating this year, we’ve got a wedding, we’ve both had big family issues in the past 2 months, she fell out with her friends and we’ve not done much. I feel like this is just a really bad rough patch merging from lots of little things.  We were happy 3 weeks ago, she said it wasn’t until that initial conversation she’d not even thought about it.  We were still buying wedding things, just before Christmas we were doing big organisation stuff - I don’t understand why doubts wouldn’t have rises then.  I’m lost on what to do because I think the only thing that will fix this is us behaving as normal (with extra effort and improvements) to show that’s we’re good and happy. But she said even if I offered her a 100% solution she doesn’t know if she’d take it.I’m not willing to just throw away 7 years over a kiss or anything. What do I do?  How do I approach this without pushing her further away?*edit* - If it wasn’t for the kiss , would you view it any differently?*edit #2* - The guy means more than she initially said.  We’ve solved every problem except for him. I’ve told her that she’s gotta have to get over one of us, and even if she hated my guts and didn’t love me, getting over 7 years is going to be harder than getting over 2 months [info] None [info] 1517306199
anxthrowaway1234 [info] Disqualification question? Using a throwaway because I already told my supervisor about my situation. I'm February I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder after holding off on seeking help after my wife told me to seek help back in November. I brought the anxiety meds to the clinic and had doctors appointment on Saturday (I'm a traditional guardsman). The doctor told me that it was a disqualifying condition and is placing me on a profile until I can get a letter from my doctor staying that the meds are treating my condition. I told my supervisor and he said that it shouldn't be a problem if I have that paperwork filled out asap. He mentioned that the worst that could happen is that I would be medically discharge and/or retired because it can be service related. Does anyone have any input on my situation. It sucks that were told constantly to seek help and when I do, it's jeopardizing my career. Thanks for listening. [info] None [info] 1465829782
BloodcityWa [info] I like the maybe comment so basically you have no idea?  I was diagnosed with anxiety and then checked to find out my brain wasen’t making any serotonin I am an introvert and at many stages before social events I would feel physically sick and  tired beforeI even got to those events uncomfortable quiet and irritable when at the events because I did not wish to be there and the moment I got home instantly relived and happy again , there’s more going on then just being an introvert here which is why I believe they should go see there gp and discuss what they are feeling and how it’s affecting them may very well have other issues then just being an introvert  [info] ♂ [info] 1547429675
OrneryDefinition72 [info] TS/SCI clearance and mental health issues (anxiety disorder) I currently hold Secret Clearance but I am in the process of being investigated for TS/SCI for new job. About 8 years ago while in college I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and was prescribed medication (basically anti-depressants) to control my panic attacks, which are under control with the meds. So I've been on the meds for the past 8 years and also been seeing a therapist/psychologist for the past 8 years (at least 6 times a year, sometimes more).My mental health did come up while being investigated for Secret, but the investigator didnt have much questions and contacted my doctor (i assume to confirm my diagnosis and get medical records). Now that I am up for TS/SCI I assume my mental health will be scrutinized once more or more closely scrutinized. I already had my interview with the current investigator for the TS/SCI and he didnt have any questions about my mental health at all, so maybe I'm just assuming too much/jumping to conclusions. Posting this because I want to hear from other people who have been granted TS/SCI clearance and had/have mental health issues, especially anxiety disorders and if its grounds for not being granted clearance. [info] None [info] 1575665613
tortillaslut [info] I did this too, could only sleep if I knew someone else was awake. {thankfully my step dad was always up super late watching TV} I was diagnosed with anxiety and once I turned 18 and moved out of that house I never really had that problem. &amp;#x200B;I guess it was because it was an older house, and I was constantly afraid of fires or something happening so I needed someone awake in case anything happened. [info] None [info] 1561400249
nugai666 [info] Anxiety or actual health issue? I can't ever tell anymore I've only recently been diagnosed with anxiety about 3 or so years ago. I've even more recently been practicing mindfulness meditation which has helped me greatly reduce panic attacks and general anxiety. However I still have other "physical" symptoms, that I can't ever tell if are anxiety or not. I'm not asking for a diagnosis or anything, I was just wondering if anyone else has had this experience before:&amp;#x200B;Lately (starting from about 2 weeks ago), I've been occasionally having a feeling of something stuck in my throat, chest or lungs. I can't really pinpoint the exact location, it just seems to be in that general area. The thing is it only usually lasts for a day, and I usually wont feel it the next day. It has only occurred about 3 times since the first occurrence. The reason I'm not sure if its anxiety is because on the days I \*don't\* feel it, I try to actually think about it to see if it will occur again. But it pretty much doesn't in those cases. However, if I feel it a little bit, like I did today, thinking about it makes it worse. I also noticed that on a day I do feel the sensation, if I work out or eat/drink something, I don't feel it at all, at least for a little while- then it eventually comes back.&amp;#x200B;I will probably make a trip (again) to the doctors office, but I'm curious if this is indeed an anxiety experience? I don't have any trouble eating, drinking, swallowing, or anything like that.&amp;#x200B;This seems to be a common problem ever since I've been diagnosed with anxiety - I never know if what I'm feeling is anxiety or an actual health issue... [info] None [info] 1563858409
_icebear [info] Feeling frustrated and discouraged after talking to my professor... Some background: I'm in my fifth year of university. I was diagnosed with anxiety 1.5 years ago but I've been struggling with it my entire life. Last week I was diagnosed with ADHD and I've been taking 5 mg of Dexedrine daily. I'm more productive when taking the Dexedrine than I have ever been before.After class today, I asked my professor if we could set up an appointment for sometime this week to discuss the midterm next week, since I have class during her office hours. She said we could talk right away if I wanted, so I said sure and met her in her office.I tried to explain my situation - that I was diagnosed with ADHD last week and that the medication *really* helps during the day but it wears off around the time I get home from class. Next week, she is assigning a "take-home" midterm on Tuesday which will be due that Friday. I have midterms in other classes on Wednesday and Friday.She immediately became defensive and said that her class and midterm would not take second place to other midterms, and that "managing your time is something you need to learn in university." I tried to assure her that this wasn't the case, but that I was feeling very anxious not knowing anything about the format - how many pages it would need to be, etc. As an example I said "like, if it were 8 pages, I'm not sure how I would manage." Her response was lightning fast: "I didn't say it was eight pages."I tried to explain again that I just didn't know what to expect, which was causing some anxiety. I have always had so much trouble staying on task for essays, and my productivity in the evening post-meds is about the same as it was before my diagnosis (read: it's horrible!).I guess at most I was hoping that she could just take this into consideration for future assignments (perhaps assign the essay on a Friday and make it due Monday...) or show some understanding. Instead, our conversation just amplified the way I've felt throughout my education...that I'm failing at things that are "just part of university."She then told me it would be five short essay questions at 500 words each (the length was worse than I imagined but hopefully I can manage 500 words at a time better than 2500 words all at once). I thanked her for explaining the format and was expecting to leave. She then told me that since someone else is going on vacation next week, she supposes I could get the essay question at the same time as them (Monday morning).Getting the essay early is genuinely going to be really helpful (I have all of Monday free until 4:30 pm) but I felt really uncomfortable that someone's vacation was more of a justification than my medical diagnosis.I know I can't expect anything, especially without documentation. At my university, that means registering with a resource center for students with disabilities. I'm working on that right now, I have an appointment to discuss it with my counselor on Friday.I just really wanted to vent about this. I'm going to do my best next week and to get through this class. I'm really worried that she has a negative opinion of me now and thinks that I'm just lazy or want special treatment.**TL;DR: My professor is giving us an essay prompt on Tuesday and expects it finished by Friday morning. This will be difficult because I don't really have time to work on that during the day, and when I get home, my meds are wearing off. I tried to talk to her about it and left feeling really discouraged.** [info] ADHD-PI [info] 1422393874
ZA-X [info] How to approach the possibility of ADHD Okay, I tried to answer my own question by creeping, but that hasn't worked so I'm going to bite the bullet and make a post. I'm not sure how often you guys get posts like this and how annoying they are but I need some advice.I think I may have adult ADHD, and I want to explore that possibility but I don't know how. I am diagnosed with anxiety, which I know can sometimes manifest in ADHD like ways, but I am on a low dosage of meds and have been working on it for a couple years, but I feel like what I experience isn't something I can just chalk up to anxiety...How do you all suggest going ahead with this? My family has a long history of dealing with mental health problems, so I am wary of both crying wolf AND of leaving it unaddressed. I am currently seeing a therapist, and will be starting with a new general practitioner this week. Who should I talk about this with? I had a "holy shit that's me!" moment when reading about ADHD recently and I want to be able to communicate that is the case with someone but I'm not sure who.TL;DR I recently realized I may have ADHD. I do have a diagnosis of anxiety, but that was diagnosed when my life was ruled by panic attacks. That is no longer the case and I think there may be something more. Who do you suggest talking to (therapist or GP) and how do you broach the subject? [info] None [info] 1478126341
vaqt [info] I have no idea why it's listed as adjustment disorder. I was diagnosed with anxiety and MDD while I was in. But my compensation says adjustment disorder. I also have sleep apnea which accounts for a good chunk of my percentage.  [info] None [info] 1520476249
baatlyio [info] Question About Night Sweat Symptoms Hello! Can someone help me figure out what do to or who to ask? Some details:-28f, white, generally good health (no major medical past besides anxiety, more on that below), 5’2”, 122 lb (down about 5-7 pounds unintentionally since Dec, not sure if this is significant enough to be considered serious)-night sweats: have been happening since earlier this year, once in a while but more frequently recently. Not localized, definitely happening all over my body. Also not drenching as in I don’t need to change my clothes but I am definitely damp and some spots are more wet. I dry up fairly quickly, so if I don’t wake up in the middle of the night, sometimes I am not sure if it happens or not.-My room temperature is comfortable at 68/69 degrees, which is what I have always kept it at. my sleep clothes are pretty consistent. I don’t have any other major symptoms like fever during the day-I have been diagnosed with anxiety and have been experimenting taking Xanax (started earlier this year, very low dosage at about .25 mg i think). Took it maybe 4x/week. Took lexapro for 30 days in late May through June (low dose 5mg). Never overlapped Xanax and lexapro. I recently took Xanax a few times this last week too. Doesn’t seem like either med exactly correlated to the days I have night sweating-I have had a lot of testing so far. Multiple CBCs, thyroid, basic hormones, and chest and abdominal CTs, all of which have come back normal-I don’t have any lumps I can feel in my neck. But I have 1 pea sized bump and another even smaller one behind my ear. One doc told me they are cysts but I don’t know if that’s correct. Don’t hurt and they are soft. I know I’ve had the larger one since at least Jan of this year, potentially longer but unsure. -Randomly had some muffled hearing in my ear (opposite side of the cysts/bumps) the other day. I have worse hearing in that ear in general, been that way for several years. Probably unrelated but who knows, I’ll throw it in hereI’m considering seeing an ENT to help with the bumps behind my ear. Let me know if this feels like the right next step/right doctor. I want answers because 1) I have anxiety and the results for night sweats on google all basically say cancer :( and 2) night sweating is gross and uncomfortable so I’d really like to resolve it. Part of me is comforted because if it is something serious, it apparently hasn’t spread to the rest of my body given my clear CTs.Let me know if there is anything I am missing and I can provide more detail. Would be helpful to know if I am thinking about this correctly!EDIT: formatting, some more detail [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1562504021
uninventedword [info] How do I tell my crush I like him, and am I a stalker? Around four years ago, a new face appeared at the local gym, and I fell in love with it. He was the most beautiful boy my teenage heart had ever seen. He quickly became a regular at the gym, and was part of the reason I wanted to keep going, if only for the fact that the mere sight of him and his sunny personality brightened my day. However, I never spoke to him. Not once. I regretted it every time. Last fall, he left for college, which I knew because I'd overheard him talking about it to someone else there.    Only the year before that did I hear he was the same age as me. I'd thought he might be older. But, that didn't matter. Everything I knew about him, I knew from other's conversations with him, for my cowardice stopped every impulse to even say hello. I treasured every found morsel. He came back for holidays, and lastly for the coronavirus lock down. The last day the gym was open, for the first time, I heard someone say his name. Just his first name. At first, the name didn't seem fitting. It was too majestic, too rich, too mature sounding. Like the names of centuries long past. When I went home that day, I did something that could only leave a sour taste in my mouth. I searched his first name on Facebook, coupled with the name of the town where we live. The town isn't too big. I found his profile quickly, out of only 13-15 results. His full name was on his profile. I searched it on google. To my shock, I found that he has a YouTube channel. Not a beginner one, at that. I also found his Instagram. I didn't watch any of his videos. I couldn't. It was too far. Knowing details of someone's life, posted online, where those of the home town are likely not meant to... to... I don't know. This is where I become confused. The reason I did all this was to find a way to message him, if I couldn't see him  anymore. I desperately want to know him, but I don't want it to be from afar. If only he knows how I feel, that would be enough. But, there is no conceivable way I can think of doing it without fear of sounding like a creepy, obsessed, crazy woman. Am I just that? Creepy? Obsessed? Crazy? I have all the signs of an internet stalker. Well, just enough of them to be worrying. But, am I? Is this behavior acceptable, or not, in this confusing era of life through a lens?Extra Facts: I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and social anxiety. I've also lived a life as if in quarantine, because I've been home-schooled, and have allergies that may cause my death. Also, everyone says I'm beautiful, but I worry he will not think so, or perhaps everyone is just being nice. In conclusion: Help. [info] None [info] 1587805580
GoldenBirdSong [info] I've started meditating after my therapist suggested it to me. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD, and I suffer from panic attacks.It took a while, but it's helping to the point where if I feel myself getting agitated I'll meditate for a few minutes and get less anxious. I also don't get anxious as often.The trick is not to grab onto any of your thoughts, just let them float by. When my mind is wandering or relaxed, the reason I get anxious is because my mind is latching onto thoughts and it turns into a spiral of obsessive anxiety. TL;DR: Try it. It helped me and you won't know if it helps you without trying. [info] None [info] 1389325794
_cheerio [info] Recovering Amphetamine abuser here. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and panic disorder. When I first got clean, I couldn't sit through an NA meeting. I had to have styrofoam cups and would literally pull a trash can up to my chair during meetings so I could tear them apart because I was so  paralyzingly terrified. It was ridiculous, I was physically incapable of sitting still. I was so uncomfortable with myself. I've had to leave many meetings because of panic attacks. I've driven to more meetings than I can count and just not gone in because I couldn't force myself to get out of the car. During months 3-6, I would drive to this one meeting that was an hour away once a week, but I never once went because I was too busy having a panic attack in the parking lot to get out of the car. I get 8 months tomorrow and it's still a struggle sometimes. But it is SO much better than it was. No more styrofoam cups, I'm starting to build relationships in the fellowship, and my panic attacks have decreased by about 80 percent. All I did was two things: Didn't use, and kept going to meetings.It sounds like you plan on doing those two things, so you're in good shape. Just know that everyone has days where they think recovery/NA is dumb as fuck and not for them. We ALL think that way sometimes. The ones that succeed are the ones that go to meetings even when they're 100 percent sure they don't need to. Feel free to PM me if you ever need! [info] None [info] 1492264701
Redhaired103 [info] OP, I have to tell a story. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder but still had it undiagnosed, I went from in my safe zone to working as a waitress at a 5 star hotel's ever-crowded restaurant. The first two weeks were challenging in every way. Both physically and mentally. Physical exhaustion only made my anxiety worse. But, it was one of the best things that happened over time. I got use to the environment. I liked my co-workers and that place started to become another safe space for me. Even with the customers that were problematic, I didn't really care because it was still *my* safe space, with some fun co-workers I liked. I tell this story because while your 'bad scenario' is an option, my experience and alike are also definitely on the table.But let's say things didn't work out at this job. I think of the things us with anxiety disorder sometimes don't totally accept is that this wouldn't be the end of the world. There are zillions of jobs out there with different work environment, different work duties, different co-workers. Yes, you might not make enough money for the life standard you would like to have at all of them, but "paying the bills"... the chances are you can find a job like that. And please please please don't forget, you are not *stuck* at any job. Another common thing I see is that we feel like whatever situation we are in, sometimes we feel that will always be our situation. It's not. If you don't like the job, if you want to leave, you can do it anytime you want. One of my best friends is an employer. She did have employees over the years who quit after a week, didn't show up at work, etc Some had good reasons (anxiety is a valid reason), some were just irresponsible like they went on a date instead. She never thought badly about the people who couldn't continue to work over health reasons, including mental health. Her employees actually don't know this but she suffers from anxiety disorder herself and gets panic attacks, sometimes at work. The moral of the story: more people are familiar with anxiety disorder than you think. They won't even think badly about you, nor they expect you to have an incredible performance in the beginning, regardless of if you have anxiety or not.Give it a try. If things work out, great. If things don't work out, not the end of the world. [info] None [info] 1532264370
MentallyPsycho [info] I was too young to realize, my parents had to figure out that I was far more scared than most children. One visit to the psychiatrist later and I was diagnosed with anxiety. Alternatively, I didn't realize I was depressed till I admitted out loud to my mom that I wanted to kill myself. It finally clicked in my mind that I was suicidal because I was depressed. It's weird how something can be so obvious, but you just don't see the signs right away. [info] None [info] 1498364201
lozerlife [info] For me that's Yoga. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I signed up for a yoga class and really enjoyed it. I usually hate excercise so this was add for me. I was mega stressin and yoga was helping me before my diagnosis. Yoga teaches lots of stuff to help with anxiety like patience, improvement, exercise, and mental awareness. The yoga itself helps give you a good work-out without taking all your energy away. The stretching makes your body feel great. You have to be patient during yoga or it won't work,  you have to sit and soak the stretches without pain. And when you can in a way you couldn't before,  then you see the results of your progress. It's exercise so it makes the body and mind feel good. After the work-out we meditate,  and it's the nicest part of yoga for me. For me this improved my mental awareness and got me to a doctor,  so I hope it helps you. There are lots of YouTube videos to follow if you want to do it at home. Honestly doing it at home is nice to because it's just you time, your mental day.  [info] None [info] 1552544587
Anonymous-barista [info] In a constant state of panic and I'm getting tired of it About 10 days ago I had my first panic attack even though I was diagnosed with anxiety more than a year ago. After that I've had about 3 milder ones if you can even call them panic attacks.But about four days ago I've noticed that I am in a constant state of panic. I feel really weak, my hands are shaking, I have trouble breathing, feel nauseous and am in a constant fear of something. I can overcome the current fear with a little effort but there's always another one around the corner. Sometimes, for seemingly no reason at all, I have episodes of more intense panic when I can barely hold myself from crying or actually cry a bit.So what should I do? I've tried some breathing exercises and calming music but that didn't help. Some things to note, though, I've been going out with my friends everyday for 5 days straight. Even when I was in this state I kept going in order to distract myself. I don't feel worse or better when I'm with them, I feel the same.Thanks in advance! [info] None [info] 1406760201
TheLemonMage [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but that's just something I inherited. As a person, yes, I'm emotionally resilient; it's easy for me to not take things to heart, and I'm surprisingly adaptive to big life changes, including deaths of loved ones. My friends can rely on me to vent to, as a shoulder to cry on. I'm not an emotional person, but I'm always there for my friends and family [info] ENTP [info] 1566874283
Vadermaulkylo [info] Does this sound like a heart problem or a blood clot to any of you? So I’m 17, have always had a terrible diet, but am not overweight, and last month I noticed that the left side of my heat was hurting, so I freaked out. I went to the doctor and found that I had perfect blood pressure and pulse, so he sent me home. Two days later I felt a slight pain in my arm and panicked, so then sure enough I started having pains that shot down my left arm into my pinky, just like with a heart problem and rushed back to the doctor, where he did an EKG and found it to be “perfect” , so I was diagnosed with anxiety. Some time has gone by and it’s gotten worse and I’m feeling other symptoms, such as back pain, abdominal pain, extremely hard heart beats, fast heart beats, the pains I described before, and the main vein in my left hand is hurting very very bad, but it only started that when I noticed the vein slightly bulged a little(which I’m pretty sure it always has). I’ve had all those symptoms for weeks on in now. Then the other my parents called the doctors office and told them to test blood I had taken 4 months ago(another story there) and they did and found it to be normal, which I don’t think blood from 4 months ago would pick up on a heart problem or blood clot I may have gotten since, but oh well, my parents says it can. Now that hand pain I described earlier is hurting extremely badly and I’m worried it that I have a clot in that arm and that’s caused it to hurt right where that vein is. I went to a physical therapist who found a rib on the left side of my chest was poked out and she said that probably caused the pain to begin with and my anxiety made me start feeling all this other stuff, but that sill didn’t convince me. What do you guys think of this, I’m beyond scared and want to have an updated blood test but my parents are NOT happy, as the EKG was already pricey and came back just fine. It might just be very bad anxiety but you can never be too careful! [info] None [info] 1528465252
hushxx18 [info] Tips for anxiety? I been having really bad anxiety for the past two weeks. It feels like I’m going crazy (when I’m not) Some background info; I have been diagnosed with anxiety at the age of 14. I’m almost 20 now. I have these rough periods every couple years but usually I’m okay. I haven’t had anxiety in over a year- maybe two, so it hit me really hard. It’s the same old same old, cant breathe, intrusive thoughts/ thoughts that don’t make sense, can’t sleep, feels like I’m going crazy, but the newest one is derealization, where it feels like I’m not in control of my body. I don’t have many friends so I can’t do things or talk to people to get my mind off. And my family is extremely abusive and won’t be much of a help to speak to. Advice would be welcomed [info] None [info] 1559624660
bikeandboard2 [info] Please help me, but I think I'm suffering from some form of mental illness Okay, everyone. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year with a minor case of OCD. But the psychiatrist that told me this was hired by the uni I go to. She's not the most reliable appearantly. Anyway, I stopped taking my anxiety meds because my mother believes that the meds are going to cause more harm than good in the long run. Anyways, ever since I started going back to school, I've had these urges to try coke, heroin, smoke weed like crazy. I constantly drink to drown my problems and thoughts away. I'm lying to people all the time. Sometimes I will act differently in front of different groups of people, so they can feel bad for me. I also am compulsive, very compulsive where I decide things at the moment and don't think about the consequences. If someone makes me mad, i will stop talking to them and when I see them again I will act really passive aggressive. I cannot seem to act stable at all. I really just want to die sometimes. I really want to end it all, but the only thing holding me back are my parents and brother. Last night I smoked and drank, but that wasn't enough to make me forget, so I cut myself. I guess I did that not only to feel pain, but to also get the attention of others. I realize that although I have sooo many friends and so many people that look up to me, I only have 1 real friend. Just 1. Sometimes I'm in a great mood and I'm really positive and respectful, but half of the other times I act like a fucking dude. By this I mean, I swear like fucking crazy, I talk like a bro, I say very unladylike things. I just want to know what the fuck is wrong with me. I think I might have a personality disorder. Because when I'm with adults in their 30+ years, I am very composed and serious with our conversations. But when I'm with people my own age, I lie to them. And I act like I need constant help. I've never had a relationship in my life, and seeing people around me have one makes me want to fucking kill myself. I just want to die, but in my head, I know I'm going to be big one day because I have this drive that pushes me everyday. Sorry for this long rant, but I want your help. Please. Please. [info] None [info] 1474137328
lullie-cat [info] Do I have depersonalization? So I've been reading up on depersonalization because I feel as though I might have it. I go to therapy every couple weeks or so and I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I've read that's common with dprd. Is it supposed to be triggered by nostalgia? Because whenever I go somewhere or remember a certain memory that happened in the past I go into this cloudy state of feeling like I'm living in a bubble in that moment and I feel very spaced out. This usually only lasts a few days (sometimes a week or so at most) and then it's gone. It's been coming back a lot lately though and I just get so panicky and touchy during this time until I snap back. I've been doubtful because whenever I read about dprd I see symptoms that are super severe and it just happens here and there for me (it's still awful though I'm so lucky it's not a daily thing for me) But I do sometimes just forget me, people around me and pretty much everything else exists for small amounts of time (this isn't too bad it's just kind of odd and I space out again)I've been asking my other friends and a lot of them don't share similar feelings so I thought here would be a good place to hear other people's opinions who might have the same feelings. [info] None [info] 1489628109
throwaway831937 [info] Intrusive sexual thoughts make me feel fucking disgusting Hey y’all. Made a throwaway just for this post because I feel so disgusted with myself. I’ve been dealing with intrusive thoughts for a really long time. I’ve never been diagnosed with OCD (I talked to my psychiatrist about it once, but my symptoms aren’t constant so she didn’t diagnose me) but I have been diagnosed with anxiety.As a kid I always had little rituals that didn’t make sense and revolved around eating- say if I had a bag of m&amp;ms with 4 orange, 6 green, and 3 red, I would split them up evenly by color and bite the third red one in half, eat them in order, one half on one side of my mouth and one half on the other. Complicated to describe but it’s always made intuitive sense to me and I would get very anxious if I didn’t do that. There’s other things that I repeat or redo until they feel “right”, so l wouldn’t be surprised if I had a mild form but I don’t want to self-diagnose.I started having intrusive sexual thoughts when I was 12- every person I talked to, I would immediately see them naked and think “I want to fuck you.” Didn’t matter who it was. My friends, my teachers, my grandparents, it was disgusting. I think they went away for a little while, but they’ve come back much more aggressively over the past few years. I especially get them around kids and certain members of my family. I love my family and I love kids, and I want to have them someday. But I get so disgusted by the thoughts I’m having that I avoid close contact with my family because it sends my brain into a loop and I avoid children as well. I try not to spend time alone with anyone because of the thoughts I know I’ll have, which really affects my ability to have close relationships with anyone. I also have some disgustingly racist thoughts that make me feel physically ill. I’ve never told anyone about them.I know that intrusive thoughts are manifestations of things you consider to be the worst sins you could commit but it doesn’t make me feel better at all, and they seem to get worse when I get anxious. Do y’all know how to deal with these? [info] None [info] 1568579654
VilePug [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and am happy to say that I have overcame it through shear willpower and I'm no longer medicated, but when I feel a little anxious, I like to recite Wu Tang lyrics (very familiar to me) and think about my dogs. If your struggling with anxiety DON'T WORRY. It gets better over time. When I started experiencing anxiety attacks I thought i was going crazy, but years later I have full control of my emotions, sometimes it seems like more so than most. Just see a doctor and find a hobby.Tl:dr, Song lyrics, dogs, get a hobby to distract yourself from your irrational worries. [info] None [info] 1502264383
bebetolittlefella [info] My anxiety is ruining my relationship because it make me focus on my partner's 'flaws' Hey guys, how are you?So, I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder for 6 years now, though I know I've had it for more than ten years, I just didn't know it was an anxiety issue.I'm a 30 years old straight dude who started struggling with anxiety when I started to think I was gay (now I know this thing is called HOCD, but at the time I even came out as bisexual to my mother). After I went to therapy hoping to accept my sexuality, I discovered my problem wasn't self acceptance but an anxiety disorder, so that made sense, because I came out as bisexual even though I don't feel attracted to men. I thought I was burying my desires or something like that.With therapy, I've made huge progress, but sometimes my anxiety attacks me back in other areas of my life, whatever seems important. And is attacking my relationship, unfortunately.When I'm not anxious, I don't care much about my girlfriend's flaws. I mean, I can see things I don't like about her behaviour, but I believe there's no perfect relationship, so it's just something I don't like but I can live with. Unfortunately, when I'm anxious, I keep thinking about these 'flaws' and I keep thinking things like "If I'm thinking about her flaws, that's because this not the relationship I want". Or "If I'm checking out other girls, that's because I'm not satisfied with my girlfriend". I know these kind of thoughts don't make much sense because there's no perfect relationship and people checks out other people (my girlfriend does it too), but my anxiety makes me exaggerate these thoughts and it gives me more and more anxiety. So, I think my anxiety is transforming common relationship issues into monsters that are eating my happiness. And it's making me doubt my relationship the same way it made me doubt my sexuality. The bigger problem is: regarding my sexuality, there was objective ways to know it was just anxiety (for example, I wasn't attracted to men), but with relationship it's more difficult because is more subjective with real issues that are common.Another problem is: she is my first girfrliend and I was a virgin. We've been together for almost 8 years now. So, sometimes I feel curious about having sex with other people and I think that's ok, it's natural to think things like that. But when I'm struggling with anxiety, this issue becomes a monster. I keep thinking that it shows I don't want to be with my girlfriend. It's like a proof that I'm in a relationship that it's not for me.Do you guys have some advice? Am I the only one that have these kinds of problems?ps: sorry about my broken english, I've been trying to learn it by myself. [info] None [info] 1517782378
The-Bunny [info] Like everyone else has said, it is possible and you are worthy of being loved. You aren't ruining his life and he is with you for a reason. I have been with my boyfriend for four years and I have been diagnosed with anxiety, I believe my boyfriend has anxiety as well but he hasn't been formerly diagnosed. We recently had a heart to heart and we both discovered that we have the same worry of being bad for each other- I actually giggled a little when he told me cause it was kind of funny we both had the same worry and could have talked it out and gotten support from each other. Communication, communication, communication. This is the key to making it work. Also, I learned it kind of helps me to joke about it in a way. For example, there are times when I realize I get irritated for no reason and make a big deal out of nothing cause of my anxiety but he realizes he handled the situation wrong and let it spiral into something worse. and after we make up, the fights become a weird inside joke between the two of us that is kind of like play fighting to make fun of ourselves. Talk to your significant other, I guarantee you aren't ruining but enhancingEdit: also know you aren't alone. Sometimes my anxieties get so bad I contemplate breaking up with my boyfriend to relieve him the trouble of being with me. However, once the anxiety passes I remind myself if I was truly a terrible person than he wouldn't be with me. Just keep reminding yourself it is your anxiety [info] None [info] 1435264841
FrekyShadow [info] High heart rate I just need some reassurance right now, for the past couple hours I've had a high heart rate, about 120bpm, I don't have any chest pain or anything just a high heart rate but it's starting to freak me out because it's been high for over 2 hours. I don't have an overwhelming feeling of fear though or anything else, just the high heart rate. Anyone else get this? I've been diagnosed with anxiety but this is just weird to me. [info] None [info] 1446764837
cuebabies [info] I’m 25, just diagnosed with anxiety disorder, unsure if symptoms are all related to anxiety. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder just 2 months ago. In short I had a massive panic attack after smoking some weed 2 years ago since then I’ve been very anxious when I feel a symptom similar to the attack. Fast heart rate, dizziness, chest pains, and muscle spasms all get me thinking something bad is about to happen. I notice in the onset of an attack my bowels get loose as well. I’ve come to accept this is anxiety, a couple of doctors have told me the same.1 week ago I woke up with a headache and it’s been on and off until today, sometimes it’s intense other times it’s just barely noticeable.  Also I’ll feel pins and needles on my chest and what feels like the heart. Does anyone know if this is also related to anxiety?? [info] None [info] 1546571281
AbsentMindedArtist [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety but none of those. However, my mind is constantly going and I often have to redirect. I also remember as a kid if I did something to one side of my body, I had to make things even and do it fo the other. However I never thought much of it and slowly phased it out. This is interesting though because during the last two intense episodes, my body began turning in a circle, repeatedly waving a hand gesture in each direction (NESW). I don’t know much about OCD. Is this a combination of an OCD ritual and my ts?  [info] None [info] 1543113960
Osixotin1 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety at 5 so it’s definitely not new to me. I’m thinking it is time for a med check. I am on meds but I’m on the lowest dosage so it may be time to up them a little. I’ve been given breathing exercises but I have had a hard time realizing I need to do them when in a situation like that. I was trying to breathe while in the store today and I had my “worry rock” (a slick rock that I use as a sensory toy) but it didn’t seem to make things much better. Hopefully I can just get better at them. Thanks for the advice! It is greatly appreciated [info] None [info] 1545604030
whostolethesampo [info] Fellow anxious person, and I get this too! At times before I was diagnosed with anxiety I legitimately thought I had throat cancer or a plethora of other horrible diseases. Now, years later, I’m finally able to recognize the feeling of “something stuck in my throat” as a symptom of my anxiety, and nothing else. Once I stop focusing on it, it goes away. It took me almost 4 years to be able to take control of this symptom, but I know how real it can seem. Last year DH and I were traveling in Europe and I was so convinced that I had throat cancer that I almost made us cut our trip short so that I could go home and see a doctor 🙄  [info] None [info] 1544007486
BarfPendegrass [info] Finally starting therapy for my anxiety/doubt/worry, and I couldn't be more excited! So I've always labeled myself a worrier. I've always had a voice of doubt in the back of my mind, I overthink things, and I'm super sensitive. I live a lot in my own head. I had very critical (of myself and really everyone) parents, one of whom was alcoholic. I really never had much of a chance to be a kid as I grew up. Now I'm out of that environment, but all my learned behaviors are still there.I never really tied all those things together into meaning that I have anxiety, but recently I went to the doctor because my nighttime tooth grinding was causing headaches. I even found myself clenching my teeth during the day, when I'd think of things that stressed me out. The doctor asked if I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and I just shrugged. I always assumed therapy would be super expensive, but after looking into my work's insurance plan, I've realized that it's entirely doable. I made some calls and found a therapist who seems super friendly but super ready to call me on bullshit when it comes up (I saw a student counselor during college, and was turned off by the way I could pretty much tell her anything and she'd just sorta go with it). Ever since I made the appointment, I've been so excited. It's at the end of the week, and I can't wait. I told a friend that I know deals with massive anxiety and he was so excited for me. "You won't believe how much easier life is going to get!" I don't have any questions or need anything; I just wanted to share my excitement with the sub! I suppose if you have any advice for someone starting therapy, I could use that. [info] None [info] 1395183326
rosales0709 [info] Fear of existing? So this is my first post on here and I just want to know if anyone else here have any similar experience or at least somewhat understand where I'm coming from. I was just diagnosed with anxiety recently and this lead me to be pretty much be stuck in my head most days and start ruminating about a lot of random things. One of these thoughts was about existence. In my head I wondered if there is such a thing about having a fear of existence. I started obsessing over this and in my head I imagined what it would be like to just be in a state where your mind perceives everything to be scary. This thought put me in that state of what I would call "hyperconsciousness" and it made me feel very frightened and confused at the same time. It usually comes and goes and Im trying to get a better understanding of it and I keep telling myself that it is just a thought and doesn't mean anything but it does get the better of me at times. As ridiculous as it sounds im just wondering if anyone can give ma advice or relate to it. [info] None [info] 1565726518
pastelbacon [info] Not a lot of point in responding this late, but I'm a bit emotional to see how many people share the experience of relying on Hitchhikers to get them through bad times. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and panic attacks (the humour isn't lost on me there) when I was 17. I had loved the books before then and read them several times, and happened to have the audiobooks on hand too, the versions read by Douglas Adams himself. During the worst period of my anxiety, I found that if I put the audiobook on then the familiar words combined with Adams' voice would calm me down. It could dissipate panic attacks and help me through insomnia. As treatment began to work for me, I needed them less and less, but to this day if I start to panic I repeat the first lines back to myself and it centres my brain. My life has been helped for the better by one man telling me, Don't Panic. I hope your struggles end soon, and it sees you through too.  [info] None [info] 1470374725
walkswithmusic [info] Can you guys help me out? Could use some opinions on anxiety issues. Just a small background. 30 years old.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety at a young age and was on lexapro for a year, didnt like it much, and my doctor and I decided to do traditional talk therapy and things were going well.  In the last few years 2 other doctors believe it may be add that is causing this and I've been on ritalin and now vyvanse.  This seems to control my anxiety better, however now the last few weeks nothing has improved and I'm left with some serious nervous paranoia, insomnia, and just bad anxiety.  I was just traveling and while it was fun I had a few anxiety attacks for really no reason. I emailed my doctor and she said we can talk about medication changes, and I'm going to up my trips to the talk therapy.I'm a normally functioning person with a job and life, but this anxiety can be crippling and it sucks.  Do you guys think based on your experience medication could help this?  My doctor is very open to discussion on things and is willing to let me try things until they work. Thanks for any help! [info] None [info] 1365078938
OneFinal [info] Looking for help in dealing with health anxiety. Several months ago, I was diagnosed with anxiety after having a series of panic attacks, during which I thought I was having a heart attack. I was put on Xanax for a couple of weeks, and being on that drug was magical. I did not want to be dependent upon it, however, so I gradually weaned myself off of it over several weeks with the help of my doctor. This was incredibly difficult because decreasing the dosage increased my symptoms tremendously. Fortunately, I was able to push through it, my symptoms gradually decreased, and I felt fine for about a month.About five weeks ago, I got home from a little vacation and got really sick with a head cold. I had a lot of coughing, sneezing, sinus issues, etc. After about a week, the cold went away, but the cough remained. After another week or so, I started to develop really bad sciatic nerve pain in my left leg. I saw several doctors, including an orthopedist, and they all felt that it was tied to over-exercise/excessive running. I've been stretching/doing light exercise for the past two weeks or so in order to help with the nerve pain, and it's come and gone, but has not disappeared. I will be starting PT for it this week.Over the past week though, I've been dealing with all of the following:* Continued sciatica* Continued cough* Feeling of swollen glands in my throat* Some stomach pain* Nausea at times* Night sweats* Trouble sleepingI've been through the gambit of tests including: CT scans of my lower spine, chest x-rays, heart monitors, several blood tests, urine tests, and more. My doctors have not found anything wrong with me and simply see a healthy young adult. They recommend that I see a therapist and think that it's largely anxiety-related.I've been really struggling to accept that it's all tied to anxiety. I can't sleep at night because I'm worrying so badly that there's something seriously wrong with my body. I really want to believe that it's all tied to anxiety so that I can get back to living my life, but I'm so wrapped up in symptoms and worry.What are some resources that I should turn to in order to get help? Should I really be concerned and consider seeing additional doctors? Would something like CBT help? Have any of you suffered from such health anxiety that you'd be able to share your experiences?EDIT: I just found this [super useful document](http://www.cpft.nhs.uk/Downloads/DVD-Documents/Leaflets/Coping%20with%20health%20anxiety2%20final.pdf) that is aimed at educating and helping one deal with health anxiety. I almost cried reading some of the bullet points because of how much I can relate to them. [info] None [info] 1458660324
SadHatt3r [info] I'm so bad at making friends I've been diagnosed with anxiety about a year ago. Since then I've been taking my meds (and was able to take less of them) and going to therapy. I do feel much better-my self-esteem is much higher, I have less trobules with casual interactions and starting a relationship. But I still haven't reached one of my goals-making friends. It's very hard for me to actually continue a relationship after meeting somebody-going somewhere after school or meet up during the weekend. It's hard for me to ask someone out because I always feel like someone would either A) deny me or B) go out just because they pity me. I feel like nobody would want to be friends with an obnoxious, smart-ass person like me. I'd love to find some kind of organisation or a hobby group that I could join, but they are either filled with people much older than me (Im 17 and others are 20-somethings), have completely different interests or groups like this don't exist. I envy my classmates-I feel like they have so many friends and no troubles finding new. I have no idea how they do this. I want to have a meaningfull connection to someone, I want to find a soulmate (preferably romantic, but platonic one is great too), just someone I'd feel an instant connection with. I'm aware that due to my bad mental condition last year I've missed out on a lot of socialisation and meeting others and I plan to fix it next year. It's funny, I've used to be terrified of school but thinking that I'll be back there in about three weeks actually makes me feel... happy. I'll get to see my teachers, other students, I'll be able to get into a routine... Funny how things can change. [info] None [info] 1502744986
ohtheplacesyoullgo_ [info] I have a heart murmur thing and I got it tested and the docs said nothing was wrong. Later when I was diagnosed with anxiety I realized that was probably the culprit.  [info] None [info] 1512021616
kirbysdreampotato [info] That's crazy. I've had minor versions of that my whole life; seeing bugs that don't exist, seeing something stationary "move", mistaking objects, always far away or out the corner of my vision.I was diagnosed with anxiety last year and I've always been easily stressed, which builds up when everything stresses you out. I always thought seeing small things like that was normal. Never thought it could be connected. [info] None [info] 1547935471
_null-entry [info] Real OCD is fucking awful and it's sometimes hard to cope. I have been diagnosed with anxiety induced OCD, so no I'm not another insecure moron who self diagnoses. It has ruined friendships and made simple things like working in class or cleaning the house real marathon challenges. [info] None [info] 1448691482
Yer1blackfriend [info] I love my mom and I think that undiagnosed and untreated general anxiety disorder made her this way, but she’s incredibly negative. Every time I wanted to try something new as a kid or take up a new hobby, she’d always mention how it could go wrong/wouldn’t work. Want to try out for soccer? “Who will pick you up from practice?” Want to take up acting/drama? “You know that’s not a stable profession.” (I was like 10 btw). Want to try cheerleading? “You sure you can do all of those tricks?” Playing in a concert for your middle school band? “Ugh, now I have to sit during that long concert.” I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and now have to check myself from being a negative Nancy all of the time that often makes me insecure about taking up something new. For instance, I love comedy and have really wanted to take up improv for the longest time but it takes a lot to move past the negative thoughts and just go for things. I know that when I have kids, I want to make sure that I always encourage them to go for their passions and at least try new and different things.  [info] None [info] 1528490369
jbrinskele [info] I used to be agoraphobic when I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder. After finding the right medications that worked for me I no longer have the problems I did. [info] None [info] 1334166958
smolbeanlydia [info] Just fyi if this is for Psych I’m assuming this is about how social media impacts your mental health, so I think it should take into consideration people with already diagnosed conditions. I was diagnosed with anxiety wayyyyy before I found social media but in your data it could be used as a point that social media use and anxiety levels correlate when my disorder has nothing to do with it. Just want you to be aware people with previously diagnosed conditions may skew the results.  [info] 16 [info] 1553483016
PoppaDR3W [info] It is scary. I definitely had/have a bit of it. For awhile, before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I didn't know what was going on. So every pain was a heart attack or a stroke or cancer. It was weird, because other people's stories made me anxious and get those feelings.Like someone I know had a benign brain tumor. I never had headaches, but after I was told that I had them within days. I had intense head pressure. :/  The easiest way to get over it, in my opinion, is to see a doctor and get a checkup. Being reaffirmed by a professional definitely helps. Take care of yourself - exercise and diet. :) [info] None [info] 1420838757
femalefaceless [info] yeah i feel so tired all the time. I was diagnosed with anxiety as well and while i try to manage it best i can i do feel tired...psychologically, emotionally and physically.  [info] None [info] 1538146371
DM-333 [info] Addicted to caffeine while taking medication. Hello all, I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and ADHD a few months ago. Along with my ADHD diagnosis, I was prescribed Adderall xr 10mg/day. I know that drinking caffeine with this type of drug doesn't have pleasant side effects, but I have been drinking coffee all my life and it's tough to go a day without it, I've tried decaf, but there's always something missing about it. I will say that when I hit my low at about 4pm, a cup of coffee always does the trick to give me that extra boost, I experience no insomnia but I've lost over 10 pounds since taking this medication. I'm thinking I may just have to quit coffee all together. Any suggestions would be appreciated, thanks. [info] None [info] 1494600863
morganafiolett [info] I do this. I get really upset over pointless things. I know I'm doing it. I can't help it.And yes, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and yes, I have medication to help. [info] None [info] 1538123640
jcannawithya [info] No longer doing this, but when I was in uni, I’d commute for 2 hours to go to school, then after a full day of school, I’d do the two hour commute back.. just to rush back so I could attend officer’s meeting, choir practice, bible study, etc. I was at church almost every day for some kind of event. By the time I got home, I’d have to choose between doing my homework, sleeping, or eating.. I’d usually chose homework first, sleep second. I ended up loosing about 20% of my body weight before I got into grad school and moved out of my parent’s house. Not healthy, and my grades definitely suffered.  If anyone else is resonating with the statement above, I’d recommend readjusting some of these priorities or reaching out for help!! I was diagnosed with anxiety because I was so brainwashed that I would panic if I missed any church events. You are not alone!!! [info] Done with EVM [info] 1556150626
ang_2k6 [info] I've recently started seeing a psychologist and I've been diagnosed with anxiety... [info] None [info] 1555195822
pcs199 [info] Need to vent. Worn out from fear of epilepsy among other things. So a little while back I posted about how I get deja vu all the time, and how Dr. Google diagnosed me with temporal lobe epilepsy. This obsession has been paralyzing me ever since, and anywhere I go I get deja vu triggered by anything really. It got real bad when I traveled far away this March, but died down like a month later. Not too long later, I got super stressed, anxious, and obsessed over a girl that I liked at the time, and the deja vus came back and have stayed since. It can last for any amount of time. My psychologist tells me it's derealization, and my doctor (who is fantastic and has known me since I was a baby) knows my history of anxiety and OCD well so he pretty much told me to knock it off lol. What scares me though is I've read stories from people with temporal lobe epilepsy that they get misdiagnosed with anxiety etc. Of course, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD since I was very young, so this is just an irrational thought pattern. I have a family history of anxiety disorders, but none of epilepsy. That helps reassure me a little bit, but not really.I get a bunch of other physical anxiety symptoms. I get so many I can't list them all, but I have constant vision symptoms like visual snow, floaters, and this stupid little smudge in my vision that flashes and blurs on lines and stuff sometimes. I also get these sharp headaches above my eye, mainly in the morning. These things really don't help my epilepsy and brain tumor fear.I've taken 100mg Zoloft for 8 years. I tried upping the dose this year to 150 but my anxiety got worse, so it's down to 100. Perhaps Zoloft's effect has worn off on me. I take 0.25mg (sometimes just half of one, so 0.125mg) Xanax when my anxiety gets too bad to handle. I only need to take it once or twice any given week.I just wanted to vent my frustrations out. Maybe this can help others with similar anxiety problems to know they're not the only one. [info] None [info] 1502896074
RomeroChick26 [info] Anxiety during Meditation I was hoping to get some advice on how you all meditate during your practices. I can't seem to empty my mind during tarot readings,rituals,etc.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety, so my mind is just always going going going.  Any tips on relaxing your mind enough to empty it? I felt like there's got to be other anxious people on here. Any advice would be helpful. [info] None [info] 1528997060
Google24 [info] Full on grown-up style that I'm not ready for. I absolutely can't deal with stress because I was diagnosed with anxiety. It's frustrating because I would like to date someone. [info] None [info] 1386388631
Kotastraphe7568 [info] Hello, I'm having trouble with my left arm going numb as well as chest pain. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I have a heart condition. I was born with Tricuspid Atresia. I'm have difficulty understanding if these symptoms are life threatening or just a result of my anxiety. I'm currently taking no meds for my anxiety and take Aspirin for my heart every day. Any legitimate advice would be helpful. Thank you. [info] User Not Verified [info] 1573746163
Gaydonut [info] Numbers that don't end in a 0 or a 5For example if I see a 203 bus I'll take the 2 add it to the 3 to get 5 and then put the remaining 0 on the end for and anxiety reducing 50.I don't know what it is about 0's and 5's that bring me relief, but if I see any numbers that don't end in them I'll do all the mathematical gymnastics I have to to make it happen.I have a few forms of ocd not just relately to numbers also I'm diagnosed with anxiety, avoidant personality disorder and I'm anorexic perfectionist so being in my head drives me kinda mad.  [info] None [info] 1503455039
Asspickles [info] Will I experience anxiety my first time smoking? I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and I am going to smoke for the first time soon. I have heard that weed causes anxiety. Will I experience a lot of or enhanced anxiety after smoking, or will I be alright? Wondering because I don't want to have to back out because I have an anxiety attack or something like that. [info] None [info] 1434608770
TDJS95 [info] Jaw Clenching So when I seen my doctor she said my jaw clenching has to do with trauma and now I am going through trauma therapy for it. Is jaw clenching part of anxiety? I was diagnosed with anxiety and I really don't know too much about... Anyways, thanks! [info] None [info] 1530058102
hal4019 [info] Bad health anxiety flare up. Try to help reassure me. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year in November. Fought meds and help for 4 months until I finally caved after ending in the ER with a panic attack over a brain tumor. So far, I've survived brain tumors, MS, Heart disease, thyroid cancer, and lymphoma. My latest is bone cancer. I have this pain in my rib cage. Ive had it since last April. Now the doctor has looked at me multiple times and assured me it's nothing serious. But now I'm wondering if I should have had a test done or something. I want to google the stuff so bad but I know that will make it worse. We have said before it could be a muscle strain inside the rib or just anxiety pains. I've seen anxiety cause some crazy stuff, but not this. This pain has been on and off, and I can't pinpoint it. I can't make it happen or anything. It just comes and goes. I started to try and attritubue it to stress (I'm a teacher) since I would normally get it at work. Over the summer, barely had it at all. In fact I thought it was just completely gone until it came back in October.   Please help reassure. Can bone cancer symptoms come and go. This is probably the worst anxiety I have had in about 6 months. [info] None [info] 1483660240
DFJ17 [info] How do you even cope with it? Some days it makes me feel like I'm going insane, it's horrible. It's not like I've been diagnosed with anxiety or anything, I just feel like I have some strain of it. I hate it. I feel like it's turning my life upside down, making me feel afraid and inadequate of doing basic things. I'm honestly starting to get worried about what my future is going to be like because of how I am now. I don't know where exactly this all started, but it feels like it's gone haywire in the last few years [info] None [info] 1568920176
Flightxx [info] Advice to Those With Anxiety in Maintaining Relationships? It happens whenever I start to get close with a girl. My anxiety flares up for days thinking about them, and then the paranoia starts. I start thinking actual reasons are excuses. I start feeling that I’ve done something wrong when I haven’t. I usually keep these to myself, but with so many thoughts some are bound to slip out. I know these thoughts are false, but with the absolute worse outcome continuing to surface, j still feel horrible inside. I’ve lost so many friends and interests by doing this, and I just want it to stop. It’s unhealthy for me and unhealthy for the other person. What tips do you have for me to stop this toxicity? I thought I was just crazy until I was diagnosed with anxiety only 2 weeks ago. [info] None [info] 1542470473
sizillyd [info] Did you see a nurse practitioner or something? You should have seen a psychiatrist. A physician. Not a nurse. The same thing happened to me my first time. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I went and saw a primary care physician. However, my issue was my concentration. So I made an appointment with a psychiatrist and told them what my concerns were. I was tested for ADHD and was prescribed medication. [info] None [info] 1474136976
GoBackToMeddit [info] To supplement my post title:I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder after several trips to the ER for chest pain/discomfort, lightheadedness, nausea, sweating/clamminess, heartburn,and several other heart attack symptoms. Each time, they run blood tests, x-rays, and EKG and find nothing. After the fourth visit in August 2018, I stayed overnight and had a stress test that showed no signs of blockage, so it was written off as anxiety or panic attacks.Since then, I am still always experiencing the symptoms above. Last night, however, I experienced the same symptoms, but these felt distinctly different and more intensified. For example, the heartburn I usually feel is esophageal whereas what I felt last night was a raw burning sensation in the core of my chest cavity, kind of like the lactic acid burn you feel in your arms or legs when trying to get in that last rep of a set of free weights.So it got me thinking about the stress test which, as I understand it, only detect around a 70% blockage. Given my age (41), sedentary lifestyle, alcoholism, obesity (6" and 280 lbs), poor eating habits, high cholesterol, and high blood pressure (tldr: I am a ticking time bomb waiting to go off), it seems theoretically possible that an artery could have been 65% blocked at the time of the test which would have gone undetected. Since it was 7 months ago when I had that stress test, would it be possible to jump from 65% to 70%? What if an artery was 50% clogged?Therefore, I think the real question is this: How long does it take for a clogged artery to increase by a percentage point? I understand that there are a great number of variables that go into such an estimate, but is there a rough estimate? [info] None [info] 1551744864
brokenmind12345 [info] All the time. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and I'm always scared others see me the way I see myself. And I don't have a very high opinion of myself so you can imagine how that affects me.  [info] None [info] 1481442716
geekybrunette [info] Really poor body image after changes over past year From about age 16-22 I was consistently 120-125lbs, size 1, 34C. I had a slim build, with average muscle. I ate healthy but didn't make a point of exercising. I was also using estrogen-based birth control during this time. A year ago, I moved to a new city and got a new family Dr. She asked me more about my medical history, and since I get migraines with aura, took me off estrogen-based birth control. I then spent 5 months using no birth control while waiting to get a Mirena IUD inserted.  During this time, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Around the time that I was diagnosed, I underwent extremely rapid weight gain of about 20lbs in 6 weeks. I am still unsure if this was due to going off of the previous birth control, the anxiety itself, or the anxiety medication. When I went on the Mirena 6 months ago, I also went up to a 34D. I am now off of anxiety meds for a couple months now,  and am going to counselling for anxiety, and have been eating extra healthy and trying to exercise 3 times a week. I still have not lost any weight/fat at all, and my boobs often feel swollen and tender.  The changes to my body have completely rocked the my body image. I feel very chubby, and many of my clothes no longer fit. I have lost my sex drive as well, as I just don't feel attractive and my boobs hurt half the time. I don't know what to do. I feel like there is something hormonal (either sex hormones or stress hormones) keeping me from being able to lose weight. I know it sounds shallow, but it's actually so upsetting to me...like to the point that I cry about it like twice a month aha. Does anyone have any advice for either getting my body back, or at least regaining some body confidence? [info] ❤ [info] 1470105233
dunechka [info] The presumptions again, son. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder, hence my personal stake on the subject and why I'm very comfortable letting you know that your language is harmful. [info] Legs n. thighs. No biscuits  [info] 1475592163
CasTheUnicorn98 [info] My kitchen is haunted Hi guys, I've never posted before and never thought I would but this is just getting annoying for me now and it feels badMy parents, and three siblings and I moved into this house 7 years ago, the place is 200 years old in a very old village, things were going great.It started a few years ago, I was sat in the living room (it's directly connected to the kitchen with no hallway) on my own, my brothers and sister upstairs and my parents trying to keep them entertained. I was studying for exams coming up, and I felt something tap the back of my head, my back was to the wall when this happened, I yelled  to my parents to keep the kids away from me because I was trying really hard to maintain focus here and all the kids were still upstairs.I shook it off, and a few nights later the same thing happened. I always shrugged it off as something logical.Then I started hearing voices, it's like two men having a conversation that you can't quite understand, it's so muffled. I would hear this at night and go downstairs to check as my room is above the kitchen, every time nothing was there and everyone was asleep. It would stop the moment I'd enter the kitchen and then almost start up again the moment I left. I shrugged it off again when I was diagnosed with anxiety because yay school stress so I thought hey I'm overthinking everything.Then my mum comes to me and asks me something about a year ago, she asks me if I hear them at night too?Turned out my sister and brothers and my mum had all been hearing them at night too. We know it can't be the electric because it still happens when there's a power cut so regularly.Now things are getting moved around, books are being dog-eared and that's something my mum and sister can't stand, things are disappearing for a day and reappearing in the middle of doorways like it was always there.I don't know what to do or what to think but I don't like it, it just feels bad in there now.We still live here and if it gets worse we are seriously considering bailing. The voices still happen for hours on end, I don't know if it's like one ghost or an echo or a mix happening.Why is it making our stuff disappear and reappear? [info] None [info] 1557288441
caterinaprimavvvv777 [info] how did you overcome anxiety in relationships? how do I not let anxiety ruin a relationship? I was diagnosed with anxiety at age of 7. I been in 3 serious relationships. when I was 15 I was in abusive relationship. I lost trust, my self worth, I get my anxiety from there sometimes. luv last two relationships end, becsuse they say “ i’ll be here” then end up leaving. my anxiety gets the best of me, makes me overthink, analyze everything. i’m nervous my anxiety will ruin my relationship I have now. no matter how many times people said in past, it won’t ruin us and we’ll get through it, but then it somehow does. my bf is good to me. he supports me. I believe him when I say that my anxiety won’t ruin it. How can I calm myself? how do I not push him away? I feel like he getting distant how do I not come off as clingy or needy or pushy, but my anxiety gets me like this and I hate it [info] None [info] 1587833471
madheadjosh [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety a long time ago when I was little as I had it quite bad. But Its never affected me when I got older (adult hood). I am 21 now and have never experienced a panic attack nor had anxiety attacks as far as I know.Edit: I also have heart palpitation if that makes any difference but my doctor has said it only just means that I am more aware of my heart beat. [info] None [info] 1566402274
bananas_cake [info] I told my friend I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and they told me just not to think about it and I won’t be anxious anymore  [info] None [info] 1544765214
cookem8 [info] If you have any kind of anxiety disorder this could have manifested itself as a form of OCD or HOCD. I believe that site yourbrainonporn discusses it in length. You can't get it up with a girl, then you think you're gay, then you think about how you fapped to pictures of dudes one time when you were a curious teenager, so you think you must be gay. Then you end up fapping to straight porn to get rid of the thoughts. Becomes a self-fulfilling prophecy. Trust me, if this sounds like you, you probably aren't gay. I was diagnosed with anxiety with obsessive thoughts early on in life and I have struggled with this for years despite being in quite a few successful long-term sexual relationships with women. [info] 376 days [info] 1396749269
Ghosttownhermit [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, that is the thing. I appreciate your advice. Thank you.  [info] None [info] 1544124099
saareadaar [info] Experiencing mental illness. Don't get me wrong, it's absolutely horrible and it's not really something I wish on anyone, but it wasn't until I was diagnosed with anxiety that I realised just how hard doing even basic things can be when you have a mental illness, even though I previously thought that I understood. And I think it would make people just a little more empathetic towards people with mental illnesses rather than viewing them as lazy/crazy/dangerous/etc. Also I am so sick of the triggered jokes. People who joke about it have no idea how horrible being genuinely triggered in the clinical sense of the word actually is. [info] None [info] 1498877886
TechnoFlame19 [info] I get terrified when I have to go into an elevator, it may sound very stupid but I did a bit of research and there’s a phobia agoraphobia which is a anxiety disorder in which you fear and avoid places or situations that might cause you to panic and make you feel trapped, helpless or embarrassed, this dose make sense to me since I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year ago [info] None [info] 1550327780
beevibe [info] I scraped through high school, sleeping in every single class every day and maintained an B average. I got to college and holy shit, you cannot do that shit any more. I never used to study and now I have to and I’m struggling. I’m in the process of being diagnosed at the moment because I’ve never needed help until now and I just assumed I was lazy and stupid. I was diagnosed with anxiety in high school and my psychiatrist told me that I could have ADHD without me ever even mentioning it and at first I was like nah because I hadn’t ever considered it, but it definitely made me think and now I’m fairly confident I do. Also since my sister has it and my dad thinks he has it but doesn’t see the reason to get it medicated since he’s learned to cope without it. [info] ADHD [info] 1566178585
pattywGon234 [info] Mental health.I need money to live on my own and start feeling better about myself. I need a job to get money. In order to get a job, I need to a) have some kind of career in mind and b) impress someone enough to hire me.I can't do either of those 2 things in my current state. I have been diagnosed with anxiety / panic disorder in the past, but I suspect I may be also dealing with ADD and/or OCD. I also have a gastrointestinal disorder that is most likely related to the anxiety - that bothers me from the moment I wake to the moment I fall asleep. So to be quite honest, life fucking sucks right now. I'm overwhelmed with all of the things that need to be addressed, and as I've deepened into this funk my social skills and confidence have fallen off completely. I overthink every single moment in life.  Almost every single one of my friends and peers had no problems getting job offers and knowing what they wanted to do. I feel like the only one who's completely fucking lost and it's so frustrating.  [info] None [info] 1535476367
Bluewall1 [info] First time smoking high CBD weed Hey Trees ! Little story :I have smoked weed like 20 times but it never felt right. I never felt really good after. I was more of a drinker.Few years later I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and it all made sense. Weed was making my anxiety worst. I had to take Xanax for a few months and went to therapy for like a year. I felt better but anxiety never leave. Always in my mind. all the time. For everything.So what have I been doing ? Not much, learnt to deal with it and maybe drink a bit more or more often than I should.Recently weed with low THC (less than 1%) and high CBD was made legal in Switzerland.I've bought some Colorado Indoor with a 15% CBD in it.And let me tell you, I've never felt this good during this evening. Well I actually did, when I was taking Xanax. So I guess I'm part of the family now ? If someone is in the same situation, please try it. I feel like my life will improve.Blaze it! [info] None [info] 1490907725
fuckthisthat [info] I HATED the call center. Gave me the worst anxiety ever. (This was Before I was diagnosed with anxiety and was on meds so it made it even worse.)I remember a lady I talked to. Can’t remember if it was inbound or outbound. She said that her dad screened and recorded every call made in the house and he would listen to them. It sounded like she was a prisoner in her own home. She had to go and asked if I’d be there when she called back. I had to tell her my “shift” was ending and I wouldn’t be speaking to her again.  [info] Satan's Victory [info] 1542835254
bewareoftheaussie [info] I was officially diagnosed just a month ago, and I felt the same way you did. It made all of the health problems I've ever had since early childhood make complete sense. Like you also, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and for years my doctors just said it was stress causing all these health issues. I hope, like me, you can find some answers and coping methods in this diagnosis.  [info] None [info] 1453871834
shlorpwastaken [info] Thanks for the reply! I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder but the therapist I was seeing was a bad first experience unfortunately so I haven't tried getting help again. I am highly considering it now that it's becoming such a huge roadblock for me no pun intended. [info] None [info] 1565272678
crciv [info] I have smoked weed longer than I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Since my diagnosis I began formal medications but continued to smoke. I  have to quit for work and the thought of quitting after so long is making me so anxious that I wish I hadn't let the habit develop so much. [info] None [info] 1392343293
JollyGreenDragon [info] Thanks. I'm diagnosed with anxiety already, and have only recently been diagnosed with ADHD as an adult, which creates a lot of problems when untreated for a long time (and is apparently a disorder related to Aspergers!) [info] None [info] 1475583296
Certainlyunsure22 [info] Yeah I’m starting to think I also have ocd although I haven’t been professionally diagnosed. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and for the longest time I’ve just thought my episodes were just anxiety episodes. I guess we will have to wait and see until my next therapist appt. stay tuned  [info] None [info] 1550356559
joanne31love [info] So a little bit of background: I grew up without too many friends, which really didn't bother me as a child because I didn't know any better. As I grew up and began understanding that I was socially isolated, I became lonely. I really began to make better friends when I was in high school and understood how great it was to have company. However, I occasionally experience these "manic" episodes around people (for a lack of a better term, sorry if this isn't correct.) I become extremely uncomfortably hyper, especially around new people. It becomes uncomfortable both to me and the people around me, and I am unable to stop. It is almost as if this other persona is taking over who is completely over-the-top when it comes to energy and speech. I tend to become crazy, and I come home feeling embarrassed. I tell myself before every interaction not to become hyperactive, but I can't stop myself. At work and around my family, I can keep a calm demeanor. Around new people it becomes unbelievably difficult to control. As a side note, I am diagnosed with anxiety if that makes any difference. Thank you to anyone who may have experience or answers to this. I can't seem to find people who know what this feels like. [info] None [info] 1513397228
shika_Peekis [info] I Broke Up With My Girlfriend To Figure Myself Out, Now I would Really Like To Be With Her But She Says She Has Moved On. Before I start I would like to say that we live together and she was the one who wanted to renew the lease before I broke up with her. She still wanted to renew it even after I talked to her about breaking up. So to start last fall I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and didn't think much of it. I figured I was just really stressed out at the time and it would pass. Over the coming months I progressively got more and more agitated with just about everything including her. I was really out of hand. then one day I said some really hurtful things and realized how toxic I was acting. I needed to get a hold of myself. I broke up with her in the spring so I could focus more on myself. We didn't talk to much over the summer. She went back home and I wanted to dedicate the summer to helping improve myself and understand how to deal with my anxiety. I feel like I really did improve and I do have a better idea of what I'm dealing with. Once the summer ended she came back to the apartment and everything was alright until I would bring up the relationship. She said she moved on and we're not getting back together. She hasn't really been able to see how much I've changed and actually did improve (Before I say something hurtful and then say, I won't do it again and I'll fix it. Then a week later I would just go back to being what I was). I can tell there's still something there but she's worried to open back up to me because of the past. She's still willing to hangout and spend time with me. But I keep messing things up because I keep bring up the relationship and getting back together when things start to look a little promising.I would really like some advice on how I should handle this. What should I do to show her things are better? What should I do to truly move on if my situation doesn't change? Thank you for giving me a platform to talk on. [info] None [info] 1568351599
DinosaurEggsBenny [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as a teenager but after I was in my early 20's I luckily lived almost anxiety free without medications until my accident when I was 26. I'm 31 now and have issues with PTSD, but don't live in daily anxiety. This lyrica withdrawl feels like a whole new animal I'm not used to. Maybe you're right that my previous anxiety issues contribute to what I'm feeling now. I have a tens unit and some lidocaine patches for the muscle pain for now. I haven't tried taking magnesium but my doctor is testing to see if my body is low actually. I also haven't tried using oils or scents but that's a good idea. I'm currently doing some adaptive yoga in physical therapy as well as pool therapy which helps, although I was too anxious at my last appointment and had to leave unfortunately. Thank you for your advice and sharing your experience. [info] None [info] 1515767600
HappyLlamaSadLlamaa [info] I’m not OP, but I do this with my eyebrows only. My mom has a habit of running her hands through her hair obsessively. I am diagnosed with anxiety and I know she would be too if she saw a doctor for it. I’m guessing that’s why the family does it, they all use this as a nervous habit.  [info] None [info] 1553977846
imsosleepyyy [info] doctors can't find anything wrong, I feel like I am going crazy I'm 23. I never feel well and I'm exhausted to the point of tears everyday. Even when I sleep for 12 hours, I am exhausted. I can't stay up for more than a few hours at a time. I feel lightheaded and my vision is white and grainy. I feel like I'm going to pass out often. I have 4 soybean sized lumps in my neck and groin. I get bald patches on my head and lose tons of hair.I don't drive because I don't think it's safe for me. I don't see friends and I can barely keep a job. My friends and family can see that I am not well, but so far no doctors have found anything wrong with me. Since I was diagnosed with anxiety as a teen, a lot of doctors brush off my symptoms. Other doctors pass me off to specialists who then pass me off to other specialists.I've seen a neurologist, sleep specialist, endocrinologist, my pcp, even a naturopath. This has been ongoing for years. My naturopath told me I tested positive for Lyme, and I'm supposed to see a Lyme specialist next week. I like my naturopath but I don't know if I trust naturopathy. I have read about Lyme and the controversy, and I'm doubting everything. I don't even know if I should see the specialist or if it's BS. I feel like I'm going insane. I cried in front of my boss today out of pure exhaustion even though I slept last night. I'm scared and frustrated and I can't keep living my life like this. I am starting to feel suicidal because my life is so shit and I feel like a crazy person. Nothing feels worse than having a doctor tell you that they can't help you. I've been dealing with this since middle school btw. [info] None [info] 1522971058
MonsterMash1987 [info] My head is always full of thoughts and im constantly overthinking stuff. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, my issue with it is talking to people in real life. People tell me everyone has nerves when talking to people but they dont panic like I do.. it sucks to think i will always struggle to make friends and get to know anyone. Dont apogise for the wall of text, its good you were able to talk about it. Its such a difficult topic to talk about because everyones anxiety is their own personal demon. I dont judge you for feeling the way you do. I actually think you should be proud of yourself for getting through the days feeling like that. It must be tough. [info]  [info] 1556491919
yumkittentits [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I try to make sure I get enough sleep, and don't go forever without eating. Those two things have helped me a lot. The rest of it for me is a mental game, and talking myself down from my anxiety.  [info] Ø [info] 1384055295
babisaurusREX [info] Yes anxiety can definitely mask symptoms. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 14, but not until 19 was I diagnosed with ADHD. I started to realize I was anxious BECAUSE I was forgetting things,  running late, procrastinating, unfocused and then trying to catch up in school after I zoned out for entire lectures. I also was a straight A student through high school because I had what I now know to be hyper focus (and a little OCD which I'm happy to say is 99% under control now) on my schoolwork. But that started to change junior year of college and I started barely passing in my major. it is always best to seek the guidance of a specialist, but keep in mind many people don't believe ADHD is real. They think it's that we live in a distracting time or that you want to get amphetamines or whatever. But if it is affecting your life in such a negative way that you can't enjoy most things or your work or school or hobbies or relationships are suffering, you need to do what's best for you! [info] None [info] 1439609708
txmsh3r [info] You know I was actually thinking of this a few days ago. I must have been about four, but one day I was riding on the bus with my mom, I turned to her and said, "Mom the bus is going to fall!" She would tell me that it wasn't possible and that I was just being silly. Now, i'm in my early 20s and I'm realizing this moment was probably one of the first anxious moments I ever had as a being. I was diagnosed with anxiety this year and prescribed anxiety medication, for the first time, last month.  [info] None [info] 1447047175
BigG80 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and used to suffer from the same situation - I used to dread bed time because the though intrusion was unbearable. I now take a low-dose SSRI and I have no issues sleeping as my mind is 'quiet' at night now. [info] None [info] 1498923281
Confusdthrowaway [info] Do I (F/28) owe my ex (M/30) an explanation? Sorry for the long post! After months of thinking I am finally posting this here. Throwaway and vauge for obvious reasons. I am f/28 and he is 30/m; we are both of Indian origin. I have been settled in the States since a very early age and he has been brought up in India. I was with my ex for 2.5 years (almost a year long distance and then 8 months spent in the same country, however not living together due to strict laws of the company about living together before marriage). It was an awesome relationship; we were best friends!!! We would Skype daily for atleast 5-6 hours. There were rarely any arguments (if there were they were resolved before the end of the day) after a year of being long distance I was able to secure a job in his country of employment (Dubai) and I moved there and life was just great. He would come visit me on my days off, take care of me when I got sick and we would cook, clean and just talk about life, take walks etc. As I mentioned everything was great. However, I got extremely sick and came back home after just being there for 8 months. From then, everything started to go downhill. He was being pressured by his family to get married due to his age. Whereas my parents are more understanding of getting an education and a having a career. Since my return home, any time I would call him while he was visiting home (India), his mom would always ask me when we are planning to get married etc. It got to the point where I would avoid calling him if his mom was around. Then after he returned back to Dubai he started asking me the same thing over and over as well. And I explained to him that right now my priority is to find a job to support myself. And he dropped the questioning for a couple of months. I bounced around a couple of jobs before I found one in field at a company I have always dreamed about joining and was extremely happy. After almost a year of searching I was finally able to get back into what I enjoy doing. The day I signed my offer letter in January, the questions started again. When can we get married? When can you get days off? Tell them you need a month off and work it into your contract. Again, I very kindly explained that this is a new job and I don't want to start asking for days off before I even start the job or finish my probationary period. During the month of January, he also quit his job in Dubai due to some internal conflicts, packed up and went back home. From this point my hell started. Every single day the questions started. And it got to the point that I would find excuses to not speak with him as it begining to effect my performance at work. Or if I did it would be via whatsapp only just so I wouldn't have to speak with his mom. And anytime he would message me, I would avoid looking at the message for hours. This went on for about 1.5 months and he finally landed another job in Dubai. When he got back to Dubai, it was no Skype just again WhatsApp for 10-15 mins and we would leave it at that. Again, anytime he would message I would get anxious and avoid it for a couple of hours. Then in February my dads younger brother and older brother passed away within a couple of days of each other. I was heart broken. I was especially close to the older brother - he was like a 2nd dad to me(We didnt have much growing up so when my parents were working he would take me and my brother out so my parents could go to work/rest on their days off.) And to make things worse, I had to break the news to my parents. Come the day of the funeral I was a complete mess. To point where my brother had to carry me outside. As I was on the verge of  having a panic attack. During this whole ordeal my ex did message me to ask me if I was ok if my parents were ok. Then a few days later (even before the funeral took place) he messaged me to say his parents were asking him about marriage and what our plan was...what or how was I supposed to feel? Here I was, strangers making sure I was ok. My work colleagues making sure I was ok, making sure I was eating and regularly checking up on me. Making themselves available if I needed to talk. Yet, the one person who should be there for me was adding more misery to my life. After this point I emotionally checked out of the relationship. I feel like something changed in me. I was diagnosed with anxiety a couple of weeks later and it turns out I've been having panic attacks over the course of this entire saga. And I continued to avoid/ignore him hoping it would all just go away. Which I know was wrong on my part but I was grieving and I still am. I am still dealing with the anxiety as well.  We ended up breaking up in June. I told him I wasn't ready for marriage as after this ordeal I feel there is more to life than just getting married and having kids. I guess he wasn't expecting it or he really was clueless but he accused me of taking him for a ride and dumping him coz he is a loser etc. He then told me not to whore around and cut the phone on me. I felt relieved that it was finally over. I didn't bother arguing with him as I was done. I started my healing process and guess who messages me a couple of weeks later...yup! He messages to say its still not too late we can get married. And I told him its not what I want at this point in my life. And clearly we are not thinking in the same direction right now so it would be better to not attempt to get back together because it would be the same thing all over again. And he hasn't messaged since then. However, my question is do I owe him an explanation? Do I tell him where it all went downhill? Do I tell him what made me snap finally? I was doing fine up until he called to beg me as I feel like I have done something horribly wrong. I don't love the guy anymore this much I know. But do I owe him an explanation or hope that time will heal the both of us? I am only asking this as now my moms older brother is on his death bed and all the feelings of hopelessness etc and are coming back to me. I know im mixing and confusing everything in my head. But I just need advice on how to proceed for my own sanity. Thank you for taking the time to read this. TLDR - broke up with ex for being insensitive during the loss of a loved one; emotionally checked out, broke up a couple of months later only to be contacted and begged to come back. Do I owe him an explanation? [info] None [info] 1502212271
taylornicole95321 [info] New job anxiety. How do I cope before I ruin things before they start? I would like to vent and get some support or have some people share similar experiences. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I do not take anything for it, so sometimes it can get bad. I currently work at a doctors office doing everything (literally. I work alone.) I take the patients in/out of rooms, do billing, answering the phones, running to do EKGs for people and doing the doctors errands.. All at once. Needless to say my job is causing me great anxiety from all of the pressure and no help (normal doctors offices have at least two people working- one at front desk and one person taking people in the rooms). I am finishing my degree in human development so it's time to get a new job, especially since my office is open part time only and I have bills to pay. I have been here four years.I have two interviews (Friday and Tuesday) and I am worried about it. I am worried about starting over and being the odd one out. I always feel so dumb when I start a new job, like my brain completely resets and forgets everything. I am so worried and I didn't even interview yet. I never worked with people (all my jobs I worked by myself) so working as a team scares me as well because I don't know what its like to work with people, and I am scared the people I work with won't like me. Anyone have any tips or stories they can share to ease my mind? I feel so alone,  everyone else I know are so fearless and think I'm crazy. [info] None [info] 1574306238
Kennyv777 [info] I was once diagnosed with ADHD. Nobody seems to now. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and that sadly stuck. So possibly. [info] None [info] 1569094845
kmw920 [info] There are several causes, including my family. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder in last May. Looking back I actually had a panic attack (couldn't breathe well) on the plane in June in 2017. I think these two years or so have intensified my anxiety. When more and more physical discomfort got accumulated in my body, I couldn't bear it anymore. Last May one night I had breathing difficulty (this problem emerged significantly in last April). I couldn't stand up. My limbs got so numb and cold and purple. Heart rate was fast. My family called the emergency line and I was sent to a hospital. I get worried and nervous easily since I was a kid. Also since primary school, I've been underweight. My BMI now is around 14.6.  [info] None [info] 1549642306
tiny_venus [info] Do you perhaps have anxiety? I used to get freaked out in the same way and then I’d get more freaked out wondering if it was normal. I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year and a half ago and talked this over with my counsellor who said it was a totally normal trait of anxiety. I’d just suggest to try not to get too wrapped up into it- you don’t want to start feeling paranoid and wrapped up thinking ‘oh he acted like this maybe he’s going to break up with me!’ Because that might strain the relationship. Things sound pretty good between you, so just ride it out and enjoy life with him. [info] None [info] 1524436136
capaldithenewblack [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and mild OCD that doesn’t feel mild when my fingers are bleeding around the nails. This stuff doesn’t always look like the textbook. A compulsion doesn’t have to mean a full blown Rain man freak out if it goes unsatisfied.  [info] None [info] 1529623588
AntiChr1st [info] That being said having something to do can be helpful.I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 17, the more i work the less I feel it. Back when I was full time army and working 12 to 17 hour days it was basically gone. [info] I couldn't think of anything funny to have here [info] 1563353707
NateGrey [info] &gt;  I have been diagnosed with anxietyAlways love this gem.  [info] None [info] 1501701424
Miiaevia [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety and I can say that CBDs help with that immensely. I can't even describe how much. I hate Xanax and almost never want to take it, so having a safer alternative when I need to calm down is huge. While I'm not diagnosed as autistic, I have immediate family members on the spectrum, so i learned a lot of my socialization skills (or lack thereof) from people with autism. Not sure if/how that plays into my anxiety but I can definitely relate to having strong emotions, the way you described. It's definitely a struggle. Don't be hard on yourself when other people judge you, be proud of yourself for navigating through this everyday and taking care of yourself. It's not easy. [info] None [info] 1535808809
muoniar [info] Yeah, I've lived with multiple illnesses such as eczema, asthma and whatnot. Whenever it'd get worse, my mom would read Ruqya on water and make me either drink it or bathe in it. It was absolutely tiring. Sometimes, she'd even assume that my faith wasn't strong enough and God was doing this to me to bring me back to him. When I was diagnosed with anxiety, she'd say it was the shaytaan giving me negative thoughts and I had to pray more. She'd literally even ask a Sheikh to read some next shit on me, assuming that it had a better chance of treating me than medicine does.. true ridiculousness  [info] New User [info] 1527405581
gretta25 [info] Yay (Questions) I've tried adderall a few times, thoroughly enjoy it (I am too euphoric to work), and am considering getting some coke off the DNM.I am diagnosed with anxiety, and I always worry about my health (often my heart) even though my GP has told me I have a "one in a million" chance to get a heart attack.Basically, what I'm asking is this: does cocaine REALLY put you close to a heart attack level of a heartbeat or is it "not as bad as it seems"? [info] None [info] 1494606656
kindnesscary [info] Obsessive thoughts are very common in anxiety disorders, and although they are also a symptom of OCD, it’s just a symptom and can be found in other disorders. Going to a psychologist will do you wonders :) I was diagnosed with anxiety and have a lot of symptoms of OCD because they can overlap sometimes. Anxiety makes us a little obsessive every now and then, and maybe repeating words is a way your brain found to cope with something or to be rewarded after a conversation. [info] None [info] 1550745918
boredwoman [info] Today I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. 5 minutes after I got out of the doctor, I discovered that I accidentally shared a man I'm currently crushing ons spotify playlist. I don't even follow him. Great day. [info] None [info] 1527267464
Z00LOFT [info] Need psychiatry help please! Age 22Sex MHeight 5^11Weight 147Race Caucasian Duration of complaint: See bodyLocation (Geographic and on body) AmericaAny existing relevant medical issues (if any) Anxiety, DepressionCurrent medications (if any) Zoloft 100mgTo start off I am a 22 year old male and I was diagnosed with anxiety a couple months ago (which I had my whole life) and I had panic attacks and a lot of worrying. I also started becoming depressed which previously I wasn't.Also, multiple times a week I wake up in the middle of the night and see spiders, people, or scary stuff in my room and have bad hallucinations. I don't smoke, don't drink and I am 22 years old. I also realize I have restless leg syndrome. My mother and her mom also have this, but mine happens more often then themDuring the day I am pretty fatigued and my concentration isn't the best but I get good grades. I frequently screw things up and forget things and have a hard time remembering directions. During my internship at the Chicago Board of Trade, I frequently messed up on minor details even though I would double check and would often forget instructions. Also in organic chemistry lab 2 years ago I had to drop because I was the worse student in lab and could never accomplish an experiment as I couldn't follow the directiosn properly and would accidently forget thingsI am very lethargic during the day and started skipping class and would really want help so I can keep up my good grades as I am scared now... [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1449091913
faruins [info] Should I quit due to my anxiety worsening? I’m really at a loss here. I’ve been working casual hours (even though I’m technically hired as a part time RN) on an orthopaedic surgical floor for the last six months. During this time, I was diagnosed with anxiety and essentially just feel it getting worse and worse. My doctor has even said I appear to be worse and has since upped my medication and I’ve been coming back to check in with her every two weeks. A part of me knows that bedside nursing isn’t for me but because I’m a recent new grad, I know without gaining hospital bedside skills I won’t be able to apply to jobs outside of the hospital. Hence feeling so conflicted. I mean maybe bedside nursing could work for me but I’ve yet to find the right fit. The staff are nice and supportive on this floor, but I can’t see myself working there long term.I had a talk with my family and boyfriend and they’ve even suggested I quit my job now and just look for other positions. It kind of surprised me because they’ve been encouraging me to stick it out and to keep trying but I guess at this point, even to them I don’t seem to be improving and with the few shifts I work, I may be better off finding another job? I constantly feel ill and have GI issues, I don’t sleep through the night well and wake up a lot, I wake up with my heart racing, and the list goes on. It’s just affecting my daily living and I feel like a phoney. I keep being told how I feel is normal for a new nurse but I don’t know how much longer I can continue feeling like this. Because I work so few and far between, I’m a recognizable face on my floor but I don’t really know anyone and they don’t know me. I haven’t even met the new floor manager either so I feel like I can’t bring myself to let them know how I’ve been feeling. My sister who works in healthcare has said to not bother due her own personal experiences which have been negative. Any nurses with anxiety or anyone in general, if you can just give me advice. [info] None [info] 1557927018
Catrain1 [info] Is the stress worth it? I have been married for almost 4 years, have a 3 yo, a 1 1/2 yo, and a 3rd baby due in July. For the past year I have had times where I absolutely adore my wife and times where I want nothing to do with her. I was diagnosed with anxiety and high levels of stress about 2 years into our marriage. Recently, we made the decision to move states so I drove across the country alone to start a new job and work on getting everything ready so after a couple of months, her and the kids cam come down to a ready to go house. After being alone the past few week, my stress is virtually gone, I'm able to sleep through the night without waking up from nightmares or constant worry, and my anxiety is basically non existent. To say the least, my wife and I are complete opposites. We have very little in common and, I feel like we got married way to young and way too fast. Any time I try to talk to her about issues, she makes me feel like the bad guy. Shes made claims that if I ever left, she would off herself. She's mentally unstable even without the thought of me leaving. I am not happy.  I haven't been for a while. And I know if we split, she would stay where shes at and I would stay here. Do I swallow my hardships and stay with her for the kids' sake? Or do I tell her I  think we should split up? talking hasn't fixed anything for me and I'll feel terrible if I just let this drag on and on. My family would support me and just wants me to be happy, and her family already hates me. What should I do? [info] None [info] 1551947717
raccooncityangel [info] I think neurosis is more of one specific thing or grouping of things. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so that makes me a bit weird, and i see and experience the world differently than most people i know.  [info] None [info] 1353049406
Hey_Im_Probably_Okay [info] Did this, I was diagnosed with anxiety last spring. [info] None [info] 1547049822
monads [info] How to get medical marijuana license in CO? Hey ents - I'm making the move to Colorado this September, and I was planning on getting my medical license. I currently work third shift (and will out there) and I have been diagnosed with anxiety, heart palpitations from caffeine, etc. - it really DOES help to smoke before I sleep during the hot bright day and helps me relax of course.Think that's enough of a reason? Or do I need to plan for this better..? [info] None [info] 1309180456
thechikinguy [info] Any solution for severe grinding/clenching beyond mouth guards? I've been aware of my teeth grinding/clenching for about six years now, and have been wearing a mouth guard at night off and on, consistently in the last year as I've noticed my gums are receding. I find myself clenching during the day, and though I try to catch myself, it happens often and subconsciously. Despite using a mouth guard, my gums have still been receding. At this point my teeth feel more sensitive and I'm worried I'm getting near the root/nerve. After tearing up a boil-at-home mouthguard with a six-month warranty in less than three weeks, I decided to make a doctor's appointment.I'm pretty wary of consulting a doctor on this; I mentioned this problem during my last physical, and the doctor only suggested tensing up all my face muscles regularly to relax them. My dentist offered to custom-fit a mouth guard, but it would cost more than $1,000, and I simply do not have that money. Now I have no dental plan, so I had to go to my family doctor.Already from the get-go, I got a bad vibe off the doctor. The nurse weighed me and asked about the problem and suggested a mouth guard. I told her I chewed the last one up, and explained how I've cut down on caffeine, changed pillows, tried to get more sleep, exercise more to try and reduce stress, do yoga weekly, everything. She just said "it looks like you're doing everything right!" laughed, and left.So then the doctor comes in with his laptop, barely looks in my mouth, and tells me I should get a mouth guard."You can get one at a sporting goods store," which seemed very suspect, as I imagine there's a difference between a mouth guard for grinding and a mouth guard for field hockey. When I told him I've been using mouth guards consistently, they're not working my gums are still receding, and I don't want to buy a new one every month for the rest of forever, he just said he'd call a dentist friend and call me the next day.He also asked if I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I haven't, but I'm a very anxious person. I fret about everything. But he just asked if my job was stressful, and I said no, and he dropped the subject.I've heard muscle relaxers are an option, and brought that up, but he gave me a very dubious look. I felt like a chump.So he's supposed to call me today and tell me what brand of mouth guard to buy as though that will solve this. Is there anything I should do? Should I be following this anxiety thing further? I'm super cautious with my insurance and don't know what I'm covered for; once I got charged $100 on top of a copay because I had to take my shirt off for the doctor to look at my bacne. [info] None [info] 1394659504
Lordkeravrium [info] I never said it does. And if you look down upon me that much why do you feel you need to go and be an ass? Also, you didn't read the comments of that post either. I was diagnosed with anxiety at age 8 and I've had it my whole life. I'm not attempting to say I'm entitled. You just don't need to go and be hella rude about me making a tiny ass mistake. It doesn't affect you in any way.  [info] None [info] 1546039406
beepbopboop810 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety long before hypothyroidism was even on the table. I often wonder the same question you are posing.... is one affecting/causing the other? Following. [info] None [info] 1572232577
k12314 [info] Oh yeah, I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and antisocial personality disorder. Mental illness is a definite factor for me. [info] None [info] 1402685684
Amiaweirdo17 [info] Is it possible for someone to sexually [abuse] a child and not even know it? *I have been diagnosed with anxiety, I got toTherapy, and I am being medically treated*From what I can remember my mom has always been a hypochondriac. She almost died at age 20 with a lung disease. So since then she's had terrible anxiety. I was born with a big birth mark on my butt. I have more recently been feeling like I was sexually abused as a child, since I am uncomfortable in some situations. I have no recollection of being abused but do remember being younger, and this one time my mom wanted to check my birth mark to make sure it wasn't growing. I remember feeling extremely uncomfortable because I didn't want her to look at my butt and remembered thinking "well she just wants to look at my butt and not my actual birth mark." I was probably about 10. I remember laying on the floor in a bathing suit, and her just looking at my birth mark quickly. Then that was it. Other than that my mom has never crossed a boundary with me. An example of how I feel uncomfortable: my mom had to measure my waste a few weeks ago for a dress and she wouldn't let me do it myself. So I had to lift up my shirt for her to measure my waist. I felt extremely uncomfortable and thought "she must just want to look at my stomach because she thinks I'm hot." Then an hour later I was thinking how that was crazy and she's my mom and has never crossed a boundary with me. I never feel weird around her, and me and her have an awesome relationship where were like best friends. I tell her everything. I don't know if this is just my anxiety or if I actually was sexually abused or if the whole birth mark situation just left me uncomfortable with things [info] None [info] 1456774486
DrunkenMechanic [info] getting PA medical card Looking to get the medical card in Pennsylvania but have some questions. I guess the first one would be will they even give it to me? I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2015 and was prescribed medications for about a year then I couldn't afford the doctor anymore. I also really didn't like the medications I was on as I had many side effects. So I haven't been to a doctor for that in a while so I don't know if that would count. I also over the past year or so have had pretty bad back pain that comes and goes. I threw out my back pretty bad last year I went to an urgicare for it but they just sent me home with something like ibuprofin. My boss paid for me to go see a chiropractor a few times which got me back to being able to function again but my back still hurts often and has not been right since then. Would either of these be good enough to get my card?  Also I see you can apply online, someone on here recommended [quickmedcards.com](https://quickmedcards.com) but can you really get it through there? i see the card cost is $50 but how much does it cost through them I don't see that anywhere? I'm open to other websites too I just saw someone on this sub recommended it. [info] None [info] 1586631878
wuverul [info] Welbutrin for 5-6 months, Buspar for 1 month, feeling kind of messed up, not sure what to do.. So.. Idk what's going on at this point. Things just don't feel right. I hate just hopping into forums just to ask questions without really being able to do much in return, but.. I wanted to ask someone about this before I call the doctor tomorrow. TLDR of what's been going on. I was diagnosed with anxiety in late '14. Went without medically treating it up until Jan 2016 when I was sick of constant pains, especially chest pains. Doc prescribed me prozac, was suicidal within weeks, so I was pulled off of that. I was then put on Welbrutrin. Felt like I was in a better mood overall but always tense and easily startled/worked up still.. So he added Buspar. I've been on it for a month. First few days I didn't feel too different, but then my chest felt kind of.. odd when I was going to bed. Freaked me out, and the feeling lessened when I was freaked out. 2-3 days later I kinda felt various muscles when that happened and everything else was actually not tense for once so I figured the feeling was me being unused to muscles being relaxed. This went away a couple of weeks in... until 4-5 days ago when it came back. I was confused, and intended to call the doc but then got caught up in stuff and got way too busy. I intended to call tomorrow, and still do, but today has been an adventure. I woke up and went to the restroom.. and almost fell sideways off the toilet. I had JUST woken up (and I stopped feeling like I should just lay in bed for an extra hour or two after waking up) and felt that the fact that I'm out of bed sooner contributed to it because I wasn't awake enough to have good balance. 4-5 hours later I went to the restroom again. Felt kind of lightheaded while looking down. Was confused about it and started getting worried... Feeling went away though. Not long ago, though, I was just making myself some dinner and kneeled down to grab a lid to the pan I was using and almost toppled over when I started looking down into the place we store 'em. It's starting to scare the living hell out of me. I just started a refill of the Buspar last night, but the pills are identical. I have no idea what to think, what to do, etc, and now that I'm getting worked up about it I can't stay still, I'm tense, my throat feels tight-ish, and scared to death that it's my heart although my pulse seems completely steady, albeit at a high bpm because of stress.While I've been feeling mildly anxious still, there ARE reasons for me to feel anxious for once right now... A math professor has practically vanished on me and her grades for my course are now 3 days overdue, plus my boyfriend is coming over in a few days to stay for a week, only our second time actually being together in person in a 4 year long distance relationship. Plus finances are a wreck and always are. Even so, that shouldn't make me light headed and mess up my balance I'd imagine.. [info] None [info] 1466988349
Snitchwithabitch [info] Anxiety or something else? I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder for about 3 years now. Recently i am feeling disconnected with surroundings like memory loss or something like that i don't know who am i and what i am doin on this planet what's the objective, it sounds like a existential crisis but i think it's different it used to drive me to a panic attack but now this feeling has become more prevalent. I don't know what this is, is this psychosis? [info] None [info] 1569609612
chriswha [info] I‘m abroad and can‘t deal with it. Hi r/helpme, so my problem isn‘t as big as many here but I don‘t know what to do.So I just moved to Barcelona for two semester abroad and I was really excited for it. However now I‘m here and I hate everything about it. I‘m scared to go outside alone. I was diagnosed with anxiety and after about a year of therapy everything seemed Fine and I haven‘t been in therapy for 6 months. As soon as I landed in Barcelona it kicked in again.My best Friend came today to visit me and I thozght it would help since I won’t feel alone but thats not the case. I like being alone usually. Today I even thought if there was an accident I could go home without looking like a pussy.Has anyone felt like this before?Thank you ❤️ [info] None [info] 1567550900
throwawayaountcc [info] Need help towards my journey for a diagnosis For sometime now, I have been questioning whether I had BPD. My counsellor rejects it, but an old psychiatrist thought it would be interesting to look into. But I'm am too young or rather haven't gone into it for too long to come to a conclusion. I was wondering what I should do to help myself until I can finally find a solution. My mum is ignorant and doesn't belive or 'tolerate' my attitude, even though I have been diagnosed with anxiety. My emotions have made me hate my family so much that I am planning to run away and want nothing to do with any of them, even the children. My anger gets to the point where I want to fight people or even kill at times but I keep it to myself. Drinking is the only thing that helps and I still study so I don't want to drink too much. I also just want to do this alone without my family's involvement. Just need help on what to do. [info] None [info] 1565909223
ferdous12345 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety by my general physician, but I was 14/15 and it was mostly about my stress level and my constant worrying. He said that I should look into non-medicinal relievers, like showering. Needless to say, it hasn't helped in the long run. I kinda just want to try medications. I know it sounds bad, because medication isn't magic or whatever, but I'd like to at least try to feel normal. Deep breathing doesn't always work. I can't leave class and take a shower. I can't stop in the middle of the road to meditate. I just want a chance to feel like a functional human who doesn't need to go through a list of techniques to alleviate 1/5 of my anxiety. But maybe it's selfish of me, and I know medication isn't a walk in the park. I know it can take months to find the right dosage. I know the side effects could be worse than the symptoms. But I want to say I tried, you know? [info] None [info] 1503630082
sleepyeyes_24_7 [info] That is one of the first questions I was asked when I was diagnosed with anxiety.  "If three people were walking down the street toward you, and they were laughing, would you think they were laughing at you?" [info] None [info] 1405540800
lotsofdmg [info] Beta Blockers and Epinephrine Tolerance Break Hello r/drugs how are you guys doing at the moment? I haven't slept in two days, but my lexicon remains partially intact. I am intensely sleep deprived, and I could sprint a fucking marathon anytime of the day. My brain is working in over time and I can't stop. I have taken numerous sedatives to no success. Gabapentin, mirtazapine, cannabis, hydroxyzine, and CBD. Usually this combo would knock me tf out, and kept me sleeping through the next day but this is bad. Nothing is working and Im only getting more stimulated and my heart can't take it. While my current situation appears to be dire, I am guilty of enjoying this euphoria... I feel alive for the first time in years. **Backstory:** So you are wondering how I got into this situation in the first place right? Back in highschool, I was diagnosed with anxiety. My GP prescribed me propranolol, which is a non-cardioselective sympatholytic beta blocker. This means it blocks both β1- and β2-adrenergic receptors. (Epinephrine and noradrenaline) This seemed to help to relax my veins and my ~~impulsive thoughts~~ anxiety. I have taken it everyday for a few years (60mg ER). Back to present day. I ran out of my propranolol, and didn't bother to pick up more because,**I felt it... I felt.. Alive.**HOLY SHIT this feels too good. I imagine this is what meth would be like, after trying addy. I'm sure everybody knows exactly what I'm talking about. I never relized how amazing Epineprine was. Your body becomes so acclimated to your brains natural level of adrenergic receptors that you are tolerant to it. ☆ So this is my purpose of dictating my pool of turbulent frustration ! ☆If you can build a tolerance to adrenaline, previous activities will prove less stimulating eventually. So then, if I was to reduce my tolerance to adrenergic neurotransmitters would I have an elevated enjoyment of activites due to more stimulation and euphoria? To try out my theory, I loaded up a game of League of Legends and blasted some Travis Scott. AND HOLY SHIT, I FEEL LIKE A FUCKING GOD. I have never felt my heart beat this fast or felt so engaged in the moment. Best way to describe it is a constant runners high on dexamph or good ass expresso and without the fatigue.When I focus on my body while laying in bed, I can control the rate at which im stimulated. It feels like all my body becomes cold and vibrating except for my gut and I just feel comfy but like I could still fuck your bitch and steal a fridge on a bike on some crackhead shit.If yall have anything you want to add down below, by all means. With this strat you could make a skydivers heart skip a beat while hes resting in bed. Edit: Sorry for ranting this was such an interesting topic and I was gonna talk about the chemistry of it but got caught up in the moment and fucked it up. *Bonus Question:* Is my tolerance psycological or physical? [info] None [info] 1534321244
frankg677 [info] I can get 8 walking miles in at work with pulling, pushing and lifting shit. I was diagnosed with anxiety and haven't taken my meds in months. Do you take anything for it? That shit has me worried a bit [info] None [info] 1553129535
keylimeallatime [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, OCD, and tourette's. My heart attack, admittedly, was diagnosed a few days after. I did not have a medical professional monitor my detox, so that is just my interpretation honestly. I had fever-like symptoms. [info] None [info] 1398995140
JinxedAndFading [info] I think I understand a bit where you're coming from, I've been diagnosed with anxiety as well, and although praying and listening to Heavenly Father's and our Savior's words do not make this worry go away, it can definately help relax you and realize that there is always someone on your side :) [info] None [info] 1551303259
Whelpers__ [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety, But it was just social anxiety. I’ll tell someone this, thank you. [info] None [info] 1563149096
megatron412 [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety and I went to cardiologist for the same thing... everything keeps coming back fine. It’s great that we don’t have a physical problem, now it’s how the fuck do we get out of our own heads? [info] None [info] 1565370420
WINTER_1S_COMING [info] This is nuts....ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, I've found myself in constant need of mints as well, tic tacs specifically (white ones :P) [info] None [info] 1396249237
newaccount0707 [info] I'm a couple years older than your daughter, and she sounds a lot like me  (except I was never "strong" enough to move out of my hometown and attend a 4+ year college). I was diagnosed with anxiety as an preteen, and I struggle with my emotions, especially if it involves other people (relationships, communicating, etc). For lack of better words, I'm a huge cry baby. While therapy can help drastically with coping skills and managing these feelings, this is most likely always going to be a part of your daughters personality (to a certain degree- as she continues to mature this issue may lessen, at least that's what I was told by a therapist) . I've gotten good at "saving" my emotions, so to speak, when they happen to arise in a situation where it would be inappropriate to cry, but  when I'm home, I'll usually call my mom to cry it out and talk about what happened. It means more than I can put into words that I'm able to have my mom as a comfort person when I feel vulnerable.You should obviously continue to be a support person for your daughter, but if I were you I'd encourage her to seek therapy. If you're able to, I'd also meet with a therapist yourself to discuss what you can potential do/say to your daughter to help her better manage her emotions. [info] None [info] 1490559251
virginiajeannemarie [info] Issues with skin picking? (Kinda gross sorry but I really need help) I've been diagnosed with anxiety for a while and I get panic attacks that I'm used to. I've just started to realize how bad my skin picking is. It never occurred to me it was a symptom of anxiety till my boyfriend pointed it out. Luckily I am blessed with very good skin so acne isn't a big problem because I rarely get zits. My biggest issues are with biting the skin on my lips, scratching at the skin in my nose, biting my cuticles and the worst (right now ) is my big toenails. I always rip off my toenails and it always fucks up just my two big toes, they turn into ingrown toenails because I ripped off too much. Then I try to fix it by cutting the nail so it will grow straight. Then I end up cutting too much and fucking it up even worse. Then for some insane reason I try to use tweezers to fix it and of course it only makes it worse. Now I'm left with a throbbing big toe that I know is gonna get gross and infected because I can't stop fucking with it. I know I shouldn't touch it or mess with it but it feels impossible. I live alone in a dorm room so I don't have anyone to help stop me when I'm doing it and don't notice. I don't know what to do. It happens too often and it hurts to walk. If someone could please help that would be awesome [info] None [info] 1430977626
Business-Socks [info] In high school I was diagnosed with anxiety, boy got them freshman gitters! Within a few days I was being rushed into surgery for an appendectomy.Cleared it right up. [info] None [info] 1403526252
floppyweewee [info] I thought misophonia was a quirk until I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and ADHD. Obsessiveness and extreme reactions could be a symptom for some of you. [info] None [info] 1513266023
justwondering311 [info] My fiance [M/30] is avoidant when it comes to communicating. I'm [24/F].. Every time I try to give a chance at communicating, he shuts everything out and gets all random with me or he will just make it out to be like I "just want to argue" as if it's a hobby of mine. I believe that some arguments are necessary and there's nothing wrong with having them. It's not like I start yelling and get violent or anything crazy...He considers a calm, assertive discussion as "irrational arguing" and immediately goes into avoidance and victim mode and starts ignoring me. I don't know what to do with him anymore. I'm just trying to make some effort here, but he doesn't seem to look at it that way. :( He makes me out to feel like just some sadistic, argumentative person when I'm just trying to figure things out and work through them.A little background on us: He is diagnosed as severe ADHD. I am diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. I know, that doesn't help the situation at all, but it's our quirks that bring us together (after all, isn't that what brings us all together?). :P **TL;DR: My fiance shuts out when I try and talk to him about anything serious.** [info] None [info] 1409812193
kefern [info] &gt;I'm open to the idea that this is "just" anxiety. Never really been an anxious person though.Same here, but I was diagnosed with anxiety way before I have experienced these weird symptoms that made me even more worried as it could be some other underlying issue like you said which could potentially be something serious. Have you tried seeing a neurologist? I'm probably going to do that soon.Also, how are your ears? Apparently most issues with balance disorders are due to some infection or issue in the ear. However, I'm not a doctor but I don't see how an ear infection could have such a profound impact or relation on the heart. Secondly most ear infections presumably also cause actual vertigo, spinning or some sort of dizziness, which both of us do not have. It's truly puzzling. [info] None [info] 1522155411
ECFreed [info] Heart Palpitations...maybe? Hey guys! I just wanted to ask you guys a question. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 16 and I would normally feel pains in my chest that I was told was heart palpitations. Three years later and now I have anxiety again and this time I can't convince myself that the abnormal feeling in my chest is heart palpitations. It feels like a sudden sharp pain and then leaves instantly. Now the sharp pain isn't that bad it feels more like a pinch or something. However it is enough that I feel it and I freak out sometimes. I feel it most often in the left side of the chest and it normally feels like it happens around the nipple area. I have gone to the ER recently and they scanned my chest and gave me a blood test and everything came back negative. Every time I experience this feeling though it feels like the left side of the chest tenses up and eventually it will go away in less than 5 minutes. The good news is, is that I feel my anxiety coming down however I still seem to experience some symptoms such as this feeling in my chest. I also still experience some mild depersonalization  but it seems to have shorter episodes than before. Every day I feel like I am getting better and better but this chest pain is getting on my nerves. (also during the 3 years I didn't feel like I had anxiety my chest would still get these sharp pinches.) do you think you guys know exactly what it is? (also I don't think running to a doctor is a viable option mainly because money is an issue for me this is why I am relying on this for now.) [info] None [info] 1371866807
AnxietyThrowaway8 [info] Anxiety and mood swings? Hi /r/anxiety.I was diagnosed with anxiety in Summer (suffered from it for a whole year before - ever since I started my MSc studies abroad). I was prescribed something to help me sleep better at night. It was awful so instead of suppressing the issue, I worked on finding a solution to the cause and it has worked out perfectly. I sleep very very well, I have resumed my studies, I am getting good grades and accumulating credits, my apartment doesn't look like a zoo anymore and I go to University daily, even when I don't have courses (in order to prevent the dreaded 'I haven't gone out in two weeks' scenario). Before heading out to a professional, I would like to know more about how do you live mood swings. For me, I can be cheerful, relaxed and happy one minute and then, either out of nowhere or because of a trigger (or rather what I perceive as a trigger), everything flips. I am sad, I cry, I become cold to people (LDR BF, my mum, etc...) and this behaviour of mine (the contrast between happy/sad for no apparent reason) is hurting them.Can you tell me how you live, if any, your mood swings? [info] None [info] 1386874568
SafManWan310 [info] 18 year old South Indian dude here. I badly want someone who's not clingy, but will always be there for me. I'd also like to share my everything with them while knowing everything about them. I said this because I have super strict Indian parents, though they're not physically abusive, they don't know anything about me, not even my hobbies.While they won't give a shit to my concerns, they're super clingy and won't even let me talk to girls. I know, and I am totally aware that none of these problems are as difficult as the ones suffered by many people my age but having no one to share yourself just sucks. I had one good friend but ever since I moved to college, I couldn't find a good friend, that's because everyone here's super competitive. I asked out three girls for a date and all of them rejected me.At times, I get super emotional looking at my old pictures with my good old friend. I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD earlier this year and took fiuoxetine for two good months and I eventually stopped it after an advice from our family physician.Yeah I stopped it, and so far I've been good thanks to my new calisthenics routine, it makes me feel good at times. But, I'm alone most of the times, I eat alone, watch my favourite shows alone, learn alone and even workout alone. So, life's been pretty sad and monotonous for me and I hope it will get better soon. And for the hug, just hug me already, I've never been hugged in years. I'd never say no to a hug. I love warm, cuddly, tight hugs. [info] None [info] 1569161788
NBogart9129 [info] I keep getting fat lips, rashes, and occasional eye lid swelling...what's happening? Age: 28Height: 6'Weight: 200 lbs (very into weightlifting)Medications: atenololSmoking status: I don't smokePrevious medical issues: IBS, anxiety, high blood pressureCurrent medical issues: &amp;#x200B;I've been having these symptoms for months.I think the possible culprits are: some sort of food allergy (I cut out gluten, but was still having these symptoms), my blood pressure medication (atenolol, which I started just before these symptoms appeared) or...anxiety. I was working an insanely hectic schedule for almost a year (basically two full time jobs) and was experiencing terrible anxiety about it. I have been diagnosed with anxiety before and have IBS, which I always assumed was related to it.Any insight would be appreciated. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1580085584
icantfindaun [info] Among other things I was diagnosed with anxiety a couple years back but I hated how the meds made me feel. Yes there's days where it's bad but overall I've learned to manage it. Exercise, eating right, trying to get at least 7 hours of sleep every night, and having a mentally and physically challenging job have been the keys for me but everyone is different. If you're having trouble please reach out. Even if it doesnt feel like it there's people around you who care. [info] None [info] 1531750031
anxietyisabeotch [info] I have been using it on my face a for a few months now and it works fine. Though when I use it a lot of days in a row it will stop working for a week or two and I have to gut it out so now I only try to use it when I absolutely have to like when I am in court or meeting with a new client, that way I can be sure it works. Drysol also works.I have even used right guard clinical strength anti-perspirant on my face, but you have to rub it in good or it looks like you are wearing makeup (not good if you are a dude like me), and it will also stop working if you use it too much in a row.I finally got sick and tired of dealing with it and went to the doctor to relate my embarrassing saga. I was diagnosed with anxiety and am now treating the sweating with beta blockers (metroprolol) and am going in today to maybe get a low dose anxiety med. It has made a huge difference. [info] None [info] 1367858642
rubncto [info] Drank a Rockstar, and subsequently had dream paralysis and LD happened. I had not heard of this subreddit before, but I have been able to LD since I was about 8 years old. I never track when I get them, but last night I had a Rockstar(vitamin b-12), not to LD but to study, before I slept and I had intense paralysis and subsequent entering into the dream world where I flew and was running away from something evil the LD was not pleasant. I guess this is a thank you to you guys for helping me to understand why and how LDs happen. I'm diagnosed with anxiety, and was wondering if this is common with LDers. [info] None [info] 1382614689
Fauxdite [info] Knitting. I'm not even a little bit kidding. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago, probably related to the fact that I was laid up with a chronic illness at the time and feeling penned in. I took up knitting, which is a way for me to redirect my nervous energy. It calms me down so much. I carry a small project in my purse and if I'm starting to feel it escalating, I can knit just about anywhere. On the bus, in a waiting room, in a restaurant while sipping a coffee, it's great. I did some cognitive behavioural therapy as well, which has taught me to recognize my anxiety and head it off at the pass before it escalates to the point where I have a panic attack.  [info] None [info] 1446471870
moortare [info] About my story and whether I should I tell my psychiatrist or not. I just discovered about Maladaptive Daydreaming yesterday night, and it just hit me hard because I've been doing everything the criteria said ever since I can remember, that thing with listening to music, daydreaming non-stop, extremely vivid dreams, physical movement, etc. I used to be very dramatic about my daydreams because I kind of expect my reality to follow my daydreams. My solution was to daydream about "someone else's" stories, and I wrote them down. I have several folders with so many details and information regarding to my characters, plots and other stuff. I was taking my daydreams very seriously, I even hope I could publish them as novels, but they were never completed because I would waste away my time daydreaming repeatedly or coming up with new plots instead. I never see it as a problem, I thought everybody else daydreams. The only strange thing I do is I would have to listen to music, in certain patterns, and kind of walk-run jumping forward around my house during midnight until I sweat and my feet become sore. I hardly do this now due to limited space in my apartment, so I substitute that activity by doing it while I was walking to work, or shopping, or anytime with space and privacy that I need.Around last year, my overall situation have gotten much worse. I am always emotionally unstable, but after entering university, it effected me and my relationship with my mother badly. We're not communicating, and I know that she will never understand me and neither I will understand her. My grade has dropped significantly and I can't concentrate in class. I was crying almost every night and every trigger from my verbally abusive parents seem to just make everything worse. So I decided to go see a therapist and he adviced me to see a psychiatrist and I was diagnosed with anxiety, which I thought was reasonable and explained a lot about my reservedness, socially awkwardness and insecurity. I have been taking anti-depressant for more than a year now, I even feel better, or so was I pretending to be alright.Until my daydream starts to involve my current reality into it. The situation now is that I have involved one person that doesn't even know who I am but I know who he is in my head for over a year, then I moved on, to my psychiatrist, which is just dangerous. I have seen him for more than a year now and he never popped in my head until several weeks ago. I don't want to daydream about him but I just can't stop. I associate my happiness and source of energy with his presence in my daydream, and later I would be extremely depressed and angry because I know it can never be true. My anger has spread that I couldn't control it sometimes and it runs into rage and destroyed my relationship with my parents. We still keep in touch, but I can never think of them the same way before, and I'm very ashamed of my behaviour. This has always been the case with me that I would daydream about "a perfect partner". I've been doing that since grade 1 and I remember the first person I daydreamed about. It has gone way too far to the point I expect it to come true, but I'm very aware that it won't, so I can become angry, very depressed when my reality doesn't meet my expectations from my daydreams. The main problem with this situation is about having my psychiatrist as a part of my plot. He was supposed to listen strictly only to my story, but I notice that our situations with mental issues are very similar and we have a lot more in common than I thought. He is the only person beside my therapist to see the weakest part of me, and that made me even more exposed to him. Then I discovered about Maladaptive Daydreaming, which would be the best thing to describe about my whole situation, not just anxiety disorder. MDD would be the reason for every single source of problem as to why I'm contradicting myself and why I have to try so hard separating dreams from reality. For the first time, I feel trapped. Because I crave for my daydream and expect it to come true, but I know I can't, then I would be depressed, angry, then I feel better, move one to another character maybe. This cycle continues non-stop.I have an appointment with my psychiatrist at the beginning of next month. I'm thinking whether I should or should not tell him about this, but may not tell him about him being in my head because I'm still very insecure. I have never really discuss with him about daydreaming problems, I have only discussed it with my therapist once, and it was never mentioned again. The main thing I discuss with both of them was about my mother, university pressure, future, my expectations which led to being disappointed, then depressed, and also my behaviour problem with me spreading my anger on my close ones. I have had negative and really disgusting thoughts throughout the year. I feel like being tortured, I do want to daydream because I love it but I don't want to include myself in. I am always proud of my wild dreams and imagination as it's the best source for expressing my creativity, but as I grow older, I realized I will have more responsibility, and my favourite hobby is interfering with what I know I'm supposed to do.I am glad I found this subreddit. I am glad I learn about Maladaptive Daydreaming, not only I know that what is going on with me, but I also to know that I'm not alone. Sometimes I hate that I have to wake up to my conciousness, but right now I am glad that I did, and maybe rest from daydreaming for a while. It has really consumed so much of my energy and time that I become sleepless and tired all the time.But for now, that I've shared with you my story, and I want to know if I should tell my psychiatrist or not. Have anyone ever told about this to their psychiatrists, and what was their advice? I may try to ask him to change my medication from FULOX to fluvoxetine that was found to work best with MDD. Taking FULOX does stop me from being too emotionally unstable, but it doesn't stop my daydream. [info]  [info] 1529211668
poompoomjuice [info] I think my insecurities are ruining my relationship Basically I've been diagnosed with anxiety and have been trying to take anti-depressants but lately I feel like I'm just getting worse. My boyfriend and i have been talking about how Im always waking up crying in the middle of the night because i have a bad dream and i think im just annoying him at this point. I constantly ask questions like "do you love me" or "if [blank] asked you out before u asked me out would you have dated her" and other stupid stuff like that.He's by far the greatest guy I've ever dated and we both said that we see a future together even though we're pretty young. Every single time we talk about why I'm upset he's always comforting me and says that i don't annoy him and that he loves only me. Even though he does that i still feel like he's lying because he doesn't want to hurt my feelings. I don't know what to do and i already have a therapist but it just keeps getting worse and I'm worried that I'm ruining this relationship because of it and i just can't help from overthinking and hurting my own feelings.What do i do? [info] None [info] 1584539892
Huge_Zookeepergame [info] How easily does mental illness go away? I'm thinking about going to a therapist if I might have a mental illness. But I'm not sure. I think it's quite possible because when I was very young I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and a mild case of OCD. I didn't know until an adult because I never read the papers that I gave to my parents to sign when I was in school. But for fun I decided to go through them as an adult. [info] None [info] 1552334983
theelvenguard [info] man, I was diagnosed with anxiety at 19. if anyone had said that after telling me that's what it was, I can't even imagine what I wouldve done..  [info] None [info] 1549423526
tourmalineghost [info] Can physical anxiety symptoms last for many hours on end? Hey all. For a few years now I've been experiencing a lot of the physical symptoms of anxiety, and I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but recently my symptoms have been lasting way longer than ever before. I was wondering if anyone has experienced this and if this is a "normal" part of anxiety or if I should see a doctor or something.To go into more depth - the specific physical symptoms I feel include racing heart, feeling short of breath/like I can't get in enough oxygen even with deep breathing, shaking, and physically feeling very weak. Sometimes a stomach ache/mild nausea too. It's very difficult to eat, walk around, breathe, etc when I feel like this. Usually I'm not consciously anxious about anything but I can point to things in my life that might currently be stressing me out, so anxiety would make sense but the sensation just lasts so long - I've definitely had days where I've woken up feeling like this, and the feeling didn't go away all day, meaning it persisted for 16 hours. Sometimes it even carries into the next day.Is it normal to feel like this with a diagnosis of generalized anxiety? Has anyone else felt this and found some way to relieve it? I'm going crazy over here spending the entire day just trying to breathe correctly and not being able to focus on anything else but how I feel like I'm about to pass out (even though I never do). [info] None [info] 1566156680
sowhatbroseph [info] 1. Good point2. i have no health insurance, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder before. Was on meds but the side effects were unbearable. 3. Would love to, but no health insurance4. I've done it before and it helped, need to get in the habit again5. I have been going to the gym a few times a week, but I know I need to do more. 6. Fair enough.  [info] None [info] 1409845695
ExAerian [info] (First post) I don't know if its my heart or not. I'm scared it is Hi my name is Harley, 22, first time posting. I've been diagnosed with anxiety since around October now, after visits to the ER for chest pains came out negative (EKG, X-Ray, scans and all that for heart/lungs) although I was diagnosed with esophageal spams by my now current pcp. I guess this all boiled over after dealing with my mother's fight with Dialated Cardiomyopathy and a Heart transplant. (10 years now and still fighting, she's my hero but I digress.) Cause of this and the incidents in Oct. I've been scared as hell. I'm afraid daily that my heart is gonna give out, even though my Mom, my PCP, and my family has said my heart is fine. I'm constantly feeling my pulse, checking my heart rate ( they say its normal, even though to me it doesn't) Its gotten to a point where even a little symptom makes my mind think its my heart. And I don't know what to do. I'm sorry for the rant, but I don't have too many people to talk to. I guess I just need to vent.  TL;DR 22 year old heart hypochondriac rants. [info] None [info] 1429673395
coreygirl10 [info] Worried there is something wrong and doctor won't listen For the past few months I've been having so many different symptoms. My most worrisome is having a hard time breathing at night and occasional chest pain. She prescribed me an inhaler but it isn't helping. I have heart palpitations also. Unrelated, I get lightheaded often (every day), and I sometimes get dizzy. I had a vitamin D deficiency, but my doctor fixed it with large doses. I've gone to my doctor for my symptoms and I feel like she doesn't listen. I am diagnosed with anxiety and I know how anxiety can make you feel, but I feel like my doctor needs to take me more seriously. She never does any tests. She hasn't done blood work or EKG's in months. I feel like there is something wrong but I don't know how to get my doctor to listen to me. She's a great doctor, don't get me wrong. Any advice? [info] None [info] 1525841647
BurntCalorie [info] I was diagnosed ADHD at the age of 25. But when I visited another psychiatrist,  she said she didnt think I had it. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder at 12.I know for sure I have anxiety issues. Not sure about the ADHD because some of the symptoms, I don't suffer from. And they do say anxiety can share similar traits to adhd [info] None [info] 1572789115
chipsahoyguru [info] I’m going through this right now and have one week to get my grade up before the class ends. It’s been so draining. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago and emailed my professor when my panic attack’s were impacting my grade. He responded by saying, “I’m sorry for your personal problem.” And offered virtually no support. I’m really hopeful that I will pass, but it’s not looking great. How did you cope with failing?  [info] None [info] 1551438750
heatherilene [info] I take xanax as needed as well. For me, I start taking a very small dose (1/4 of a pill) each day about a week before exams, then I take a half pill before the exam itself. (I was diagnosed with anxiety in undergrad and taking it before a test allows me to calm down enough to successfully take a test. I went from Cs and Ds in high school to mostly As in college).Also, look to see if your law school offers counseling services. They may offer X number of sessions at a discounted rate. You should definitely sign up. I found it helped me tremendously my first year.Use the tools you need to get through school and don't be ashamed. You may not be taking this medication forever. It might just be helping you through a tough time and that is OK. Law school disrupts everything. You need as much support as you can get.Oh, and you shouldn't worry about job interviews until November/December, so cut yourself some slack :) [info] None [info] 1400292727
lilbutterfly_ [info] Lamotrigine Hiya, recently got prescribed with lamotrigine and I've never been on medication.I was diagnosed with anxiety. So, my doc thinks stabilizing my mood would help with my anxiety and insomnia.&amp;#x200B;A lil worried only because im not too sure what to expect.RX: Lamotrigine 25MG every morning for 2 weeks then twice a day [info] None [info] 1553643059
EnoughDetective [info] Trouble sleeping (Im a guy, currently 19 years old.)For a long time I have had trouble falling asleep, everytime I am trying to fall asleep and there is a tiny noise in my room I have this sort of shock that goes through my body, it also causes me to see like static and it comes with a sound similar to being flashbanged in a video game.The sounds are all real and in my room like cracking of my wood floor etc. For as far as I know like from the age of 12 I have been having this, and It never really caused any trouble untill now. Because now I have a 29 hour a week job. And the thing is that I start to notice how fatigued I actually am, I always thought I was just lazy but the amount of energy this takes at night from being shocked every time I hear something it just drains me.On the sidenote, I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder (who not these days).And I've had some serious trauma's growing up as a kid, from being abused by my kindergarten teacher to being knocked out by a bully.&amp;#x200B;I haven't been to a real doctor yet, I was wondering if anyone could share their thoughts on my situation beforehand. Or diagnose me. [info] Patient [info] 1585571629
Gaboyski_ [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety last month and the symptoms are severe (palpitation, headaches, fatigue, brain fog, short-term memory loss, etc). I had to postpone my thesis because I could not handle my workload this semester. Even coffee/stimulants can no longer give me the fix I craved in usual amounts. Which is why I can't go on a reboot; I honestly doubt that my ailments can go away by going cold turkey for a few days or weeks. [info] 3 Days [info] 1554708510
wiltinggirl [info] I messed up and need advice I'm 23 years old and about 35 weeks pregnant. I had trouble getting insurance at first, then saw an obgyn around 27 weeks. I had my consultation appointment, then one ultrasound appointment, then a vaginal exam appointment. I had another appointment scheduled in November, but I was having car trouble and went to call the office but no one answered because they weren't open yet since I was going to be the first patient of the day. So I ended up just...not going and planned to call the next day to reschedule. I'm diagnosed with anxiety, panic disorder, and PTSD so my mental illnesses got the best of me and I was too "scared" to call and reschedule because I have this crippling fear of being yelled at or "in trouble" because of my PTSD. It sounds so stupid and immature, I know, but it's so debilitating. So I just never made another appointment. And now it's biting me in the ass because I'm too embarrassed/scared to call and be like "lmao hey, remember me? I am back two months later than I should be." The obgyn asked me about my mental health history so she knows of my illnesses, but I'm still afraid she won't care and will scold me or something. I don't know what to do. My boyfriend and I have everything we need for our daughter and we're excited, but I'm a mess because I know I need to make an appointment, but I'm legitimately too terrified. [info] None [info] 1578263243
Confused_bean [info] If you feel like this then you should probably get re-assessed. It depends on how thorough your diagnosis was and how skilled your diagnoser was as well. There are many stupid psychiatrists and psychologists out there who know next to *nothing* about ADHD (believe me -- I was diagnosed with anxiety and Asperger's, but not ADHD, twice), so if you didn't see a specialist, then you should. [info] None [info] 1443114183
FalcoIgnis [info] I can agree with everyone here, except that my experience is actually a bit backward... I agree about this being a symptom of anxiety/low grade panic attack, but I actually never experienced it in my life until about 3 years ago, when I was 23, shortly before I was diagnosed with anxiety.   [info] None [info] 1538882581
Chief_Tallbong [info] You sound like me. Worry is the word of my life. Worry. All I can seem to do is worry. I've been diagnosed with anxiety.My girlfriend was in town this past weekend so I'm feeling much, much better than usual. Haven't worried about anything in days. So in my moment of clarity, allow me to speak to you.The best advice I can offer is to just let it go. This is much easier said than done. It's taken months, but I'm getting there. Realize that worry does nothing for you. Literally nothing. There's helpful stress that will push you to do your best, but you and I both know this is not that kind of worry. This worry is intrusive, cold and dark. It's bullshit, put simply. Why do we have to deal with this shit?Because we let ourselves. We have to just... Let it go. Worrying about everything will not help you make everything better. It is not useful stress. Don't try to solve your entire life right now, no matter how old you are. Live in the present, and appreciate small things. Add them to your life one by one. Just think to yourself, when is the last time exhausting all possible scenarios actually helped me? Probably never.Just let it go.If you enjoy your days, your lifestyle (without comparing it to others'. What do YOU like to do?) then you're living it pretty well. Not every day will be perfect but if you still enjoy your routine and activities and the people you spend time with, you're doing great. If not, make changes and work toward your ideal lifestyle. It really is that simple, no matter how hard it sounds.TL;DR: Find your own standard of what living life to the fullest is. Let that be your guide. Otherwise, just let go of the pointless worrying. [info] None [info] 1444762647
WorriedParsnip [info] I'm stuck in my life and don't have the capacity to break my habits. So I am a 22yo student, and I've been diagnosed with anxiety about two years ago, but had it for at least eight years (when looking at the symptoms and looking back and recognise what was actually going on). I have been in on-and-off therapy, but everytime I've had to find a new therapist, I'd get stuck in my head and not be able to actually reach out and find one. So I would say most of my anxiety if untreated as of now, I'm still really confused, but I understand what it is.   Now on to my problem right now: Self-isolation and keeping up the daily routine.   The last two years self-isolation hasn't been a problem for me, I used it to cope with stress from school, and to keep myself out of social situations, simply out of fear of not knowing what would happen.  For the last 3 weeks we've had to study from home, and since the first day I've been avoiding it as much as I could without confrontations. Which has put me in kind of a never ending circle I can't get out of. I'm behind on assignments, and my teachers seem to be pretty understanding, but the fear of confrontation is still there.   Everytime I pull up an assignment with the intent to get it done and turn it in, my heart starts racing, and it's almost like it's harder for me to just get it done than to not get it done and pretend i don't have to do it. Like I would rather be ignorant than stressed, but it still stresses me, because I know that the only solution is to just get it done. I need to break this stupid habit before it's too late,  I really wanna graduate this summer or fall. So, does anyone have advice on how to move forward and maybe feel good or confident about it? [info] None [info] 1585837586
WarKittyKat [info] Unfortunately, it's also not a great idea when you're still in a relationship with an abusive person.  I think for me CBT was trying to dismantle something that was on some level still keeping me safe, without necessarily looking if there was anything I needed to be kept safe from.  Therapy seemed to proceed based on the idea that everything was safe for me then, when it was not.  And there wasn't any real check, just the fact that I was diagnosed with anxiety and needed CBT because that's the therapy for anxiety. [info] None [info] 1566609034
BurntPaper [info] It's definitely not, but it's the generation that has pushed the most for other people to change their habits, lifestyles, etc, in order to make them less uncomfortable. I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues. I've struggled with it since I was in my early teens, and I'm in my early 30's now. It sucks, but I'm not going to try to make others change to make my life easier. I suck it up, or I avoid situations that trigger my anxiety too much. It's like the ability to just fucking deal with shit has been lost.  [info] None [info] 1539989865
dinngoe [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety for 15 years.  I need Benzos to function.  Panic attacks are worse than death.  Only people who have had them can understand.  There is normal anxiety but then there is something else.. [info] None [info] 1534717563
toews-me [info] That's true. Very true. I will check that out. You know, I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but I've never done anything about it. I should probably see someone... if I had the money. :/ I will look at your blog though. That will probably help. Thank you. &lt;3 [info] None [info] 1396023728
lazy-beans [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety for 8 years before ADHD [info] ADHD-C [info] 1523076894
Mr_body_bags [info] Oh ya I love football when ever we are practicing or working out I love it it’s awesome to just scream and yell and be with my friends and get stronger and shit. I can’t get a job because of it tho cause track is after school but when ever I’m doing somthing with my team I’m always in a good mood I guess it’s when I’m alone and have to think just for me. I do watch joe Rogan sometimes hahahaAnd ya I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 13 and took lexapro for 2 years but stoped so I could cum and actually feel myself I’m gonna stop over thinking tho  [info] None [info] 1548450271
overcometogether [info] I haven’t taken medication, it’s the route most don’t take. I was prescribed Zoloft,  because I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder. I was having panic attacks for a week straight, one after another. I was actually afraid of taking medication because of the side effects. For 5 days I haven’t gotten any attacks, just mild chest pains. I keep telling myself, it’s not a heart attack, just anxiety symptoms. Eventually the symptom goes away but comes back. I don’t let it stop me, I went back to work 4 days ago and I told my boss about my anxiety because I missed a whole week, thankfully boss was understanding. I went to a psychologist and he did recommend breathing exercises. Taught me to breathe with my belly. Put your hand over your belly, keep your chest staright, and breath in through your nose while pushing your hand into the belly. Breathe out through your mouth, and your belly will push your hand away. Repeat this exercise everyday. 3 times per day. That’s all I got taught.Also side note, I’ve learned not to think about the past, or future just the present. It will take slot of worries, what do you we know of 5min into the future? We don’t, so there isn’t much we can focus on, just the present. Also talking or people about my anxiety has helped tremendously. Message me if you have more questions. Wish you the best.  [info] None [info] 1540662330
depressedtempacct [info] I’m ready to explode I’m angry. I’m angry at myself, I’m angry other people, I’m angry at life, I’m angry at the universe, I’m just really fucking angry. I’m sick of all the bullshit. I just want peace. My life has been a trainwreck from the start. I almost died during birth, had serious health issues as a child. Health issues prevented me from doing normal kid things. I was diagnosed with OCD and ADD from age 4 until age 9. I was diagnosed with anxiety at age 4 and PTSD at age 7, I still have those diagnoses. I’m 15 now. The physical health issues prevented me from being normal and fucked my head, and now my head is making me miserable.I’ve always been very emotional. From the time I was a toddler I’ve had issues with serious mood swings. Up until age 12-13ish I would go from really happy and laughing, to throwing punches, to curled up in a ball sobbing, and then back to happy, all over the course of a few hours. I still felt like that, I just learned to hide it. But for the past year I’ve just felt empty. I’d say 80% of the time I feel apathetic. The rest of the time I’m sad or angry or anxious or something else negative, but mostly I’ve been feeling really empty. I’ve been feeling more and more alone and isolated, even as I surround myself with people. I’m competing internationally in my sport, and I’m a reasonably talented musician. I like drawing and writing. But I have no drive. I used to wake up in the morning and before I ever left my bedroom I’d pick up an instrument. Now, I when I’m home alone I hole up with my guitar and play and cry. It’s my only escape. My sport is expensive and can be quite stressful, but I refuse to give it up. If I didn’t have to wake up at 5am to go to the gym and pass a piss test before and after competitions, I’d be self medicating. But I don’t get excited about anything anymore. I kind of got excited because I really hit it off with a girl I know, but it turns out she was just stringing me along and she’s had a boyfriend for months. So that didn’t work out either. But other than that one glimmer of hope I had for a little, I haven’t had much motivation to do anything. I just want to sleep, listen to music, play music, and try to find a way to escape. I’m scared right now. I thought most of my issues were environmental. But over the summer there were some changes for the better in my life. I cut contact with a lot of toxic people, and some other events happened that have made my life easier. My life should be better than ever. I’m in great shape, I’m having great success with my sport and my music, I’ve been getting a lot of attention from girls and I’ve made some really great friends. Now I’m scared. Before, I was just empty. I passively thought about suicide, but it was just passing thoughts. I wasn’t going to put the effort in to walk in front of a bus, but if a bus hit me then so be it, I’d be at peace. But over the past few days, I’ve been having more intrusive thoughts about death. I’ve done research into the best way to die. I’ve made an inventory of materials. I’ve got a list of what I need to get and what I need to do to succeed. I’ve ranked from 1 through 12 the best ways for me to die. I’m not sure I want to go through with it, but I’m getting concerned. It’s gone from passing thoughts to a legitimate plan. I could say ‘fuck it I’m done’ and look at my list, pick the most feasible option, and be dead an hour later. That scares the shit out of me. I feel like I’ve got so much potential left, but I don’t have the motivation to keep going. I’m scared. I don’t want to die but I’m afraid I’m going to end up dead forever because of an impulsive decision. If it matters, mental illness/suicide and drug/alcohol abuse runs on both sides of my family. Since I have to pass drug tests, one night when I couldn’t take the voices in my head anymore, I tried to get high on Benadryl. I talked to myself for a little and then passed out. That’s my only use of drugs ever, that was about 2 weeks ago.I need saved from myself [info] None [info] 1514067112
Thetiz [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety.It was only recently that I finally decided to check it up, but before that I only had suspicions and at times though it to be something else. Exams-everyone gets stressed right, socially-some people are just quieter than others right? That's what I thought. But recently it had gotten worse, especially my social anxiety which was why I checked it out.Ofcourse I hate the fact that I freak out, blank out, and shake in exams, but what I hate the most is how socially broken I am, extremely shy and quiet, and i I stutter and freeze when I talk to people. I only talk to 5 people, my 5 close friends, if I am with them, I seem really open and outgoing, but take them away, and I'm going to be mute, staring at phone. Sometimes I feel glad that I'm quiet because if people notice, they won't talk to me, which what im thinking all the time, whether it be a train or out and about, hoping no one talks to me etc.Atm what I'm struggling with is this girl from my lec that I like, she too is very shy and quiet, so I'm pretty much screwed. [info] None [info] 1431858965
missjulia928 [info] It wasn't really a tantrum. I'd just cry uncontrollably and try to run away from the situation. When you are 6 and have an anxiety attack, you have zero idea how to cope with it. It's scary enough for an adult most of the time. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 10 and finally started to learn coping methods through therapy.  [info] None [info] 1426478174
hulk-tiddy-lover [info] Horrible anxiety about flying In all of my nearly 2 decades worth of years on this planet, I've never been on an airplane. And my mom has sort of put a fear of them into me, as shes never been on one either.In less than a week I'm flying with my dad and his girlfriend for spring break. It's only a 2 hour flight but I cant get over this.I'm essentially convinced that I'm going to die. I know it's not logical but like... I can't help it. "It be like that sometimes."Now I've been diagnosed with anxiety anyways so I get anxious about... well, a lot of things to be honest. So it's more than just 'anxious over flying' its 'anxious anyways, WEE WOO ALERT, YOU WILL DIE' inside my head.As I get closer and closer, I get more and more freaked out, and my therapist or psychiatrist wouldn't give me anything to help. In fact, they told me to try a window seat because 'it's an experience you wont forget'I dont like heights and I told them this!?? How is that advice?? I'm asking for advice on how to deal with my anxiety about the flight and I was basically told 'oh it'll be fine dont worry'.... so, yeah. Not a lot of help.I've tried so many things to reduce my anxiety, and I managed to get the anxiety attacks to stop, but it doesnt help the fluttering nausea and trembling when I think about the flight.So, any advice on how to deal with my flight anxiety?Tldr; I think I'm going to die on my first flight. Any advice on how to calm myself down and get over this? [info] None [info] 1552764322
Bawka_Bawwk [info] My mom is great, she really is. But she pounded into my head when I was a child that if my future home wasn't spotless, people would think I am gross and dirty. Looking back, our house was too clean and we didn't get enough time with her. I saw myself going down this same road after my second child was born - a week after his birth I was baby-wearing and back to my clean-freak ways, instead of healing and snuggling all day. Something had to change... I knew I would never get this time back with my kids. After talking to my doc, I was diagnosed with anxiety and the meds have really helped. I can let some messes go now. Everything doesn't have to be perfect. No one is going to come to my house and tell me I'm dirty. We are just a normal family living life. I could probably still use some therapy though. I feel for your wife! Good luck addressing this.  [info] None [info] 1510797137
Allskinny [info] It was a mocha syrup tho haha! 60 calories a pump!!It's not 1200 but I'm definitely not sedentary and I'm average height (about 5'4") so I should be good. But idk. It just looks bad haha. Tbh idek what my goals are anymore. I don't weigh myself often and last month I had lost 5 lbs for no reason and then gained it back. I just want to feel my pants loose again even tho last time I did it was a problem because there weren't smaller pants that fit me (too big for a 0, too small for a 2 x.x). I also want exactly healthy sooo. Maybe I just want to see what I'm eating because i was starting to get a little too mindless lol. I felt heavy all the time. My biggest achievement was getting to (the equivalent of) 1 cup of coffee a day tho! I used to drink 4 and then I was diagnosed with anxiety. Yeah. [info] Losing/21F/162 cm/CW: 54.4 kg GW: 49 kg [info] 1543278814
allergic-to-life [info] From my grandfather "you know when I was diagnosed with anxiety at your age (17), I worked everyday that summer until I have enough to not be anxious." [info] None [info] 1566357650
recueee [info] [Discussion][Help] Emotional Support Dog in College I am a freshman in college, almost done with my first semester (go me), and have anxiety. I have been going to therapy for 2 years, currently see my therapist weekly, although should probably have started therapy far earlier than I did (actually I was diagnosed with anxiety at a very young age but ignored the diagnoses and did not get help for most of my life) and take Zoloft to give some context. Basically, I am really struggling in college, especially missing my dog as she was my main coping mechanism since I got her three years ago. She often was the only reason I got out of bed on weekends or left the house for days on end and loved spending time training her so she knows a lot of tricks (especially ones that I could teach her without leaving my house). As I am in college I am again struggling with some of these anxiety symptoms and others that I know she would help with so I am considering seeing if I could make her an emotional support animal (with my therapist) to bring to school with me, probably next year.First I want to establish I know the difference between an ESA and a Service dog and I am fully understanding that she would not be allowed to go to class with me or in places other than my room. Additionally, financially I have enough money to generally support her and my parents would be able to help with any emergency care, as they bought her in the first place. With that, she would also have a place to go if anything was to happen so I could not care for her or something. And luckily my college is only 30 min away from my home too. Also, my college is very dog-friendly and many dorms already have dogs that are owned by the faculty in residence. Another issue often brought up is getting the dog and the unknowns but this would be my dog that I know very well and while she is going to have some struggles I know she has a personality that LOVES people and would love that aspect of college.However, the college I go to requires you to live on campus for 3 years so next year I will still be in a dorm. While there is a slight chance I could have an apartment or suite-style dorm it is more likely I will continue living in hall-style housing (shared bathroom). I am unsure if it is fair to my dog to take her away from my house to a small space, even though she would love being around me, so am curious to hear if anyone has any **experience with an ESA dog living in the dorm** with them and could tell me about it.&amp;#x200B;UPDATE: I want to clarify that I am fully aware of the full-time commitment of a dog, I have cared for her alone in the past. I am not asking for advice in the that sense because I am currently mentally struggling enough that I am unable to do "normal" student stuff and go straight back from class to my room as it is. I really just want to know about people who may have experienced it or college-specific aspects of dog care. [info] None [info] 1543730676
momsasylum [info] I used to do this so often a woman I worked with complained to my boss.Sometime later I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. That was the last time I was able to work. [info] None [info] 1390808230
takeitslowinnyc [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and was previously on anti-anxiety meds. I go to weekly therapy and have made tremendous progress. A big problem I still have is always thinking ahead/looking to the future vs being present in the now. It's something I'm actively trying to work on, especially since I'm pregnant now (baby was a happy surprise) but it's HARD. I don't want to keep "wishing away the present" but I feel like I've just been so anxious for the next doc appt. Even getting my betas done twice, I was an anxious wreck. Last week we saw baby for the first time (it's doing well, yay) and already I'm counting down the days to our next ultrasound next month so I can make sure it's still there and ok. I grew up with an incredibly anxious - still anxious - mother and I refuse to pass that on to my child but shit this is difficult. [info] 26 | 8/12? | FTM [info] 1546282327
heyuhhhdrigs [info] This happened to me, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and the abilify made it so bad, it also made my anxiety make me incredibly angry so I was cuddling through aggressive anxiety, to sad boy anxiety. It literally made new ruin my life and destroyed my relationship. You need to talk to your pdoc right away about this because it's not worth staying on it if it's making you gave really bad anxiety [info] Bipolar 1 [info] 1566405468
kvng967 [info] this is very true. the difference between stress and anxiety is that stress is temporary (maybe it last for a week or two or until a specific situation that's stressing you out it resolved) and usually doesn't disrupt your life this much. I was diagnosed with anxiety when i was in middle school and these are also the symptoms I had. you should try to see a therapist or even the school counselor could greatly help [info] None [info] 1550758956
yacula [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety prior and handed the doctor a form typed by my therapist. There were people there who got diagnosed by the on site doc which made their visit with her just a tad longer. [info] None [info] 1573494692
SnugglyFluff [info] Strange Attacks of unknown origin Hello! This is my third time trying to write this all out. I could really use some advice or ideas of what these attacks I'm having could be.-21 -Female-5'6"-125lbs-White-Over 2 years. Started when I worked at an auto parts store-Atlanta, GA -My whole body, but mostly my arms and legs seem affected-I have been diagnosed with anxiety at 17-I self medicate with MarijuanaThe attacks started very small and have been getting progressively worse. First it was just my foot dragging a bitThen my right arm started to sieze upThen both arms started, and it seems to switch feetNow I can barely stay standing when it happens and if I'm holding something I WILL drop itI haven't been to a doctor because I have no insurance, my mother didn't think it was important (she would rather just shove vitamins or chinese herbs down my throat) and as I live on my own I have to pay all bills for myself.I applied for Medicare but was denied, and I have no idea how to appeal that. I tried following the instructions on their website but it led me down a rabbit hole. There are very few to no clinics around me and they charge as much as a regular doctor's appointment. Please, don't delete my post. I'm desperate and feel like I have no options. If anyone can give me some insight into what these attacks may be, I would be forever grateful. Even if you can just tell me what my symptoms would be called professionally other than just "episodes" or "attacks" would be great. I posted a link to 4 attacks I had within 30 minutes of each other that I managed to recordI can usually feel one coming on, but I can't seem to make it not happen[Attacks](https://imgur.com/gallery/YzaMU9A) [info] None [info] 1539534014
LemonCandy123 [info] Getting back to activities Hi everyone&amp;#x200B;I was diagnosed with anxiety in November. I've been in Cipralex since then and just tried to change my dose recently. I have an awful time sleeping being on it so now I'm on sleeping pills.&amp;#x200B;How has everyone gotten back into the groove of doing things? Mainly the gym. I was never really a gym person but I think that is because of my anxiety and I want to get back into it. I'm paying for a membership I don't use.&amp;#x200B;Any tips would be great! [info] None [info] 1560441510
sorosa [info] Decision making and falling asleep? Hi guys I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I'll be starting medication soon. I was wondering what tips you guys have for the following. Decision making: I have so much trouble making decisions from the small things to the big. Like I've been going back and fourth on some subjects for over a year which has cost me a lot of time.Falling asleep when bored: whenever I have to study I do tend to get bored and I then begin falling asleep despite being fully tested, the same goes for meetings at work, but as soon as the meeting is done I'm wide awake again? Any tips? Or do you guys think this is more than just anxiety? [info] None [info] 1562536947
princesscarmella9 [info] Reverse/Opposite PMDD Disclaimer: Not really PMDD related, but desperate and seeking help.I understand PMDD occurs during the Luteal phase. I experience the exact opposite. Symptoms only during the first half of my cycle. Generally starting around days 7-9, peaking at ovulation (day 14-16), and then tapering off from there. I've noticed this for the last 9 months I've been tracking my cycle using an app.Once I ovulate I feel like a brand new person.Main Symptoms:Mood SwingsAnxiety/Panic AttacksIrritableNauseaLack of AppetiteBloatingConfirmed via: Feel like trash when a Clear Blue Ovulation Test says high estrogen, and feeling the worst the day before or day of my LH SurgeI am diagnosed with anxiety but the difference is night/day during these 7-10 days. Examples:After Ovulation: Have waited in lines over an hourBefore Ovulation: Panic attack when I'm buying 2 items in a short lineAfter Ovulation: Can eat 3 meals a day, even if its slightly greasy or unhealthyPrior to ovulation: Can barely get dry toast downPrior to Ovulation: Severe panic over a blood drawAfter Ovulation: Visited a family member after surgery with zero issues.I've noticed these time and time again. Its even coming to the point that I schedule stressful things post ovulation!So far:PCP: Has never heard of anything like it, brushed off.Pdoc: Suggested upping meds during those 7-10 days Therapist: Thinks I may be creating it by expecting anxiety at certain times of the month.Advice welcome but not expected. I hope maybe someone can relate to me most of all.HUGS [info] None [info] 1545622772
babykittiesyay [info] So I'm coming into this from maybe a different background, I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder and "severe major depressive disorder" (yes, that's actually what's on my charts, lol). I'm also a FTM.The anxiety has been way worse than I've experienced before. Partly, I think it's that my emotions are turned up to 11 from all the hormones, which might continue for the whole pregnancy but definitely not past that. This is probably the first thing to remind yourself of, this is temporary. It's also good to remind yourself of all the people you know of who are parents. Are they all perfect? Humans have been making it through all this for millennia. Make sure to check in with yourself about the effects these worries are having on you. Are they keeping you from getting things done, taking up a lot of time, messing with your breathing or heart rate significantly? If yes, it's time to chat with your doctor. It's very normal to be nervous, it's also pretty common to develop anxiety disorders in pregnancy, between the hormones, the information overload, and the huge responsibility. Getting care sooner will hep prevent any temporary issue from becoming long-term. We can do this! [info] None [info] 1546283184
LameSaucey [info] My third, actually! The first two I had what I would call normal anxiety, now it’s just...awful. And has started pouring into every other aspect of my life. I can’t sleep at night because I’m worried my 7 month old will stop breathing, or that someone will break into the house, or that the doors aren’t locked.  I spend way too much time daily worrying about my husband while he’s at work (he’s a tattoo artist, there’s really not much to worry about, but I’m just always worried) Every time my two year old has a tantrum, I’m worried the neighbors are going to call the police (he’s like...way loud haha) It just sucks, I was diagnosed with anxiety as a teenager, but apparently it has been a part of me for longer than that, but it wasn’t until I had my youngest that it truly and severely started impacting my day-to-day life, and I just want to feel normal again. Starting EMDR therapy on Tuesday, and I’m so so hopeful that this will help! [info] None [info] 1562385161
TogaMcrightousFace [info] It was motivation. But I didn't feel the urgency until closer to time. Believe me, I understand that it was irresponsible.Yes, I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders, including PTSD.  [info] None [info] 1529617726
SpankmasterS [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety as well. Its one of the reasons I am insistent on getting physical activity. In this sense the exercise will ease the symptoms. Otherwise general health is pretty simple. I'd suggest two things. 1. Have a specified goal (lose weight = not good, lose 50lbs by Sept 11 = good)2. Make a detailed plan with benchmarks (i.e to lose 100lbs I need to lose 2lbs a week for the year so I need a calorie deficit of 1000 cals per day - I'll lose 4lbs a week till xx/oo then 3lbs a week till xx/oo then 2lbs a week till xx/oo then 1lb per week till end). Then you fill in how you will do it. Given your stats you wont have to do much to see a big change. Just:1. Get some exercise daily. Walking is perfectly fine. 2. Control your calorie intake.I'd check with a doc before starting this. Find foods you like. Find a physical activity you like. Your healthier lifestyle will have these two as the foundation. With just these two you can drop 100lbs this year. It  might not win you a ms. fitness universe award, but you'll be healthier (physically and mentally). Also, anxiety can be well managed by nutrition. Sugar and coffee in large quantities are not your friend. In theory its simple. There are quite a few details and your gonna have to educate yourself. But a basic one:If you can just walk for an hour a day and eat 1700 cals your weight will plummet. If you have goals that are more challenging then roadmap how to get there.Good Luck. Keep us informed.  [info] Inactive [info] 1264744416
Scaredistka [info] We are 20,and 19 we are together for 3 years .i have ROCD for 1 year almost and I am diagnosed with anxiety disroder and ocd [info] None [info] 1556489353
Caffeinated_DaVinic [info] Yeah same. I have access to it legally for real cheap though only temporarily. Asking everywhere I can for any info on it. I've had my fair share of bad trips and immediately thought to use it as a backup Benzo since my doctor won't prescribe me Xanax anymore after I told him I smoke. I mean I've been diagnosed with anxiety and sleep disorders since I was 9 but now the only med I've been prescribed my entire life that works is taken away just because I care about drug interactions... Gave me something else for anxiety but leaves me with HUGE memory gaps, like hours I just can't recall at all. [info] None [info] 1513901221
apple_pi_314 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and needed to start on medication for that. After starting, I started getting some nausea (a totally normal side effect) but the psychiatrist at the college counseling center kept insisting it was my seizure meds and that I should stop taking them. I’d been on them with no issue for THREE YEARS! When I told her that, she kept citing where she got her degree from and that she obviously knew best. My neurologist, who is the most intelligent woman I’ve ever met and I had a good laugh about it later. [info] None [info] 1561210615
PostError [info] Marijuana induced anxiety... I've been smoking weed since about 16 or so. Now that I'm 18, I've been smoking for about a year straight now, never taking more than 2 days without having at least another joint. Yesterday, I got some kill Gorilla Glue from my bro (a strain I've had before) and  for some reason, this time smoking was a terrible experience. As soon as I put out my joint, I went to lay in my bed, and my heart started RACING. Like, 140 bpm kind of racing. I started to shake uncontrollably, I felt sick, cold. It was actually a pretty scary experience to say the least. Most of my friends are stoners and they have been for years, and I've never heard about anything like this happening to them. I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past, but I'm no doctor, so I can't really tell what's going on. I woke my grandma up at 2am to drive me to the hospital. X-rays, blood tests, piss tests, all nothing. (At the time of going to the hospital, I didn't consider the fact that it may have been marijuana induced, so they said nothing to me about it.) After I went back home, I lit up the same joint and sure enough... Extreme anxiety. Guys, it's the next morning and I still feel this way. I'm kind of worried, I never want to even touch weed again. Will I be okay? [info] None [info] 1571771771
EchoVixen [info] My partner and I have a similar chemistry. I worry a lot about the big things and the little things. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago. My partner, on the other hand, is the most relaxed person I know. Everything washes over him, nothing phases him. I love him dearly and I know he loves me, but I still worry that my anxiety is grating on him and I sometimes wish he would reassure me the way you do in your post. That being said, he's never been one for speeches or romantic gestures and just as he accepts me, I accept him. He's affectionate in his own way. You seem like a genuinely great person, I hope you and your partner have an amazing future together. [info] None [info] 1540652289
xerces717 [info] Fuck, that last line got me. I was diagnosed with anxiety 13 years ago. It's tough. You're not alone, there's other anxious wrecks out there like us. I hope you find peace and live well, friend.  [info] None [info] 1538174297
youdontknowmeyouknow [info] My last line manager in my current job. She was invested in me as a person first, always listened when I had ideas or questions. Her primary concern was my well-being, and she showed it. I was diagnosed with anxiety a while back, and she was so supportive, I really believe her presence played a huge part in my current frame of mind which is so much more positive. On top of all that, she's one of the most efficient people I've worked with and had an amazing can-do outlook. I'm sad that she left, but we're still good friends and she's incredibly happy in her new job. Couldn't be happier for her, she's an amazing person. [info] None [info] 1553180962
im_your_bullet [info] 27 with Anxiety and I'm asking for your help. Hello, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd from my time in Afghanistan. PTSD not so much, but the anxiety is terrible. We got back in the states in  2013, In 2015 (yep took this long) is when I was diagnosed. I was prescribed anxiety meds and they made me feel like an emotionless zombie (which right now I would take). I stopped taking them because of the zombie like state they put me in. Because I was. No longer taking meds I started to self medicate with cannabis. BEST medicine yet. For me, it helps instantly and usually for the entire day. With that being said, I'm in vacation with my family. I'm in a place that Cannabis is still illegal and I usually don't medicate around my family. They would understand but I just like to be sober unless I'm home. Well, as you guessed, my anxiety is going crazy.  It's just this terrible feeling that's over my entire body. I'm only here for a week, but I would really like to enjoy it. Going to do some meditation as soon as I'm done writing this. I keep getting hot flashes followed by sweat. Any over the counter medicine I could go to a store and buy?  I would just like to not feel this way for the next five days while we are here. Thanks in advance. [info] None [info] 1494802383
Bananasticker642 [info] Thank you for your comment. I have been diagnosed with anxiety from my doctor a few years ago.  For the most part I have it under control and am no longer taking any medication. But for this, my main problem is just the unknown. I know medically what sleep apnea is, but that doesn't help with the everyday part. I was just looking for real life stories to get a better idea of what happens during a sleep study and how people deal with a CPAP everyday.Like... how are the wires attached to your head? Do they pull your hair? I am very tenderheaded. Do they visually watch you while you sleep (on camera or something), or is it just when the machines go offline they come in? [info] None [info] 1534354503
Dokii [info] Unfortunately for me, I was unable to join. I tried to join the Navy and was declined by MEPS. I wanted to join and still would love to, but it's no longer an option. Kind of a story in itself honestly; the only reason being that I had one therapy appointment a few years back and they didn't like that. I never took medication, never was recommended for another doctor. I was diagnosed with anxiety, however I believe it was just typical teenage bullshit. Anyway, that got me declined unfortunately, so I'm going with my only other option for an advanced career and that's college. [info] None [info] 1378412166
C1awed [info] &gt;I'm also introverted and avoid social situations that I haven't experienced before or that I'm anxious about. I tend to avoid people altogether if I'm particularly tired or in a particularly bad mood. I've never felt the need to go to someone for emotional support... I dislike music, loud noises, drunk people, dancing, partying and crowded gatherings of people. I don't use any drugs. I'm not good at expressing emotion.&gt;I sometimes feel extremely lonely and I long for the kind of connection that I used to have with my close friends. I miss the great times we've had together and would like to have more similar experiencesWithout trying to be insulting,  what kind of connection and great times are you talking about?  &gt;I've been diagnosed with anxiety(mostly social) and Asperger's syndrome.Have you considered therapy?  Something like CBT could greatly help with the anxiety and teach you strategies to be able to stand - or even enjoy - a wider variety of social experiences.Right now it seems, even with all the changes you've made, that you're still waiting for other people to reach out and be friends with you, the way they did in elementary school.  Unfortunately, you're going to have to do a fair amount of the reaching out as an adult, and you're going to have to be willing to put effort - emotional and non-emotional - into the friendships to grow them and maintain them.All the experiences in the world aren't going to make a difference in making friends if you're not actually actively trying to make friends.  You won't passively attract them by looking nice and showing up the way you could in elementary school.Adult friendships tend to be more about chatting with each other during the week, and meeting up to do things once to a few times during the week, evenings and whatnot.  Neither of those seem to be areas you feel particularly comfortable with or good at.The first step in friendship, and the goal of the clubs and groups and meetups, is acquaintances.  From there, you talk, you find things you have in common, you move the friendship outside the club.  Or maybe you just hang out at the event and see them there.  But that's an active thing.&gt;I've changed my diet several times and have started exercising more and am slowly getting into shape. I'm experimenting with doing different stuff with my hair, facial hair and clothes. I'm learning a second language. I'm learning to drive.That's great to improve yourself.  Self-improvement is always a good start.  None of those are "I asked people to do something with me / got their facebook or digits / invited someone to hang out / was in any way social."  I'm not trying to say that what you've done is bad - it's not! - but ... &gt;They all seemed to be well functioning socially so I can only assume they'd have asked me if they actually wanted to be friends with me. They're assuming the same thing about you. [info] None [info] 1484786074
Jibblers [info] Wow, you sound exactly like me, what with the having no filter and overanalyzing things in hindsight. I was diagnosed with anxiety, panic disorder, and OCD (mostly of the obsessive thoughts). Before I finally got on medication and got used to it, I would always obsess over things I say to people, if I said the right thing, what they thought I had meant and everything. The one or two true friends I have really get me so I don't feel uncomfortable around them. I'm much better now, since I'm on Paxil CR, but it's still hard to push myself into social situations. Think about trying medication again if you ever feel discontent with not interacting with people. It helps you control those thoughts and maybe even not having to deal with them at all! [info] None [info] 1347593044
zigzagwag [info] Chest pains that go away when I'm occupied with other things So I've been diagnosed with anxiety. Something I probably should've sought treatment for years ago. For about a decade I would get these chest pains in the middle of the night, take some aspirin (because that stops heart attacks, right?) text my boyfriend that I loved him (because those should be my last words to him) and watch a movie to go back to sleep.For the last 2 months, work has been unusually stressful on top of me having to take flights (&amp; what would be a more inconvenient place to have a heart attack?).  About a week ago I was dismissed from my job even though I have a job lined up to start in another week. With that being said I've been home with nothing to occupy myself with but these chest pains. But they go away when I'm occupied like...at a wedding... or playing a game.How can logical me convince illogical me that I am not dying? [info] None [info] 1496023140
AnEmancipatedSpambot [info] If you have particularly bad OCD I'd highly recommend getting diagnosed by a psychiatrist. I was diagnosed with anxiety. It helped me a lot.  [info] None [info] 1532376944
kazoodles [info] I'm not able to empathize entirely nor am I religious, but I can see why you would fear over blaspheming by consuming this kind of content. A lot of SMT concepts are based on real life beliefs and practices, such as the belief that YHVH isn't in fact the perfect creator god or demon summoning. I mention the former solely because it seems like a really common theme in any game that he's mentioned. Anyone on the chaos or neutral side of things hints towards the diversity of gods which in turn is a rejection of monotheism and more specifically, YHVH's rejection of lesser gods. --I experience similar feelings, albeit they're probably not relate-able. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and psychosis 2 years ago which I believe started as a result of me dabbling in the occult as well as already having a predisposition to anxiety and intrusive thoughts. Getting into SMT has helped me by exposing myself to material that would previously send me into panic attacks. I remember playing Persona 3 for the first time two decembers ago and slightly shaking throughout the experience because of the demon names. Now the intrusive thoughts aren't as common and recently I've been getting anxiety about it likely because I just switched medication. I used to think that I was being possessed or that god would punish me(at the moment of the panic attack), although I didn't in reality believe in either of those things. It's easy to develop fears or worries related to these games if you're religious regardless of whether you see it as just fiction. But I doubt any christian would feel entirely comfortable with wanting to punch god in the face, especially considering how close to detail he's portrayed thematically in most of the games. Even if it were blasphemous in some weird, convoluted way God loves you and knows you don't have malicious intentions.  [info]  [info] 1479787341
Thealtruisticpoet [info] Pisces sun, Leo moon, Sag rising.I can cross my legs in a very difficult way that others can’t, and my feet don’t have any arches. i am pretty sure I’ll develop some kind of arthritis when I’m older. I think this is in due to my Pisces sun since Pisces rule the feet.I haven’t really felt anything going wrong in the aspect of body parts associated with Sagittarius. Leo rules over the heart and spine system... I have been diagnosed with anxiety and i tend to feel emotional pain as a physical pain. I’m anemic, so i guess my heart isn’t getting as much oxygen. My posture could definitely use some work. [info] Pisces Sun, Leo Moon, Sag Ascendent [info] 1564839877
Bloody_Insanity [info] 12 weeks and starting to genuinely fear everything. (Depression/worry rant?) Let me sound young. But im turning 19 in a month and im 12 weeks and i feel like i have no friends. I always get scared if "is this normal" "is this normal". All the normal fears that come with being pregnant and the journey to motherhood. I was diagnosed with anxiety 10+ years ago. Depression Shortly after that. So im getting overwhelmed feeling like i cant talk to anyone. Feeling like i have no friends. Feelig like theirs things wrong with me. Idk. [info] BabyBoy&lt;3 7/2/16 [info] 1450931126
Rsubs33 [info] Hijacking your comment. I am diagnosed with anxiety and deal with it through medication and coping mechanisms. It sucks balls when you get an anxiety attack. I thought about this example for a while because my wife asked me and the best example I could think of is that feeling you get when you tilt too back in your chair before you fall forward and resettle yourself or if you are unlucky and just fall backwards. Think of that split second feeling, but imagine that it lasts way way longer than a split second. Now think of trying to anything never the less playing a football game in front of tons of people. Glad he was able to get diagnosed. Before I figured it was fucking horrible.  [info]  [info] 1481769645
V4ST4 [info] I've already invested in a lock for my chest. I will be sleeping with my phone and wallet in my bed next to me. I really want to do this without all that build up. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and take medication for it. I'm afraid that mentally I will not be able to handle this without my grades and mental health suffering.  [info] None [info] 1507772479
Tinabird20 [info] When Doctors Suck. Warning I'm going to talk about some topics specific to those of us who menstruate. If you don't want to read about that don't read this post.  I saw another post about a bad doctor and switching your primary care physician. So I thought I'd share my story as well.   When I was 14 years old my saint of a Primary Care Doctor switched to strictly pediatrics. So my Mom chose a new doctor.  Well being a young girl I didn't know that the things that happened weren't acceptable, or that I had a choice to switch doctors. Here is the list of things that finally at 23 made me kick this particular doctor to the curb.  1. I was on the boys wrestling team in high school. When I went to the doctor to complain of knee pain. He scolded me for "being silly enough to be in a boys sport" and that "girls aren't meant for that kind of physical activity."   2. When my periods were so heavy I couldn't go to class without having to change my tampon every hour he put me on birthcontol. The pill lessened the heaviness but prolonged my period to 15 days. When I complained he shrugged and said he already put my on the pill there was nothing else to do. I didn't know until college I could just change types of birthcontol.    3. I was diagnosed with anxiety and after that any and all ailments were chalked up to me being anxious and dismissed.    4. Had an untreated sinus infection I went in for three times. Each time I was told I just had a cold go home. This weakened my immune system and made me miserable for a month or longer. When I went to the emergency room because of a bladder and ear infection I was told I had a sinus infection. Three days of antibiotics later I was perfectly fine.   Basically moral of the story we are the customers of doctors and we should listen to their advice. But, if your doctor is dismissing your concerns get a new one. [info] None [info] 1556304573
NightOwlMordecai [info] I honestly just love this game. I got into D1 right between Crota and HoW, which happened to coincide with when I was diagnosed with anxiety. I'm a huge space nerd and games like Mass Effect always really chilled me out for some reason so I decided to check out the D1 demo for the 360, and bought it the next day. For some reason this game is like a meditation for me, I'm really able to relax and lose myself in it.  I actually convinced my entire crew (I was working at a Papa Murphy's at the time) to get into it and we would just spend most of our work days talking about Destiny and not getting anything done. I'm from Northern Colorado. Thanks! [info] None [info] 1561617834
runny6play [info] Depressed and in stress Hi all, I'm 24 years old who still lives with their parents and failing out of collage again for the second time. I have ADHD and I thought where my problems lie (with executive control) but I found out this year I was diagnosed with anxiety as a child, as well, and treatment was never pursued. I don't have terrible social anxiety, and in the past it wasn't a huge issue for me high school,except maybe English,was fairly easy for me was but as soon as I get below a B in a class in collage all my grades tank and I just avoid my problems, when I attempt to deal with them i end up internally freaking out and very frustrated so then I avoid them more. I want to be a successful software developer someday, I am very anxious and depressed about where I am now. As I'm typing this I should be studying for a math class that if I pull it together and study for I could get a C but because I'm scared of getting kicked out because I'm on probation and failed a class. I've started smoking on and off as it greatly downplays an attack. It really sucks to have an executive function disorder on top of anxiety as I always had a problem of scope mentally. Not being able to focus on the big picture is a problem when you have pessimistic anxiety. [info] None [info] 1524848958
Cutel1ttlebutterfly [info] I can see how the relationship with my dad left me feeling lonely and anxious as an adolescent and later on as an adult.  My dad was violent and aggressive with me (a boy) and he was never kind when I showed even the slightest feminine mannerisms.  I adored my mom and women in general: singers, teachers, classmates, and my dad made me feel like there was something wrong with that.  Reading this article, I can see how our relationship greatly influenced my feelings of loneliness and anxiety.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and stress disorders and I lament that I had to go through what I did and what I am still going through.  I work with young students and I feel sad that some of them may be going through what I went through once.  (Again, another reason why planned parenthood should be taught and practiced in every society!) [info] None [info] 1513829533
undeserving_sci [info] I'm trying therapy soon. I'll let you know how it goes? I've been diagnosed with anxiety and persistent depressive disorder. Something I suspect many of us suffer from possibly. [info] None [info] 1561339992
cheeseandwine [info] Hey, while I'm well out of highschool now, I still know that feeling. It wasn't till my final year of uni that I was diagnosed with anxiety - I'd worry about not getting good enough grades and disappointing people, ignore whatever assignments I had to do till it was almost due, panic because I hadn't prepped enough, do a rushed job and not get the grades I wanted, and go through the whole spiral again the next time.  The advice on here is really good, especially with the exercise and getting restful sleep.  One thing I'd modify is while Pomodoro is great once you get into it, I found that I couldn't focus for a whole 25 min when I started.  What I did instead was shorten the time - 3 minutes, tops.  It sounds stupid, but you CAN do 3 minutes.  And once you've started, it's easy to hit reset each time you get through your 3 minutes, and then you've completed your 20-odd minutes before you realise.  Also - just launch into it, if you know you have to read something, or write an outline, do it.  I would get into a trap of writing a to-do list for everything, and while it can be a useful tool to get your head in order, make sure you don't get stuck writing lists instead of your assignments.  The hardest thing for me to come to terms with was that those negative voices in your head are just that - in your head.  They are not a accurate reflection of your abilities, they are your worst aspects trying to sabotage your self worth.  When you catch yourself thinking like that, stop, close your eyes and take a deep breath and realise that you can do this.   The first few assignments can be tough going, but you can do it :)  Good luck!!  [info] None [info] 1355736680
Ailouros_Venom [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety.  I was livid reading all of the demands and then the NEED for the spotlight.  Holy shit. I was almost seeing red.  I got such a justice boner when you called her out.   [info] None [info] 1503721929
Haizenberg [info] Decreased my feeling of anxiety, even though I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder. [info] 83 days [info] 1432098963
joeymason420 [info] AITA for paying my subway fare rolled up I take out a subway fare ticket to keep in my hand as I walk towards the subway. I'm fidgeting with the fare, rolling the paper. I walk towards the ticket collector, Bob. The trains at my station go quick and as I don't like missing the train, I push in my ticket rolled up into the collectors container and run off.  (I fidget with things to calm myself down).As I'm running towards the stairs that lead to the subway platform,"Bob" says "Come back here. Miss." and I run towards him. The following happens. Bob: You need to play the fare again.Me: No, I already paid.Bob: Why is it rolled up?Me: Because I take the ticket fare out way before coming to the booth so- like - um -yeahBob: You can't put it in there rolled up, there are people who cut the fares in half and roll them up to make it look like the full ticket. So you have to pay again.Me: I was trying to get to my subway and I just -um -if -Isn't there a way you can take the ticket out so you can see the ticket for yourself?Bob: No, I don't have access to that.Me: Can I like take it  out -and -do&amp;#x200B;I kept saying um, and playing with my hair. I realized I was going into panic where I was going back and forth on what I should do to prove I was innocent. (like get a fork, get side view pic of fare) but, I saw a lady waiting for her tickets. I don't like wasting other people's time and my anxiety was getting the better of me so to not waste anyone's time I pulled out another student ticket on my phone case.&amp;#x200B;Bob: See, thats what it should look like going in.Me: \*Proceeds to fold it like in the collectors booth\* (I was going non-verbal but I was going to try to take a photo of them rolled up together).Bob: What are you doing, fold it back up - yes see look. This is what it should look like. This is an educational experience on how you should put in your ticket.Me: \*reluctantly puts it in the collectors bin".Billy: See that wasn't so hard was it? You can go now.&amp;#x200B;I'm a pushover and I care for not wasting other people's time. He didn't know that.  I wanted to tell him that I was diagnosed with anxiety but Im not the most abrasive of peoples ( I didn't have my medical bracelet on me to show him, or at least thats what my head told me since it could at like "definitive proof"). I wanted to pull out a fork but, I didn't know for sure where it was in the bag or if he would think I would have any malicious intent. I wanted to take a picture with my phone but I was getting increasingly upset, and about to loose my composure. I wanted him to give the tickets to the lady who has been enduring this conversation with him and I but I couldn't really speak, so I put it the fare in the collectors bin.&amp;#x200B;TL:DR I put  a rolled up subway fare into collectors bin, collector tells me to pay again and I do because anxiety. I didn't get the chance to prove my innocence. He argues people cut fare in half to trick tellers like him. Am I The Asshole? [info] Partassipant [2] [info] 1555650753
AWeebByAnyOtherName [info] I guess I have anxiety. New to this. Hi All,Recently I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I was on an anti-histamine for a bit. I'm about to start on SSRI. Therapy, exercise, and dieting didn't work. Apparently, this all started when I was just about to graduate from school. I was also working a full time job. I used to drink energy drinks every single day but I quit. No more caffeine even as I worked. I would say, I was working 60-80 hours a week. I also had a traumatic experience that same year. To cope, I drank nearly every other day for two weeks. I thought that 4-5 beers was nothing. My anxiety was worse just when I was about to graduate. When I finished, I thought it would go away. I have two masters degrees with multiple publications but working a job that I am immensely overqualified for. I'm not a writer but I am good at other stuff. I started a company and now I'm shutting it down. I live with my parents. I'm 30. I did too much and resulted in nothing.The reason why I made this post was because just typing about it made it a bit better. Before posting here, I was writing a "just in case" note (it was a note detailing what my new symptoms are and to blame my doctors. I plan on living a LONG time.) I felt nauseated, dizzy, and a hot flash and it felt like the end, but it was a panic attack that one anti-histamine pill fixed in 30 minutes. I always thought that I would be living alone for the rest of my life but I'm thinking I might just go out there. Not sure what I am looking for but anyways, hi everybody. My interests are manga, video games, and watching the same set of tv shows on end (Psych, Monk, Burn Notice, The Nanny, 30 Rock, Drew Carey Show, Scrubs, King of the Hill, Regular Show, Adventure Time, Parks and Rec, Everybody Loves Raymond, and The Office). I might be just posting on and off. [info] None [info] 1547699398
pkosuda [info] Going to a sporting event. I always worry some emergency will happen and I'll be trampled to death in the crowd. Or leaning against a window/window sill in a 3+ story building. I always think it'll break and I'll fall to my death so I'm nervous leaning against them. I have been diagnosed with anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1393083909
swingerofbirch [info] I've heard of ADHD being misdiagnosed as GAD because the lack of focus causes frustration/anxiety and a feeling of being out of control. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 14 and then at 18 my psychiatrist tried me on Adderall for a week and it seemed to make my anxiety better than years of benzos/SSRIs but it made me shake physically so I was scared of it. I always wonder whether I was misdiagnosed and should have stayed with it. Anyhow, very difficult to know how the psychiatrist would respond unfortunately because of it being a controlled substance. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1572850214
novusflorae [info] DO IT! DO IT! DO IT!Well, I have been wanting to do comedy for a very long time. But I always chalked it up to "oh, but I am just conversationally funny." Last year I met a girl who ended up being my other half - one of my closest pals. Her and I clown all the time, and it really opened up a can of worms. I started to go to more and more comedy shows, frequenting open mic nights, and really just enjoying watching people just give it a try. I was going to do a routine last summer time, but I always made up excuses of why not to. THEN three weeks ago I was diagnosed with anxiety/ADD - ADD I totally expected, but anxiety wasn't even on my radar. BOTH explained so much. I started to take Ritalin to help me focus, then all of a sudden I was able to actually do all the different creative stuff that I always felt overwhelmed by. Started to paint (first time in 2 years), sew, and write down comedy monologues.My friend was hosting an open mic this weekend, and I felt, "what the fuck, just go ahead and do it." So, I had a funny thought about how excited I am when I get my period even when I know for damn certain that I did not have sex in the past 28 days and I know I couldn't be pregnant - After seeing a drop of blood during a restroom break at work. I sat down at my computer right after and wrote down a stream of thought. Practiced it for three days, and it turned out to be set for the night.  As for the courage - I am not sure. Haha, I didn't feel that much anxiety going up to the mic when my name was called. I do not have problem with public speaking - I was a TA for undergrad/grad courses and a MS/HS class tutor for 4 years. I really don't care about getting laughs for my jokes, because really I just LOVE a captive audience. Its empowering to have someone have to pay attention to you because they're future depends on it. With my students it was their grades, and for the audience its if they're going to have a good time or not. I would joke around with my students, and their bonus question would be "What joke did Ms. Novus make when talking about mitochondria?"It wasn't that bad, and everyone was super encouraging. Even if I had bombed, that would have been great too. Because I know not everyone likes grapefruit, and that doesn't make the grapefruit any less of a grapefruit.  [info] None [info] 1531152394
PM_ME_4_COKE_HOOKUP [info] I'm 24 and I've never had a seizure. Could I still have epilepsy?I know I have anxiety.I've been diagnosed with anxiety, panic disorder (under control mostly), ADHD. [info] None [info] 1440417662
NudePenguin69 [info] Mine is more of a personal one rather than song meaning specific.Twice's Fancy came out the day after my first ever panic attack sent me to the emergency room for 14 hours.  I got home at 4am from the hospital and was physically and emotionally exhausted but I stayed awake because I knew the new Twice song was about to drop.  I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder shortly after that, and for a while, I couldnt listen to Fancy because it triggered memories and feelings from that night that flared up my anxiety. Recently however, now that my anxiety is well regulated by medication and I am half a year removed from the incident, Fancy has become a song that reminds me of what I overcame.  My struggles with anxiety earlier in the year were the scariest thing I have personally endured in my life, and Fancy reminds me the no matter how shitty things seem, life goes on and it will soon pass. [info] Jihyo | Juri | Lua | AleXa | Yoohyeon | Lisa | Ryujin | Hani [info] 1575071798
Lionflower13 [info] Me.But, it's getting better since I have started taking ADD meds. I was diagnosed with anxiety first and given medication to help with it. I was still getting overwhelmed because I couldn't tell when I was taking on too many things in my life (inability to regulate).And, transitions kicked my ass. Always. I could go to the gym for six solid weeks, get sick for 5 days, and never go back to the gym because my groove was thrown off. And, forget going from writing instructions to suddenly being interrupted for an emergency meeting. All that did was put me in a foul mood because I liked my hyperfocusing.After being diagnosed with ADD and placed on the appropriate meds, I am better able to adapt to transitions and uncomfortable environment, but it's taking longer than I thought to get to a point where I no longer need the anxiety meds. It has been 6 months, and I keep making progress, but it's baby steps. [info] ADHD and Parent [info] 1366666500
CardioPumps [info] Not sure if they count as antidepressants but I have been taking SSRI pills since 2-3 weeks and they work fine. I am the same me, only a bit more relaxed and my mind is on ease. Nothing BIG happened though, it is not a magical pill obviously.My psychologist prescribed them since I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1448221417
SensitiveEase3 [info] Health Anxiety That's Hard to Shake, Help or Advice Would Be Appreciated! So I always have sort of been a hypochondriac since I was little, but things got out of hand one day when I smoked too much of a joint and had a panic attack for two hours. If I smoked too much weed in the past or had edibles, it would mostly result in me having panic attacks; however, that one panic attack from the joint for some reason really messed me up. I don't touch thc anymore because of that. I went to sleep like normal that night, but later in the morning, suffered a panic attack for the first time without being drug induced, and ever since then, was on edge constantly. The anxiety got so severe that for months, all day and night my heart was beating fast. I couldn't sleep but a few hours a night in the dorms at school, and eating was difficult. People saw that I wasn't well, and that the color was drained from my face in addition the the dark circles under my eyes. I was desperate for help but the school's health care barely did anything to help me. I went home a week early before thanksgiving break 2018, and was almost considering taking a leave of absence from school. I was 24 at the time and am typing this a year later after the incident. During the early week I took off, I was visiting the doctors for my issue with anxiety and lack of sleep. It was as if I couldn't calm my nervous system down. The doctor noticed my heart was racing a bit and decided to give me an ECG, and everything was fine and I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.  They also prescribed me Celexa (Citalopram) of 10 mg which I think has helped a bit. It took me a couple more months after the doctor visit just to feel somewhat safe again, and the little sleep I did manage to get was welcomed with a racing heart in the mornings. Eventually I was able to start sleeping a little better, and now I get okay sleep at night, way better than it was back then, although the quality doesn't seem as good. Despite all this, I am doing a lot better don't get me wrong, but this whole experience has left me shaken still. I now obsess constantly about my heart and heart rate. I have a compulsion to check my pulse all the time, and if it seems a little fast I start to worry a bit. A few months back I was getting panic attacks every week and anxiety attacks, and now they seem to be more under control since I looked into some self help exercises; however, I still obsess over my heart rate constantly and get anxiety attacks. I know I should find a therapist again but with school and being off campus plus coverage, it's difficult to get access to one at the moment. I'm sick and tired of all this and just want my life back the way it used to be before I smoked that joint. Anyway, I just wanted to get this off my chest, and was wondering if any of you have experienced something similar or have any advice, thank you. [info] None [info] 1578634636
throw-away_today8 [info] Does CBD oil work for anxiety? I was diagnosed with anxiety (GAD) 7 years ago and have managed it pretty well myself. I take 1-2 Ativan a year but that's it. Last week I was struck with the most horrible anxiety I've ever had times 2. I went to the ER because I thought I was having a heart attack. They said my heart looked good and that I was physically healthy. It's just anxiety. I took Ativan for 4 days and then suffered a severe 48 hour headache coming off of it. Now the anxietys back and I'm back at work. I live in a state where cannabis is legal. I'm not interested in getting high. But there is CBD oil with only 0.3% THC and if it relieves anxiety with no side effects like benzodiazepines have then I'm interested in trying it. Does anyone have any experience with it for anxiety? Thanks. [info] None [info] 1488310345
YoLazySammich [info] See I was like this as a child too. I would cry, not wanting to leave my family to go to school cause I feared they would be dead when I got home, or that no one would pick me up cause they've left me. It was definitely a strange fear. I was diagnosed with anxiety, and as I get older, the irrational thoughts just seem to go from one topic to the next.  [info] None [info] 1455928843
Emilieellis [info] Feeling like an orphan My dad isn't in the picture. He left when I was two to persue his love of gambling. My mum raised me by herself. She is a great lady. But now we don't get along at all because she doesn't want me to go out with my boyfriend I've been diagnosed with anxiety... Now all of a sudden my dad wants to meet up with and come back into my life. I don't have a place for him. I have made barriers and mental defenses in regarda to my dad's absence. Is it a horrible thing to do to say I don't want to see my dad? I don't the man. He wasn't there to see me ace my exams and get into a great college. I'm 20 and the last time I saw him was when I was 16. Is it ok to tell him no. I feel so guilty but I don't to be let down yet again by him. [info] None [info] 1466598154
JoeChristmasUSA [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in high school. Essentially, if I am faced with a problem in work or personal life, I could not sleep if it was solved. It would play over and over and roll around in my head, even if I could do absolutely nothing about it in my head. And often these "problems" were solved in minutes, after being built up for hours on hours in my mind.I am now 1 week into a doctor-guided "tapering off" of my medicine. After a year of treatment I feel much better. [info] None [info] 1447297643
cutiecarol [info] I’m a great big mess of pelvic issues and anxiety and I’m just hoping someone can relate… Hi everyone! Very new to Reddit. I have sort of a vast array of mental/physical health problems but I feel like IC is my “main” diagnosis so hopefully this is a good place for me to rant. To give you a bit of backstory: I started having vaginal pain when I was around 11 or 12 (I’m 21 now). Just a constant burning swelling sensation that no one could ever quite diagnose. By the time I was in high school it didn’t bother me too much anymore (I’m assuming it was somehow related to puberty and just went away on its own). Throughout high school I surprisingly didn’t have many pelvic complaints, however this was around the time I was diagnosed with anxiety/OCD and I began to notice that I was constantly clenching my pelvic muscles whenever I was stressed. Especially if the thing I was worried about was somehow related to sex (irrational fear that I was pregnant, irrational fear that I was a sexual deviant, neither of which were ever true of course, but if you struggle with OCD you know the kind of bizarre delusions it creates).Fast forward to when I was 18 and starting college, I started dating a boy I liked very much and thus began the horrible combination of lots of alcohol and lots of sex. I barely ever drank in high school (literally only once or twice) and I didn’t have sex very often at all with my high school boyfriend, so sex and alcohol were two things that my body was not very used to at all. Yet there I was, chugging straight vodka every night and having sex sometimes twice a day (I’ve always had at least a little bit of pain during sex, even on a good day, so I would drink in order to numb the pain and be able to enjoy myself and it created a vicious cycle). Big surprise, I started having insane UTIs. At least once a week I would wake up with excruciating bladder pain. It didn’t matter how much water I would drink to counteract all the alcohol, or how diligent I was about peeing after sex, bladder infections were completely unavoidable. I was making very frequent trips to urgent care (sometimes even spending nights in the emergency room, on the occasions when I was peeing blood and I could feel the ache of the infection spreading to my kidneys). I quickly realized that this was just not the lifestyle for me and I dropped out of college. I continued dating the same guy, and he was very understanding when I told him about my issues and was willing to cut back a bit on both sex and drinking with me. I was able to manage quite well at home for a year or so, with UTIs only popping up here and there when I didn’t take extra precautions. Discovering D-Mannose (and taking lots and lots of it) was a life saver. So at that point life was good: I’m 19, I’m at home running an online business, managing my bladder issues and anxiety, enjoying a pleasant relationship with my boyfriend. It occurred to me one day that I wasn’t really enjoying sex if I wasn’t drunk, and wondered if the antidepressant I was on (Lexapro) was causing a low libido. I made the STUPID decision to quit Lexapro cold turkey. This is where all hell breaks loose. I went through a few days of withdrawals, and on around day four of quitting I could actually feel my sex drive rising to a normal level. That night, I had the most amazing sex with my boyfriend. I’m a little embarrassed to admit that in my almost 20 years of life it was the first time I was able to enjoy sex sober. I was totally into it, I had absolutely no pain, and we didn’t even need to use any kind of lubricant for the first time ever. Okay so this is where it gets weird. I ended up having an orgasm that just didn’t feel quite right. Like it didn’t feel quite satisfying and left me kind of on edge. I got this weird sensation of throbbing and pelvic fullness afterwards. I assumed maybe it was a UTI coming on that just felt a bit different than usual? Or maybe since I hadn’t had an orgasm in over a year (due to Lexapro), those unused muscles and nerve endings were feeling a bit frazzled? I tried to ignore it, but these strange sensations continued for a few days after having sex that night. Keep in mind I’m off my medication now and not managing my anxiety very well, so I’m getting progressively more and more freaked out about this. I started googling my symptoms (big mistake) and happened upon the topic of PGAD (persistent genital arousal disorder). Oh boy did this freak me out. I spent way too much time reading forums full of very miserable women suffering from this disorder and somehow managed to convince myself that this is what I had. It seemed impossible that it *wasn’t* the case, there seemed to be so many women who noticed similar symptoms after stopping an antidepressant. I wasn’t sure that what I was feeling was “arousal” (and in hindsight I don’t think it was at all) but the fact that I was describing my symptoms as “throbbing” and “tingling” was enough to convince my anxious brain that I absolutely had PGAD and I would never escape from this nightmare of a disorder.Thus began the most hellish year of my life (2019, age 20). Constant pelvic pain, constant tingling and fullness and throbbing, constant feelings of what I thought was “unwanted arousal”, constant fear of sex, fear that I would become aroused on accident, fear that I would start having “spontaneous orgasms” (something I’d read about on a forum and my horrible OCD brain had fixated on). I hadn’t had any kind of burning or UTI pain in quite a while, but I would have almost welcomed that back in place of all the awful fears and sensations I was having now. I stopped having sex completely, any time I did anything sexual both the anxiety and the throbbing/tingling/fullness sensations would only worsen. God bless my boyfriend for sticking through this with me.I was exercising like a madwoman because that was the only thing that seemed to help take my mind off of it. I was miserable from the moment I woke up from the moment I went to bed at night. I don’t know what was worse, the actual pelvic pain sensations or my terrible fear that I would spend the rest of my life tormented by what I thought was some weird sexual disease. Towards the end of 2019, I saw a light at the end of the tunnel. I flew all the way across the country to see a pelvic pain specialist. He had worked with lots of women with bladder issues, pelvic floor issues, and even my new greatest fear in life: PGAD. Seeing him felt like a miracle. He was instantly able to explain everything happening to me and calm all of my fears. He immediately diagnosed me with IC, which was probably causing all the feelings of fullness and throbbing. I also apparently have some sensitivity issues with my vestibule (which I didn’t even know was a thing), which probably caused my pain during sex all these years. I also have pelvic nerve issues (pudendal neuralgia I believe?), which was causing me to have all sorts of tingling and clenching pelvic feelings that sometimes ran all the way down my legs. Also, turns out I have lichen sclerosis, which is a painful vaginal skin condition and is just the icing on the cake of all of my problems lol. He couldn’t say for sure whether I had PGAD or not, but he explained that I didn’t really have a whole lot in common with the other women he had seen with that condition. (For example, I had never once felt the need to masturbate to relieve the symptoms). He sort of gently suggested that my mind had blown things a little bit out of proportion, and I was probably mistaking typical feelings of IC and pelvic floor issues for “arousal”. I left feeling very hopeful, and since then I have been doing SO much better. I completely changed my diet, no more alcohol, water is pretty much the only liquid I consume. No more acidic fruits like oranges. Definitely no more tomatoes or anything spicy. My diet is super bland and consists mostly of bread, plain chicken, plain noodles, and tons of water. But you won’t hear me complaining!!! I feel better than ever. I started taking Cymbalta for the anxiety and nerve pain, as well as an antihistamine every night. They seem to be working wonderfully. He also prescribed painkillers, but luckily I rarely have to take them.  So that brings me to today. I’m 21 now. It's been about 5 months since I saw the specialist. Most of my days are pain and discomfort free, but I do have the occasional flare up. I’m in the middle of one right now as I sit here writing this. At the moment, my main questions and concerns are:* How common is it to experience IC *without* sharp burning pain and frequent urination? I feel like my only symptom is constant pelvic pressure/congestion. I definitely get uncomfortable and the throbbing feeling worsens when my bladder is full, but not to the point where I struggle to hold it. I haven’t had true burning UTI-like pain in a very long time. But according to the specialist I saw I still do very much have IC. Does anyone else experience it the same way as I do? * Has anyone else mistaken their IC symptoms for something like PGAD? Does anyone else feel like their IC symptoms do sort of manifest as “arousal-like” feelings in a way? I remember the doctor telling me that sometimes our brains interpret urination and bladder-related sensations as sexual feelings for some reason, so hopefully I’m not alone in this. * This is random and bizarre but recently I’ve been getting this strange pelvic fullness feeling that’s a little different than usual. I’ve noticed it showing up around the time I’m on or about to get my period. It doesn’t really hurt, its just this awkward hyper-awareness that something isn’t right down there. The way I describe it to people is the feeling you’d get if you shoved a beauty blender up your vagina lmao. Very strange, but that’s truly exactly what it feels like. Not pain, just an annoying feeling that something is out of place. Does this sound like it might have to do with my bladder? Or one of my other issues? Has anyone experienced something similar? It’s different than the typical achey throbbing/fullness that I usually feel with flare ups. And its somehow way more bothersome despite not really being painful. * I still haven’t really been able to have sex (or do anything sexual), even now that I’m feeling better. It seems that even just the *feeling* of being aroused causes discomfort. It seems like the second any blood rushes down there it intensifies that horrible feeling of congestion I already have and just makes everything worse. I know painful sex is common with IC, but does anyone else have issues even dealing with the sensation of being aroused?Okay I’m just rambling at this point so I’m gonna end it here. If you’ve taken the time to read this very long scatterbrained rant you are now my new best friend. If you have any advice for me, or just want to take the time to let me know that at least some of what I’m feeling is normal, that would be awesome. Wishing everyone health and happiness :) [info] None [info] 1587430139
kylepierce11 [info] I was always just like "Okay Kyle, don't fuck it up. Don't let your voice crack. Just say 'here' in a nice, normal tone and we'll get out of this just fine."I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years later.  [info] None [info] 1458258596
fredemar [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder back in 2007 and got my first panic attack in 2010. For me it was also a point in my life when I was stressed out about multiple things, and I just snapped I guess. That feeling of your first panic attack stays with you for a while, it's scary. It helped me to see a psych about it. With her I trained so that I could feel the panic attacks coming, and knew what to do. For me I start having a tingling feeling in my arms, signaling that I need to get up and go do some exercises (that makes them 'go away' most of the time). She also made me realise that the things I feel when having a panic attack is normal, it's my body and it happens even during my 'downtime'. So during a panic attack I have a high heart rate, so she made me do jumping jacks until my heart rate was up when I was feeling good. Same thing about dizziness. [info] None [info] 1568995633
TecumsehM [info] If all work is constant stress to you, you have no worked hard enough to find a career. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD but I work 10 hours a day, 6 days a week in a career I love. The hours aren't the problem, you are [info] None [info] 1545346099
likestosleep [info] I'll probably get hell for this, but I think it may be helpful. Some points that I would like to note are that I was only in an abusive relationship for 3 years and I am currently I mental health professional. It wasn't until I was with my current SO that I realized that I had turned in to my so hated ex. I would yell and scream and manipulate. It's a wonder he stuck it out, but he also made therapy a must. I didn't want to go at first for many reasons. I was strong and didn't need it, I shouldn't still be affected by the abuse, and because I help people with problems, I'm not the one that has them.  Right? Oh so wrong.I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD along with anger issues. Through the past year and a half I have learned so much about myself and even more so, how to handle my emotions in a healthier way. You can see that there is a problem and you want to fix it, so make that step. I can't tell you how thankful I am that I did.  [info] None [info] 1453754140
harley_44 [info] Diagnosed with ADHD at 23 Hey everyone,So I was diagnosed with ADHD inattentive type about 6 weeks ago..Started on meds two weeks ago. I'm in grad school and my life took a turn for the worse when I started failing my classes... People have always described my personality as a "hot mess", scatterbrained, all over the place, and that I just don't have my shit together.. As happy as I am now that I'm getting this taken care of, it's been really overwhelming to me that all of these problems I've had for 10 years or more could have been resolved if I had been diagnosed correctly as a kid.. I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD when I was 9, because I was so unorganized, frequently lost homework, and never paid attention in class. I'm changing now and doing my best to just move forward, but because of all of my ADD related problems I've missed so many opportunities in life, destroyed all of my romantic relationships due to my lack of emotional control and outbursts, and pushed a lot of good people away.. I've been seeing a psychologist for about 7 or 8 weeks now. But I just still feel alone learning that I have this "disorder" at 23 and that I would have never just "snapped out of this" on my own.. Does anyone have any experience with feeling this way? It's been so great getting this all figured out, I just wish I had someone to talk to who's going through the same journey. [info] None [info] 1459021671
throwaway231918 [info] Can't bring myself to gain weight. Trigger warning for weight issues.Full disclosure, I've been diagnosed with anxiety but I do not have an issue with an eating disorder or BDD. I'm very controlling about my weight. Weight gain has been a huge trigger for me over the last few months. I try and keep my weight at 45kgs which I can acknowledge is underweight. The problem is I have a job interview requiring healthy BMI and I get extremely anxious everytime my weight even gets close to the 50kg mark and I have to skip a few meals to reach a weight I'm okay with. I just need to hit that mark so my BMI is stable and normal but it feels insurmountable at this point. I have my next appointment with my doctor on the 29th, my interview is on the 28th. Any advice would be great [info] None [info] 1560790043
madmaxturbator [info] He had no clue how much a single pill would affect him, so to take two and then an ambien is intense.That’s a terrible way to prescribe meds.I have taken pills recreationally and also for medical issues / anxiety. In both circumstances it’s good to start with low dosage to understand your tolerance / threshold. That’s what a good doctor will do... When I was diagnosed with anxiety, my doctor told me to take .25mg klonopin. Then work your way up, if it’s not helping with the anxiety.Popping two Xanax and ambien for what was his first time trying those meds is really reckless. Dude is defending his doctor, but she sounds like a terrible doc frankly. Mixing strong meds like that in a fucking airplane (ie medical help is very limited) is insane. [info] None [info] 1527699410
tossmecookies [info] Is this wrongful termination? I had been with a company in Oregon for 4, going on 5, years when I moved from one role to another. Around the same time was when I was diagnosed with anxiety. I told my supervisor because this was a rough transition for me and she was very supportive. She went to her boss for guidance. It turned out her boss had a son/daughter with the same issues so he gave her pointers on how to work with me.One day I was called into her bosses office. I was friends with this supervisor because my wife had worked for him earlier on. He noticed I was struggling in my new position and mentioned that there was someone on another team who wanted to transfer to what I was doing. In return he said I could move into his spot. I was told that the job had less grey area than the one I was doing currently and "if I had any issues I could move back." This was the 1st supervisor to tell me this.The next day I get a 1 on 1 meeting invite with the departments director. She brought up the transfer, because she had to approve it. She asked what my thoughts were about it. I told her I was scared to move into something I knew nothing about and she told me "If you don't succeed in this role I will find a place for you on the floor." The second person to tell me this.I was the most recent person hired for this new role. I was in the department for 7 months. During this time I had a few meetings with the director. She told me on more than one occasion that I should have never brought up my mental state with my last supervisor and how dare I put them in a situation to where they always have to watch how they act around me. Once I even pulled her aside to mention that she seemed distant towards me lately and asked if she disliked me.The day before I was let go I was asked to wear business dress. I failed to do this. The very same day I had waited to use my lunch break to work out in the gym for the first time. I was late to a department wide meet and greet.I was pulled into an office by the director who said I'm being laid off. I asked why and she said it was house cleaning. I brought up that she told me if I didn't succeed that she was find a place for me. "House cleaning" she kept saying.I asked her why and she said that she wasn't legally allowed to tell me and that she didn't want me dwelling on it, hinting to my mental state.When I spoke with HR they told me that the director never even turned in my papers and nothing was documented. They also mention that the legal talk was horse pewp.I feel that she was looking for any reason in the book to fire me because I made her worried about how to be around me.Is this wrongful termination? [info] None [info] 1385542387
schrodingerscatapult [info] Possible marfan... How do I ask doctor to test me? I've been concerned about this for a while. I have a lot of signs. Pectus excavatum, extremely crowded teeth, myopia, my fingers are bendy, and I had a lot of stretch marks on my butt growing up. I'm not particularly tall though, 5'10, not tall for a guy at least (I am a 24 year old guy). The other thing is that I've been diagnosed with anxiety due to excessive health worry. I've been to the doctor a lot about symptoms but never said anything about marfan or EDS or any connective tissue disorders. How do I ask the doctor without sounding more like a hypochondriac? [info] None [info] 1418457926
MysteriousStyle2 [info] 22F constant headaches - cause to worry or anxiety/hypochondria? Hey, so this is my first post so sorry if I break any rules? I'm a white 22 year old, 165lbs, 5ft6in woman (if any of that is relevant!). &amp;#x200B;For over two years, I have been experiencing headaches and other symptoms.I was diagnosed with anxiety. The reason I was diagnosed is because I am currently a student at university, and last year I went part time for the very simple reason of - complete inability to work. I managed to scrape by last year, but this year I am half way through my final year and I have done no work. Zero. Complete and utter lack of motivation. When faced with deadlines, I panic. Heart racing, brain foggy, panic. I've deferred deadlines to August. So, anxiety right?This is why I am asking a second opinion. I go to the doctor and I'm either considered just having anxiety, or having hypochondria. They can't even consider other options. But it's affecting my ability to study in a huge way, and I really don't actually want to fail my degree.  Counselling hasn't helped, neither have meds. My symptoms have gotten worse over the two years. So, here I am. &amp;#x200B;My symptoms: \- Headaches. Most days, and mostly all day. Most of the time it feels like my brain is being squeezed. They've been identified as Tension Headaches. Sometimes its a very sharp pain above my eyebrow that comes and goes. \- Brain fog? Basically I have found (and my friends have noticed) that I find it hard to think. I'll forget a word, or say the wrong word. I'll loose my train of thought or speech. This mostly happens if I'm tired or it's late in the day, but it's only been happening the last 6 months. I'll misread things. I've been sending off emails that have more misspellings and grammar errors than emails I sent when I was 12. \- To go with that, I feel like I've been getting dumber as time goes on. I don't know if that's an actual symptom or a byproduct of uni though.\- Lack of motivation &amp; lack of concentration \- Lack of appetite**- I really don't feel like myself. I feel fuzzy, like my brain isn't switched on.** That's the main thing. I don't feel like myself. &amp;#x200B;If this is psychiatric then I'll continue trying to get help from that area, but that's what I've been doing for the last two years. I've done CBT. I've done counselling. I've done anxiety meds (propranolol). I've gotten worse. That's why I was seeing if anyone has an idea for a medical reason this could be. I'm all set for this to be hypochondria or anxiety. I'm prepared to continue and try to muddle through. But if it's medical, I would like to know. Thank you. &amp;#x200B; [info] None [info] 1544300931
Greenhouse28 [info] Dizzyness Hi all,I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks about 6 months ago. And from about 6 months before that I had been complaining to the doctors about having random dizzy spells in the mornings. The dizziness now lasts pretty much all day, even on a good day for my anxiety. The doctors have now put that down to a symptom of my anxiety. I get crackling and ringing in my ears too so I'm convinced that the dizziness is not related to the anxiety. It literally has no correlation between its good days and my anxieties good days. My question here is, if it is related and any of you have experienced it, does anyone have any tips or strategies to lessen the effect as the dizziness is really starting to get me down now. If it helps, I'm 22, male, from the UK. First time poster on this sub Reddit. Thanks all I really would appreciate any help/advice no matter how large or small! [info] None [info] 1483357809
zekobunny [info] Had a serious anxiety attack last night Hello guys, I think this is an appropriate place to post.Some info about me. I am diagnosed with anxiety and deppression and take SSRI meds daily. I also enjoy smoking a joint every few days and never considered myself as someone who has a problem with weed.Last night, after a one week long t break, I decided that I shall smoke a joint before bed and chill a little bit. It all went well, I listened to some music, everything was nice and all. At one point I decided to go to bed and try and sleep, so I did.I successfully fell asleep but at about 5 in the morning I was woken up by the most dreadful feeling of fear, panic, shaking... I felt like I am the only person in World feeling like this and that I am fucked. The feeling is very hard to describe but it used to happen to me when I was younger (back when I wasn't even smoking). This time it felt serious though, my body felt like it was in grave danger but I knew there was no reason to feel like that, I was shaking head to toe and was seriously afraid for my life. I guess this is what they call an actual anxiety or panic attack.At the end I had to tell my dad I was feeling bad just so I could have someone comfort me and tell me that I would be alright. I decided to take my perscribed Lorazepam and tried going back to sleep, later the feeling went away. I don't know if weed triggered it somehow, I've never had problem with weed before. Maybe it's the combinaton of SSRIs and weed and even some caffeine. What are your thoughts, this was seriously a scary experience that I really want to avoid in the future. [info] None [info] 1549796932
AlaeniaFeild [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks about 15 years ago. I never felt right with the diagnosis. It wasn't until about 2 years ago that I heard of POTS and went to my doctor asking for testing. She did a poor man's tilt table test and sent me to the cardiologist. Saw a cardiologist, did a 14 day Zio patch monitor, turned out to be SVT (not severe) and POTS (diagnosed after neurologist visit). I don't take meds for the SVT though and no ablation unless something changes. My attacks are only every other day or so and don't last for more than a few minutes (usually less.) So it could also just be something that is monitored. This is only anecdotal of course and I don't know if obesity affects treatment in any way, but I just want to point out that even if it is SVT, sometimes it's just monitored rather than treated with anything. OP, good luck. It can be very scary when this happens. I really do suggest seeing a doctor about this and don't accept a panic attack diagnosis without investigation if it doesn't sit right with you. I know that we shouldn't be diagnosing ourselves, but this is one area where I feel women (especially young women like you) need to push to be heard.  [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1544299452
fligom [info] Found out I have anxiety, now what? So yeh, I never dare to post anything (so I just lurk), but this question has me consumed and it's time to stop feeling alone.For about a month now, I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Always knew there was something up, but didn't know what. Anyways, I have to wait for at least 14 weeks for professional help to start (queues at the anxiety centre) and I am stuck in limbo at the moment.Any tips/help with starting this quest on my own for now? Because I am insanely scared of everything that's coming my way, yet insanely happy I finally don't have to feel guilty for all these feels.Thanks! [info] None [info] 1500674334
FindingAmberMae [info] I literally admitted to being emotionally weak and suffering from debilitating mental illnesses. Fun Personal fact about me, I was diagnosed with anxiety, and panic disorders after I had suffered severe bullying in elementary school by students AND teachers for the sole reasons beinf 1, I refused to show an illustrated explanation of how I would come to a conclusion with critical thinkinng (Id always just know the math questions, numbers just made sense to me... They corrected the fuck out of this so I wasn't "picked on for being ahead and bored", and sure as shit my mental illnesses grew worse and worse the longer that had to deal with school, up until dropping out junior year.You see, simply because someone expresses their own personal experience with mental disorders or recognized medical conditions, doesn't mean that they are weak.If said person allows themselves to be the roll model we all need, and stay visible through all that torture and misdirected hate, I'd say we are pretty fucking strongly rooted, and will hold out much longer than your "need to be right" "need to be cookie cutter normie" to be important or lack of respect for people that come from backgrounds that you havenMt experienced firsthand. [info] None [info] 1486309420
Drew13 [info] Losing my friends because of anxiety It was only a couple of months ago that I was diagnosed with anxiety and every since I've been pulling away from my friends. Lately, however, the friends that I still have around seems to be getting annoyed every time I get a panic attack. I don't know what to do. [info] None [info] 1336329517
MereGirl [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety last year because things got *really* bad so I had to finally go to a therapist. She diagnosed my symptoms as anxiety and I started looking back through my life and realized it was anxiety whereas I thought I was crazy, abnormal, and lazy.  [info] None [info] 1450801380
loleezy [info] Any suggestions for dealing with anxiety without medication? I was diagnosed with anxiety over a year ago. I was going to therapy and got on a low dose of medication which really helped the over thinking, but I recently lost my job and got denied unemployment... so needless to say my anxiety is through the roof lately. I've been fortunate enough to have financial support from my bf and family, money saved ect... yet it feels like my worlds crumbled. I no longer have insurance to be able to go to therapy and for medication, does anybody have suggestions on how you cope with it?? Natural substances? Over the counter? Vitamins? Oils? Anything.... I tend to overthink, loss of interest in things, lately I've had insomnia and loss of appetite too. Along with the chest pains and all that jazz. Any insight would help! [info] None [info] 1481526536
etical13 [info] What the fuck is wrong with me.... Hello, my name is Gabriel and I was diagnosed with anxiety and hypochodriac disorder a few months ago. My anxiety symptoms went away, but I still have some moments when i feel lightheaded (this happens when i am in a place i am not comfortable in or have some stupid thoughts), muscle tension, tiredness, moments when I think "well, i'm sure I'm not gonna reach 30" and stupid thoughts, but at least I am not dizzy as before, I am not losing balance anymore, the blur vision went away, no more headaches, I don't have panic attacks which is great. ~~and also i'm not so hypochondriac anymore, at least talking about organ diseases... but now i think i am mentally hypochondriac.So... coming back to the stupid thoughts.. i think that my mind invents fears when it's bored... Like HARM OCD, there were thoughts that were scaring the shit out of me in which i imagined killing my family in so many ways and after that killing myself. Thoughts that went away with the autosugestion "those are just thoughts, it's only in my head, it will never happen". I had moments when I thought I was having psychosis episoded when the faces of my classmates seemed to scare me (i got to the conclussion that i was auto inducing this... like, maybe everything else ) or when I was waking up from nightmares terrified and hoping not to hear voices or lose control. Well.. I've cured from those above, maybe I went insane (which is a fear of mine) and stop giving a shit about them. But now I have a constant thought (that kinda makes me worried) which is that i never had my own personality or i lost it... maybe it's a personality crisis, i don't know, you name it. I've always been imitating a character from a movie after seeing it, a character from a book after reading it (now I have moments when I am Will Greyson), a person that I liked, when I started wishing to go to an artistic college and become an actor I was giving myself a new character everyday and yeah.. all those characters are fighting against me, mentally.Maybe my anxiety lead me to this personality crisis because I am afraid to do something that I enjoyed in the past (like drinking, smoking, watching gore or horror movies, wander the whole town feeling invicible), but I kinda have thoughts that contradict in my head like... half of my mind is atheist and the other part is a christian, like half of my mind likes a person and the other part doesn't. My friends told me that I am someone else everyday....I kinda miss the old me everyday, the bastard who didn't give a shit about dying and doing a lot of stupid things... maybe if my parents went with me to a psychiatric when my random panic attacks began (which started after two weeks after a horrible experience when i got high accidentaly with 350mg of dextrometorphan and where i had 6 hours of constant panic attacks) maybe now I would've been normal. We went to a psychiatrist after living with the anxiety and it's symptoms for almost 3 months (after i had a major panic attack where i couldn't breathe and my mom said "that's it.. i'm making an appoinment for you next week")and the psych gave me 0.25mg of xanax and serlift (serotonin inhibitors i think) and sent me for 3 sessions at a psycho therapist, but I never took the pills and I got better (talking only about the anxiety symptoms) without them, but now I have those stupid thoughts....Sometimes I feel like I am not the one talking or when I think of what happend two days ago feels like remembering what happend a year ago.. feels like so much time have passed. Also I have so many deja-vusi am sorry for the way i wrote this and not making total sense.. but at this moment i have derealisation which I got used to.What do you say? I am mentally ill, right? [info] None [info] 1509372315
Oghurz [info] Photography as a Treatment or Therapy for Anxiety Hello everyone,  Awhile ago I have been diagnosed with anxiety.  As I was seeing what I could do to relax, I found out many people took photography as their own healing tool and I decided to give it a go since I already own the gear.  So I am going out lately based on a schedule in the sake of being out walking, relaxing and seeing the outside world from another perspective as many others.  Has anyone tried this for themselves?  If you did, do you have any suggestions or what helped you the most?In addition, my partner suggested me to share the photos I took each weekend on an Instagram account to engage with people thinking it might help or make me feel better.  However I am not an expert on growth etc as you can imagine.  Main aim is not to get (n)K followers or anything but I would like to engage with people better let's say. Does anyone have suggestions that I can follow? Any good reads, materials etc?  Also what do you think about sharing your photos on Reddit for asking criticism or appraisal?Cheers! [info] None [info] 1583334063
iMickeyx [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety. Social situations are a hard issue for me and any small flaw about myself makes me thing really down on myself. I studder and shake in conversation, as soon as I'm alone I'll start hating on my flaws which doesn't help. Being able to keep away from social situations helps me.  [info] None [info] 1484790743
eaueyon [info] Hi there. This is my first time posting and I figured that seeking assistance and support from a forum may help my current situation. Thank you for the assistance, it is greatly appreciated. F21 I was diagnosed with anxiety last year, Fall 2017 and tried therapy for 2 months before temporarily ended it. I recently started therapy again this August, however the sessions are inconsistent and at least one month apart from one another. I thought I was getting better last month, but recently I feel like its been getting progressively worse. The main symptoms that I’ve noticed include agitation, depressive episodes, and anger. I seem to have a lower tolerance with my partner and I feel like I’m starting to get more physical in terms of aggression. The last time I remember getting this angry was with my brothers when we were children. I am concerned that my anxiety is getting worse and uncontrollable. It could be my Nexplanon (birth control) hormones, but I’m unsure. I am afraid that I may need to start taking medications, what do you think? I understand that everyone is different, but I would like to hear some personal experiences or pieces of advice. Have any of you experienced this pattern? If so, what did you do to control yourself and what do you recommend? Thank you in advance for all your thoughtful responses. As the holidays approach, I’d also like to wish you Happy Holidays! [info] None [info] 1545041742
soniaxvx [info] First Post: Am I really weak? I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was 19 after having been through a traumatic life changing event.I get anxiety/panic attacks and even though I know they will pass they feel so real to me at the moment. My biggest problem now is my boyfriend doesn't help and even though I explain to him what happens when I go through one,he tell me I'm weak constantly and it really hurts and makes my anxiety worse. I don't think I'm weak. Is there anything I can do to make him understand? [info] None [info] 1474225153
xisaloser [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder (not social anxiety, speaking more of depersonalization/derealization/paranoia) and make up helps me but in a different way. It's not about "I have make up on so I gotta get out of my shell," but more "I am dissociating so I am gonna try 5 different eye-looks to focus on something else and get out of my head." I find it works better than trying to focus on reading or watching when my minds tends to wonder and pictures in motion can sometimes make me feel dizzy. I basically lay out all my eyeshadows and try to come up with looks, it actually needs my focus and some creativity so instead of over-analyzing myself or my surroundings I am like "do these go well together? maybe I should try to mix two contrasting colors, that would be interesting? Maybe I'd find a new use for this shadow" etc. etc. and then the blending is really relaxing to me as well. Same with looking in the mirror, of course that's mostly therapy doing, but I am not afraid to face myself when I go through phase of depersonalization. Before I'd see myself in the mirror and think "is this me? am I looking at myself? this is uncomfortable I need to look away," and now I am like "yeah that's uncomfortable but hey I gotta ride this one out." I guess we all have different ways to cope with anxiety, but I just see this particular task as really good to cope cause my mind doesn't wander.  [info] None [info] 1495642810
plushdroid [info] Thank you for your advice. I have been considering a therapist. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but I think it’s a great idea to go and see why I am in this rut. Thank you again.  [info] None [info] 1546015596
JstAnotherNormie [info] newbie advice I've only had 2 classes in no gi fundamentals, but my problem is that I will watch and listen to my instructors direction, but when it's time to actually do it and get down I go blank and totally forget everything I watched/heard. Is this normal when you start doing bjj/any tips? I was diagnosed with anxiety and it reminds me of being back in high school math where I would listen, but would instantly forget what I had just learned when it came to actually doing math problems, this happened until I started medication (which im still on at a high dose). [info] None [info] 1552097674
6irlsix [info] It's been almost 10 years since I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I work in a private cancer lab. I'm lucky because I have an independent position that requires me to speak with a limited number of people each day.  To be honest,  even when i'm having an anxious day,  work allows me to focus on something other than the things in my head. I love doing histology,  I love the relationships I've been able to cultivate.  However it solidifies my belief that just because you work with someone, doesn't mean you know them.  I don't socialize with my coworkers often so they know nothing about my anxiety. I try to work through my anxiety because I find my idle mind is a playground for negative thoughts. I would love to do sales but I have a feeling that my anxiety would cause a drop in company sales.  Of course thinking like that definitely indicates that I should stay away from sales. But I agree with the reddit user who said that they create a 'character'.   [info] None [info] 1529363346
UKGriff [info] It's hard to decide for me. Career wise I'm a winner, I'm 22 and a software engineer for a very good company (at least I think so). However when you look at my social/relationship part of life I seem to fail in every aspect, therefore I'm a loser in that area. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder but I don't like to claim that's the reason, because if it was then my career would suffer as well, but it hasn't so I just think it's me. I just suck and it eats away at me everyday.  [info] None [info] 1545971540
ikindalikeducks [info] College roommate constantly insults me and causes panic attacks Hey /r/advice I am literally at my wits end with my roommate on college. Lets call my roommate Alex. Alex constantly insults me and my boyfriend, along with telling all of their friends about how shitty he is. Alex also likes to constantly tell me how i deserve better and i swear to god he is not abusive at all and is only nice.  (I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder and Alex is full well aware of this btw) All she ever does is give me panic attacks, and stress me out constantly. She is so overbearing, and keeps on trying to rule my life that I literally cannot function without dreading going back to my room. She also won't listen to me or have an adult conversation and just ignores me when she's mad at me. What do I do? [info] None [info] 1475747640
bonschives [info] I wish I could get properly treated This is honestly just a ramble more than anything else because I can't stop thinking about the fact that my life could be so much better if my anxiety was actually treated. I was diagnosed with anxiety at the age of about 14 but I am in the UK and CAMHS did very little for me, like I went through CBT but it didn't really help me and I was just discharged about 6 months later. They did check ups and stuff but they never actually tried to help me with the anxiety itself after that point and when I finally brought up being treated again they said I was too old for CAMHS and just suggested I go to a talking therapy place which was the opposite of what I was comfortable with. Now I'm at university and I have been struggling to cope for years at this point but I don't know what to do and I feel like I lost all my teenage years because I was too anxious to ever do anything and now university of stressful but their mental health service isn't great and I don't know how to go back and ask for some therapy again and I just want to get better but instead I am just struggling and I desperately want to be treated but I can't bring myself to do it :( [info] None [info] 1584326214
FrequentEphedrine [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder back in 2002, and mindfulness wasn’t a “thing yet”. Cognitive therapy is talk therapy that uses a ton of mindfulness techniques -  the anchoring method, Tibetan singing bowls, etc. Back then, I was told to just think of a phrase or a song that I could repeat to myself; my husband knows when I’m starting to freak out because I don’t even notice when I start humming it now. [info] None [info] 1562544805
brown_t_poison [info] Interested in joining because I have been diagnosed with anxiety.. But I am having an anxiety on whether to join this session.... [info] None [info] 1539931952
MightyShiba [info] Good on you for going to therapy, that's a great step. I was diagnosed with anxiety during college so I understand feeling overwhelmed or just down in general. Try going hiking and visiting lakes and stuff. Being by yourself isnt a bad thing and being able to enjoy your own company will invite others in. Try talking to people at the lake or at a place you like, open up and invite some people to just hang out. It's a process for sure [info] None [info] 1556728709
Melodictrash [info] I'm An Teenager That Is Diagnosed With Extreme Anxiety. AMA! Heya! Just like what the title says, I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I have gone to a doctor, and after some testing, I have been proven that I have the mental illness. It's taking me a lot to type this out, but AMA! [info] None [info] 1581810881
thispersonlookswhite [info] I also take amitriptyline which has been ineffective. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but my neurologist was upset that I went through the therapy route first instead of ruling out anything chemical or physical first. Im actually surprised that the psyciatrist I saw 2 years ago never made me do blood work and assumed this is in fact anxiety and not a side effect of something not working properly. I work in front of screens allll day. [info] None [info] 1488730883
returnaxiety [info] Anxiety has returned... and OCD I wonder if this is common among us anxiety sufferers: I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder many years ago, but I only started to take the prescribed Escitalopram in early 2015-- for many years before that I tried to live with anxiety, but around 2014, it got so bad that I was hardly sleeping, nauseous all the time and it was really affecting my work, family and life-- I was also a raving hypochondriac thinking of heart diseases, cancers etc. So many tests were done to me just to appease my thoughts-- endoscopy, tons of bloodwork, xrays, echo stress tests, CTscans, etc. All negative (thank God!), although I was a long-term hypothyroid ever since I had RAI therapy for my previous hyperthyroidism. Finally, my physicians, after all the reassurances, and me still raving mad about sickness and feeling rotten all day, recommended I see a psych. I finally relented and was soon given Escitalopram-- this I took for 2 years-- and OH MY GOD! I WAS ACTUALLY NORMAL! After the first months of taking the meds, I was a new person! So, after 2 years, i decided to try and wean myself from the meds-- and starting early this year, I slowly decreased my meds, and in March I was no longer taking them.For the first few weeks, no issues, and I felt good-- but these last few weeks, I think my issues are slowly but surely returning-- I'm again bothering my wife asking her if she thinks my symptoms are those of VERY SERIOUS illnesses, started having restless thoughts again, etc.. and the OCD, MY GOD! THE OCD is BAD! Pretty weird OCD as well-- I feel the need to always pray and have that prayer end on a good word (i.e. after I say the final word of my prayer in my mind, the first word I should hear from the TV, the radio, or any sources, must be a "good" word. If I hear a "bad" word, say "death" or "down", then I feel so compelled repeating the prayer!! If I do not pray?? I feel i have not prayed enough and that God will give me all the misfortunes and health issues for real!-- So do i win the award for weirdest current OCD??). So there, is this a common occurence, that a few months after no meds, many of us relapse and sometimes even feel worse? I am choosing not to go back to the meds at least for now, as my psych and I agreed that I can try to toughen it out for a while because at least I know that it is anxiety-- but how am going to be sure it is still anxiety and NOT some newly acquired illness??As you can see, I am rambling-- and before I posted here, I was actually reading this sub, and at least felt good reading that I am not alone in this weird world of ours. [info] None [info] 1497151889
sativasurfer [info] I feel that marijuana legality has a big part to play in it. Here we are as a society raised to think of marijuana as a bad thing and harmful. They say it makes you lazy, unintelligent, and boring. I think that is total bullshit. It all reflects around the person. I may get some slack on this, but I think Joe Rogan said it best. If you go to rehab for marijuana...it's not the marijuana...it's you! I used to get nervous thinking I was addicted to marijuana at times. Then I went to the doctor for my trouble I was having in school. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADD. It all made sense now. I never really knew about anxiety until I started researching it. I like to get high like any other person does. It passes the time by, makes things more enjoyable, and improves my well being. There were times though where getting high was something different for me. It would calm me down and get that tightness out of my chest. I don't become very anxious often, but when I do...marijuana clears it up. It was at that moment that I realized that marijuana is a medicine. I had been getting high before just to have fun and use it recreationally, but after my diagnosis, it all made sense. They tried to prescribe me Xanax, but I declined. I would much prefer vaporizing marijuana than taking a prescription medicine such as that. I think you can get addicted, but if you do I think there is an underlying problem mentally. [info] None [info] 1386872978
nick_gaga [info] I hate my life I don't know if this is the right place to share, but I think to kill myself seriously. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder since 2008 and I'm already 24 and deeply disappointed in life. I've become better with confidence, but I still don't see results. Life is so sad to see other people around me being happy and successful... while I'm alone again and again. I used to be so happy with a guy... but this society judges gay relationships, so I had to stop and when I wanted to resume, he told me he can't move on after what I did to him... I can't express myself without being judged! I even stopped caring about other people's opinions, but I'm still alone... NO ONE approaches me anymore. I hate myself again... NOTHING CHANGED.But I AM IN CONTROL TO MAKE THE CHANGE... With one move I would finally be good enough to the society and myself... My problems will get solved even if the price to pay is be being gone. This is too much. I suffer every day, but finally have the determination to do it. I hate my body again and started cutting myself again. They say that life is good, well their lives ARE good from what I see. It's easy to give advices when you haven't been through it. Before getting old and die and destroy somebody else life in the meantime, I chose to end it soon. Living life with everyday struggles is not worth it after all. [info] None [info] 1539450908
ziggydog [info] My daughter and I both have POTS. I think it's far more common than doctors believe. For years I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, turns out, it was caused by POTS (postural orthostatic tachycardia syndrome). I recommend anyone with anxiety to investigate this condition.  [info] None [info] 1422903873
do-you-like-darkness [info] I worry too much.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and it's been a part of my life for as long as I can remember.  It's exhausting and stops me from doing things I otherwise would.  I hate it.  [info] None [info] 1541041176
meepmedeeply [info] Well I was diagnosed with anxiety many years ago in my teens (not that many, like maybe five or so.) and tried Buspar. It did help, but I stopped taking it because you're not supposed to drink with it and my twenty-first birthday was close.I just found a therapist online and called him. He called me back right away and scheduled me for an appointment the next morning. I've had one session so far, but this is as close to getting help as I've ever felt, thus far. He was pretty clear that it is OCD as soon as I explained myself, and that was actually a huge relief and what I needed to hear to aid me in my recovery/management.It is scary, but I am actually really looking forward to seeing him again this weekend to sort out some panic I've dealt with just this week, and frustration in relation to it.I really suggest taking this route first. I wish I had done this long ago before the counting, lip picking, etc etc got so out of control.  [info] None [info] 1419956793
j_saunders82 [info] Entitled woman causes me to have a panic attack because she doesn’t want to wait for a manager So a little information about myself that is relevant to the story. I have been diagnosed with anxiety (social and general anxiety) and I generally work front cash at a busy Wendy’s store. I’ve gotten used to the regular flow of customers and don’t get worked up very often.The Wendy’s I work at is only a year and a half old and at the time of this story it was less than a year old and was extremely busy as we are the only Wendy’s in our town and everyone just loves our food. (It’s as if they never ate at a Wendy’s before it’s crazy.) Our location has a bad habit of understaffing our shifts so the managers are often working on different jobs and can’t always come and help right away. On this particular day I had two managers on shift one on sandwiches and the other on back cash. (the first drive through window when they take the payment.) Both of these jobs are very important during a rush and you can’t step away from them without causing huge delays in service.I was working the front register taking orders and handing out food at a moderately busy part in the day. The dinning room had two customers in line and meanwhile the drive through and a line of car nearly wrapping around the building. I finish taking an order when a customer comes in clearly irritated with a sandwich in her hands. As these customers have complaints they are a top priority so I went over to assist her right away.M: “How can I help you?”EC: Unwraps burger and points to a specific spot on the burger. “There was a hair on my burger.”I looked at the burger and didn’t see a hair on it. I did however see a hair stuck to her nail but I put on my best customer service smile and addressed her.Me: “I apologize for the inconvenience what kind of burger was it? I’ll have them remake it for you.”EC: “I’ll just take a refund.”Me: “Not a problem ma’am.” Presses button for headset “I need a manager up front.” Addressing the customer. “If you can just wait right here a manager will be up to help you shortly.” She stepped to the side and waited. Meanwhile I took the order of the very patient customer who had been waiting in line for assistance. Now I’m very good at taking orders and can get people in and out of line very quickly so in a minutes time I finished taking the order and started to prepare the tray. As drive through was busy neither of my managers had a chance to come up to the front yet and this was unacceptable for our entitled customer.EM: “I’m still waiting.”Me: “I apologize. Both of our managers are busy at the moment and can’t come up right away. They will be with you shortly.”EM: “Are you saying I’m not important? I’m busy too and I don’t have time for this.”Me: “I’m not trying to say you aren’t important ma’am our managers are just busy and can’t come up at the moment.”EM: Now raiding her voice to yell at me. “You are rude! I’m busy and I can’t just wait around!”Me: “I apologize. I promise the managers will be with you shortly. I’ll try calling them again.”EM: before I had a chance to call for a manager yells at me again. “You’re trying to tell me I’m not important and you’re being rude. I’m busy too and I need to go.” I started to apologize again when my manager who had been on sandwiches heard the commotion and came to step in physically placing herself in between us and raising a hand to me to tell me to stop (she wasn’t mad at me just wanted to make sure I didn’t get yelled at more and to defuse the situation.) AM (awesome manager): “I’m sorry. how can I help you?”EC: “First of all your employee is rude.”My anxiety was really bad at this point in the altercation and I knew I was about to have a mental breakdown so I walked past my manager and the EC and into the back where I broke down and started to sob due to the mental breakdown that took a few minutes to recover from. My other manager saw me sobbing and asked what was wrong and I managed to tell her through my aggressive sobbing briefly what happened.I don’t know what happened to the customer after I walked past her and I never asked because I just didn’t want to have to deal with her. After I calmed down they moved me to back cash and my manager that was there took over front cash (back cash has less interaction with customers so it’s much easier for my anxiety.) All my coworkers that experienced the altercation told me that I did nothing wrong and that the lady was just rude and the manager that stepped in and saved me from this rude woman had experienced the whole thing and told me I handled the situation very well and that I didn’t do anything wrong. I didn’t get in trouble for the situation which was my biggest fear. Everything after that moment went fine and I have never seen that customer in our story again and hopefully I never will. [info] None [info] 1581309209
sweet-cutie-pie [info] Finally recovery feels like something real! This year has been hella crazy! I was going to marry my fiance but he dumped me in mid-January. I have to move in with my parents (they were a major trigger from my ED) and then COVID-19 come in and I have been lock-in for the past two months.But, not everything is bad... I'm still getting (online) therapy. The doctors, psychiatrists, psychologists and nutritionists that are helping are freaking amazing and I'm thankful for their work. I'm taking Paroxetine (12.5 mg) every morning and Trazodone (50 mg) for better sleeping. I was diagnosed with anxiety and EDNOS.My parents have become a major part of my support system, I was finally able to talk to them about my anxiety and ED. They've been really supportive and I no longer feel like they're a burden or trigger...I still miss my ex-fiance and that's honestly the most painful thing in my life right now, but I also feel all of this happened for a reason and maybe I needed this storm to lay back on and start working on being a better me.The most important thing is that I haven't binged and purged since December 2019. I'm still learning to eat healthily and trying not to put that much pressure to lose weight. Yeah, sometimes I feel like losing it and I overeat, but that's honestly nothing compared to the binges I used to have.The next step is setting actual goals: weight loss, better eating, more sleeping, etc. I'm shitless scare, but feel like I finally might be able to achieve those.I hope one day all of this will be just part of my past: things that help me grow and be the woman I wanna be.Hope all of you reading this can find peace during this quarantine. It will get better, I promise. [info] None [info] 1588104483
Kardinale [info] I was the classic underachiever in high school, but was still offered a full ride to an in state university. Where I struggled was freshman year, since I had spent high school just skating by and not giving a shit about my future in general. My first college semester ended with me skipping my finals and getting a .69 GPA. I took a year long break, during which I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. I retroactively withdrew from my first semester, giving myself a clean slate. I’ve been back for a year and a half now and I’m about to attain my 4.0, thanks to me giving a damn about my future and some studying. On another note, I’m done trying to have a social life lol. It’s just not possible for me [info] None [info] 1544495649
sedatedzombie [info] Seeing a psychiatrist soon. I've been diagnosed with anxiety but never been tested for ADHD, do you think she might? [info] None [info] 1551104031
anywanyw [info] Anxiety help?Desperate Hi ,This isn’t something I would normally do but recently I have been diagnosed with anxiety and it has been so out of control . I don’t feel like myself . Things like journaling and exercise that are meant to help become another thing for me to become anxious about because I beat myself up if I haven’t done them . I feel like I’m never going to get out of this . In addition I find it really hard to talk about how I feel . Any tips that could help ?Thanks I’m advance [info] None [info] 1572132425
HannahHelium [info] I have ADHD, ASD, OCD and anxiety, ask me anything! I was diagnosed with ADHD and ASD traits when I was 8, and I am now undergoing the disagnotic process for full ASD. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 14, and recently, at age 16, I have been diagnosed with OCD. I believe there is a lot of stigma around mental health problems, so I decided to allow people to ask me whatever they have been wanting to know about mental illness. I won't take offence, I just want to help people understand what it can be like. So go ahead, ask me anything [info] None [info] 1503144383
replicagaming [info] I'm starting college soon... Hi, this is my first time posting here so I apologize if I broke any rules. I'm starting college in a couple days and I'm absolutely freaking out about everything. I'm terrified of missing my bus and messing up my projects and just in general not doing well in my program. I know many people go through this type of transition but this has been causing my anxiety for nearly 2 months. I was diagnosed with anxiety about 3 months ago. I just thought since many people go through this type of change I'd be able to get some sort of advice to help me calm down just a bit, I don't any friends I like opening up to and none of them are very understanding of anxiety. Thank you to anybody who's willing to help :). [info] None [info] 1504485774
tubular_owl [info] My mother's friend is trying to set me up with someone. So, it doesn't matter why, but I was going to my school to play bingo last night, and along the way me and my parents picked up a friend of my mother's. Now, normally, this friend is actually fairly nice, even hiring me for some yard work and paying generously, so I don't have much of any reason to not trust them. However, about halfway to bingo, this person looks back at me from the front seat, calmly stating to the entire car, "I like to play matchmaker..." Immediately, of course, I assumed the worst, but I didn't interrupt at that point because I didn't know where they were going. "So, Tubular_Owl, there's this girl at my church named [REDACTED], and I think you two would get along. She's seventeen, and works at the local coffee shop, and I want you two to meet." Now, I am not aware as to whether or not this person knows that I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but out of the grace of my heart, I will assume they do not. However, the grace inside of my heart does not extend to my head, and my head immediately started to take the downward spiral into an existential panic attack. I turned to my father, asking him if I could survive jumping out of the car at the speed we were going, and when he informed me I likely couldn't, I just shut down for the rest of the ride, not even awknowleging the statement. I thought to myself: "I already have a crush, I don't need to look into this further." But... Now, as I think of the girl I have a crush on, and I think of the herculean effort it would take for me to tell her I like her, I almost want to give in to my mother's friend, and just go and meet [REDACTED]. Any thoughts on the matter, similar experiences? I need all the help I can get. [info] 🎉 1,000,000 Attendee! 🎉 [info] 1549237964
TJoestar [info] Yes, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety since a very young age. I have also had panic attacks for quite some time now, but it was the first time it happened in a moving vehicle. [info] None [info] 1531484876
Barneysparky [info] I'm not going to compare notes but I can give you some insights on what you might go through. I'm 50 and ran away from a good home when I was 12. I saw things and had things done to me. Until I was about 35 I was in complete denial that I couldn't just suck it up. Even though I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder before it was a thing. That came at about nineteen. On the outside I was doing well, owned my own business with no help,  had three kids married. I was too stubborn to get help. Don't be me. I do have a great life but I know I did it the hard way.  [info] None [info] 1481439299
throwawawawawawawaww [info] anxiety/ocd and my relationship I I've been with this girl for almost two years, and I was diagnosed with anxiety and ocd about three years ago. we've had our share of ups and downs, but recently i've been feeling pretty insecure and i'm worried that it's totally fucking over our relationship.we are long distance. i spent this week in the town she lives where my parents live as well and got to see her in between times she was working. up until she had to go to work, i found myself obsessively wanting to say/do "the thing," something sweet or some conversation about our relationship that would sum up how i feel perfectly and would make me feel like i shouldn't worry.of course, instead i just stumbled around the topic and said some corny bullshit that i wanted to badly to be profound. she told me "if we ever break up, it'll be mutual and it'll be ok, and i love you and don't want to break up, even if long distance is incredibly hard." we definitely see a future together, talk constantly, share most of our thoughts and much of our lives together. as much as we can!but i can't get over the anxiety and ocd triggers. i feel like a terrible romantic partner because i am always looking for validation from her. i need some advice for how to relax a little bit with this and let this stuff just settle down. I really love her and want to be with her for as long as possible. no one makes me as happy as she does, and no one else makes me feel quite like this – like everything is going to be ok. she tells me she feels the same way.even as i write this i have the overwhelming urge to try and get ahold of her and ask her how she is feeling about everything and basically requesting reassurance that she loves me and wants to do this. i feel like a child, like i can't trust her or remember past a week or two and feel confident in our relationship. any advice? [info] None [info] 1448752553
amoz2k12 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety before, I only really stress out when I'm driving if it snows or if it's thunderstorming at night. I'm really light sensitive and for some reason lightning in a night sky gives me horrible headaches. Other than that driving daily is just boring. I've driven 1000 miles alone before and that really sucked. [info] https://amzn.com/w/332121UEHWAN1 [info] 1452195874
sunshinecunt [info] I lost about 45 lbs when I went through my worst period of anxiety. I also had to force myself to eat. I noticed that much of my anxiety’s physical symptoms include stomach pain / cramps so I think that had something to do with it. But the food tasting bland is still something I struggle with. I also struggle with bulimia that was never diagnosed until after I was diagnosed with anxiety as well. [info] None [info] 1557510157
comawhite_ [info] A mix of bpd and social anxiety ! long post, and might be totally pointlessI've always been shy since I was a kid, and I've been diagnosed with anxiety among other things, and some extent of social anxiety (although i'm off meds now, by my own choice) I mean, of course, due to the bpd I always have a wavering sense of self... not sure if the rest of you would put it this way - but i think of it as different personality "suits" i slip on when i am with different people.  Lately it's been feeling like I'm getting increasingly out of touch with the personality "suit" I'm wearing.. it's like watching someone else saying/doing/reacting when it's really me. Like I'm so many people in one container, and my "core self" is just buried so deep, unable to control, but ever so self aware. So anyway, today during lunch at my workplace of 3 months, some of my colleagues started to talk about intro and extroverts, and one of my colleagues said to me "she's definitely an extrovert". I was stunned for a while, but I didn't argue much with him nor did I agree. Not that being an extrovert is a bad thing or anything really, I've just never thought I'll be labelled as one (as mentioned I have an extent of social anxiety and I THINK i have mostly been an introvert all my life) At the point, in fact, it just made me feel SO out of touch, between my "core self" and my work personality "suit". Like the people looking into my eyes are seeing someone that's not me, while I stare out from my eyes like I'm someone trapped in a body that's not mine. I have to admit, I'm really almost borderline obsessed with how people label me, to get a grasp of who I supposedly really am. It was a horrible feeling. Not the fact I was an extrovert, but the fact I don't even know the person my colleagues know as “me”. To them I probably seem outgoing, cheerful, and maybe even carefree. The fact they can't see through that supposed "facade" is really causing my anxiety to kick in. Might be because I, who should know myself the most, don't even seem to know myself, or this me, who is writing this post right now, is disappearing from the eyes of others. Like no one is ever going to accept this version of me. I hate this feeling so much I came home and I am just letting myself drown in all these thoughts and I feel suicidal and alone and can’t stop crying and just... shit. That feeling of who the fuck am I? Anyways this might sound dumb or whatever but I just had to tell someone and there’s nobody in my life who’d have a chance of understanding. Not sure what kind of advice I’m looking for either. :( [info] None [info] 1530730884
RealHumanHere [info] Interesting question. Not really, I have not been fined once, nor a speeding ticket nor anything. I have very high education (Ivy). But I am diagnosed with anxiety, and I am a perfectionist and control-freak, and I definitely over-worry about things, I've been looking forward to joining Freemasonry for a long time (many years), and since my interview is so soon, I was worried I had everything under control :P. But you've risen a good point, I should not worry, and if it works out, it does.  [info] None [info] 1466344827
mentalhealthinsuranc [info] Can I be on two health insurance plans due to privacy concerns and mental health? I am currently covered under my parents health insurance. The problem is that I have been diagnosed with anxiety and need anxiety medication, but I don't want them seeing these transactions since they are very intolerant regarding mental illness.I recently started working and am wondering whether I can use my work health insurance to cover my mental health needs (therapy, psychiatrist visits, anxiety meds) but still use my family health insurance for everything else (their coverage is much better).Thank you for your help! [info] None [info] 1502986151
Psylax01 [info] Oh, I have experience with this! I'm diagnosed with anxiety/panic attacks/agoraphobia. I say this just so that you know I feel your pain.You have time to prepare for your visit, here is the best thing you can do. While you are hanging out and you have thoughts that you think, "Damn, I should ask my therapist about this, but I don't think I'd be able to." Just write them down on a piece of paper. Then, and this is the hard part, when you get to your therapist, give them the piece of paper that you have written out everything that bothered you. This really is the hardest part, I know. But do it. Once you do, they will be so much better at being able to help you.  [info] None [info] 1499747510
CandyceCox [info] I, too, became a "maniacal bitch" and was even diagnosed bi-polar 6 or 7 years into our marriage. I was diagnosed with anxiety and was on meds when we met....I wonder if I'll be off the bi-polar once he's no longer a part of my life....I was/am/always have been "the problem". If it were not for my fits of rage that are "abusive" and "psychologically damaging" to him and our children, he would be more attracted to me and want to have sex with me....at first I thought he could be right. After all, psychological disorders run in my family on both sides...well, same for him. I did scratch the shit out of his neck that one time and his co-worker and ex commented on it......in response to him breaking my pinkie. But what about when I pushed him?...oh yeah, I was trying to keep him from peeing on me.....the whole in the wall? Wait! That was him! I ducked in time. ....... He trained me to react with rage because I expected physical abuse from him. However, now he's made me look like the narcissist because he will remain calm or finally yell back once I've verbally hit below the belt. I shared all of it with my therapist and she is the one who pointed out that I respond/react to him in this manner as a defense as I autopilot my offense at the hint that a defense is needed. It's just so sick and fucked up. Now I'm "crazy". I'm the "narc" yada yada...this ALL a planned and strategic part of the narc's "grand cycle scheme". Now that I recognize it, he is having to push even harder to elicit a response out of me.....ugh! And more often than I like to admit, I engage but it's getting easier and easier to let it roll off because his mask will be torn off in court. ... You're not a narcissist! He wants you to think you are so he can play the victim. You're not the only one. [info] None [info] 1550496224
ApprehensivePickle2 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety before I was diagnosed with ADHD. Had a Xanax scrip, the whole nine. My first psych doc thought it was odd that Wellbutrin made me less anxious, but we just went with it. Second psych doc (after first one moved away) diagnosed me with ADHD, put me on Adderall (still with Wellbutrin tho) and now I have no more anxiety pretty much. I mean, I get the occasional panic attack every six months or so, but that's only when something triggers it. My day-to-day dread and feeling of restlessness is gone now; I am a cool cucumber. Huzzah for the paradoxical reaction to amphetamines! [info] None [info] 1553372282
mollyrhi [info] To me this does sound like anxiety but probably not as a side effect of drinking. Did you have anxiety before drinking? I was diagnosed with anxiety at a young age and OCD later on in my teenage years and my psychiatrist said they often go hand in hand.  [info] None [info] 1501442714
wackylol [info] Lol I actually have OCD and it's never bothered me when people use it as slang because I'm pretty sure anyone with some level of organization obsessiveness actually is a bit OCD. Of course it's only a disorder when it's actually harming your life but the ritualistic side of it still is valid. It's not some hyper exclusive diagnosis.edit: To clarify I have been diagnosed with anxiety. OCD is one of my many symptoms and I have experienced anxiety induced OCD on a very real level to the point of it invading my life. [info] None [info] 1358913312
OliveWildly [info] YTA. People are looking at her and making comments about her behavior -- not yours. It's easy to assume that people are judging you when you have anxiety (which it sounds like you have a dose of), but if she's the one creating sound and movement, they're not looking at you.I was diagnosed with anxiety several years ago, and I can see where your frustration would come from. Here's something that changed my entire outlook (from my therapist) *"People are inherently selfish."* We approach every situation thinking more about ourselves than about the people around us. So all of that embarrassing stuff? Most people don't even notice it because they're too busy thinking about themselves.She also pointed out that it's **instinct** to look at something/someone when they create movement or noise (e.g. walk into a room) but it doesn't mean anything. We do it because (even tho we've evolved) we are still hardwired to notice changes in our environment and check to see if we're still safe. So when you walk into a room and 20 heads turn to look... or when your GF starts dancing in the grocery store... they're just checking the change in environment. They don't care as much about what she's doing as you do.I'm calling YTA because your anxiety is YOURS to own and deal with. When you push her to alter her behavior to placate your anxiety, you are making HER deal with your anxiety. Recognize that it's yours to learn how to manage. It's okay! There are plenty of us out here still figuring it out. [info] None [info] 1558476318
zebrapaad [info] Are symptoms of ADHD symptoms of anxiety? I've been diagnosed with anxiety and take medication for it, but I seem to check a lot of ADHD boxes. Is it more likely that this is just part of anxiety? Or should I bring this up next time I go to a doctor? Another thing, I was raised in a family that considered things like ADHD and anxiety to be just a lack of self control, so I sometimes have a hard time gauging whether I'm just being lazy and resistant or whether I actually do have an issue with concentration. It was for the same reason I refused to consider medical treatment for anxiety for a really long time. So for that reason I'm worried about bringing this kind of thing up at the doctor because I don't want to get diagnosed with something I don't actually have because I know that this is a real thing. I guess what I'm saying is that I think I might just be an imposter. [info] None [info] 1575699361
Butthole_Berserker [info] Anxiety and Adderall I was diagnosed with anxiety over 12 years ago, in my mid 20s.  Recently ive finally started visiting a psychologist.  One night i was up and couldnt sleep so i made a list of all the things that make me anxious.  Turns out 90% of them are the same as ADHD symptoms.  Anyway, after 12+ years on lexapro/xanax they want to try adderall and im extremely anxious about being put on a stimulant.  Is it possible to have both GAD and ADHD?  Do any of you have experince with anything similar?  Thanks! [info] None [info] 1486520845
Pneu6 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and very rarely get less than nine hours of sleep, so I would definitely say the latter from personal experiences. The former implies that less sleep makes you more anxious, but I don't think that's the case for clinical anxiety. I'm sure there is a correlation between sleep deprivation and being temporarily more anxious, but I don't believe that would require anxiety medication or therapy but rather medication or other methods that that aid sleep.I've been anxious for many years and just recently realized that it wasn't normal. Since I went so long undiagnosed I developed my own methods to fall asleep amidst my thoughts, which is why I can get so much sleep, but during the day there is an onslaught of thoughts of running off the road, having an aneurysm, or anything like that.Tl;dr: I think there is a significant difference between anxiety that comes from too little sleep and anxiety that keeps you from sleeping.  [info] None [info] 1515348551
wonderfulakari [info] Help me with my letter? My mother has let me down a lot recently she's very prideful.  So for some history we are a religious LDS family and when I was a child she somehow managed to antagonise every member of our church.  She would refuse to ever cross paths with my best friend's mother who was very kind and brought us groceries when my father was unemployed because they had a disagreement on the children's choir musical arrangements.  One time she wrote hate-mail and yelled at my sister for refusing to deliver it.  Any fight or disagreement that was had was never resolved as she is not one to apologize and eventually she hated everyone so much she stopped going to church and this is a woman who cares about church.  We ended up moving afterwards and she quickly picked a fight with one of our neighbors who has the crime of having the exact same personality so that was fun.  In general she gets along in the new neighborhood but she still has episodes like she left the choir she adored because they dropped a song number she was passionate about.  Anyway more to the point my mother has always been a bit cold... I mean she loves me and a do have good memories and lessons learned from her, but she can be really uncaring.  My sister (Who we later found out had a mental illness) was a huge bully to me but my mother always swept it under the rug and if I complained I just got punished.  In the end I ended up decking my sister in the face and told my mom that she had never helped me deal with her and I that is like the only time she apologized to me.In college I had no car and one day I began having serious chest pains so my mother said she'd drive me to the doctor.  I was super scared because around that time I started having all these random jolts of pain.  We went out to the doctor and grabbed some fast food and I kid you not not a single conversation wasn't about her.  We go to McDonald's and she rants about how the only thing she could eat there was fries (she picked the place too) and when I was diagnosed with anxiety she only wanted to talk about her own mental health problems and stress.  She didn't try to comfort me at all.Any ways here are the recent things that broke the camels back and me emotionally.  It starts with my birthday dinner, I love foreign food especially stuff with rice like sushi.  So I decided to go with this local indian place as practically everything there is gluten free (My mom can't eat gluten) and while some things are really exotic other's tasted like things I knew she'd like.  They had food so many things I wanted to show her like this onion bloom thing that was friend but also gluten free and I put a lot of thought into it.  When I told my mom about this she said she wasn't really interested in Indian food and I said that I knew for a fact there would be stuff here she would like and that the dish she had before did not accurately represent the variety.  She seemed to agree but then sent me a text saying that she would love to have dinner but It had to be close to her with food she liked and when just asking what kind of food she had had before she just flat-out said she wouldn't come.   I was super annoyed so I called my dad to ask what he was doing in the evening to make sure my mother couldn't say she had plans and when confirming that they had nothing in the way I told him how much it meant for me to come and how my sisters were going even farther out of there way to make it to my dinner and that I would like for mom to come.  I started crying really bad too.  Because I couldn't talk clearly I sent my dad a text explaining how I felt and how pissed my mom was making me.  As I found out from a third party my mother ended up reading that text over his shoulder.  On my birthday my niece got pink eye so my first sister had to stay home and then my second sister got sick.  I got two excuses of why mom couldn't come.  I generic "She's not feeling well" passed by a sister and a "Blah blah blah allergies" from my Dad who was trying his best not to make me feel unloved by my mother.  I know finding out that I was talking smack behind her back hurt her feeling but considering how she DEFINITELY knew how strongly I felt about this she still should have come.  Anyways pretty depressing way to start my birthday.So the thing that broke me today was that about a month ago I asked my mother if I could use the apartment below her house for my birthday party in January (My B-day is in December but we were super busy that week so I postponed it) at first she said no since last time I had an event I didn't clean up well but after explaining how I ended up being super sick that day she decided to let me use it.  Yesterday, knowing how bad my Mom's memory can be and how she hates last minute stress I called her to remind her that I would be using the house in a week and a half, she flat out says I can't and tells me just to use my apartment.  My small tiny apartment that I already hate so much.  I tried to argue back but got nowhere.  My Dad then called me to try to further convince me that having it at my apartment was ideal (Probably asked my my mother to do so) and also tried to make me feel better by promised to take me out to lunch.  Guess which one of these guys I love more?  Anyway I was ticked but after the birthday dinner thing I was accepting of it and didn't care much.  However my kitchen is super tiny and the entire 2 feet of counter space is where we keep the drying rack.  I also don't have a garbage disposal to cleaning up after cooking was a huge pain.  I'm trying to conserve funds right now I need to cook my own food for this party.  However once again cooking is a bitch in my kitchen and I have food stains on my washer because I have no counter-space.  So I asked my mom if I could prepare food in her enormous customized kitchen in exchange for leaving her some food and of course cleaning the whole thing afterwards.  I woke up to a "NO use your table" and IDK I lost it.It's not that I'm really sensitive that even small things hurt my feelings it's that my mom can't even step out of her comfort zone or be slightly inconvenienced FOR the little things.  Anyways I'm sick and tired of this so after my party I was going to give her a this letter if I still felt the same and I need help making it less harsh.  I want to give her the silent treatment for awhile but I don't want to permanently cut her off.I need some space from you for a bit.  I know you love me, but frankly that is not enough for a healthy relationship.  I know you think I’m being over sensitive, but it’s not that I’m getting upset over little things - it’s that you can’t even do little things.  You can’t go just a little out of your comfort zone to go to dinner you might not like, or help your daughter when she is overwhelmed with trying to find a space to fit her friends.  I understand that my feelings hurt you when you read my complaining texts over Dad’s shoulder.  I know you felt depressed and upset that day, but what hurts more is you KNEW how upset I was, but you still didn’t apologize or change your mind about attending my birthday dinner.  If you’d be willing to see me more than a sinful daughter who is losing her way, you would see that I’m trying to become a better person and forgive you.  But thinking back on all the good times we’ve had is not enough anymore. You care too much about your pride.  Even when I asked you to take me to the doctor out of the fear that I was having a heart attack, every single conversation we had that day was about YOU. Not about comforting me, but about all the health problems you had and all the struggles YOU went through.  You antagonise so many people and yet it hasn’t clicked that YOU are the driving force of conflict in your own life.  Please consider seeing a therapist, or at the very least apologize.  You’ve broken my heart and I can’t do this anymore.Sorry I was going to proofread this because half my keys are slightly broken on this keyboard but I'm super upset and can't even re-read this without crying again. [info] None [info] 1483653515
myfairlady45 [info] Awful Stage Fright I’ve been singing since I was 2 years old and right about the time in high school when I developed anxiety, I also developed stage fright. It’s many years later now and worse. It’s not that I don’t think I’m a decent singer, It’s that every time before a performance, my crippling anxiety comes out of no where and I shake, I feel sick, and my vision gets fuzzy. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, I didn’t have much of an issue. What do you guys do to cure this? [info] None [info] 1527454642
chicklet2011 [info] Anything that causes me stress makes my ticks worse.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but I'm doing great right now.  [info] None [info] 1375085187
Leobeard [info] Yes! This fucking sucks so hard. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and Pure O OCD  a few months ago. My life is terrible. And I hate it when people act like they have 'anxiety' or OCD. I'm currently writing this on the bus and I'm always scared when somebody will snap and start killing people.  [info] None [info] 1432190326
cheerleader4thedead [info] Anxiety stopping me from dating? I am an 18 year old female. I have never really been big into dating because to me, dating is always incredibly stressful. My last relationship ended because I was always on edge. Is there any way to either get over this, or is there any way I can cope easier with it? I was diagnosed with anxiety years ago, but don't have a recent exact diagnosis. Any help would be appreciated. [info] None [info] 1349233088
spaghettithrower [info] Could I have a thyroid problem? Hey everyone, this is my first time posting here. For the past 25+ years I have been exhausted. I could easily sleep 15 or more hours a day. When I get up I am completely lethargic and just want to lie on the sofa. I have been desperate to find the cause of my tiredness. I've had a sleep disorder test ( no disorder found), had a doctor tell me I have adrenal fatigue, while another said it was chronic fatigue. I've been diagnosed with anxiety. My other symptoms are very cold hands and feet. Like I'm wearing fingerless gloves inside as I type this!I'm planning on getting a full thyroid blood panel this week.My question is: does what I'm experiencing sound like it could be thyroid related? I'm not asking for a diagnosis , I just know nothing about any of this and am at the end of my rope. I feel like I have no life due to my never-ending fatigue.Thank you for any insight, info. [info] None [info] 1486520415
ItsAboutTimeToo [info] Have been penting lots of stress and impending thoughts for some time now -- would like someone to talk to/help me rationalize this I am diagnosed with anxiety and OCD and I would like to simply vent to someone and get a second opinion on life, you know? Thanks. [info] None [info] 1422216305
AK7992 [info] Is it just anxiety, or something else? Hello, I am going to try to make this short. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was 17 years old--I am now 23. Since then, I have been wondering if there is something more I am dealing with, my emotions are all over the place, I sometimes am extremely anxious, or sad, or happy, or angry--the emotions usually are triggered without any causes. I have a tendency to not have a steady view of who I am, as odd as it sounds, I feel like I have different personalities--I also have goals for the future that are in constant change. When it comes to dealing with people, I usually have a small circle of friends because my thoughts of people constantly change going from them being my best friends, to me disliking them. I have researched these qualities of myself and stumbles across other disorders like , BPD. The thing is usually with BPD there is impulsive behavior--I do have thoughts of doing reckless things but I never actually act on them. Do you guys think it is just who I am, or can I be possibly be suffering from BPD? Side note* I am going to talk to psychiatrist about this issue. We usually talk about my anxiety but never about other things I am feeling. [info] None [info] 1444490833
EMTechniShen [info] Anxiety? Or Possibly Something Underlying? I'd like to start by saying I was diagnosed with anxiety about 6 years ago, and friends/family think this may just be due to a combination of stress and anxiety but let me continue, these feelings are stronger than what I remember any of my periods of anxiety feeling like. I am also 18 if an age helps whatsoever.  Starting last week during one of my college lectures, I started feeling very warm, lightheaded, nauseous, and panicky. I had to rush to the bathroom and it ended up settling down a bit, but when I entered the class again it happened again so I drove home. Over the past week I've developed a feeling of mental fog that's consistently there where it's hard to sort ideas in my head or make conversation with people, and my vision feels weird like I'm not sure if it's changed or not entirely. I keep getting random bouts of the lightheadedness, nausea, and warmness that occur randomly throughout the day, and worsen when I am around people moreso. Laying down seems to help with the lightheadedness and nausea though. I'm curious if this could be due to an underlying illness or if my anxiety may just be flaring up extremely due to chronic stress. Thank you for your help and if anything requires clarification, let me know and I'll try to help clarify. [info] Patient [info] 1581979060
flperson [info] 6 months is not excessive time to try out a new treatment for anxiety.I have been diagnosed with anxiety by a few different Dr.s over the years and trying CBD oil is the only time I have self treated with something that is not a prescription.I've talked to many doctors, I cannot afford one currently.We are having this conversation because you don't know what you're talking about and hopefully my explanations and experiences can help someone..."Get some medicaid/Medicare... It's pretty much free if he's actually broke."  I hope this comment is just you being silly or sarcastic or something... Getting useful coverage through the gov't is not easy in any way. My wife and I and one child had a household income last year of $24,000 before taxes. This gets me "medically necessary" coverage through medicare which is only good for emergency services above a certain amount. (I believe this is $5000, but am not sure ). That's it. There are county/state programs and income based fee services, which I have tried in the past, but they are another story in itself. Right now CBD is something that a bunch of people are having great results with and I thought I would try it out since I don't need a prescription and the possible side effects are negligible. That's pretty much it... [info] None [info] 1549300829
wal_cott [info] Feeling better but... Hi.So I have moderate-severe anxiety and dysthymia. I am on medication and I just finished my last session of CBT and I feel a lot better. However, I am finding that those who see me as doing better or if I disclose that I have been diagnosed with anxiety that they take this as an opportunity to unload their stuff on me constantly. I am still not 100% so this does bug me still as I tend to take on other's emotions a little bit still. I have mentioned it to some people that I can't help them right now or I am dealing with my own issues but they take this as I am being selfish or cold. A lot of the times I will tell people to go see a doctor/ therapist and start therapy. When I mention this they never do anything about it and just keep unloading it on me and it is affecting me now. Has anyone else ever had this experience and what did you do? --- BTW I didn't quit therapy or anything I am graduating and leaving the town that I currently live in. [info] None [info] 1460569008
Mattrockj [info] Really neither are any good for me, I was diagnosed with anxiety recently after I had a meltdown in class [info] 16 [info] 1558291911
tinywaves [info] I don't know if I can *help*, but I can definitely relate. When I was learning to drive it made me mad anxious yo. Having someone ride along and criticize my skills while performing a stressful &amp; dangerous task *sucked*. I started learning to drive before I was diagnosed with anxiety, and shortly before I got my license I was diagnosed. this made me aware of what was making things so difficult, and made driving much easier to handle. Now that I have been driving some time, I do find that anytime I don't know where I'm going or miss a turn or get lost or anything, I easily start to panic. I currently don't deal very healthily with panic attacks and tend to just internalize them(unless I'm in the car alone). Pulling over and stopping and then calling someone helps a lot. If I'm trying to get somewhere on time it adds a lot of excess stress and anxiety. As a release I swear while in the car, bigtime, because I can't pull over and get out and stop. But generally speaking, since driving was such a huge hurdle for me early into my time dealing with anxiety, it's the thing I've worked on most. I am generally pretty good at staying calm and then dealing with my anxiety when I feel it rising. acknowledging that I'm starting to feel that panic helps to stay calm and breathe and not endanger myself.  [info] GAD/Agoraphobia/Cleithrophobia [info] 1368816809
LippyLibrarian [info] Hi, friend! Honestly, once I'm in a flare up, the only thing to do is take it easy until it's gone. Your path sounds identical to mine. When I was diagnosed, I gave myself a year to find a natural way to manage it- supplements, herbs, acupuncture, diet, exercise, etc. That was an immense help, especially for the daily pain, but it just wan't enough. I got on the lowest dose of Lyrica and noticed an even bigger result pretty fast. About a year ago, I was diagnosed with anxiety and started taking Paxil for that... Maybe it's a coincidence, but I noticed an even LOWER number of painful days after that kicked in. Anyway... take care of yourself when you feel good, and it should at least reduce your flare ups. This sounds vague, but it's all about knowing your limits. My go to for self care during a flare is a hot bath and lots of laying in bed with a book. I hope this helps!  [info] None [info] 1471631976
Merchanting [info] I've tried it, and wouldn't recommend it. I've been diagnosed with anxiety in the past, and had tried 1mg k-pins and propranolol prescribed for me. The only one that really helped me during high anxiety times was the k-pins, so I pursued other benzos when my doctor got stingy on the prescriptions.I bought 80x 4mg bars because they were cheap af, less than 150 for all. My intentions were 1mg a few times a week, for some chilling and some high anxiety situations. I lost that regimine basically the day I got them. Day one I took a quarter before school. It was nice for my anxiety, and didn't have me fiending for more. Still, when I got home I wanted another quarter for relaxing and sleeping. When I woke up the next day, I was still a bit unrestrained and decided to take another quarter before school again. This cycle of lowering inhibitions and taking even more kept happening. Within a week I was taking halves and skipping class. This ended in me sleeping in late one day, only about a week after buying the bars. I walked in half way through class, and it was a fucking test I had forgot about. Sat outside and filled with social/school anxiety and so I took more bar. I got really depressed and no longer had control of my drug use because I was too emotional. I took a cocktail of drugs/alcohol and ended up getting sent to the drunk tank when I refused an ambulance. This doesn't happen to everyone, but it's not super uncommon either. Xanax is too much too fast for most people. It worked for anxiety, but it's easier than you think to get addicted. Almost a year later and my anxiety is a lot better. Not sure what clicked, but it wasn't from continued benzo use.  [info] None [info] 1541101472
Benzroller [info] Anxiety, and a lot of bad habits during college.I've always been super stressed out throughout my life. Tenfold more than most people that are diagnosed with anxiety.I remember as a kid, way before I even started smoking, I'd get worried sick about the smallest things. I'd be over at my friends house, playing on his dad's computer with him(windows 95 era), and we'd accidentally change the monitor resolution.We didn't know how to fix it, and I started crying. I was worried sick, even though I knew I wouldn't be the one to get in trouble. Just irrational fear over small things like that over the years have caused the muscles in my heart to deteriorate slowly.After eating like shit in college(fast food 5x a week), drinking a lot, and smoking cigs every day, I woke up one night and just started vomiting blood.I left college during the middle of the semester, and came home to live with my parents. I was bedridden for a month; I couldn't keep ANYTHING down, I'd wake up and take a sip of water and immediately throw it up. I had more procedures done on my body than anyone my age should ever have. 2 endoscopies, 2 colonoscopies, ultrasound on my gallbladder and many other areas of my body, and a plethora of blood tests(they probably took a liter of blood from me combined from all the tests).Turns out I have celiac disease, crohn's disease, GERD, gastritis, they found ulcers in my stomach, polips in my intestines, and over the past few years(this happened in 2011), I've lost 40lbs.I went from being 5'11, 170 in great athletic shape, to weighing 130. The doctors at one point told me that if I don't gain weight, my other organs would start to fail and I'd ultimately die.Well, it's finally starting to happen. I eat as much as I can; smoking always helped alleviate the symptoms of my stomach problems, but I still couldn't/can't gain weight for the life of me. I'll stuff myself every day and eat as much as I can, as unhealthy as I can, and I wont gain a pound. I can't even have sex now; after I have sex, I experience the same symptoms that I do after I smoke. Most recently over the past few months, every time I'd smoke, my heart would start racing at 170 bpm or so, I'd start sweating profusely, and if I took a few steps, it felt like I was going to collapse and either have a heart attack or seizure. I remember smoking at my friend's house one time a few months ago, one of the last times I smoked, and I honestly thought I was going to die. My heart hurt so bad, every area in my chest hurt, it was incredibly hard to breathe; yet, I didn't tell anyone. I went to the bathroom and looked at myself in the mirror and thought, "this is the end...this is the last time you're ever going to see yourself in the mirror." I was 100% convinced I was going to die -- it's hard to describe that feeling, knowing death is coming and just waiting for it, it's almost surreal.I've seen a cardiologist, and he did an EKG and basically told me the events of my past(my stomach problems and what not) have caught up to me; that my heart is in terrible condition, and any more stress on it could be fatal.There's hope that if I miraculously gain weight over the next few years, exercise(I don't exercise much though because it causes me to lose weight, when I really need to gain weight), and improve some other aspects of my life, my heart can slowly recover.Most will attribute my symptoms to a panic attack, however, I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 16. I've had panic attacks, I know how they feel. When I smoke, it doesn't cause a panic attack; my body is weak, and it jolts my heart to the point where it feels like I'm about to fall into cardiac arrest, and very well may.Sorry for the long post, it's 4am and there's a lot of rambling in it, but that's a little insight into my situation. Feel free to ask me any questions, I've had these problems for a while now, if I could be of any assistance to anyone I'd be more than happy to help. [info] None [info] 1425203467
PerceptualModality [info] How do I talk to my Dr about possibly having ADHD? I recently saw a thread on twitter that was very popular about living with ADHD and I've never felt anything describe my life more accurately. I then got googling about ADHD and found this subreddit and there are tears in my eyes reading these posts because I relate so deeply to the content. I can't believe how similar so many of the experiences are on here.For some background I'm a 25 y/o female and I've been pretty successful academically but since starting law school I've really been struggling with managing what I now think are symptoms of ADHD, though I think I've had these symptoms as long as I can remember. I've been diagnosed with anxiety before and taken psych meds but I didn't really feel like they were very helpful to me. Counselling has helped me a lot with learning coping skills and emotion regulation but I still struggle. I'm thinking of saying something to my Dr but I don't want to come across as drug seeking or like I've done my WebMD research and I know what I'm talking about. I just have related so deeply to these posts and I want to see if maybe talking to a Dr about this might help me find a better treatment plan. Did anyone have a similar experience? What made you finally speak to someone about your symptoms? [info] None [info] 1551793793
crazyisthenewnormal [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety.  Anxiety and insecurity are not the same thing.  And just because I have anxiety doesn't mean I have to let it stop me.  There's therapy, there's medication.  It's okay that you're anxious or scared or insecure, but you can still act anyway.  I've asked guys out even though my stomach was in knots and I was sweating through my clothes and almost threw up.  Some weren't interested and some were and I got less afraid to do it.  I am in control of my life, my anxiety is not. [info] None [info] 1513330652
alpaponycat [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety I read Susan Jeffers "Feel the fear and do it anyway". I wouldn't say it was life-changing or that it solved all my problems but it was a good starting point [info] None [info] 1568184156
MysticTacoDeer [info] I'm not sure how it started but I think it was because my father is a loud, continuous talker. He doesn't get the hint to stop talking and I've always seen him as the opposite of the person I want to be. Now I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I'm constantly afraid that I'll mess up and say something that I shouldn't and everyone will hate me. I also just suck at conversation but it's something you can't improve on unless you practise, but I avoid it so it's a vicious cycle. [info] None [info] 1559021892
123penguin321 [info] I've lived my life thinking my anxiety was under control but now it's worse than ever and I feel like I'm being eaten alive. I was diagnosed with anxiety 9 years ago and it was really bad then. I couldn't leave the house, I was petrified by the dark, I couldn't be near windows, and I always felt like I was in mortal danger. All that lasted about a month then it went away mostly. The anxiety has always been there but it has never that bad again.Now my friends have left me. People are ignoring me. I feel alone. I feel the fear coming back, that I felt nine years ago, and I'm terrified. I wonder if I'm meant to be here. I never will attempt suicide because it would hurt the people I care about too much. But the thought is always on my mind. I just don't know what to do. I just need people to care about me. [info] None [info] 1530989879
Username--loading [info] is my phobia of the outside world caused by my anxiety? I've always been quite an 'outdoorsy' person. Well, outdoorsy might not be the best word but I've never liked staying in my home for too long. I was diagnosed with anxiety 3 years ago but, nevertheless, I still liked going places as long as they werent overly crowded (like 100s of people). However, since last November, I've had a massive fear of the outside world. I can't even look out of my window or look at picture of the sky (I'm not exaggerating, I can't even look at photos taken outside anymore) without getting slightly panicky. I've been refusing to go to school for the past 2 months because I have to go outside to get there (even though I get there by taxi). Is this related to my anxiety? [info] None [info] 1492443814
Xyoloswag420blazeitX [info] If you're smoking at a Snoop concert and calling it medicine, you are a part of the problem. Medical marijuana has become an insult to both the word "medicine" and the movement to legalize marijuana and it is because of idiots like you. Smoking five joints isn't medical in any way, shape or form, it's getting too high to function semi-legally and then bragging about gaming the system on reddit.If I was diagnosed with anxiety and put down three bars while I was out for the night, would that be medical use in any way? [info] None [info] 1377715961
Mistaffity [info] Health anxiety help? I can't stop getting this way. It started with a swollen lymph node in my neck that I googled. I managed to find "carotid artery dissection". I also deal with hypertension (maybe it is my anxiety messing with the results? My weight problems? I don't know, I am working on reducing it) which apparently causes that. The lump on my neck shows signs consistent with being a lymph node but I still worry. Maybe I am just feeling it wrong. Maybe it is a dissection and I'll end up having a heart attack or stroke.The issue is that I find this stuff and end up feeling like I have these health problems right after. I can't stop googling every little thing that I pick up as a result of the hyper awareness. Right now, I think I have aortic dissection. This is rare and happens more in men than women and in people way older than me (I'll be 22 in a few weeks). I just read the symptoms and then I felt them. This should be the other way around, right? Apparently not to my brain. No.I really wish I could get the all-clear from a doctor. I don't have any insurance so they'd turn me away immediately. I'm tired of thinking I'm dying when I should be out doing things that other people my age can do. I was diagnosed with anxiety a long time ago (among one other disorder) and was on meds for both. Those worked but I haven't been on them for years.I really need advice on how to stop doing these things that set me off, please.Edit #1: Because I was able to go to the doctor as I found I still have insurance, I got checked out. I have an enlarged thyroid (my mom &amp; grandpa have thyroid issues so it is hopefully just passed down) and they think I have a pinched nerve. They want me to get an ultrasound on my throat and x-rays on the rest of my neck. I also need to get my ears unclogged and they also said something about an MRI and blood tests. I'll be getting those in a week or so. They also referred me to a psychiatrist.I'm going to be fine. [info] None [info] 1517171408
Younce-Davis [info] Oh gosh! I had that problem with some neighbors a few years ago. The guy would literally beat his wife on the front lawn! Luckily they moved. My neighbor is considered lower middle class— but it is full of retired folk and starter families. It’s not a friendly neighborhood since everyone is moving in and out constantly. I was raised by boomers— the pick yourself up by the bootstraps mentally is still very prevalent in my society. It’s not realistic. When I was diagnosed with anxiety and had to go on meds it shattered my parents world 😭. Luckily they are very understanding. I used to make morbid jokes out of situations. My bf is from the Philippines and over there, people who aren’t optimistic and see the joy in life usually lose hope and don’t make it. It’s a poor country so starvation is widespread. After I stopped making morbid jokes, I became more optimistic. That only happened a few months after meds though. It was a rough transition. It’s good your friends can read you well. Curious, are you a high school or college student? Or working? If you are an adult, that will probably open up more treatment options for you since you won’t need your parents permission to receive it. If you are an adult, that will also give you the possibility of moving out and into a better environment. Trade school, if you do not have the resources for college, can get you some very nice jobs— look at welding— salary of $100,000 USD. Edit: background info on me. Biomedical engineering student at a University. I live in a mixed cultural neighborhood. There are the conservative folk here and the more liberal. My family tends to be more conservative. I am more liberal/ moderate.  [info] None [info] 1554504669
Nimbleturtles [info] I didn't leave my city for a year when I was diagnosed with anxiety. Now I'll visit friend every month hours away because of medication. [info] None [info] 1502299389
Aeriayna [info] TIFU by living with complete bitches for a year I lived in a house with 4 other people (making there 5 of us in total) I thought that these girls were my friends but apparently not, they made my life a living hell for that year. They would scream and shout and bang on my door at 4am when they knew I had to be up at 6, they would make nasty comments when I was in the room or just sit and snigger about how fat I looked that day, or how my hair looked etc.. They drew pictures of myself and my boyfriend on the whiteboard we had in the kitchen and write comments around them (mature I know), there was even an occasion where they broke into my room and searched through my stuff (they got in by making up a bullshit story in order to get the full bunch of house keys off my property agent) and they found some thrush cream and then thought it was hilarious to shout and make up songs about it and tell all of their friends. I'm really not sure why all of this bothered me so much looking back, but when its 4 vs 1 with no escape from it it's pretty hard to not let it bother you they would send me petty nasty texts all of the time as well even when I wasn't in the house, there was literally no escape.One of the girls was nice as pie to my face and didn't join in with them as such, but turns out all of the things I had told her in private she had then repeated back to them, two faced cow. But now, because of them I have been diagnosed with anxiety issues and completely wasted a year of university by locking myself in my room through it when I didn't have lectures. The worst part is I have done nothing to them, I didn't even bother trying to get revenge.Luckily I have now moved out and never have to see any of them again and have much nicer people to live with next year, but its just more a horrible feeling that I wasted one of my years at university worrying myself over them instead of enjoying myself. I literally bought them presents from my holiday to try and make them stop, looking back, I wish I hadn't bothered. Since moving out one of them has even tried to insinuate that I fancied her, get your head out of your arse love, I have a boyfriend. Background information: I'm at university in the UK and in second year it is common to move out of student accommodation and into a house with friends. However, the property agents bully you into signing contracts so early. I started university mid September and had already signed a housing agreement with my so called friends by mid October. TL;DR: lived with nasty bitches, wasted a year of university. [info] None [info] 1434214897
BoxSapling [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, not OCD, but I have a lot of the same thoughts as you. I’ve felt the need to reassess my sexuality over and over again since even before I came out (even though I knew I was gay). I don’t think you’re unlovable, and I wish you luck in school and in life. I’m glad to hear that you are getting better. [info] None [info] 1533486440
sociopaths-throwaway [info] Masters and PhD’s all around and I would say we are rather upper class. My family on my mother’s side has always been full of incredibly intelligent and rich people. My father’s side perhaps lacked on the intelligence and money but I was never around them or him much. I don’t use drugs, and I use alcohol socially. I hate not having control over my own brain and I can’t help but look down on addicts. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but that was a very long time ago. I used to have severe social anxiety when I was in my early teens but have felt none of it in the past four years. That is also subsequently around the time I stopped feeling most thing all together. Weakness to me is more general sometimes but the things I find weak are as follows for my current boyfriend since it is freshest in my mind: not pursuing further education, not in constant pursuit of higher positions (or work for him overall), high level of emotions whether it is sadness or anger, constant self doubt and shame, lack of money without attempts to better the situation, alcohol or drug problems (he was addicted to pills and some other substance), self pity is my biggest one too. I have more but this is what I could think of at the moment. These traits always tell me that the person is open to manipulation. If someone immediately puts me above them it lets me know they are weak. My best relationship has been with a woman who had sociopathic/psychopathic tendencies because we were both on level with each other. That of course fell apart because I wanted to be able to manipulate and be praised and she wanted to inflict pain that I couldn’t feel. [info] None [info] 1561218251
rachel095 [info] UPDATE:Thank you to everyone who has commented/PM'ed/read and thought of me. I have been diagnosed with anxiety which explains a lot of my symptoms as far as the overwhelmed feelings and crying for 'no reason'. I've been prescribed some medication for emergency situations and am feeling much better now. Thanks again everyone [info] None [info] 1422568637
NI1515 [info] Very sharp pain in head when hit with anxiety - should I be concerned? I'm a white 21 year old male, 5'9, and around 145lbs. I'm currently on 200mg Lamictal daily for HPPD. Alongside HPPD, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD.For around a month, I've been experiencing a sharp piercing pain in my head whenever I experience a "hit" of anxiety, or even remote nervousness. It's sort of hard to explain what I mean by hit, but basically just when you get that "drop" in your stomach. Like I said, this occurs through general nervousness, not just intense anxiety. For example, I was nervous about kissing someone and as I leaned in I got the sharp pain in my head again.I thought it could just potentially be tension headaches. But the strange thing is - the past month or so has possibly been the least stressful month I've had in the past 7 or so months, and I've generally been having a great time. In addition, the pain is always right on time with the "hit" of anxiety and is very short lasting - about the length of the "drop" in my stomach.I'm a little concerned. Any thoughts? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1580520890
clearglassofwater [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety NOS or GAD with OCD features years ago and it waxes and wanes, going from totally manageable to pretty bad. I'm sorry to hear about your form of anxiety, that sounds awful. I've tried risperdal and it made my brain basically go on vacation and just be numb :/ mindfulness could help me a lot I think. I think a benzo with a shorter half life like Xanax would be helpful but I'm afraid of asking my psych because I know people sell it and it will sound like I'm doctor shopping. [info] None [info] 1499074833
nomasmustache [info] Every Sunday! I'm diagnosed with anxiety though and I absolutely hate my job. [info] None [info] 1561302058
theglassduchess [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in kindergarten and ADHD in 3rd grade. I COMPLETELY understand!! [info] None [info] 1558583985
Uggoface [info] Fired for attendance in CA I've  been working at this employer for 9 months. I will admit that I called in sick A LOT. I had a written warning once. I have had a horrible year, involving many health problems and the death of a family member. I have a diagnosed autoimmune disorder that causes me to get sick extremely easily. I've  been diagnosed with chronic migraines  which was the lost common reason for calling in sick. I've been diagnosed with anxiety which  was another main reason I was absent often. This job caused me a tremendous  amount of anxiety, and anxiety  attacks can also trigger my migraines. I fully acknowledge that i did call in way too many times and it made sense that they fired me...that being said I'm taking some time to focus on my health and apply for jobs in a different  atmosphere where  there's  less social pressure. I'm  wondering  whether I can possibly still qualify for unemployment  while I'm  on the job search for something  different. [info] None [info] 1559890763
clarissagilmore [info] I agree with this so much! I was diagnosed with anxiety recently and one thing that made me feel so much better was googling and reading about all the famous people who have come out and talked about their anxiety. Seeing those people in the public eye, being successful and trying their best despite what they’re going through makes me feel like I can do it and survive my simple little life.  [info] None [info] 1553242482
HarleeeQuin [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and acute stress disorder after going through an abuse relationship *(before opiate use even started)* and one of the main reasons I continued use was because my anxiety just disappeared and I could finally function normal again as weird as that might sound?i got to week 2 clean and my anxiety started to get bad again, really bad and that was the reason I relapsed. I couldn’t take it anymore.That’s good that they know and you can be honest and not feeling your hiding anything. I feel terrible for hiding it but I know it’s best this way.Yeah if it wasn’t for the sub and the people who I’ve talked to then I’d definitely be in a way worse place. I think I actually need to make posts or talk to people here when I am going through withdrawals or feeling like my mental health is really bad. I think it give me a higher chance to get through it being able to talk to people who can relate / understand what I’m going through. Edit - I got to 15 days being clean before my anxiety started to get bad again  [info] None [info] 1544659274
sinkorswim400 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I used to have panic attacks twice a month but now is only anxiety attacks once every 4 months or so and are less severe as time goes by.  [info] None [info] 1531763711
WestCoastKate [info] Anxiety over holding baby. Scared of dropping. I am almost 27 weeks with baby #2. My first is almost 8 years old, with such a big gap I jave forgotten a lot. About 7 years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety (which, looking back I am fairly certain was PPA) and have been fighting it this entire pregnancy. Currently I am dreading holding my baby. I have a few more months until she is here and I need to figure it out before then. My SIL just had a baby girl and I can't hold her without extreme anxiety/mild panic attacks. I feel like I am going to drop her (even though I have only held her while sitting). I am already on Celexa and it is working pretty well. Any other mom's with anxiety/fear of dropping baby have any tips? What worked for you? [info] None [info] 1529197378
cowdog2014 [info] As I was reading this it sounded more and more like myself- I was diagnosed with anxiety. I started showing symptoms when I was very young, panic attacks when I was 10, but wasn’t taken to a psychologist until I was 13. Speaking from personal experience, the sooner you get into therapy the earlier he can learn coping mechanisms. If it’s not addressed soon, I’m afraid it will just get worse and worse. Also, it sounds like he has an awesome childhood, and you care deeply about his wellbeing. Please don’t be afraid to take him to see a mental health specialist because of the stigma, and don’t blame yourself for this. I had a great childhood and have amazing parents who always questioned themselves as to how I got anxiety so young. It could just be in his genes, and does not mean you did anything wrong as a parent. Good luck!  [info] None [info] 1525952217
shiveringmeerkat [info] Gaskin's book made my anxiety worse. I'm diagnosed with anxiety so my doc and therapist have given me coping methods to work with. I feel that I'm coming into acceptance that what will happen will happen and that's ok. I just need to let go of control and allow things to take their course. Compared to some women I know I think I'm doing ok.  [info] None [info] 1388961817
poth77 [info] My anxiety.  I was diagnosed with anxiety a year ago [info] None [info] 1572786476
SwapMeetLouise [info] Dosage increase: what to expect? I’m currently taking Venlafaxine ER 75mg, for about 4 months. My doctor recommended this after I was diagnosed with anxiety. The first month was really rough dealing with the side effects, but I noticed pretty quickly that it calmed my anxiety. I’ve got an appointment tomorrow to talk with my doctor about episodes of anxiety that have been happening over the past few weeks. This is often triggered by things that are out of my control. (Running late because of a train, my son acting out in public, etc...) I anticipate that the doctor will increase my dosage, but I have a couple of questions for you all:What is the next dosage, from 75mg? I’m reading conflicting information on the internet. For those of you that increased your dosage, did you deal with additional side effects? If so, were they similar and as severe as when you first started the drug? I currently have a lot going on with my job, family, and two trips coming up this month, so I’m worried about juggling all of that while trying to adjust to an increase in dosage. Thanks in advance for your input. I really value this forum and reading everyone’s stories. [info] None [info] 1559525796
doctorwhom456 [info] I was thinking that too, but if my aunt picked up on it, she didn't tell me. Is it weird that I see a lot of myself in Rimmer? Not really 1 or 2 or 8 Rimmer, but once he started getting less annoying and his neuroses really came out I felt like I saw myself on screen. Considering I probably have OCD and wouldn't be surprised if I was diagnosed with anxiety, this isn't too far off... [info] None [info] 1533093332
StuffandThings91 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, but I think doctors over-diagnose it and over-prescribe Xanax. A lot of the time it's a normal human emotion and taking a pill to stop it is not right. [info] None [info] 1484920148
bearlovemucho [info] People living with any kind of anxiety disorder. What trick to you use on a daily basis to calm yourself down or go through your day? (Serious) I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was very young. I've been very stress lately and very tired. It seems like my symptoms have worsen. [info] None [info] 1424380904
ducksflytogether_ [info] Has anybody else deleted all of their social media? I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but haven't taken my meds in a year or so. I have my bad days, but cope with it fairly well. A couple weeks ago I had a really bad day, and just didn't want to interact with anyone I knew. I deleted all of my social media (except Reddit), and told myself I would download it again when I'm feeling better. Except I didn't re-download it. I haven't felt the need or even a desire to. These past couple weeks have been so stress free. I've accomplished so much more around the house and in my life.Anyone else who unplugged themselves, do you feel the same way? Care to share your story? [info] None [info] 1503946675
Throwawaychocolatem [info] Have any of you suffered from mental health issues? I am curious to see if any of you had hardships growing up with mental health.I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 8, even though working out, CBT and meditating helps. My anxiety (GAD) still creeps on me everyday. My mother told me as a teenager I was cured. I also have a really short attention span, I am really curious to do some ADD testing. However, my partner and my mother have told me I just need to "focus more". Which I have tried but my mind wanders.So, have any of you suffered from mental health issues and what strategies have you used to cope? [info] None [info] 1551102424
OwlfaceFrank [info] I went to my Dr. because of chest pain. I was afraid of pretty much what's described here. Instead I was diagnosed with anxiety. I take meds for that now and I feel much better. Tell your doctors everything.  That's what they are there for. [info] None [info] 1556086372
Alphurna [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in elementary school and then autism in middle school. I’ve been given a 504 plan for school (a list of accommodations) and multiple therapists for different things over the years. I find that surrounding myself with things that make me feel comfortable is a great way to cope. For example, blankets are a godsend for me. I’m actually pursuing a service dog as well. [info] None [info] 1554258612
Dreavok [info] High Blood Pressure. My name is Noah /age 24 /Male/ Caucasian. I went to the ER a few days ago because I was experiencing numbness in my arms and legs that would alternate between the left and right side of my body. It scared me, I thought I was having a stroke. I've been under alot of stress lately and I was diagnosed with anxiety, which was said to have been causing the strange numb sensations in my body. (On top of tachycardia and high blood pressure)  My EKG was normal apart from my fast heart rate (which is usually about 112bpm at rest) when I arrived at the ER and they took my blood pressure it was about 190 over 130. They prescribed me metoprol tartrate 50 mg a day. Ive been taking them for roughly 3 days now but my anxiety is still bothering me. I took my blood pressure at a grocery store kiosk a few minutes ago and it read 129 over 89 with 111bpm. So it's still high but a level that isn't dangerous. I would like to start using relatively low doses of CBD to treat my anxiety in a more natural way. If Metoprol is the only medication I am taking would it be safe for me to take CBD, or does anyone else have any other suggestions for my anxiety? I really want to avoid benzos or anything like that. Thanks guys. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1575181554
ItIs430Am [info] I would say go to the DAV, yes. If someone wants to chime in and correct me, by all means, but the DAV is literally there for helping veterans with disability claims. In all facets. At first I was worried about making the switch, but they've made it so much easier. My first representative was the American Legion and my first claim went through pretty fast, but since I moved and was told about the DAV, I have done everything through them. Got my appointments set up and everything has been easy. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD and the psychologist who did my evaluation basically confirmed it. With PTSD, I'm sure you will get the correct diagnosis. They wont look at you and think "oh they're lying." Itll be taken very seriously. On that note, and remember this, the evaluation does not mean you will be treated. For disability, you are getting evaluated to confirm your condition. You need to either get referred to or see the VA psychiatrist/therapist (I see the VA ones). They will work with you to determine how often you need to go and what you need to do to be successful down the road.  [info] None [info] 1523117839
BigOneEyedPurpleEmu [info] Thanks. Ive been struggling with multiple illnesses for the past couple of years but never got a clear deliniation between them. Ive been on klonapin for 2 years and am currently on valium. Not very effective imo.Is that anxiety general anxiety disorder? I have been diagnosed with anxiety but at different times different types.Edit: is there a word for the dtart of the cycle ie the random thought that sends you into limbo. [info] None [info] 1517768775
skieshighes [info] anxious about smoking again, was it bad bong hits? Some backstory, I've smoked quite a few times before, and definitely enjoyed it. It's been a few months since the last time, and tonight my fiance and I are going to smoke together for the first time. I'm feeling a bit nervous about it, mostly because I have had previous sessions where I got too high (I think) and freaked out. These two occasions were both smoking with a bong, and smoking some daaaaank shit. (the first was Pineapple Express. So good but too strong maybe?)I've had good experiences smoking from bowls, though. I suppose I'm just nervous. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and had panic attacks in my past.Questions: Did I get too high before? Was it from the bong hits? What are some good ways to quell my anxiety and have a great night with my SO?Thanks ents! [info] None [info] 1408313772
camerer_marsh [info] I have this exact problem but I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back. So...I just got lucky? [info] None [info] 1546146914
democraticwhre [info] I’m sure a lot of people “think” they have ADHD - Do I do anything about it? I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago during undergrad and now I’m in grad school. Whenever I have a certain issue and look up information about it, I invariably either match the characteristics of ADHD, or benefit greatly from the suggestions given for people with ADHD.Like this list - https://www.chesapeakeadd.com/how-can-i-study-so-hard-and-still-do-badI could completely just be WebMD-ing myself, and I don’t fit all the symptoms of ADHD, but is this worth doing anything about? I am on medicine for anxiety. [info] None [info] 1513313336
Darksilverbuttons [info] I am struggling to get a diagnosis from my doctors and it is destroying my life. I am waiting on an Autism and an ADHD diagnoses for over a year after a psychotherapist wanted me to go get evaluated by my doctor after she told me to take online tests and print them out, I went to my doctor and got a referral but I am still waiting. My doctors are very useless and I am trying to be taken seriously as my doctors like to misdiagnose you with stuff, I have be complaining of all the stuff the psychotherapist told me was due to Autism and Adhd like sensory overload etc but my doctors keep telling me it's my anxiety. Ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety I thought I would finally feel understood but after it, I felt like there was something missing, I knew it wasn't a part of my personality like my delayed hearing, my sensory issues, being picky with food etc I am struggling in life because I don't have my diagnosis which is making life harder for me, I am not able to get help in college because I need proof of needing help which I can't get without my diagnosis, I have lost friends because I don't know what I did to offend them and I can't explain about autism and not understanding social cues if I have no evidence to back it up with, I have gone through fights with my boyfriend because of my withdrawing from him, because of my mood swings where I have been a complete mess because I am unable to understand more arguments and try to tell him I don't understand I will come across as manipulative which is complicating everything even more.I am at my wits ends because there is 1 thing that can solve all of this but because I am an adult female I am unlikely to get diagnosed because I am being misdiagnosed and having pills pushed on me by my doctors that have caused memory loss, mood swings, loss of appetite and worse of all have made me extremely tired and anxious. I stopped taking them after my hair fell out due to me stressing out so much, anything I complained about the tablets instead of checking me for something else they just upped the dose and changed the tablets I went from citalopram 20mg to sertraline 100mg in a matter of 2 months.How do I get my doctors to listen to me? I have no money for a private diagnosis. [info] None [info] 1577959728
Hansungani [info] Depends on your definition.I have been diagnosed with anxiety and social skills disorders.Now that I've moved to a new town, therefore a new mental health agency's catchment area, I'm still needing to take a 5-hour long battery of tests to determine some new diagnoses. [info] None [info] 1469324926
trashylegend [info] I agree. Self love is important when it generates self improvement, a desire to be the best person that you can and knowing what you can and cannot change. I find the 'Self love' preached today is excessive, disgusting, and damaging to everyone. The idea that you should cut people out of your life if they are no longer beneficial to you is something I am seeing more and more of. Self love is not taught as becoming what you want in order to achieve, but it centers around the idea that you already deserve whatever it is you want. As far as the 'everyone gets a medal' mentality, I think that some things are harder or easier for certain people, but since we feel the need to treat everyone the same, we end up over-praising. If someone is incredibly anxious about something, they should be praised for doing it. Over-praising everyone's accomplishments, however, makes everyone feel like it's okay to not even try as long as you have an excuse. I was diagnosed with anxiety, but I never once have told myself "I can't do this because I have anxiety". There are people with more serious mental illnesses that actually are unable to do certain things, but there are also too many people who see it as a shortcut for praise. [info] None [info] 1559591059
my-dinner-with-andre [info] People keep staring at me... How to manage? I'm diagnosed with anxiety and ocd. Unfortunately I'm really good looking and I care about my appearance (not trying to brag) which is a really bad combo. Everywhere I go I get stares and looks from pretty much everyone. I'm also very aware of my surroundings so it's a triple threat... I feel like I cant do anything in private, the only thing that I found helps is staring at the ground when I'm walking. Also when I'm anxious I try to hide it which I think comes off looking as arrogant or cocky when in reality I'm not at all. What can I do ? [info] None [info] 1575064382
itsonlydrizzling [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I agree with what you say 100%. Sometimes, even in an out of body situation, a clear voice in the back of my head realizes it will all be okay in the end. And then it is okay. [info] None [info] 1471313959
maydsilee [info] I've noticed in many situations where I thought I was following my dog's instinct, I realized in hindsight that my gut was already telling me a situation was bad, if that makes sense? Like, I probably realized subconsciously that something wasn't right or someone was making me uncomfortable, and then my dog picked up on my own body language (me tensing, for example). Since he can show it better than me (his hackles rising, or shifting uneasily next to me, or not wanting to walk past someone, etc.), I listened to him and would change direction or avoid that person. A lot of people don't get just how much their body language rubs off on their dogs, who notice you're uneasy, so then they're uneasy. It's why trainers stress to clients often that their own feelings rubs off on their dogs.Of course, it's also not absolute :P I'm diagnosed with anxiety, so a *lot* of things make me uneasy, and my dog notices that, so...it's definitely not clear-cut lol! [info] None [info] 1573678035
nebulochaotic_ [info] [Skin Concerns] I can't stop picking my skin! HELP! I've had this trouble ever since I was told by someone that popping pimples made them go away when I was very young. It was pretty innocent to begin with since I wasn't yet more mentally ill (I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back and ADHD only a year or so ago) and didn't have a lot of acne. But, now that I'm anxious pretty much 24/7 and am very fidgety, I've taken to picking at my acne and dry skin to relieve my anxiety. I'm seeing a dermatologist (who is absolutely wonderful and very sweet) and am using tretinoin cream and azealaic acid as well as a cleanser for night and morning (different one for each), toner, and two separate moisturizers (the morning one has sunscreen). I take very good care of my skin when it comes to sticking to my skincare routine. There are parts of my skin that don't have any scars or acne and sometimes I'll just feel them and appreciate how nice and soft it feels.But, I have a horrible habit of picking my skin. I literally have no fingernails (I've had to resort to chewing them to keep them this short because I can't use a nail file without filing my finger skin on accident) but I still find a way to pick. I take medication for my anxiety and ADHD. I take spirnolactone (only since 1/20/2020) and doxycycline for my skin as well. I'm sure anyone else who has this problem will also tell you that it feels *so* good to pick it. I guess it feels like I'm fixing my skin my pushing at my pimples and picking off the dry skin. I 100% know it's not and am ***INCREDIBLY*** self-conscious about my skin. It doesn't help that I'm 6' tall and can't really hide.I've run out of options at this point. Anyone have any words of wisdom? [info]  [info] 1581265980
LoveMyRache [info] Making Up Scenarios In My Head I've been diagnosed with anxiety over a year ago and this is something I started doing recently. What I do in my mind pretty is making these fake scenarios in my head. It's either about past events where I edit the conversation to things I wanted to say or should have said it, or it's about scenarios that "may" happen where I imagine what I would say. I feel like I need to be ready in case they actually happen. I'm practicing those conversations out loud or in my mind while I walk, take a shower, look at the mirror. They are usually about me telling my friends off because they are disrespecting me in those imaginary situations. I keep repeating the things I would say, trying to memorize them and improving the speech. I feel like this has something to do with my self esteem or ego. What can I do to stop this behaviour and work on my self esteem? I graduated from uni last year and I'm unemployed at the moment, all I am doing is going to gym three times a week. [info] None [info] 1567248135
eisenkatze [info] Is this a panic attack? I've been diagnosed with anxiety and other stuff for ages but never experienced something like this. My grandmother died a month ago today, I watched her die which didn't seem to faze me. During the funeral, I kept feeling sick and nauseous, and in the viewing hall, suddenly started breathing very heavily and felt I was going to faint, my entire body went numb. I was ill for a long while afterwards, thinking it was pneumonia as I was short of breath and my heart wouldn't stop beating fast for days, but turned out to be psychosomatic after running some tests.Today I visited her grave for the first time since the funeral. Again, I couldn't help but start hyperventilating and stumbled down onto a bench, completely numb and nauseous. It felt like I didn't have any air at all. When my mom came to join me, I could function as normal, however.When I told a psychiatrist about the first instance, he said this was an "incomplete" panic attack. What makes it incomplete and what is a "normal" panic attack like? I've read up about them extensively for years but never had one, so no idea what it feels like. Is this a normal psychosomatic response to repressed emotions? I really don't want to visit her grave again, or go to the church service in her memory, in case this happens again. [info] None [info] 1447181653
Pigstah [info] First time suffering with severe anxiety... As the title say's I've been diagnosed with anxiety and have been feeling really shit for the past two months but past week has been the worst. My  **fiancée** has been dealing with much the same, if not worse, for the past 10 years and in turn she has been trying her best to help me.I had my best day yesterday as I was laying in the sun with my partner, doing absolutely nothing and was super relaxed. Then today back to work, my chest is back to being tight, clenched jaw and fluttering stomach. I've recently started this job (6 months ago nearly) and is my first step into my new career in IT. I love the job to pieces but have been taking more and more on which is turn has made me feel very overwhelmed. I'm also getting married this year, which I'm over the moon about but this too could be a reason for the anxiety all of sudden. Last week, I had a slight panic attack at work and got sent home, I then also had a big panic attack Saturday night and my partner had to cradle me in bed to calm me down :(...I didn't really have a question but more of a way to vent and to see how some of you have handled your own anxiety? My doctor advised I start taking anti-depressants, which I have and seek some therapy. I just want my normal self back, and to not associate my anxiety at the moment with work. [info] None [info] 1556028663
Stormheartgirl [info] How Can I (22F) Get Better at Communicating with my BF (24m) I'm really bad at communicating when there's a problem in the relationship. I can't seem to talk about it at the time, and instead I bottle it up and dwell on it until something snaps and I either have a cry or we have an argument. I feel like my points are valid (I get annoyed at doing the majority of the housework, I don't like how he has a tendancy to snap at people when he's annoyed about something etc) but I just can't seem to express them in a healthy way. Part of it is that I don't have much experience of having to solve problems alongside a partner. My exes have mostly been very immature or clingy and the one time I got annoyed with my most recent ex (he made me miss a train home late at night because he was late) he just apologised and that was it. I should also note that I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back. I think most of it boils down to a bad breakup, one which came out of the blue for me, and a lot of my anxiety seems to hinge around worrying my partner might suddenly leave me, especially if we're having lots of problems. Tbf it is mostly the lack of good communication that seems to bother him. He does make changes when I point out problems, though that usually comes with a bit of frustration at me crying or getting needlessly angry. I have tried therapy before, but it doesn't seem to have helped me much. I'm also just plain confused at times. Sometimes I do take a while to bring up issues, but even when I think on them a while and try and bring them up in a non dramatic way, the hesitancy can cause confusion. Today, for example, I struggled to bring up a problem that has been an issue for a while, but became a bigger deal today. The problem was delicate and a little embarrassing to bring up (I trust him because he's my partner but it still felt a bit awkward) and although I did mention it several times today, my bf shrugged it off. I tried a third time to broach it casually, and while I was chewing over how to phrase the next sentence he changed the subject. And then realised when I went silent that the original conversation wasn't over. Not a big deal and totally accidental, but I'm now a bit confused because I did try and raise it in a non dramatic way, but because I didn't do it instantly at the time it didn't seem like I was trying to have a conversation about it. I feel like, even if I did get better at talking things out, I would still need some processing time. Any advice would be handy. I love this guy so much, and I really want to make this work, but I don't know how to bring up problems in a less dramatic way.Tl;dr I am terrible at communicating when there are problems in my relationship, owing to a lack of experience and anxiety. I bottle things up and then cry or end up arguing. My bf understands so far, but he does seem a bit exasperated that I can't find a less dramatic way of talking about things. [info] None [info] 1551646929
giraffesNstuff [info] Anxiety or something else to be worried about? Sorry if this is the wrong sub for this. If so please direct me on where I can post this for helpA few years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and since then have been on and off different medications. As of the last 2-3 months it has been getting more difficult to function as things have gotten much worse. I’ve found it much harder to focus on things in front of me and thinking in general has become difficult, as I feel like my focus is in several different places at once. I’ve also had an increase in panic attacks, as well has tightness in my chest and trouble catching my breath at times. The most concerning issues that I am hoping for info on have been intense head fog, dizziness and confusion which is been occurring all day, every day, for the past month or so. These have worsened and have made me take off several weeks of work, and make it difficult for me to drive.Also in the past weeks have been dealing with some minor stomach pain, constipation, acid reflux,intense gas that has caused discomfort in my chest, but I’m told issues like these are common in people with anxiety. Also, if it’s related, I have been having several allergy and sinus related issues such as sinus congestion and headaches for a few months now. Can this also be related to anxiety?I had a CT scan done on my brain last week as well as several tests on my heart, liver, thyroids, and blood which all came back showing no issues. I would like to know if all this could be due to anxiety alone, or are there other possible issues that I should investigate further? Also if the head fog and confusion could be due to ineffective medication (buspirone), which I did not have issues with the first few months of taking, but now seems to be ineffective, considering my increase in panic attacks and other symptoms listed. [info] Patient [info] 1571849712
thekojac [info] Just had the worst panic attack (I hope that's what it is...) I've ever had... Little bit of background...When I was in high school (about 10 years ago) I was officially diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder after sitting in class and thinking I was having a heart attack, but what I now know was a panic attack. Had an MRI done, wore a holtor monitor, had a complete work up with nothing out of the ordinary. So I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder.Recently things have been good, save for a panic attack once every few months, though my baseline general anxiety level is higher. But very few actual panic attacks. Well, today I was at work going about my business when, out of the blue with literally no build-up, I noticed I was having a hard time swallowing. Immediately (like, within a second) upon this realization, my palms got sweaty, I got dizzy and light headed, I had "brain zaps", my heart was pounding, I felt like I was gonna black out, yet I wanted to get up and run. I don't know what from, but I needed to get away from where I was. I honestly felt like I was dying. The attack seemed to last with varying intensity for a good 30-40 minutes (though it was by far the worst when it first started) before slowly dissipating (with the help of some emergency Ativan I took). I'm not quite 100% back to normal just yet, but way better that I was. Oh, and I checked my blood pressure and it was quite high while the attack was ongoing, but seems to have returned to near normal. But... This was probably the singular most intense, awful, terrifying panic attack I've ever had. It scared me. A lot. I dunno why I'm sharing this. Maybe I just need some reassurance that I'm not dying right now and it really was just the worst panic attack I've ever experienced in my life. Ugh. This stuff sucks. [info] None [info] 1440962688
idk345536 [info] ADHD OCD and anxiety can create hocd kinda? I have been diagnosed with anxiety but believe strongly I have ADHD and ocd but obvs can't go doctors atm I'm just curious could that combo make hocd or make it worse not looking for reassurance just genuinly curious [info] None [info] 1585776613
phoebrie [info] I've had the worst year of my life this year it's the final  year of my a levels and I was diagnosed with anxiety this year because I couldn't cope because of everything going on with school and my wreck of a family life. I've put on over a stone and have started to genuinely hate myself I could do with some motivation to lose the weight and get my life back on track.  [info] None [info] 1497205369
AverageRedditorMaybe [info] Dunno if 1 in a million but here goes. When I was 13 I smoked some spice not sure how much a little over a bowl of it. This is the same shit that killed otherwise healthy adults. I was born with Marfan syndrome so I have heart issues. Now immediately after smoking it this time I noticed something was way wrong compared to the other 10 or so times I’ve smoked it. Not sure what it was as I don’t completely remember but I rushed home and said I need to go to the hospital and told my mom everything. My uncle said to sleep I was having a bad trip I’ll be okay. Mom took me to the hospital where they rushed me in put me on an iv and oxygen to purge stuff out of my system everyone was clambering around and I remember taking a look at the heart monitor thingy. I saw my bpm rising 140,150,170,180,190 I started to think my heart was gonna give out completely at that moment and just flipped my shit. I managed to calm down due to this cool nurse talking me through it. At the time I was completely detached from reality and felt like I was in a dream. No exaggerations everything felt fabricated. My hearing felt distorted and had a ring to it. My vision was cloudy and tunneled. I pulled through when 10 mins later a cop came in to ask me some questions. He told me “yknow you got really lucky, when they called me down here they told me I would be here to arrest your mother and I wouldn’t be able to ask you any questions” implying that the doctors thought I wasn’t gonna survive. Still alive today with ptsd related toward any drugs. Took me 2 or so years to recover from that dreamy state. Imagine 2 years of feeling like you’re still in a dream. After that I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder but at least  I’m still alive. [info] None [info] 1550745655
Markmange [info] Why am I so miserable? I just recently started a new job, a job which in theory I should be over the moon about, it's better pay and more experience and benefits than I could ask for... But whenever I'm there I just can't wait to leave.I long for weekends, not because it's free time to do things but because it's the only time where I get to lie or sit down and do literally nothing, I don't want to do anything, no hobbies, no interests, I do things only because they're required to stay alive (eat, drink etc.).I have a dog who for the most part at least adds some form of stimulation to my life, I enjoy his company but at the end of it all, I have no energy or great desire to play with him, explore with him or do anything but sit on the couch and cuddle with him.. I take him for exercise not because I want to but because he needs it, and I feel like a bastard for being this way.I like where I stay, granted, I hate my neighbor's but they have next to no impact on how I feel. My home is my own and I can do what I want when I want, but that what is always nothing whatsoever.I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues in the past and put on meds for it, and while it keeps me chill (and helps me sleep so damn well) and originally helped me from freezing up and having a panic attack, now I don't even worry about that, when I get anxious, I just feel fucking miserable, like I want to be immediately erased from the situation, with a massive god sized eraser.Last time I went to the doctor in regards to this they basically said"Don't smoke dope and fix your life. You're not depressed"So I did that. I've not smoked weed in over a year, I've got a new home, new job, new life really...But I'm still god damn miserable!I'm running out of ideas now, and beginning to fail to see the point in even trying, if I didn't have my dog, I'd have probably given up by now. [info] None [info] 1542788232
Vermacian55 [info] Just diagnosed with NOT having ADHD, what now? I have been speculating for the past 3 years whether or not I have ADHD, and after half a year of sessions with a psychiatrist I am diagnosed with anxiety (and maybe avoidant personality disorder if I was older). While I definitely have anxiety, I do not feel like it is the reason for my lack of focus. I am currently in 2 year of university and am now two subjects behind. I have been self-medicating with nicotine with some success, and am basically only able to learn the subjects close to the exam date.I do not really know what to do now, as I have been kinda fixated on getting adhd medication to see if they help me. I am sort of planning on quitting nicotine and then basically see if I am even able to study in the next semester. Sort of like "I told you I had ADHD, look at me failing all these subjects!", but at the same time that feels stupid and is self-destructive.I do not know why I am writing this, as you guys can't really diagnose me... I just needed to talk about it with someone... [info] None [info] 1545067579
burnsrado [info] There's a chance it could be anxiety. I've had symptoms for a few years, and what you described partially aligns with my early symptoms, especially being a few minutes late for class and deciding to bail. Just see your physician and talk about your symptoms. He/she may refer you to a specialist. In my case, I was treated for everything it *could* be, once that was ruled out, I was diagnosed with anxiety. Good luck!Have you always been this way? Because what stood out to me the most was I used to love being in crowds and talking to new people, but when that changed I knew something weird was going on. [info] GAD [info] 1362199588
SplinterItToPieces [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and referred to “Cognitive Behavioral Therapy” (I didn’t go) because I was “making up an illness” that I didn’t have. 3 months went by of me arguing with my doctor about this and he then “diagnosed” (his words) me with “Denial” because I wouldn’t go to therapy and take Paxil. Got a second opinion and they immediately discovered a 3 month old sinus infection that sat for so long I now need surgery. [info] None [info] 1509567997
cheddarbomb21 [info] What state are you talking about, if you don't mind? And do you know what constitutes a mental illness for that? I'm just curious because I was just diagnosed with anxiety (it's situational and has to do with public speaking or taking a test) a few months ago. I'm a gun owner and actually really like the idea of this, but I also think it should be on a case by case basis. [info] None [info] 1355889598
PaperCats4 [info] Finally went to see a doctor. I have celexa questions I thought the way I was feeling would go away on its own. I've never been depressed before but I've always been someone who is anxious. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder as a teenager. But, for the past two months it's like I've been living in a nightmare. I'm always tired. I feel numb most of the time but when I do feel emotion its irritability or intense hopelessness and fears of being stuck like this forever. I feel heavy and like I can't do anything I enjoy. Lately, even making and eating food has become a huge chore and I'm eat a lot less. I can't do my research or my writing and I fear what will happen when the semester starts, I go back to teaching, and I can barely get out of bed. People told me not to see a doctor. They said medications aren't the solution and that it will just mask my problems. Some have said that the meds change who you are as a person and that you become addicted. But, I feel so miserable that I finally bit the bullet and went to see someone. Herbs, essential oils, and yoga don't help. Someone told me to take up a hobby to cure my sadness but the thing is that this isn't sadness. I'm aware that I have a pretty good life. I have a career that I love and it pays well. I have a supportive and loving spouse, a house of my own, and three amazing cats. I have hobbies and friends. It's just that I can't enjoy any of these things lately.   Anyway, the doctor referred me to psychotherapy which I will definitely do. She also prescribed Celexa. I'm starting on 5mg per day for 2 weeks, then 10mg per day for 2 weeks, and then 20mg. However, I've sort of scared myself looking at side effects. I've read that it can cause fatal heart conditions, liver disease, libido loss, low salt levels in the blood, seizures, etc. How common are these side effects?   Also, my doctor said I can expect to notice some change at 4 weeks. Does that sound correct? What do I do until then? [info] None [info] 1564441808
fallenbutrisen [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder (GAD) and panic disorder and he reckons my other symptoms are caused by insomnia, regular caffeine overdose and ptsd from abuse in childhood. [info] None [info] 1520122351
snowfarts [info] I had the exact same symptoms when I got diagnosed this year. I was honest with my doctor and told her I had tried adderall, and it worked well when I did. My therapist is also in the same office so it helped. I am diagnosed with anxiety as well, and we were all concerned it would worsen my anxiety. I told them that no matter what the outcome was, I didn’t want to try anxiety meds and I’m willing to risk my anxiety being worse. If I know what’s causing it, it’s typically not an issue anyway. My therapist also said it was worth a try because either my anxiety was caused by my ADD, or they were two different things. I’ve been on it for 3 or 4 months now and my life is completely changed for the better. My anxiety was 100% caused by my ADD. I don’t get overwhelmed with all of the shit I have to do, and I’m actually able to do it instead of procrastinate. My doctor keeps me on a low dose, and I no longer get the feeling you experience at first (at first I was sad but then realized I cannot want to feel that ‘high’ feeling). I just feel like a normal person, which is weird because I thought I felt like that before. Except before it felt like I was living life with clouds in my brain and eyes, making me sleepy and unable to care about anything. I also have insomnia and it hasn’t affected it, if it does your dose is too strong. For a while I could NOT sleep and surprise, it was because of my anxiety. My therapist told me I was so worried about my sleep I was making myself unable to do so. Now I just lay down and if I’m laying for a minute, I don’t care. I just lay there. I’ll take melatonin every once in a while.Sorry for this literal essay.. I still have add, its just managed. [info] None [info] 1566853854
hellonew [info] Yea, if I'm diagnosed with anxiety they can simply link that with the sweating. I don't have anxiety though... [info] None [info] 1303581416
ServantofHades [info] Anxiety and PTSD I was diagnosed with anxiety several years ago. But after almost 2 years at a job with borderline abusive bosses, I am now starting to have episodes where I black out, but don’t fall, and even continue on in conversations, only to come too a few seconds later. I also have spells where I feel like I am moving through a dream. I have been told to go to a trauma therapist for PTSD treatment by a “regular” doctor. Does this sound reasonable/logical. This possibility terrifies me, but I don’t know if that terror is “real” or just heightened by my anxiety. Not looking for an online diagnosis, just some advice from others who may know a thing or two while I search for affordable professional help IRL. [info] None [info] 1577991681
BrentBlend [info] Items for sale.Gold PAX 3Newvape pusher/lid comboNewvape screenInterplanetary Super Weapon II + new screens x5 (+1 barely used in the swII, 6 total)ID Pollen PressID baggiesID silicone 2ml containers x4I used the swII maybe two times, the PAX once. I was diagnosed with anxiety, thinking this may help with medicating. It still gives me anxiety so I have no use for any of it. Everything is in like new condition. [info] None [info] 1505356437
Volleyballer08 [info] Was Diagnosed As A Kid, Now Problems As An Adult After work today I really want to put my foot down and get whatever is going on with me under control. When I was 11, I was diagnosed with anxiety. I didn't know this until about a year ago when my mom told me. I had gone through a brief period of therapy for panic attacks that resulted from being a hypochondriac. I work in healthcare now and don't have that issue anymore. My mom I guess had asked if she thought medication was needed and my therapist at the time said she didn't think so. I grew up a teenager always worried and I dealt with stress poorly, but I would say I was 'fine' as far as that goes. I had lots of friends, was very physically active, and wouldn't have really considered myself having any mental health issues.Flash forward to me at age 22-now at age 29. I'm finding it suddenly hard to make friends and have been alone for a very long time with only rare occasions of meeting up with people. Recently I moved due to a career change and now I'm feeling even worse than before; panicked, afraid everyone hates me, so anxious by the time I leave work everyday I'm in tears. My parents know this sort of thing has been going on for a while and God bless them, they've advised me to go to therapy again and try things like online dating apps and such but I'm so damn insecure these days I'm afraid I'll just feel worse. Seeing them upset makes me feel worse and the cycle goes on and on.Living in a new town with what could be a fresh start I already feel like I'm slipping into the isolation and constant state of anxiousness I was before. I don't even know where to begin in terms of seeking help and I feel like such a failure. I want to move past this mental barrier that keeps me from being myself but have zero clue how. I don't get why I'm this way after so many years of being fine. [info] None [info] 1539800664
Bonjour-B [info] Climate change news makes me so overwhelmed, I want to give up on life and lock myself in my room I was diagnosed with anxiety last year. One of the “schemas” that my therapist noticed that I deal with is vulnerability - I have a tendency to believe that I’m always on the verge of experiencing a catastrophe (accidents, financial problems, illness, death, and so forth) and I will have no control over the situation. The thought of the earth dying is very anxiety provoking. Whenever people start talking about how the world is going to end SOON because of mankind’s negligence, I can’t help but imagine myself and my family/friends/neighbors in apocalyptic situations; naturally, I get very distressed. I took an environmental science class a few years ago and it filled me with hope that we could save the earth. Now people are saying that there’s no hope anymore and we need to panic. Hearing stuff like this makes me want to give up on school, my job, my dreams, and my hopes of ever having a family. What would be the point, after all? Am I the only one who feels this way? I know I probably sound irrational...but how should I stay hopeful about the future?TLDR: I constantly fear catastrophic events occurring. How do I manage to keep my sanity when even scientists are saying that we’re causing the end of the world? [info] None [info] 1555997579
nitmarux [info] Has this happened to anybody else ? So I have been raised in a pretty abusive environment ( part due to my parents’ marriage and my mother narcissistic tendencies ), which is a big chunk of the reason I was diagnosed with anxiety 1 year and a half ago, In September, I’ve finally left for college in a town that’s 9 hours away as an escape from everything I grew up with .My anxiety has been very low there. I still had little bouts here and there, but nothing too significant. I actually gained a decent amount of confidence.I’m back home for the first time in like 3 months and my anxiety hit me full-on. I have been home for 24 hours as I’m writing this, but since last night all my proverbial demons have been coming back full force- insecurities, hypochondria,my confidence is fading. I’m feeling at a loss of control for no apparent reason and I’m very on edge.While there haven’t been any obvious triggers to my anxiety, it is possible that my anxiety is caused by simply being back here? [info] None [info] 1577038617
gvpmahesh [info] Activities that you recommend for the next 15 days? I have been diagnosed with anxiety and stress. I took a break from work for the next 15 days at least. I would like to hit a refresh button and go back fresh to the office. What activities do you recommend me doing?  Just a little bit of background. I enjoy writing, dancing(bachata) - though stopped for the past month and not at all a pro, and sometimes cooking and programming apps.  Interested in meeting new people, do some fun activities like games or community cooking(if that's a thing) or going out. Any suggestions would be helpful     I have the art of living happiness program in the back of my mind, that I intend to join on the first week of Jan [info] None [info] 1577515895
not_a_l1zard [info] Ive had lots going on and im so stressed and dont know how to vocalise it TL:DR; I've had issues coming to terms with home life, i got bad family news and i had a really tough time at work and now im overwhelmed&amp;#x200B;So I \[F20\] have had a really weird relationship with my mum for a while where I think Its great and then I get confused thinking she emotionally abused me alongside her husband for years (story for another thread). I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was around 16 and after moving out it went away a lot but still peeks up from time to time. Because of this if I get low I get really low. So I went home recently and I argued with my mum because she said I wasn't spending enough time with her (she had been at work and I went out 1 night for a party for my boyfriends family so I couldn't spend LOADS of time with her because she wasn't there either). After having a go at me she then told me about my uncle taking an overdose (I had no idea he was that low - he didn't die but it really shook me up), she also told me his gf is abusing him so I started panicking about my baby cousin who lives with them. All of this set me off but I didn't wasn't to annoy my mum so I pretended it was all fine. She also told me my nana had a mental breakdown and was found on a beach with a knife (she was struggling to deal with the issues concerning my uncle).My mum then told me to stop because everything was fine (she ''didn't want me worked up'').I get back to university after this and go back to work, I work as a first aider, one of my first aid cases was a boy telling me how much he wanted to die, (his dad had died recently) and how suicidal he was which i really struggled to deal with. When I spoke to my boss about this he said he didn't know what to do either so I was just sat dealing with him until he went home and then I needed to assist in contacting with supportive services so that he could get some help.After all this Im so overwhelmed and I dont really have anyone to vent to. Of course I have my boyfriend but I cant repeatedly complain to him, I did talk to him about it and hes being supportive but I feel like I need to let it out again.I don't want to complain for attention but I just want to let it out. Sorry for whining... [info] None [info] 1538608276
kevinsideways [info] Identifying and naming my feelings always does the trick ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety/OCD. For instance, before my diagnosis, I would have recurring videos playing in my head of my little brother getting hit by a car or my girlfriend cheating on me. Now I can just say, "Oh, this is anxiety," and move to doing the next productive thing, knowing that the feeling is going to be in my head regardless but now I'm not stressed about finding what's causing the feeling. Another example: I get rejected by a girl -- what I say to myself: "Oh, this is what rejection feels like!" -- Move on.Of course this may not work for everyone but it's certainly helped me become more stoic and forward-minded! [info] None [info] 1493756478
QuestionsQurstions [info] Help, am I over reacting? Hello !First time posting here so sorry if I don’t get this write and if it’s a little long. My fiancée (43m) and I (31f) have been together for 6 years and have two children together. We are supposed to be getting married in a year however things have not been going well. Some history on me is I have been diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago so I’m sure I haven’t helped the situation as I had been stressing and dwelling on things recently. I have always been an emotional person and am very eager to talk about anything if something is bothering me as I don’t like dwelling on it.Into the relationship issues, my spouse has always had difficulties talking about his feelings and will often answer things with “I don’t know” which is incredibly frustrating to me just because I don’t understand how you are unsure of most things, I feel like he’s avoiding discussing it at times. I was curious about his past relationships and why they ended and I asked him and he gets quite mad when I ask things that are uncomfortable and he answered “I don’t know, I don’t dwell on things that happened in the past”. I was mostly curious if it was similar to the problems we’d been having with communication as well as he gets its angry often telling me I’m annoying and I nag him a lot. If I comment that I feel I do more with the children than he does he gets mad and tells me he doesn’t want someone nagging and telling him how awful he is. Which really isn’t what I’m trying to say when I bring these things up, I’m just asking for a little more help or appreciation sometimes. He watches a lot of sports and sometimes won’t come out on walks with us due to him being busy watching hockey/baseball. And I have gotten frustrated and told him I do feel like he watches sports more than he spends time with us. Then he’ll accuse me of constantly watching tv and that we should starting taking notes of who watches more TV then since he disagrees.I always feel like if I address something that bothers me he turns it into something where it becomes my fault. Today he was cleaning downstairs and I wanted to go outside to start getting the garden together in the front yard and with our oldest (5) and I asked if he could watch the younger (1) just because it’s a busy street and I don’t want him wandering around while I may not be paying attention. Anyways he said no he wants to finish cleaning first (which I figured he could do with the 1 year old since he’ll jusf play). He said he would be 2 minutes and it’s be about 20 minutes and I was in the kitchen and my youngest tried to o downstairs to see his dad and he fell down some stairs. Which I felt awful because obviously I wasn’t paying close enough attention. My spouse came downstairs and was yelling at me that I should be watching him which I understand I should have been, I don’t ever want anything to happen to my kids. And he was yelling at me that if I can’t pay attention to them then I should get him to watch them. So I just did mention I had asked before but he said no and he said “well if I knew you were going to ignore him I would have”. Which wasn’t my intention at all. I told him I always feel like I hve to ask him to watch them when it’s just expected of me and it’s frustrating because I have stuff to do as well. And he just kept yelling at me and saying if he knew I was going to just ignore him he would have instead of saying no. It just makes me feel awful because I know it was my fault and I didn’t mean for that to happen. I do feel like the kids are all my responsibility though and I do get tired of asking permission all the time to go do something and see if he can watch them. He says he loves me, but he doesn’t show it. I try to cuddle him but he tells me he doesn’t like cuddling. He would never say no to sex though. If I try to kiss him he barely kisses me goodbye. Am I doing something wrong? Is it my anxiety? Please help me [info] None [info] 1555985963
sammy0415 [info] Thanks will do :)Stress is a really huge thing for me. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was like 15. I'm 20 years old, with severe palpitations, balding, and greying hair that's apparently attributed to stress. So the doctors are also attributing the migraines to stress- they told me to just try to regulate my stress. How do you know what frequencies affect you?  [info] None [info] 1419212631
RepressedThot [info] A lot of my childhood I can't remember either. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and persistent depressive disorder also known as dysthymia. I grew up with my father in and out of my life but always in a very toxic way. I've thought I had PTSD but am not sure. I was seeing a therapist for a few months but then moved and haven't gotten insurance back. I remember a lot of verbal abuse and traumatic stuff like spending Christmas visiting my dad in prison but it's hard to think there is worse stuff that is repressed. I think it's messed up how the environment we grow up in can follow us for so long. My and my bf don't want kids ever due to our childhood, we don't think we'd be good parents.  Im sorry what you have gone through I hope you can find ways to cope and improve yourself. [info] None [info] 1556037211
rocco_xL [info] been there, even before I was diagnosed with anxiety I bit my nails.thankfully I stopped that, but like you I developed that exact same bad habit of digging my nails into my skin and it gives me some sort of strange relief I can downright crave at times when I'm very anxious. I've honestly never thought much about it as I chalked it up to a nervous habit (much like someone bouncing a leg) and I have no ambition to cut/hurt myself or do anything of that sort.pretty interesting that we both were nail biters who suffer from anxiety and now get the same kind of relief from digging our nails into our skin.anxiety is weird, isn't it? can anyone else chime in here? I'm honestly lost on what specifically is causing this [info] None [info] 1427306491
Wooden-Smoke [info] Increased brain fog and forgetfulness Female, 18, 5'11", 145lbs. Mostly vegetarian; will eat meat twice a month at most. Never had any serious medical issues. I am diagnosed with anxiety but am currently not taking any sort of medication. I do take multi-vitamins and D3.Lately, for the past 3 weeks, I've been very forgetful and having trouble forming sentences/finding the right words to use when I talk aloud. I'll be stuck for several minutes trying to think of the correct words to say. It's like half of my preexisting vocabulary has erased itself from my brain. This isn't typically like me, I consider myself pretty sharp when it comes to remembering.These are really the only things I've been having lately that have stood out to me. I'd like some advice as to what I can do to help this. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1585507612
madelinewalters [info] How many of you are self-diagnosed, versus professionally diagnosed? I've been diagnosed with anxiety by my GP, but haven't gone so far as to see a therapist. My symptoms line up exaaactly with DPDR, which is what I assume I've been suffering with for the last two years.Wondering how many of you have been diagnosed proper, or have self-diagnosed? [info] None [info] 1435599100
CognitiveRipper [info] Pain in the happiness I recently got a girl that ive had a crush on 6+  months, and its been great, but also painful. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, haven't ever taken meds for it till about 2 hours ago. Idk what it is, but I feel happy, but i also feel like she decided that she doesn't like me the same way, and is too scared to me. Idk what to do anymore, and i feel empty [info] None [info] 1576216587
SevenHeadedCrow [info] Anxiety and Partying I (19M) always tell myself I'm not the kinda person who likes to party, but my roommate has some people over and I kinda want to join. I was diagnosed with anxiety and just popped some meds. Something has me worried about how they will think about me and i geuss I'm just to much of a fucking wuss. What can i do when i act like an antisocial semi-arrogant asshole who wants no friends almost all the time. I can't hide from my weaknesses and problems anymore but i dont want ro change and try new* things. Maybe i just want to lose my virginity or feel accepted but i thought i was past these things. Oh well thanks for reading if you did [info] None [info] 1546760043
lechino3000 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety a while ago. It is hard not to worry about things. Slowly though, with the help of others just watching them being so easy going and fun has helped me calm down.I don't know, I think you need to start rationalizing things in your head whenever you start freaking out. For example, whenever you feel anxious, ask yourself "why am I feeling this way?" and.."can I let this feeling go? if so, when?"..that helped me calm down.  [info] None [info] 1343721198
ScreamYouFreak [info] No and no.The doctors will advise against taking any medication or eating anything before the surgery because it could cause issues during the surgery. You don’t want to choke on your own vomit because you got hungry before surgery. You don’t want to have a heart attack during the surgery because you had anxiety and decided to pop pills beforehand (I am diagnosed with anxiety too, so I know where you’re coming from). The doctors and nurses should make everything just fine for you, but make sure to listen to them.Furthermore, you can ride your bike to them, but won’t be able to drive it back. After going under anesthesia, they’re legally required to wheel you or borderline carry you to a vehicle that you will not and cannot operate. This is due to liability reasons and they will check that everything is in place beforehand.Get an uber/lift or a friend to take you. Don’t be dumb.  [info] None [info] 1540216467
SlugHeart [info] Wow this is eerie, I'm going through pretty much the exact same thing. Although I've been diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder in the past and am currently trying to figure out if what I'm actually going through is more neurological/medical or if it's just my mental illness going out of wack. My Deja Vu/Derealisation just won't stop on some days though, it's been on/off for the better part of this year. Today is one of my "bad days". :( I recently had a CAT Scan, which came back normal, I still need to schedule an EEG. Just wanted to say you're not alone in these symptoms, hopefully we can both find some answers.  [info] Neurontin 200mg/day [info] 1407944026
CSnare [info] Apparently I have anxiety So I was enrolling for university and I had to send them my immunization records. On my health record they list that, plus some “ongoing issues.” And one of these ongoing issues was apparently anxiety disorder.So that’s been there since 2016, but no one bothered to tell me I had been diagnosed with anxiety? I had NO idea, for real.I’ve never had a panic attack, but I do worry a lot. I thought the worrying thing was normal. Even the not being able to get out of bed at night out of fear there would be an intruder standing outside my door kind of worrying.Not even my parents bothered to tell me I was diagnosed with anxiety. But I’m not surprised to be fair, my dad doesn’t like the stigma of mental disorders, every time I bring it up he shoots it down.That’s all I really have to say lol.TL;DR I was diagnosed with anxiety and had no idea, and I thought the amount of worrying I did was completely normal. [info] None [info] 1563781598
Marthaver1 [info] Are ppl who suffer from shortness of breath issues related to anxiety be affect more by COVID19?  A couple of months ago I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder after experiencing severe shortness of breath episodes. Ever since, I have been taking pills to keep the shortness of breath episodes from coming back, and they have been working. Since COVID19 affects the breathing of people, will this affect me more severely? I know my issue is not chronic but psychological, I just want to know. Thank you. [info] None [info] 1585012341
-partlycloudy- [info] And if you absolutely have to check if that weird feeling in a particular body part is really just caused by anxiety, include the literal word “anxiety” in your search. Eg “lump in throat anxiety”. 99.99% of the time, that weird symptom will be down to anxiety. This helped me during my google rampages when I was just diagnosed with anxiety and having wild panic attacks! [info] None [info] 1546777401
corialis [info] Anyone else have major life changes as a trigger? I was diagnosed with anxiety at the age of 9 after a big change (well, for a kid, anyway!) - I spent the summer at the babysitter's with 2 toddlers who wouldn't leave me alone when I was an only child and not used to kids at all. It was like my brain just short-circuited when confronted with such a drastic change.So far in my life I've had 2 more major meltdowns, one after I graduated high school and one when I moved to a brand new city for a brand new job. If I'm unprepared for such huge change it's even worse. The anxiety just takes over my life and I can't think of anything else! I'm okay with smaller changes, like when there was a semester change in high school or being moved to a new room at work. I'm moving this week for a new job, but the job is on another team in the same department, I've lived in that city before and I'm moving in my friend's apartment building. Hopefully I won't have a huge meltdown, but I still feel like this is consuming my life and I can't think about anything else. Bonus rant: So the last time I had a meltdown, a psychiatrist prescribed me clonazepam and quetiapine temporarily (I'm on Paxil maintenance) to help me make it through until I acclimatized. Those were life-savers! Anyway, this time around I was proactive in getting the prescriptions, but the psychiatrist would not give me clonazepam because I was moving and he wouldn't be able to monitor me. He told me that if I need it, go to a walk-in clinic. Seriously? I'm asking for the benzos to *prevent* a meltdown.  I would have lost my job last time if my boss wasn't so great. Why yes, let's tell the person with an anxiety disorder triggered by changes that she can't plan ahead to mitigate the change, that'll help! [info] None [info] 1439860454
Cabbages-and-Queens [info] [Help] Just Adopted My First Dog, My Anxiety is Out of Control I love dogs. I've always wanted a dog. I pet sit frequently. Since moving out of my parents' house in December, I've been planning on getting a dog. I went through the whole adoption process, forms and phone interviews, paid an exorbitant amount of money to a rescue to adopt this critter, and woke up at 6 in the morning to pick the little guy up. He is a 13lb Jack Russell mix. He is so sweet. The way he looks at me is with so much love. He just wants to play and snuggle. I was diagnosed with anxiety three years ago. I take medication, and thought I had everything sorted out. I hadn't had a panic attack in two years. But since bringing the dog home four days ago, I have been in a state of rolling panic. The worst of it was sitting on the corner of my sofa, sobbing and punching myself in the forehead while the dog stared at me. I cry every morning waking up. I wake up in the morning feeling so limp and frantic. My knees and elbows feel like they want to buckle. My hands shake. I can't eat. My throat is constantly clenched. I am having trouble getting work done at my job. I only feel properly safe when the dog is crated. My roommate and my boyfriend have both been trying to help me, taking him out with me and making sure he's got water and food, and trying to make sure he's supervised, not peeing or destroying things. I don't want them to be taking the responsibility for my pet, but I just freeze up. Every time he starts sniffing around, my entire body clenches with fear that he's going to pee. I can't keep him leashed to me because I panic. I don't want to leave him in his crate while I'm with him in the house because that's not right and not fair. The shelter wants me to keep him on lockdown for two weeks, but I need other people. I go totally to pieces when I'm alone. He's a sweet little dog and so good, and mostly all the way trained, but taking care of him just flings me out to sea. I don't know what to do. Part of me wants to keep him as part of my family, and another part of me wants to grab him, put him in the car, and drive screaming back to the shelter. People tell me to give it time to adjust because this is a major lifestyle change. It is, I know that. But didn't think it was going to ruin my mental health like this. I'd feel so guilty bringing him back, and I don't know how to explain it to everyone I told about the dog. I feel like a terrible person who's made a terrible mistake. [info] None [info] 1526487620
inalotofemotions [info] Why does my boyfriend have such difficulty with words, memory, and language? Note: I'm not asking this in a "my boyfriend is broken and needs to be fixed" sort of way. It's something that bothers him and he wants to work on, when I wonder if it's just part of his personality, or temperament. I'm just interested in having a non-judgemental conversation about it.So everyone will have those occasional moments when they forget a word mid-sentence, have to substitute a synonym, or ask for the word - those moments when it feels like your brain's recall system just isn't working a little. If I had to guess, I'd say it happens to me about once per week? Maybe less? It happens to me more often if I'm having a conversation with a stranger and worried about being judged or anxious, but it still doesn't happen to often.It happens to my boyfriend multiple times per conversation, even when he's not anxious. He's also much more forgetful than I am, and tends to misplace things quite frequently - at least once per week, he'll tell me he can't find some object that he uses most days (keys, wallet, etc). I misplace things like that quite rarely - when I do misplace them, it's due to some disruption in my regular routine.I think both these things are sort of parts of our personalities? For my whole life, I've liked to do things slowly, deliberately, methodically. I don't tend to talk a lot because I'm a bit on the shy side, though extraverted and comfortable around non-strangers. I'm sort of reserved, but I purposefully do things when I want to do them. I HATE being hurried and rushed - one boundary I had to set with my BF early on is that he needs to let me SLOWLY enjoy things sometimes (especially my mornings). I am this way because I've always been quite anxious (to the point where I've been diagnosed with anxiety), and I feel best when I slow down and act very deliberately. I pay lots of attention to my environment due to the amxiety as well - I almost never get "tunnel-vision".My boyfriend is basically an excited and passionate introvert! And I absolutely love that about him. He latches on to things he likes or wants to do and dives right in - he doesn't seem to worry about failure when trying new things. He's confident and self-assured in a way I'm not, which I think leads him to be more comfortable without needing to slow down and be deliberate in the way I need to - and I think this is why he misplaces objects and words more than I do.We're both the sort of people who try to practice mindful meditation, so that's not it, I don't think. I don't think it's solely anxiety because I'm typically much more anxious than him. I might be completely off-base with this guess - maybe it doesn't have to do with personality at all? That's why I'm curious to talk about it.Do you forget words or misplace things often? What's your personality like? What do you think is the reason for something like this? [info] None [info] 1568990490
mooseisfat [info] I went to the emergency room because i was feeling the left side of my face tingly after a big argument with my boss. I thought it was a stroke. I was diagnosed with anxiety a month later. Im sure anxiety was the cause. [info] None [info] 1572500818
haveanupvote2424 [info] I do this when I am trying to fall asleep. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, it sucks.  [info] None [info] 1384628775
microwavedcatfood [info] My family insults me because of a mental illness. Okay, so some backstory. I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2012~2013 and I am absolutely terrified of getting sick. I stopped taking meds a while ago because I was doing better, but that’s not really the point. Anyways, so today my dad was baking some pizza from Papa Murphys. I was sitting at the kitchen table on my phone just messing around, and when it was ready, he poked it with his finger. Yes, that may have seemed insignificant, but to me he just spread millions of germs onto something I was about to eat.Because of that, I chose not to eat the pizza. I don’t want to get sick. I already refused eating it, and decided to just not eat anything so I just sat at the kitchen table still drinking my soda. My dad asked me several times if I wanted any, and of course I said no.What really made was what my uncle was saying. He was talking about how “I’m such a baby, it’s not that big of a deal, it’s all my fault...” and on and on. My dad was agreeing with him, and it sucked. I wasn’t choosing to eat it because I was being picky or stuck-up, but because I don’t want to get sick. I didn’t say anything though, because I knew I would just start crying. What was worse was that when I got up to get some more soda was that my six year old sister told me that I can’t drink it because ‘daddy touched it’, before running away giggling. Needless to say, I left shortly after.Similar things have been happening like that. The day before, I was eating a granola bar when my mom came and hugged me. Her sleeve touched my granola bar, so naturally I didn’t want to eat it. I offered it to her, and when she asked why, I explained. She then got angry at me because apparently I thought she was ‘dirty’, which wasn’t what I meant at all. She didn’t accept my apology.The day before, we had a pizza party for our choir. We could each get two slices, but when I tried to grab one with a napkin (I couldn’t watch my hands beforehand) it broke and I ended up touching it. I didn’t say anything and just tried to grab the second one, so I could only eat that one, but my finger slipped. My friend from behind me said, “What, MicrowavedCatFood, are you like a germaphobe or something?” When I put down my pizza saying I didn’t want it anymore. I don’t think she meant for it to be mean, but it just sucked. My eyes started selling up with tears and I went to leave the room when one of my friends stopped me and asked me what was wrong. I started crying and choked out, “I’m gonna get sick [friend], I’m gonna get sick.” She seemed confused so just hugged me and told me I’d be fine before leaving.I have more stories but I don’t want this to be so long. I’m so angry with my uncle and parents for acting like I’m faking it, or can control it or something. I don’t know how to explain that I can’t control it, and now it’s affecting me social life. Sorry for the rant, but I don’t have anyone to talk too.Tl:dr I am terrified of getting sick and my parents and siblings degrade me because of it, and it’s affecting my social life [info] None [info] 1557026534
AwesomeSince1981 [info] I'm knowingly going to fail my pre entrance drug test, hear me out... So, I have crippling anxiety.  I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder and panic attacks.  As a result I'm on clonazepam 0.5mg 3 to 4x a day.  This is a benzodiazepine, which will definitely show up on my drug screen.  Will this eliminate my chances of entering my program?  Has anyone else had an experience like this?  I have legitimate prescriptions that my Dr. can provide.  I'm just nervous I'll be thrown out before I even get to start my program because of this.  Any helpful input appreciated! Thanks! [info] None [info] 1560878975
emmaensign [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety disorders and I'm totally fine when I'm drunk, infact it helps me loosen up and be more friendly and open towards people [info] None [info] 1451107881
boundariesnewbie [info] Hermit fears are not mine Was finishing up Understanding the Borderline Mother last night and my mother is pretty solidly a hermit. One of the things that struck me is how hermits never can (or often even try) to comfort their child when the child (adult or kid) is anxious or afraid or otherwise upset. Instead they exacerbate any existing fears/worries. This is certainly true of my mother, who finds new and creative ways to plant seeds of doubt and anxiety regarding every subject almost every time I talk to her. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I’m 99% sure I have C-PTSD. (my therapist agrees but can’t officially diagnose bc she’s a LCSW). The anxiety has been tackled by a few therapists and I’m healing really well from it. But I realized last night: most of my fears are expressed in her voice (in my head, not audibly tho thankfully). Like, the things my mind makes up to make me scared are not actually things I’m naturally afraid of myself and are easily dismissed by evidence (thanks CBT!). Anyway. I just wanted to share that in case any other RBBs can relate and take comfort. Your hermit’s fears may not be your own! This anxiety doesn’t belong to me....And I certainly won’t let it control me anymore. Sorry for any typos, on mobile. [info] None [info] 1553183523
rowrowyothrowaway [info] Yes. Go to the doctor. Or maybe even better, go to a therapist. You *do not* have to live this way. Medical professionals can help you understand what's going on in your body and give you coping methods. That doesn't mean they'll *cure* it, but they can absolutely help. I would recommend *not* talking to your parents about it until you know what to talk to them about. Lots of times, if you say "I feel worried all the time," people will tell you to just not worry. They don't mean to be hurtful, but it is! It will be better if you can go to them and tell them what you need to be well. Say, "I was diagnosed with anxiety. Here's what that means. Here's what makes me worried, if anything. Here's how you can help me."  [info] None [info] 1525275992
veraloe [info] I’m still fighting this concept and I have been diagnosed with anxiety/OCD now for almost 10 years. I’ve gone to a psychologist but never stuck with it. I’m on medication/seek help from my doctor - but I just find it really hard to seek a psychologist.  This is for a few reasons:- I can’t really afford it at the moment - as soon as I feel slightly better, I feel I don’t need it anymore- I’m not willing to change my habits yet (I have strict compulsions that my psychologist tries to change, and I feel as if I’m just not ready)I know I need help and I know help would do wonders for me... but I recommend seeking help ASAP so you can get back on the right track :) [info] None [info] 1532312560
zombiebroh [info] I'm feeling very afraid after taking a final using Proctorio I used Proctorio for the first time. I was very unaware of how it worked until the day of the test. Let me come out the gate and say this right away; I did not cheat. However, I did a lot of things wrong that I really wasn't aware of until I started reading about it more after the exam. Apparently Proctorio tracks your eye, body,  head, and mouth movement and flags that as cheating. Unfortunately, I'm diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. I tend to move my head a lot, my body, my hands, I touch my face, and I look around. And now I'm thinking back to the amount of times I did that during the exam .... and jesus  I'm CRIPPLED with anxiety right now. I mean, I didn't sign up for this. I just wished there were alternatives to this or some kind of accommodation. [info] None [info] 1588219953
steady_complexity [info] Throat clearing - chronic vocal tic?? I am a 23 y.o. woman and I've cleared my throat persistently (throughout the day/night, no specific time frame) every single day for the past 10+ years... I'd say about since I was in sixth grade. My friends and family recognize my throat clearing as "this thing that I do." It had never once occurred to me that it could be a tic until about two months ago when an acquaintance mentioned that possibility. I couldn't believe it! I've had this "thing" for over half of my life and nobody has ever given it a label. Personally I would love to own my throat clearing and have it become part of my identity rather than have it continue to be "this thing that I do." I'm just not exactly sure what it is.Like I said, I've cleared my throat every single day since I was \~11. The throat clearing does cause muscle discomfort and fatigue, but I am otherwise physically very healthy. Further, while I am (and always have been) self conscious of my throat clearing, it hasn't affected my social life tremendously. It's only when I start to hang out with a friend more often or I'm with the same group of people consistently (e.g., college classes, boyfriend's family) and they begin to recognize that I clear my throat *a lot.* I can tell that they notice because they make comments (not mean ones, but general comments still make me hyper aware of it). Sometimes I try to “hold it in” during a class or other scenario, but it usually doesn’t work and it is very uncomfortable to even try. I am thankful that I can freely clear my throat, sometimes without noticing, in front of my boyfriend. However, I can tell that it's becoming a bit of a burden/annoyance to him. :-(My plan, once the world is back in the swing of things, is to go to an ENT to make sure that nothing is objectively wrong with my throat and/or that I do not have an excessive amount of mucus in my nose/throat. If that all checks out normal, then I intend to seek out a (neurologist or psychologist?) to hopefully figure out if this is a tic or not.I am sane enough to know that I cannot get a proper diagnosis from reddit, but does my description potentially exhibit signs of a vocal tic? If it is a tic, what does treatment look like? Cognitive behavioral therapy? Oral meds?I would really appreciate any thoughts and advice, especially from individuals who experience or know someone that experiences throat clearing. Thank you!Edit: I just remembered that I used to touch the side of my nose whenever I got nervous, which I believe is a tic. I developed it when I was about 18 (at the same time I was diagnosed with anxiety following the death of a best friend) and it stopped when I was 21 or 22. [info] None [info] 1587517846
dpefi [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and went through continuous treatment for two years, for that, before I finally found a therapist who asked about/saw my trauma. Being in therapy for anxiety was mildly helpful and gave me some helpful coping mechanisms, but it always felt like dealing with the surface-level of my problems. [info] None [info] 1543424507
Feifaye [info] Feeling intimidated by speaking up in big classes Last fall, I transferred into a big university (30,000+ students) from a community college where all my classes had maximum 40 people in it - usually way less. It’s been pretty nice and I enjoy my school life here, but I’ve noticed that I’ve developed an inability to speak up in these large lecture classes. My heart starts pounding out of my chest and I start feeling really hot.Now, I was diagnosed with anxiety last year, but in general I used to be generally fine in this type of environment. I like sharing what I have to say and discussing with my peers, but it’s a lot scarier now I suppose. I even had a professor who asked me why I was so quiet in class when I was so thoughtful in my written responses, and it made me feel bad since I do want to contribute more.Has anyone dealt with this before? If so, how did you do it? [info] None [info] 1581057871
eduardamenezesc [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder earlier this year and most times I don't know what's going with my body, I just wanna lay down and sleep till I feel better. [info] None [info] 1563199660
bby8bit [info] This is literally me right now. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I'm having a little panic attack right now. I have GERD but unfortunately to symptoms enhance anxiety symptoms and it's way of manifesting... Chest pain, very slight numbing to left arm and hand, gassy as fuck through both ways lol. These are typical symptoms for gerd but my anxiety is saying it's not. Fml. Why anxiety, why. Especially at 3:30am. Curse anxiety  [info] None [info] 1491031504
AddyDreams [info] Does Wellbutrin cause weight loss? I'm looking for an anti-anxiety med that also causes massive weight loss. I went off Adderall in January and gained 45 lbs and need to lose it. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and my doctor told me to research some mess before we choose one. [info] None [info] 1436402681
tootphaste [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, ADHD, and major depressive disorder early in life. When I first heard that it was approved by the board I was excited for the news of it being added. Unfortunately the Secretary of Health for PA postponed adding it in the May meeting. As someone who self treats in the shadows because it's better to be at risk of a fine instead of at risk of self destruction, this news has brought me incredible joy. [info] None [info] 1562874912
Epilef59 [info] I learned to masturbate in 3rd grade. I am a 23 year old man who is Catholic. I am diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. I am a virgin because I choose to be celibate. I learned to masturbate when I was in 3rd grade to WWE magazines, specifically in the Divas section. The addiction then went onto female video game characters, elementary school crushes, body swap compilations (the idea of being in a woman's body was appealing to me for some reason), and scenes from movies. I never actually went to Porn Hub once in my life because my fantasies were good enough. I never had a girlfriend before because this problem made me feel insecure and incapable of loving another woman as someone that you would support and bring the best out of. In other words, I struggle to try to be attracted to woman without feeling an erection or semen in my briefs. What led me to here... I am currently in Europe, because I taught English camp two years ago and I promised some people that I would return. One of the reasons that I did return is to tell one of my friends who was a translator for me at the time that I had a crush on her for two years. I never did anything like this before and I was nervous for various reasons. Despite nerves, I am glad I did it and it turned out much better than expected. Biggest challenge for me was the fact that she was wearing a v-neck and no bra (Yea...... my brain hurts.) We agreed to remain good friends. Heck she even gave me a letter to appreciate my surprise visit and allowed me to give her a quick kiss on the cheek, which made me melt inside because I can move on and appreciate a good friendship without any conflicting feelings. However, that doesn't mean the masturbating stopped. Even if I can now look at her as a friend, I still feel those erections and semen coming. I am just not used to interacting with woman, because I am scared of coming off as perverted or creepy. I treat women with dignity and respect when talking to them, but inside I have impurities in my mind and heart that make me feel two-faced. There were points and times in which it was easy for me to control it, but other times it was not. Heck even the thought of hugging or being near a woman in general makes me fap. I tried to cut out any media or entertainment that makes me think of those urges. I did journaling, praying, and go to confession multiple times to clear my head, start off new, and do my best. It is helping, but I just feel the unwanted urges still affecting me. I easily get angry with myself about it, because I feel hopeless no matter how hard I try and pray. I want to make better changes with this NoFap community. I know that this is a part of my OCD because obsessions and compulsions are involved. I can say that this interaction I had with my friend helped me realize that I need to make changes with my own self, not just to look at woman better, but to also be a better person in general. I feel lost and stuck. I need help. What should I do? [info] None [info] 1564560415
RedWhiteAndBlueMoney [info] How long does fluoxetine take to take effect? I've been on fluoxetine 10mg for 2 weeks now but I've seen neither side effects or effects at all. I was diagnosed with anxiety brought on by OCD. How long does it usually take to have an effect on my anxiety? I'm thinking that maybe the dose is too low. [info] None [info] 1566538729
EclipseAnon3 [info] Would this qualify for FMLA? Ended up in ER. Due to work stress and outside life factors the past few weeks have been horrible for me. It progressed from going to urgent care, to primary care, and yesterday I ended up in the ER. I've been at my job for several years and while it has it's stressful moments it's taking a toll on my mental health over the years. Last week I woke up with respiratory issues and went to work the following day. The breathing issues got worse at work and I had to go to urgent care. This had not happened before. Urgent care said tests were normal. I was given an inhaler. Then I went to my doctor and he couldn't find anything physically wrong either. Tests came back normal. I don't have allergies or asthma. I'm relatively healthy, work out a few times a week, watch what I eat. The respiratory issue never really went away and I had a trip planned. On the plane I was having a very hard time breathing, gasping at some points but trying to stay calm while I was freaking out on the inside. But as soon as I walked off I was very fatigued and gasping for air. My ride took me to the ER and they ran all the tests including a CT scan. Could not find anything physically wrong which was frustrating. While at the ER I was diagnosed with anxiety attacks. They said I was hyperventilating from all the stress. I have never had panic or anxiety attacks so this was news to me. I'm dreading going back to work and feel like my mental and physical health are at risk now. How do I proceed with FMLA or do I just suck it up? [info] None [info] 1567139241
theneen [info] 1) a blood test won't tell you everything, especially when it comes to bowel disorders.2) There are meds you can take if your tummy acts up.  Levsin is a great one.  Just knowing that you have access to these meds at all times will help calm your anxiety. 3) There really is only so much you can expect your husband to put up with.  He's only human.  He's allowed to be annoyed/frustrated.4) i know what i speak of.  I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was 6, i also have IBS.  Been there, done that, pooped in that creepy gas station bathroom. [info] None [info] 1410332299
SirAwkward [info] My sphynx cat was solo up until a year before he passed away. We got him when he was 6 months old and my family and I were all at either school or work from about 8 AM-6 PM. While we did leave him alone a lot as soon as we got home he would be pet and played with. At night he had to sleep with someone. If we were at our desk, he had to be acknowledged and held. We made it work but only because we were regimented. On the few nights we got home late he would be at the door waiting or would get stuck some where behind the washer or in the closet because he was looking for us. Because he was a lone cat though, he spent many hours with me as a companion. We got him when I was 10 and we had a symbiotic relationship. When I was diagnosed with anxiety he was there for me for all my attacks and I was there for him when he started having seizures.I now have two sphynxes close in age and they are their own companions. I can go on day trips and unscheduled things and won't come home to crying or a stuck sphynx but they still hang out with me when I'm home. I guess it depends on your lifestyle but if you're looking for a companion kitty and have a fairly normal schedule, I definitely think you can pull it off.  [info] None [info] 1491973385
Blue45 [info] I've had those situations where I'm thinking I'm having a heart attack, or on the verge of death, but it's just the anxiety. I've also been to the emergency room for all the tests they did on you and same results, clear. That's when I was diagnosed with anxiety. And I know what you're going through with the diazepam. I usually take them the night after drinking (and it's common knowledge to not mix benzos and alcohol) and I still wait a large amount of time but the thoughts inside my head are "what if I didn't wait long enough" or "what if the diazepam is going to do more harm than help". The meds finally kick in and I feel much calmer. It sounds like it is just your anxiety, and 2mg of diazepam isn't a large amount (I take 10-20mg) Avoid drinking, take it for your flight and you should be fine. [info] GAD [info] 1378161243
Petro0162 [info] Honestly, it's cases like that, that give cannabis a bad name. People who overinduldge to the point of constant dependency bring all of us down. I'm an army vet, never did anything serious but due to the nature of my work, I've been diagnosed with anxiety. Cannabis helps me wind down and take the edge off, but I don't huff it all day, everyday. I take care of my kids, I clean my house, go to work, and looking at me, you'd probably never guess that I would smoke. I'm not saying your opinion is wrong, but please don't condemn a very helpful substance based on the poor desicions of the few. Again, not throwing any shade, just presenting the information from a different perspective. [info] None [info] 1555232109
reallysadjpg [info] Face App???? HI! Sorry for the quick post!!I need reassurance bc I’m panickingI KNOW the Face App thing isn’t as bad as the media is making it bc I read the companies statement but I’m just panicked. I tried to remove my data from their servers by sending a bug report which ends up being an email that you send to the company (this was the way the company’s statement said to do it) and it bounced TWICE. i’m so anxious.A little background, I was diagnosed with anxiety. It’s bad and things like this make me jittery. I don’t even know why I’m scared I just don’t like the idea of someone having all my data. But I guess it doesn’t matter bc FaceBook has all my info anyway... I don’t know I’m so anxious I’m so sorry! Does anyone have any suggestions to cope?? Or any reassurance? Is anyone else feeling this way??? I don’t want to scare anyone else but I’m so panicked. [info] None [info] 1563416445
Caymerr7 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well. I've had to go to the emergency room for panic attacks and other health anxiety issues. Old me would drink to make my anxiety go away. Since I've been about a month sober my anxiety had improved greatly. I still can feel the uptight feeling at times but I haven't had a full blown panic attack. I always felt like it was worse when I was hungover. Anyway sorry for the ramble but drinking only makes the symptoms worse. I think anxiety contributes greatly to a lot of people's issues with alcohol.  [info] None [info] 1391655326
worriedhypochondriac [info] [Help] I'm in constant worry that something is wrong my health - particularly my heart Some backstory information: **Skip to paragraph 6 if you don't want to read backstory/wall of text*** I have been a "worry wart" for just about all of my life, gradually becoming worse throughout my teenage years up until now at age 23. Usually it was just separation anxiety when I was on my own or when my parents went out and I had the house to myself. It wasn't until 2 or 3 years ago that it became centrally focused on my health, but this year (it's only MARCH!) has been by far the worst.* It started in November of 2014, I was working my cashier job at a grocery store when I was getting ready and I had some mild chest pain while walking to my car. I brushed it off and drove to work. I clocked it, rang up a total of 2 people, and then hunched over, grasping my chest. My manager noticed and sent me to the break room to rest. It slowly got better, but I was dismissed and went to urgent care.  This was where I was diagnosed with anxiety attacks. They told me to follow up with my primary care doctor, which I wouldn't be able to see until January.* After seeing her, she suggested putting me on Zoloft starting at 0.25mg, but I wanted therapy sessions before I started taking medication. I have yet to find one locally to accept my insurance, so I'm kind of just taking it as it goes for now.* In late January, I went to the ER for shortness of breath, radiating arm pain in my left arm with tingles in that hand, and fullness/pressure feeling around my sternum - not directly my chest but not directly in my stomach. They ran some blood tests, did an EKG, and gave me pepcid through IV, then sent me home. I guess they brushed it off as indigestion - but I KNOW how that feels in my body, and it didn't feel like that - but I went home and slept easier knowing I was okay.* Fast forward to February where I began having palpitations. I have never had them before to this degree. I thought it had been because I binged on a box of Hostess Ding Dongs and then tried to sleep afterwards, but they still persisted even when I ate anything caffeine free. So another trip to urgent care, another EKG, and the results were that they were benign and I that I had no cardiac issues.* And now for this week's issues. I've been under a lot of stress since Valentine's day because we had a house fire which forced me to temporarily move. This meant I was out of work until I could return to live at my house, which was today. For about a week now, I've had these episodes where I would get radiating arm pain in my left arm. Sometimes it would be in my elbow to my wrist, my shoulder to my wrist, my shoulder to my elbow, it's been jumping around. Occasionally with tingles in my hand, but not always. This pain does not go away with pain killers. I have also had fatigue, but not severe, but I'm guessing it could be due to my monthly cycle beginning this week. I haven't had one in 2 months because I'm irregular due to birth control. The arm pain is not related to exertion, I still exercise with it, but it scares me. How can I know for sure this isn't heart related? I would like to be seen by a cardiologist to rule out everything but my doctor doesn't want to refer me to one because she feels she doesn't need to. I have also been having dizziness episodes where I just feel wobbly, even while sitting. The room isn't spinning, but I feel like my body is in a wave pool. The arm pain comes and goes and varies in intensity, which is why I'm worried. Should I go and be seen again? They're probably tired of seeing my face by now...I'm just terrified that I'm ignoring potential heart attack signals here, especially as a female.I am 23, 150 lbs/68kgs, do cardio exercises at least twice a week - sometimes more, and try to eat healthy foods. I usually cook everything myself rather than purchasing prepackaged foods or getting fast food unless necessary/I don't feel like cooking.Medications I am on: cetirizine, norethidrone 0.35mg, ibuprofen 200mg when needed/or acetaminophen 325mg when needed. During last year's physical it was found that I have slightly high cholesterol. Not dangerously high, but it does need to be lowered a few points.**TL;DR I'm worried about potential heart attack signals as a female. I have radiating left arm pain that varies in intensity throughout the day, followed by episodes of lightheadedness/dizziness when walking or resting** [info] Hypochondriac [info] 1426127665
littlemac93 [info] Emetophobia &amp; Me Hi everyone. Glad I stumbled across this sub, as I know that emetophobia is a common disorder but I don’t know anyone else personally who has it, and people generally just think I’m being crazy or over dramatic. I don’t know when my emetophobia started, but I feel like it’s getting worse. I know that growing up, my brother was *constantly* getting stomach bugs (which actually ended up being acute apendicitis but that’s besides the point) and I was always SO scared that I would catch his illness, to the point where I would get in trouble for not being a sympathetic older sister... it wasn’t until I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was like 23 that my mom took this phobia seriously. Then as I got older and my friends were starting to party and experiment with alcohol, I realized I never had a desire to be drunk. As I’ve come to terms with my emetophobia, I’ve realized that it wasn’t being drunk that turned me off, but rather the possible side effects that come along with being drunk/hungover. I’m 25 and to this day I’ve never finished an alcoholic beverage because of this. I feel like within the last few years this phobia is getting more out of control. I think it started a little while back when I went to my pediatrician right before the holidays, aka prime flu season, where little kids were running amok and getting their germs on everything, and a short while after that I caught a stomach bug. Since then, I can’t even hear someone announce that they’re nauseous without being sent into a panic. The second I hear someone is sick I immediately think they have a stomach bug and I start to feel sick myself, even if I haven’t seen said person in days. I’ve been a vegetarian for 10.5 years and could never even consider going back to meat because I know my body would reject it and I would get so sick, which scares the $#!T out of me. I also realized I’m avoiding things that are so freakin average, like eating other people’s cooking/baking (any time I eat out I panic about food poisoning). I would NEVER go to a buffet or a salad bar and I’m afraid of build your own froyo places. I’m constantly googling recalled food items and if there are any new E. coli outbreaks happening in the US. Having children worries me but I’m hoping that the unconditional love that you’re supposed to feel with your child will outweigh my phobia. I have 3 bottles of hand sanitizer (one on my nightstand, one in my purse, and one at my office) and I’m constantly using it or washing my hands. I wouldn’t say it’s taking a toll on my life, per se, but it’s a little bit exhausting realizing how big this issue is. I also think I’m developing Vasovagal Syncope. The last 2 or 3 times I thought I might V, I broke out into a cold sweat and developed tunnel vision and almost passed out just from the sheer POSSIBILITY that I might be sick. Sorry this is so long... it just feels good to have a place where I could freely talk about this without anyone being like what the actual f*** is wrong with this girl ;-) [info] None [info] 1523676987
wheremybagobeans [info] Lol that’s crazy man. I was tripping balls a couple weeks ago with a couple friends. Probably around 300ug but I get drug tested every week so I can’t smoke. 3 of my friends were drinking. And 2 of my other friends were tripping with me. One of my friends who was drinking decided it would be a good idea to take 8mg of Xanax and drink half a bottle of Jose Cuervo while ripping a dab pen and smoking blunts non stop. As this was happening my friend who was also tripping started having a bad Trip and physically could not open his hands. When we would try to open his hands they were extremely tensed up and almost impossible to open. After giving my friend a Xanax he started to calm down and Started feeling better. Then I noticed my other friend who took the Xanax and Tequilla was completely overdosing. Long story short I took the alcohol away and sat next to my friend who was overdosed and made sure he was breathing for around 4 hours straight. After he threw up multiple times he started coming to his senses but was nowhere near sober.(I know I should have called a ambulance but I am trained in basic cpr and first aid so i felt comfortable enough to watch over him) Overall it was a crazy experience while tripping but somehow even though I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder I managed to keep my cool while completely tripping balls. This was a extremely scary experience and really opened my eyes to the dangers of things like that. Ever since then I trip either alone or with 1 other friend in a comfortable environment. [info] None [info] 1565075181
Joeldanhig [info] I find my anxiety strange.. Quick back story: I was diagnosed with anxiety at 16, I'm 24 now. I self medicated with drugs and alcohol for several years, first drugs, then just over a month ago I quit drinking. I'm prescribed 0.5mg of clonazepam twice daily.Moving on,I work at an extremely busy fine dining restaurant (I'm in the kitchen). Before I go to work, I find my anxiety rises but I'm also really excited to go to work. Once I get to work however, my anxiety subsides completely. I feel like everything is in order, and I'm able to think fairly clearly. The comradery in the kitchen also helps this, as we are all pretty tight. I feel like my social life in regards to work as a whole is decent.When I'm not at work however, things change. My anxiety gets very high on my days off, I begin over thinking what I'm doing with my life, I consider quitting my job, I begin to think I have no purpose, I don't really hangout with too many people at all (I used to have a social life outside of work, but since I quit drinking I tend to avoid the enablers, which made up pretty much all of my friends).Is this more common than I think it is? I know a couple of people with anxiety disorders as well but they experience the opposite feelings in the situations described above.Just something I'm trying to wrap my head around.tl;dr I have virtually no anxiety when at work in a super stressful environment but have lots of anxiety on my days off and I find that strange. [info] None [info] 1416448253
jakalarf [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety not to long ago, I didn't even know that there was anything wrong with me, I don't even know how long I've had it. So i guess it doesn't effect me in any way i notice. [info] None [info] 1435552892
mayor-J [info] My friend with anxiety I am on mobile so sorry for the formattingI (15M) have been friends with my best friend (15M) my whole life. He is like a brother to me. We hang out often, go to school together, and do a lot of things together. Five maybe six years ago (tbh i don’t really remember when because we were much younger) his father left his mother and she got sole custody of him and his brother. I have known that he has had anxiety since the split. He never went into too much detail about it so I just always assumed it wasn’t that terrible because we tell each other everything. A few days ago he told me he was going to go into therapy. Curious, I asked why, and he explained it was because his anxiety was just getting worse. I told my mom about it (she is good friends with his mom as well) and she told me that his anxiety was pretty severe. He hangs out often at my house or at the mall with me or whatever, not only because we are good friends, but he feels safe with me and at my house, along with him not feeling safe being home alone. Which I honestly understand. I have been diagnosed with anxiety (it is bad but not insane lol I’ve been in therapy my whole life so it’s gotten much better) and for many years of my life I couldn’t be in a room alone because it freaked me out so much. Anyways my mom went into further detail because I was getting worried about my friend and she was saying he wasn’t eating because he was getting so scared about choking to death (an important piece of INFO: he gets random things stuck in his head, like he can’t eat because he will choke. things like that and it is very hard to deter him from these thoughts, but I just thought it was him being stubborn, I now know though that that was his anxiety). Along with his not eating he’s lost 5 pounds in the last week and I am extremely worried for him. Normally I am (and have been told many times) that I am very good at listening and talking with people. I’ve talked a person out of suicide and have been there for many many of my friends who needed some form of help. But this instance, I don’t know what to do. I don’t know whether I should just stay the same way I have been and not talk about it, or should I confront him and try and help him, or should I talk with him about it and let it run it’s course? I’m honestly just freaking me out and i’m getting a shit ton of anxiety writing this because I don’t want anything bad to happen to him, he’s been my brother my whole life and I don’t want to think this grim, but if he becomes depressed for whatever reason because of the anxiety I don’t want him to kill himself. I know that’s an over reaction but I couldn’t imagine a world without him. I honestly just need advice as for what to do in this situation. Any advice would honestly help because I’m stuck with this and it has been on my mind a lot lately. Thanks. [info] None [info] 1582767738
raeynar [info] I haven't really lived for months. Forgive me, Reddit, for I am on mobile. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and it rears its ugly head whenever anything medical has to be done. On top of that, I've been depressed for most my life and I can't take medication because the potential side effects make my anxiety worse.I was bullied all through elementary, high school, and most of college. Because of that, I didn't graduate high school nor college. I spiralled and honestly I didn't know how to go on. But, my fear of basically everything but my own shadow has kept me from ending things myself. (Good thing too, because when things are calm, I don't want to die). The past two years I've done some intensive therapy and it has helped me push on a little bit. Because of this therapy, I thought I had the strength to get my teeth fixed. So at the beginning of this year, I started the process and saw a dental surgeon. The prognosis is that I'll get dentures and they'll remove my teeth while they put me asleep. The process started in February and I only recently got to know the date for the actual surgery. I've just been in a state of constantly waiting. I spend my days playing video games, trying to tune out the dread and the anxiety, but it's getting harder and harder to do. My family and friends are very caring and they support me. They try to give me pep talks but I'm so afraid I'll let them (and myself) down. I'm afraid I won't be able to go through with the surgery and in all honesty I believe I might not even survive that day because of the stress and anxiety. I can very logically tell me that's unlikely.. but the feelings and thoughts remain. I don't know anymore how to handle this. The surgery is little less than two weeks away and I don't know how I'll be able to last through the rest of the days, waiting. I feel utterly alone, even though I KNOW I have the support of my friends and family. [info] None [info] 1566937966
ghoulcinema [info] Drug abuse. I was 15 years old when I first started abusing prescription pills, 16 when I was diagnosed with anxiety induced psychosis. I tried to kill myself the day before Thanksgiving of that year, obviously failed, asked my dad to have me hospitalized because I knew I'd try again. I swore off anything harder than pot and thought my life was turning around; then mom got sick. I moved closer to her and haven't touched anything pharmaceutical (aside from allergy meds or ibuprofen) for years. What's worse, I followed in my stepdads footsteps, but we're both different people now. [info] None [info] 1530613241
InkblotDoggo [info] My service dog. I was diagnosed with anxiety pretty early on, and in High School, I was assigned a service dog. His name was Baxter, and he was a German Shepherd. I was legally allowed to bring him to every class, though I remember I got weird looks from every teacher and staff member for the first few weeks that I had Baxter. Most of the upper staff, like the Principal and Superintendent, knew about my service animal and had cleared it, but I'll never forget my history teacher's expression the first time I brought Baxter into their class. [info] None [info] 1555688750
anniemalplanet [info] Yep.  And to add, I think people who get anxiety diagnoses later in life struggle with that more.  My SIL was diagnosed last year and she's now "disabled" and pops benzos all day to supposedly deal with it, and just sleeps and neglects her kids.  Meanwhile, her brother and I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders since we were children and had to learn to actually manage our disorders in order to live productive lives.  It takes some time to learn how to manage and I feel like when it comes later, you're so set in habits that it's hard to want to learn how to manage the disorder. [info] Jenelle's old hair feathers [info] 1568997682
cdepatie4 [info] I have a question.. To start off I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and it's pretty bad. Just feel like that's important.Anyways, I was sitting in a bathroom stall when I heard people laughing and one person going  "haha dude stop". It sounded like it was coming through a vent and there was a vent above me. Also, when I plugged my ears it went away. Could this be a hallucination. This really through me for a loop and I'm freaking out. Am I overreacting? [info] None [info] 1473792579
calmajuh [info] Hallucinations and crazy heart-rate - am I dying or is it just anxiety? Female, 27 y/o, 158cm/70kg - English teacher, crazy routine yadda yaddaSo, for the past couple of years I've had some really freaky symptoms. I wake up in the middle of the night a couple of times a week with my heart pounding like crazy and sometimes I see shit (random shit floating in the air in front of my wide open eyes) and it freaks me out. I'm doing some heart exams (got the electrocardiogram done and it's all fine and am waiting for my echocardiogram to be ready for pickup). I have been diagnosed with anxiety and sometimes take medication to help me reign it in when it  all gets too much (rivotril, my bff) but I try not to make it a habit because every time I've been on meds the side effects would kick my ass... These symptoms happen kind of randomly though but no doctor seems to find them particularly worrying. Should I not be worried, then? [info]  [info] 1520907477
anxious1s [info] [RANT] I drive myself insane with anxiety Background, I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks 10 years ago when I got tired of feeling scared of everything and sick to my stomach and then had my first panic attack. I don't want to be dependent on meds for life just to feel normal, so over the years I've found ways to relieve it. Its a lot better now than it was, but rears its ugly head occasionally. It can start with almost anything and my mind takes it to the thing I'm actually afraid of, which is dying. Even the regular anxiety of public speaking most of us have (which can be worsened by actually having anxiety)  will somehow lead me to a whole slew of crazy death thoughts.Tonight was going fine until my SO wanted to talk about planets and space and I felt myself 'going there' in my mind: we are tiny dust and not important and when I die it won't even matter and stuff like that. I jerked up and jump out of bed feeling like I need to be moving and pre-occupied and try to suppress the waves of panic coming over me and blurting out stupid shit to change the subject.  SO is asleep now and all I can do is clean and check out that website I heard about and file my nails because as soon as my mind is still, all that will be in it is how scared I am of dying.  It gets so old fighting my own mind. [info] None [info] 1363410026
Jecykah [info] This is me to a T. When I was diagnosed with anxiety, it surprised me that my doctor said “anxiety and OCD.” I was like, “Oh please... I’m not one of those weirdos who has to flip the light switch 70 times or the moon will explode.” But when she explained my anxiety as an obsession it all clicked and made more sense to me than anything ever. [info] None [info] 1542954810
MajesticTie321 [info] Cheers for the advice! Sorry for any offence caused - that was not my intention, especially as I have been diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1547835111
dubaichild [info] Just a post that can hopefully provide a little hope for anybody going through a difficult time right now. So... I was diagnosed with anxiety 2 years ago, and I'm pretty sure I suffered from it all throughout high school, and it only hit unmanageable levels when I went to college.Anyways - I have had this mountain of an essay (3000-3500 words, which isn't that big but it sure seemed it) looming over my head for the last three weeks, when it was first due, when it was extended to for me in lieu of my grandmother dying, and then until today, when I actually finished it.So, I may have had to get some help from my parents and go home for a few nights, and I may be massively late with this assignment, but you know what? I finished it, and I'm proud of myself.My anxiety tends to manifest itself into severe procrastination where I don't work because it's all too much and then I can't work because I'm so behind because I didn't do it when I should have and now it's due too soon for me to finish it and do a good job. It can actually be surprisingly debilitating, especially as a university student.Feel free to post any of your recent achievements in spite of anxiety - I'm trying to stay positive and seeing other people achieving stuff might make feel a bit better, even if it's just getting out of your house and talking to somebody for 5 minutes - that's an achievement some days.You are more than your anxiety, and it can get better. [info] None [info] 1430229207
kR4in [info] Maybe it isn't the ADHD, but perhaps anxiety? I have been diagnosed with anxiety-panic disorder, inattentive ADHD and massive depressive disorder....and I am not sure what bits and pieces of my life are affected by each one of those [info] None [info] 1567968136
Polaritical [info] People are medication reliant because its cheaper and more profitable than therapy. "Softness" isnt the issue and thats honeslty just offensive. Not being able to handle regular life IS LITERALLY THE FUCKING PROBLEM.  I have anxiety. When its bad, you're correct that I cant deal with normal everyday shit. That's how I was diagnosed with anxiety. Its the only way anybody is diagnosed with a disorder. What anxiety doesnt mean is that I'm soft, and that kind of approach not only doesnt help, it actively hurts recovery.I dont take anxiety medication. Tried them, theyre not for me. I'm LUCKY enough that my insurance will cover therapy. Not everyone is in that position.Don't call people soft for struggling with their disorders. People from the "man up, be hard" are just as fucked up as the rest of us. [info] None [info] 1572187319
atomickate [info] Just coming back from one of the worst migraines I've had in a long time... The only upside is that it didn't last *super* long. About 8 hours ago, I had to leave work early because I lost vision in my left eye. It was making me extremely nauseous. My fiance picked me up, and I came home, got sick, and took a dose of Maxalt (a triptan-seratonin agonist). This medication makes me feel really weird and I passed out for about 15 minutes. I wake up and begin getting sick again. I take a dose of excedrin as my doctor has told me I can do. I get sick again. I decide to get in the shower to relax and that helps a little. After two hours and no *real* progress, I take another dose of Maxalt. At this point, I'm hungry and very nauseous...so as I'm thinking about food, I'm also making myself feel even more sick. FINALLY after 4 hours, I pass out on the couch. After sleepng for another 4 hours, I feel almost perfect. I say almost because now its 2:30 am, I'm wide awake, and have nothing to do! (lol)The one thing I have taken away from the last 8 hours is that I now know that my body nearly hates that Maxalt. It obviously works (even a little), and that is good, but my body has not fought that hard against a medication in a long time. I could feel the medicine working - I felt very light and my legs felt really good, but my body almost felt heavy and very shakey. This has only ever happened when I've had to take laughing gas when my wisdom teeth were removed. Now, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I'm sure that it definitely has a part in this.Does anyone else have this issue - where your body fights against the helpful parts of your medicine? How do you tell your body to basically shut up and let the medicine work? [info] None [info] 1377325685
penisinthepeanutbttr [info] What running shoes would you guys recommend for someone just getting back into running? I'm a 22 year old male, trying to get my shit together because its Spring and I'm tired of the bullshit. I used to be a fitness fanatic a few years ago. I lifted for 2 hours 4-5 days a week and ran about 4 miles a day 3-4 days a week outside with hills. I remember feeling great all the time and it impacted my life in many positive ways. However I still struggle now with getting back into it. I have this paralyzing anxiety whenever I even think about running or working out. I cant explain where it comes from. Sob stories aside, I made the mistake the first time of doing it for "a girl" who had no interest in me but motivated the hell out of me ***blah blah blah no one gives a shit...*** I think thats what I'm missing now but I would like to motivate myself another way to kick my own ass out the door and run a mile or two without feeling a sense of doom, heart flutters and general inexplicable anxiety and fear. I've been diagnosed with anxiety but for some reason it really rears its ugly head when I contemplate exercise. At the moment all I'm doing is every morning before work (4 days a week) I do 30-40 push-ups, 15 pull ups, and 15 seated rows, its not a lot, but I feel good for doing it. I know it does practically nothing but it does exhaust me quite a bit and I feel quite drowsy after doing it. If I don't do it I feel extremely guilty. So I've managed to create a habit for myself, which gives me some hope!**TLDR: Trying to make a new habit of exercising, too anxious to start**So I figured yesterday that I would make myself start by investing in a new pair of running shoes. The running shoes I currently own are from 2009 and are kind of rotted to say the least I was wondering what you guys would recommend in terms of beginner running shoes to get me back in gear. My budget is $60-$80 dollars.Thanks so much in advance! [info] None [info] 1399403896
ksavage1986 [info] You are certainly not alone.  It's true though, there are people that make it all seem so easy, and it's frustrating.  Sort of like, "Damnit, why can't I just do it like they did?"My boss is someone like that.  I was diagnosed with anxiety after I had gone to the doctor with hamstring tendonitis and was convinced I had MS or ALS, only to have him say I showed no signs of either. (99% of my brian believes him, but I struggle to convert the other 1%).  So health anxiety has been my thing, but looking back, I realize all the times I was anxious and thought it was just normal (as I alluded to earlier, I would check the trash can in my bathroom for tampon wrappers when I knew it was my wife's time of the month--not normal behavior).  Anyways, back to my boss.  When he was around my age, a bit older, he decided to buy a boat.  He wound up sailing around the world for 17 years.  He said some nights during a storm, he would go beneath deck and just say, "I'm going to sleep now, hopefully I wake up tomorrow."  He was just able to look an uncertain situation in the face and have faith that it would work out.That's probably a pipe dream for people like you and I, but there's some real truth there.  Even if you have a kid, you'll be able to figure it out.  You are well-educated, and being an anxious person, you'll find the motivation to make your situation okay.  Again, I'm really sorry about your mom.  Did she have anxiety problems?  When I went to my parents and brother about my anxiety problems, I was comforted by the fact that they all had anxiety disorders at some point in their lives, and that I came by my feelings honestly. [info] None [info] 1424893752
Slightlybrainy [info] I went through the exact same situation as you described and wrote a letter. I had to provide proof that I was diagnosed with anxiety, but within a few weeks of me sending it in they reinstated it. I highly reccomend appealing if you went through the same thing. They're a lot more understanding than most people think. [info] AAE 2020 [info] 1528817880
WTF_Christine [info] I went through a bad breakup at the same time my parents were divorcing. My dad asked me to move home because he had this huge house and no one to help take care of it.I did most of the cleaning and was able to stay on top of it, even while enrolled full time in college. However, my dad's entire family was coming for Thanksgiving and he wanted the house to be "deep cleaned" so he hired a professional cleaner.I came home from class one day and the cleaner had washed dishes. No big deal. But as I went to unload them, I noticed she loaded them differently than I loaded them and I had a full on melt down, including screaming and hysterically crying. It lasted about 10 minutes.Afterwards I called my doctor and told her that I thought I was having a mental breakdown and she had me come in immediately. I was diagnosed with anxiety.Turns out I have BPD.  [info] None [info] 1551417778
FecusTPeekusberg [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in the top 1% of all anxiety sufferers... yay me... [info] None [info] 1504998047
bigangryhobbit [info] I am no stranger to mental illness, and I know what its like to not be able to finish school because of it.  I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder with agoraphobia 20 years ago.  It was tough.  I went to college 3 times and never could keep it together becuase of classroom anxiety/panic.  I tried every medication imaginable during those 20 years.  I have been self employed for half of that time.  I could never work a physically demanding job unfortuantely.  Somehow, I continue to push on.  Its nice to have come into contact with you.  Its hard to find people that truly understand what living with a mental disability is like, and how much of an obstacle it is.  We aren't lunatics, we just have a health disorder like anybody else that may have something wrong with them.  Good luck to you!  Always have hope that things can change for the better, no matter how bleak it may seem.  I have been off of all medications for 4 years and live a better life than I ever have. I can't even remember when my last panic attack was.  Namaste [info] None [info] 1557256950
Abman117 [info] Can brain chemicals be measured Can seratonin and other brain chemicals be measured if so, why aren't psychologists suggesting that we take such a test.Although I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder and its been hell. how do you physically prove that I have it. What comes to my mind is irrational but, ( at this point  I stopped writing because I was having a conversation and when I came back I forgot what I was writing damn it. I'll come back to it when I remember lol) [info] None [info] 1499049997
holyshmoke [info] Yes I get this sometimes and it's one of the reasons I am currently struggling to go back to work. I have been diagnosed with anxiety attacks as well as ibs so it's sort of a chicken or the egg scenario when it happens -- does the anxiety attack cause the need to use the bathroom or does the ibs trigger something that causes the anxiety? I don't know if I'll ever know unfortunately. Seeing a therapist to deal with the anxiety attacks and always having some Ativan on hand for emergencies has helped somewhat but I still try to avoid scenarios where an attack might happen or where I won't be able to escape to the bathroom if needed. I wish I could be of more help, sorry, but yea I think you're definitely not alone!edit to add: random question but are you female and happen to be on your period? Just curious cause I usually get very similar attacks to what you've described on the first/second day of my period. Think it's something to do with the cramping causing bowel movements and loss of bp from blood loss (I have very heavy painful periods however in general). [info] None [info] 1444095177
arrowkeysmovetherat [info] Fair enough. I don't take meds but I've been diagnosed with anxiety (among other things), maybe there's a correlation. [info] None [info] 1292880988
rightlyanxious123 [info] This is an interesting thread for me because I’m over 90% turbulent. I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 8 years old, so yes, I agree to the whole mental illness thing. I’ve been in therapy for many years and I take anxiety medication, but I don’t know if I can ever truly be “healthy” [info] None [info] 1557072746
reooke12 [info] I've always had anxiety to some degree, but I didn't realise just how bad it was until my doctor sent me to a therapist due to the fact I had a mental breakdown because I had a slight wheeze. I was diagnosed with anxiety pretty soon after that.  [info] None [info] 1505660969
PatchRat [info] Of course there are, but not all mentally ill people are a danger with firearms. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and at one time had suicidal thoughts.  I own almost 30 firearms and enjoy hunting and target shooting. As far as I'm concerned, the two things are completely unrelated.  [info] None [info] 1443992769
dennismiller2024 [info] Urinated. Until yesterday.A little background, I'm 23 years old, and I was diagnosed with anxiety in high school. I have a small group of friends, but I like to stay in the same routine. I was talking to one of my friends about my daily routine, because we were having a deep conversation about both of our anxiety issues.He said, "Do you have OCD also? Sometimes I have to wash my hands for minutes after I pee before I feel clean." I had to tell him my biggest secret, someone that I've never told anyone. I said, "I've actually never peed before. I know it's something you're supposed to do, but I guess I just kinda never had the time." He was stunned by my revelation. "You've never peed before?!?!" Maybe it's because he had a fascination with urine or maybe it was just because I had never told him that before, but he was amazed that someone had not experience urinating. “You NEED to try it. In fact, let’s go to the bathroom. I’m going to teach you how to pee.”He walked me into the bathroom, and taught me how to lift up the toilet seat. He took my hand and arranged my fingers on the stem of my cock. “Relax, it’s easier than it looks. Here, watch me do it.” He pulled out his cock and started pissing into the toilet. “Just relax the muscles in your crotch, and focus on the sensations inside the penis. Whenever you feel a force coming outward of the penis, focus on it but don’t try to control it. If you feel it moving inward, then recognize it, and relax the muscles again until it’s moving outward.” I followed the instructions and nothing happened. I said, “I can’t help it. I feel the force. It’s moving back up. I’ll never pee, I should just give up.”“You got this, just relax. Don’t play mind games with yourself, you will pee before I let you leave this bathroom. If you don’t think you will pee, then no pee will come out. Trust me, you just have to believe in yourself.” I tried again, and pee started spraying out of my cock. "I'm doing it! I'm urinating!"I peed for 5 straight minutes. He said, "How do you like it?" I politiely asked him to leave the bathroom so I could be alone with my piss stream. I wiped the tip of my cock with a single square of toilet paper, and flushed. "I am a new man today," I thought. I ran over and hugged my friend in the most intense display of platonic affection I had ever experience. My pants were sprinkled with wet spots and urine continued to drip down my leg. My friend saw the urine marks on my pants, "Don't worry about that. You'll get the hang of it soon." We fell asleep together on the couch in his apartment. [info] None [info] 1553696566
mboyle1357 [info] I (m26) am worried that my commitment phobia is causing my ex gf (f23) serious emotional trauma and I don’t know what to do. So I dated my ex for 2 years and we lived together for about 8 months. I had some creeping doubts throughout the relationship and only confided in a couple people about these concerns. However I kept them at bay as they were relatively minor. Fast forward to the final 4/5 months of the relationship I had started what i now know to be standard commitment phobic behaviour. I found all the negatives with my ex as possible and got so worked up that this might be my future that I ended up breaking her heart. Worse than that i stupidly decided to be truthful about the reasons why which only served to put her down and really knock her confidence. Note to others - breakup kindly not truthfully!As is also normal with commitment phobes I felt initial relief which then formed into extreme pain and longing to have her back. Subsequently I have contacted her twice, the first time we met and I instantly got cold feet. The second time we ended up sleeping together and currently I’m caught between wanting to try again with her but also remembering all initial negatives and also some new ones (such as her friends all hating my guts)I go through anxious cycles of missing her and being unable to commit to letting her go. But then the instant she shows signs of wanting to get back together I panic. This is extremely unhealthy behaviour of which I’m not proud. I’ve resorted to seeing a therapist which hasn’t been particularly helpful as one session she told me that I should move on and the next she told me to reach out to my ex. I have also started taking antidepressants (only a few days in to the treatment).  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I think my behaviour is invariably linked to this. I am worried for my ex as I know this must be taking a tole on her emotionally. Please reddit help me out of this toxic cycle. I’ve become one of those horrible men that get written about in women’s glamour magazines. To make matters worse I can’t tell if I want to be single in the hope that I will find the one for me or if my ex is the one for me all along and my anxiety is stopping me from seeing thisTL:DR - I cannot move on from my last relationship but every time I connect with my ex I get cold feet again. This is toxic behaviour and is causing my ex emotional pain. I think my anxiety is causing commitment phobia which is causing me to get stuck in this cycle. How do I get out of this cycle ? And how do I know whether my ex is the one for me or if I should keep searching? [info] None [info] 1578092202
4theloveoffiber [info] I totally believe what we eat has a lot to do with what goes on with our bodies. I own a 95 acre organic farm so I try to ensure that as much as my diet as possible is food I have grown myself. Which is hard in the winter time when I still have to get milk and fruit at the stores, but two items that aren't homegrown that I consume seem to affect me if I have them during my period. Of course it's two things I love: coffee &amp; chocolate. So I try to cut down and not consume too much of either the week before and during my period. I take the vitamins every single day and as for the tincture, because it was $60 for a 1oz bottle I use it sparingly. 5 drops in a glass of juice when I'm having a good day 20 drops on a bad day. I also noticed that when all of this started my blood pressure went from low to sky high, I was diagnosed with anxiety attacks the summer before all this started as well and was having them two or three times a day.Thank you for sharing your experience with me, I look forward to reading the links.  [info] None [info] 1482868393
Quietgirl89 [info] I'm really new to Reddit, but I have wanted to join for a long time. I am in my first year of university and live in the UK I was diagnosed with anxiety almost a year ago and I haven't really spoken about it to anyone. Although I have struggled with my anxiety for many years prior to being diagnosed. I started feeling extremely low and depressed in high school and I had a big mental breakdown in my last year of college. Through having cognitive behavioural therapy I know that people and social situations can trigger my anxiety (it's very difficult for me to open up to new people, and don't really want friends) I have also had counselling because I wanted to know why I have anxiety and this is due to growing up and living in a toxic family which I am trying to break away from. Has anyone experienced having a toxic parent or living in a toxic home? I am feeling better but I have to take each day at a time and sometimes I have bad days and sometimes I have good days, I just hope that by joining this Reddit I'll be able to open up more and try and challenge some of my anxiety triggers (posting on social media sites is a big one because I'm scared of being judged and criticised) I'm just glad to be a part and join a supportive network of people who understand.  [info] None [info] 1490395101
lalka808 [info] I am just like this too. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and it manifests itself in this way.  I'm not socially anxious either but like you I spend the whole time worrying that I'll loose my alone time.  Recently I've now started to worry about the worrying.  Not nice.  I've always tried to schedule my alone time: plan it and then accept the social times when they inevitably come along if it's not during a scheduled quiet week.  I'm trying to accept that I can't control everything and let it happen.  Sorry I can't give better advice!  [info] [F/33/INFJ] [info] 1441361918
boom_pow [info] My marijuana manifesto (why not?) I have smoked pot since I was a freshman in collage. 3 years now. It started small and became that which consumed me, everyday. I smoked myself silly, throwing down so hard it hurt. I Essentially failed out of college while still being enrolled. I have taken time off. When I did , I took pot along for the ride and it as possibly the most unmotivated time in my life. I started caring more when I ran out. I found more and fell back into my old pattern, even buying more devices and such. Having stopped smoking voluntarily ( cigarettes and pot) and exercising, I have noticed I care more. It's still a chore to leave bed in the morning, but it's not in a pot haze. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and medicate with alcohol in social situations. ( figure its the same as benzodiazepines which I half-want my therapist to prescribe but I still want to be me') alcohol ftw I guess. I'm not an alcoholic, but it sure helps me talk to people, it removes my anxiety filter that makes me think forever about everything.Anyway I'm returning to school, and I finally have an ideas about who I want to be when I am my parents age. I feel like I grew up. I hope this feeling lasts. It has to; I want it to; I need it to.Thanks r leaves for being here to hear me. [info] None [info] 1304234348
Soldat_of_the_race [info] What are you referring to that sounds bi-polar, I haven't looked into this, I was diagnosed with anxiety before  [info] None [info] 1511269214
NikaVika [info] Wow, my story is basically the same. I have been picking at my face (mostly) for a looong time and only this year I realized I did it when I was feeling anxious or I had a panic attack (I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder). At that very moment it feels so good but then the realization hits and I feel horrible, which makes me anxious....which makes me want to scratch and pick. I discovered this reddit just recently but it really helped me to finally feel like I'm not alone and that something can be done about this. So, you can do it! It won't be easy, there will be relapse or two on the way, but we can do it! Great thing that I started using are the pimple patches. Put it over and bye. But of course I cannot put one giant patch all over my face, but at least this helps me with the worst areas. [info] None [info] 1565185775
MoiraVonTeese [info] Does this make me mentally unstable/ill? First of all, I'm pretty sure it does. I guess it's just kinda hard to admit it to myself, so, here's my question.I'm almost 16 years old. A week ago, I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and anger issues.I didn't get any medication because my clinical psychologist said that she thinks it's not that bad, and I'm young so it would be bad for me to start with it so early (I do believe her, at least for the first part because I know people who have much more severe anxiety than me).I've been through a lot in my life. Don't come at me with "you're only 16 what do you know about life". You don't know stuff that happened so please consider that.I'd just like to know, does having these two diagnoses make me mentally ill? Unstable? Thanks [info] None [info] 1538683323
Mollinator5 [info] I’ve been typed mostly INTJ, ISTJ and INTP.How old are you? What's your gender? Give us a general description of yourself.I am 17 years old and female. I am quiet and never talk to strangers unless online or they happen to have the same interests as me somehow or know of an assignment I missed. When I am with my friends, I am extremely obnoxious, loud, sometimes rude (like swearing and calling them ‘dumbass,’ but I don’t actually think they are...usually).Is there a medical diagnosis that may impact your mental stability somehow?I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. I possibly have excoriation disorder (literally go to a therapist for it).Describe your upbringing. Did it have any kind of religious or structured influence? How did you respond to it?I was raised barely Catholic (we only prayed on holidays). I responded by saying how Jesus can’t be born. Because the Holy Spirit doesn’t have semen and therefore can’t procreate with Mary. I am one for modernism in the Scoped Trials.What do you do as a job or as a career (if you have one)? Do you like it? Why or why not?I am unemployed as a high schooler. If I were to do a career, it would be something medical without massive blood (opposite of trauma surgery).If you had to spend an entire weekend by yourself, how would you feel? Would you feel lonely or refreshed?I would be kind of both. Like I would want to be refreshed in the morning and afternoon, but then during the evening I would like to chat a little. If I were given a single player game, I would not care if I was alone for a weekend if it meant I could play the game.What kinds of activities do you prefer? Do you like, and are you good at sports? Do you enjoy any other outdoor or indoor activities?I love video games (First Person Shooters, RPG, and strategy). I also draw and study anatomy or history for fun. I am not good at sports but made 2nd for my table tennis championship. It was teams, so I was carried. I hate the outdoors since I am allergic to bug bites and they will bite me anywhere...I mean anywhere. Probably TMI.How curious are you? Do you have more ideas then you can execute? What are your curiosities about? What are your ideas about - is it environmental or conceptual, and can you please elaborate?I am very curious about the future and kind of pessimistic. I honestly think the future will be like Wall-E where it is a trash planet in less than 10,000 years. Literally. But I like to think for fun about futuristic cars, technology and how it could work. And I have no clue if it is environmental or conceptual. I think conceptual? I don’t daydream much but when I do, if it isn’t about my science fiction character, it’s about how the world will end and hypothetical scenarios like zombies, epidemic, etc..Would you enjoy taking on a leadership position? Do you think you would be good at it? What would your leadership style be?Nope, nope, and nope. I would be meh. I would expect everyone to do the task I assigned them and if they don’t, well, I will be pissed as fuck. I will show it like Gordon Ramsey bashing dishes LOL. If it is acquaintances, probably would keep it to myself but be passive aggressive and ask them if they could do this part of what I assigned.Are you coordinated? Why do you feel as if you are or are not? Do you enjoy working with your hands in some form? Describe your activity?I have no clue what that question is asking. And I do, love clay and pottery. It’s satisfying, soothes my skin (sensitive skin, red and itchy when many materials touch it) and is fun to do.Are you artistic? If yes, describe your art? If you are not particular artistic but can appreciate art please likewise describe what forums of art you enjoy. Please explain your answer.I do draw time from time of humans. I still haven’t decided on a style. I like Marvel Comics art style though! Kind of cartoony but mainly realistic lineart.What's your opinion about the past, present, and future? How do you deal with them?I groan whenever I see political stuff like racism or sexism. It is bad but if I see it, I will just be angry, so I avoid it whenever I can, one reason I hate the past (yet like history class) and despise the present in terms of news. Although that black hole photo made me extremely excited for once! So cool. And the future I think will be crap, but at least I will be dead by the time it explodes, sun eats it, nuclear explosion occurs, etcHow do you act when others request your help to do something (anything)? If you would decide to help them, why would you do so?I will help them. I secretly want a reward but also want to look nice. Usually I don’t get a reward and I won’t be bothered.Do you need logical consistency in your life?Yes. No evidence, I won’t believe it. Also I hate saying 100% because most of the time that is literally impossible. It could be 99.9%. That’s why the personality tests make me a bit mad. They say definitely agree. Does that mean like 99.9% agree? I think nothing is definite, so I rarely answer the far left or right.How important is efficiency and productivity to you?Keep work consistent and I am fine. Efficiency is how everything is produced and cycled smoothly.Do you control others, even if indirectly? How and why do you do that?I don’t. I may criticize them for doing something, but not control.What are your hobbies? Why do you like them?Video games because I go at my pace and I get power and control. And I can do things that you can’t in real life like parkour, kill people with a motorcycle, hack appliances, etc..What is your learning style? What kind of learning environments do you struggle with most? Why do you like/struggle with these learning styles? Do you prefer classes involving memorization, logic, creativity, or your physical senses?I am both audio and visual. I struggle with stupidity. By that, I mean people who CONSTANTLY talk during class. They make me want to rip my hair out. And I do literally sometimes (I know it’s bad). Also people who lack common sense. I also hate pushover teachers. I prefer classes that aren’t math. My favorite class would probably be biology. I am taking Anatomy soon and bet that will be number one. It is memorization, but partially logic in knowing how human parts connect. I hate numbers.How good are you at strategizing? Do you easily break up projects into manageable tasks? Or do you have a tendency to wing projects and improvise as you go?I am okay. And yes, I think I can easily do that. I sometimes wing projects, but it is less compared to me planning ahead.What are your aspirations in life, professionally and personally?I want to have a job I like that pays okay, find a best friend who shares every single thing I would want, and I guess other clichés like romance.What are your fears? What makes you uncomfortable? What do you hate? Why?Those CGI bacteria animations scare the shit out of me. Spiders, lobsters, crabs, deep marine creatures like that toothless looking shark with a huge mouth and tardigrades scare me to hell. I hate clowns and also when someone is framed in a show and everyone doesn’t believe them.What do the "highs" in your life look like?Seeing huge discoveries on the news that are science related, being praised, winning a game, being with my dog and watching YouTube videos about video game companies being greedy or lazy.What do the "lows" in your life look like?Meltdowns, getting a B or lower on any assignment or test, my excessive skin and hair picking (literally my scalp hurts a lot because there are two large torn off scabs on my scalp), and my 17 surgeries were lows.How attached are you to reality? Do you daydream often, or do you pay attention to what's around you? If you do daydream, are you aware of your surroundings while you do so?I am pretty attached. I obsess over staring at live action actors or actresses to see how awkward them acting is and I am usually not engaged emotionally in shows or movies. The few that made me actually cry were Violet Evergarden (anime drama about love), A Silent Voice (some anime of a dead girl), and that one Shiba Inu or something that stayed at a station waiting for his master then at the end he dies, finally leaving the station. I daydream a quarter of the time. And I am aware usually.Imagine you are alone in a blank, empty room. There is nothing for you to do and no one to talk to. What do you think about?I am alone. Well, it depends. Why am I there? Captured? I would yell and then get tired and look for a way out. If for fun, I would think about our ending of humanity, video game news, my fictional character and then go to sleep to be let out of the room (time going quicker).How long do you take to make an important decision? And do you change your mind once you've made it?It takes forever if important. If like a food order, I’ll be a little shy but mainly because of my appearance. And I change my mind half of the time then back and fourth.How long do you take to process your emotions? How important are emotions in your life?Not long. If I am pissed, I am pissed. If I am sad, I will know. If I am elated, I will be just bouncing around literally yelling out loud.Do you ever catch yourself agreeing with others just to appease them and keep the conversation going? How often? Why?Nope. Fuck that. If you are stupid to me, lack common sense, just have an opinion about a flavor of ice cream or politics, I will disagree. Sometimes I even disagree even though I agree inside just so I can socialize for once (since not many do to me at school).Do you break rules often? Do you think authority should be challenged, or that they know better? If you do break rules, why?I don’t besides skipping mass at my school LMAO. And nah, they should know better. I don’t really mind them since they haven’t been a part of my life much.Ask me anything else you need to help type me. [info] None [info] 1555726235
PoetryInALovesong [info] Is this anxiety or something more? Hello :)To cut a long story short, I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year ago at the age of eighteen. Since then, I have improved vastly (without meds) and gone from having attacks everyday to about once a week/fortnight.I have the most amazing boyfriend of 1 year who I see pretty much everyday and my anxiety doesn't really affect me when I'm with him. However I've noticed a massive change when I'm not with him. Every time I have plans I end up freaking out and cancelling last minute. I have loads of uni work to do but I just end up sitting there staring at it which is not like me at all.All I want to do is sleep because I constantly feel exhausted and also because I just want to close my eyes and forget about the world.I'm confused about what this is as I never used to feel like there was no point in living but that's exactly how I feel now.Any help would be much appreciated :)Thank you [info] None [info] 1393703705
lumpycakemix [info] Mine too then terror feeds the anxiety. I was diagnosed with anxiety 10 years ago but only recently, like weeks ago, started reading about it and trying to find strategies to live life without letting the anxiety bring me down.  [info] 35/F/5'10" | SD 6/17 | SW 283 | CW 204 | GW 170 [info] 1528916862
Bobysaur [info] I've never been able to stop thinking but it wasn't until recently that I was diagnosed with anxiety. I got prescribed Buspar and now I feel great.  [info] None [info] 1341709554
AlexandriaVineyard [info] Is this anxiety? Or insomnia? Any advice appreciated! 24F5’675kgCaucasianU.KNo existing medical issues Nexplanon Implant (contraception)Used to be a casual drinker (~2x/mo), doing Stoptober with my family No recreational drug use So for the past few weeks I’ve been REALLY struggling to sleep - not managing to sleep until 3/4/5am, waking every hour or less, and, although throughout the day I feel it, but ignore it, when I get into bed I can feel this almost adrenaline feeling in my arms and legs along with a tight knot of worry in my tummy, and although I feel it during the day, it’s harder to ignore when I’m trying to block out everything to get to bed. The adrenaline feeling makes it impossible to sleep for ages because I feel like I need to get up and go for a run, or hit something, to try and use this energy up. Some nights when I get my head into a vicious circle of thinking, I can become a little short of breath and have to ‘talk myself down’. My mother and my sister have both experienced panic attacks in the past, but up until now, I was lucky in that I’ve never experienced this - I always used to think of myself as happy go lucky person; positive, nothing could hurt me - so I’m not sure if what I’m feeling IS anxiety.I always used to be able to use ‘thinking through situations’ to help myself feel better. But now, I can’t stop it when it reaches its ‘end point’. I panic, and go through every situation - what would I do if each family member died, where they might die, how they might die, how I would support my family, what they would do, what I would do, etc. It varies from financial situations, to death, to other situations.I’ve tried soothing music. Acupuncture. Cutting out all caffeine. Rescue remedy. Lavender pillow sprays. Herbal stress relief tablets. Herbal sleep teas. Clenching one muscle at a time and then releasing. Opening a window to cool my room down. I’ve even tried drinking alcohol in the evening as depressants to help me sleep - Etc!I’ve been through a rough year - left an amazing job to move 400 miles to live with who I thought was the one, who turned out to be narcissistic and a serial cheater, spent most of my savings on my house we lived in, then in July I found the courage to end things - moved back in with my parents, and started the process of selling the house 400 miles away. I’ve only just managed to secure a job (found out Thursday) which is amazing but I’m constantly aware that I’ve set myself back immeasurably by following my heart, and this links in to the thoughts that run through my head with this adrenaline feeling.In all the issues that happened during the last year, I also gained a lot of weight. I used to be 63kg, so during October my family and I have cut out all alcohol, and have been eating healthy, mostly vegetable based dinners (but we have protein I.e fish, chicken, tofu) in almost every meal, in an attempt to lose it - and it’s been working, I’ve been losing weight steadily, as have my parents.Since this ‘anxiety’ has become more apparent over the course of October, I’m wondering if perhaps it is linked somehow to the foods I’m eating? Or is this normal to have peak periods of time where it seems worse? I ask about the foods because my mother (55F, white coat syndrome, on Lisinopril for HBP) over the past few days has complained of almost my exact symptoms - insomnia, feeling too much energy, but unlike me, she’s also become sullen and ‘in a bad mood/aggressive mood’. She’s always been what I would call a ‘worrier’, and has been diagnosed with anxiety in the past, but I:A) want to know if what I am experiencing is anxiety? Insomnia? B) want to know if this dieting could be having an effect on both me and my mother?C) want to know what the treatment might be? If it’s therapy, I know in the UK at least I can get treated quicker privately than on the NHS, so I would rather get this going as quickly as possible. D) can my UK GP tell anyone if I am diagnosed with anxiety? I don’t want to lose my job! I know it sounds strange and the above is very convoluted, but this is my first experience with anxiety and I want to make sure I have all the facts - before going to a GP and discussing this with them. The last thing I want to do is waste anyone’s time, and the ‘what is anxiety?’ websites can be less than helpful at the best of times! As I type this, it’s 03:22am. I’m desperate, please, for any advice.Thank-you to anyone in advance who responds to this, from the bottom of my heart. [info] Patient [info] 1572318982
Sausagesanga [info] I didn't realise so many others thought the same things. I was diagnosed with anxiety after I lost my first daughter, and after my second daughter died in September it got really bad! I have the "intrusive thoughts" all the time. Maybe it's not an anxiety disorder I have after all. Maybe it's just a broken heart. Stolen innocence. Seeing life and death differently. It seems so cruel now, so different. Through the eyes of a bereaved mothers :(  [info] None [info] 1389025555
sand-ham [info] My boyfriend (18m) has recently decided to stop telling me (18f) when he is upset or anxious about something while facetiming. My boyfriend and I have been together for 4 (pretty serious) months  and FaceTime almost every day. As is to be expected we sometimes have calls where we both get upset about something. Often, but not always, this is caused by him overthinking something I said or something we did together. I’m kind of the only person in his life he feels comfortable talking about deeper emotions and anxieties with, and I don’t mind listening. The only problem is when his worries start to make me anxious as well (I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past). I recently suggested that he find another outlet to talk to (edit: in addition to me), like a close friend or therapist, hoping that he could find the comfort in talking that he needs without upsetting both of us while on FaceTime. But last night I was venting to him and he was very supportive, but hinted that he is no longer going to talk about any of his worries on FaceTime ever again because he doesn’t want to upset me, and that he isn’t going to talk to anyone else about it either and is just going to keep it to himself forever. This might not be my place to say, but I don’t really think thats a healthy practice. We’re transitioning to a long distance relationship in a month and I really don’t want him to shut his emotions away, especially when he will be 5 hours away. I know a relationship is a two way street and I don’t feel comfortable being the only one sharing my emotions. How do I tell him that I want to hear some of his worries and fears and emotions, just not everything? [info] None [info] 1532616288
AlexKTuesday [info] No, mine do not necessarily trump their conditions. I've been diagnosed with anxiety as well, and if I could pick to have one or the other, I'm not sure what I'd choose. They're both crippling in their own ways.However, there are been a lot of reputable studies showing the benefits of MM (specifically, strains high in CBD%) for epilepsy patients but the evidence isn't as concrete for the other conditions I mentioned. [info] None [info] 1457014888
Taylor_Audrielle [info] If I'm diagnosed with anxiety, will that hurt me in two years when I apply? [info] None [info] 1528871336
cudger [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety last summer and it was almost terrifying how easily the doctor prescribed me with pills instead of offering other solutions.  [info]  [info] 1400782978
Betterself0226 [info] Hey, correct spelling is important!I think it's possibly because when you know you have something it can exasperate the symptoms. That's happened to me with psoriasis (once I was aware of it it started itching more thus making me scratch more this making it worse) and it's kind of the same with mental disorders I think. I was diagnosed with anxiety so young that I just don't know my identity without it, so I made my identity around it.Then again it could be helpful for some people to have those labels, I have no idea haha   [info] None [info] 1503772383
Irlydntknwwhyimhere [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety conditions and it’s extremely anxiety inducing for me. When I used to drink I’m sure I would have liked it more but I’ve quit drinking for many reasons. I’ve done most of the “common” recreational drugs, the only ones I enjoy now are THC, LSD, and DMT. I’m looking to try more psychedelics tho. Maybe ketamine. Stimulants just really aren’t my thing. [info] None [info] 1561945783
godsanddevils [info] I used to get horrible hangnails. Then when I was 15 I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. [info] None [info] 1476076991
A_Panda_ [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and it can be seen in my interactions. But so many people throw around the terms without knowing what is happening. [info] None [info] 1560048470
plan_with_stan [info] I suffer from anxiety disorder and on some days I have the exact same symptoms... except for the difficulty swallowing... it was weird reading your post because I have gone through all the tests including my thyroids and they said all was fine. I also have had testing heart rate they went through the roof, lost 10KG in 2 months without trying was nauseas as heck and had difficulty focusing on any task.. this started at a very particularly stressful period of my life, so I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I wonder now if this is all that it was....I still sometimes suffer from an elevated heart rate, especially when I try to fall asleep, and lately I do feel nauseous for no reason... I may want to visit my doctor again... [info] None [info] 1574906255
BCD195 [info] I’ve had anxiety for as long as I can remember and I can tell you this feels very similar to an anxiety attack (for me) but it feels slightly different, which makes me worry that it’s something worse. Last time something like this happened I stoped smoking for 2 months and it seemed to fix me but I don’t know what caused the issue to come back, or if this is even related to what I experienced about a year ago. Like I said it’s very similar but slightly different so I cannot tell if it’s related My best guess is the weed is making my anxiety get worse for some reason (or in your case, making it so you notice your anxiety) but it’s never safe to assume and move on I’d much prefer to know the cause For future reference I use nicotine, caffeine, and weed on a daily basis (wow, shocker I have bad anxiety huh?) I occasionally use cocaine when I’m drinking which isn’t that often about once every three months or so. And I drink on average 1 time a week. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and am prescribed Wellbutrin for it (for some fucking reason) Cross reference that ^ to your day to day life, if you see a lot of similarities I’d say we’re having the same issue and it’s most likely panic attacks brought on by smoking weed. [info] None [info] 1573586584
danielleidk [info] Break from high school I was diagnosed with anxiety in early January. I'm now on a break from high school, and I will be starting over in AugustI am currently looking for exciting jobs I can work until High school begins again. What else should I spend my time doing? I do want to use my time somehow productive. I definitely want to study on my own, so I'm extra ready for school. What else? I'm sixteen btw [info] None [info] 1456071716
smolbur [info] Thankyou, the OP is absolute cancer and so are a lot of the comments.I'm fucking sick of people glamourising mental illness.I was diagnosed with anxiety and it is a complete detachment from reality, it's about your mind cooking up nightmares of the immediate future and them scaring the shit out of you until you are paralyzed with fear.Mindfulness is the ONLY way out.People need to wake the fuck up. [info] None [info] 1542941179
PastelCake491 [info] Am I ESFJ or ENFJ? Maybe even another type! Am I ENFJ Or ESFJ? Maybe Even Another Type!First of all, I am stuck in between these types because:•I relate both to Ni and Si, and notice myself using both, sometimes even at the same time!•In tests, I usually get ENFJ, but with sort of strong Si (and Ne), but in some of them I do get ESFJ, mainly in the shorter ones.•I have asked people, in a page of cognitive functions I made that I showed my family and friends (it was around 9 people) My parents: ENFJMy mom said Ni because since I was little, I liked to play with patterns and connections and I have always liked finding the deeper meaning of things. My dad said Ni over Si because “I grab things from the future, not from the past”.2 Friends: ESFJ1 Friend: ENFP 2 Friends: ENFJ (one of those is the one who I have told the most about MBTI, and she has this belief I am ENFJ, and doesn’t let it go)1 Of My Siblings: ESFJThat Makes: 1 ENFP3 ESFJs4 ENFJsThen, I showed my mom a picture which contrasts ESFJ vs ENFJ, cognitive wise, and she said ESFJ. I showed her Ni vs Si and she said Si.Now, I’m still young so my auxiliary function is just developing. But I will explain my Si and Ni! Using the 4 letters, I am an ENFP. Si:I’m not the biggest fan of change, it depends on the kind of change. I don’t prioritize tradition but bothmy dad and mom said I’m more of a detail oriented person rather than big picture, but I’m not sure. I am not a fan of routines, I would definitely get bored from doing the same thing all over again, which is why school days are boring. But, I do sometimes find myself giving advices based on my past experiences and even though I use a lot of metaphors, my day to day speaking doesn’t involve a lot of them. I don’t have the most detailed memory, but I do remember various things that happened to me when I was little and find myself using examples from both the past or imagination. I sometimes think about the past, usually things that had lead me to be insecure and I find myself thinking of what I could have done differently in certain situations. I don’t have the best short term memory but my long term one isn’t a mess. I do look up to past experiences, even though they’re not my top priority. Ni:Even though people don’t notice it, I can be very deep and arrive at insights, I analyze some things unconsciously so I suddenly have these random moments of realization. I am very future oriented. I was diagnosed with anxiety so I don’t know if this is just my anxiety, but I tend to get very paranoid and overthink stuff.I like getting to the deeper meanings of things and enjoy the abstract. I am creative but not good at brainstorming and prefer thinking and processing my ideas before letting them out, though I sometimes can be pretty random and say the first thins that come to my mind when I’m with people that make me feel comfortable. I use metaphors but don’t really include them that much. I enjoy abstract thinking and analyzing situations that lead me to maybe a theory. For example, while making theories, I usually just make one and stick to it. I have just one goal, and I enjoy working to get that one goal instead of having multiple ones. I usually think of one possible outcome, or idea, sometimes I think of more but usually stick to one. I am pretty abstract and usually have hunches that turn out to be true. (Like for example, one time I was playing a game and since the beginning I had this idea that I was going to win, and I did!) I usually just know things without really knowing how to explaining. But, I do have trouble deciding, and I’m usually just like “idk, what do you want?”, which could be a sign of trickster Ni, which means tertiary Ne, auxiliary Si. I don’t think about the long term future, I rather stick to daydreaming and thinking about the short term future.I hope you can help me if you want! And I hope this was not too long! :) [info] None [info] 1556991773
CrypticEmpress [info] Silence can be nice, if you just wanna hang out that's great you don't have to talk.I was diagnosed with anxiety a while ago and I'm not so sure that's true anymore but silence can be really comfy and I'm just glad to have you there with me.So people in general, especially those with anxiety, please don't feel like you need to keep coming up with things to say. I enjoy your company regardless :) [info] None [info] 1542946821
kleptolittlesister [info] My [19F] younger sister [13F] keeps stealing stuff from my room/around the house/who knows where else I know this is petty, r/relationships, but it's getting on my nerves.So. Little sister and I are two sisters. Our parents are happy kind people and we are moderately well-off (a combination of a lottery win+hard working parents+owning a few franchises) so it's not like we are hurting for money.I do my own thing and live at home while going to school and working because it saves me a ton in rent so I can save up to move out after my degree, something my parents fully support. My sister and I have a good relationship. I take her out to the movies and ice cream, and I actually drive her to school in the morning (it's about 10 minutes away and it's really cold at this time of the year, usually she walks, but Canada.) so we spend some time together everyday.About a year ago I noticed things in my shower were going missing. Razors, shampoo, things like that. I brushed it off thinking my mom threw stuff out because she cleaned my shower and just got new ones. I work a retail job so I get discounts on these sorts of things. It wasn't a big deal.Then I noticed some of my shoes were missing from my closet. Specifically, some expensive high heels that I wear to business conventions (I'm doing a business major) and the like. Well, my mom has size 10 feet and I am a size 7... and so is my sister. When she was at school one day I went through her closet and found the shoes. I also decided to go through her bathroom and I found my missing razors and some shampoos. I decided to ask her the next morning if everything was OK and if she needed me to buy her some stuff. I remember being her age and feeling embarrassed about my leg hair (we have LOTS of hair!) and if she wanted a razor she just had to ask. I don't mind buying her that stuff. She was embarrassed but she admitted to it and agreed so I got her some of her own stuff.But later more stuff started going missing. It's a whole long saga and I was pretty stressed at the time so I assumed I was just misplacing stuff. I forgot about a lot of it, but I also sat her down and told her lots of times that if SHE NEEDED SOMETHING, she can ask us. My mom and I are very open with her. She does not get an allowance but she has quite a bit of money saved up that she just hoards in her room. She can ask my mom for money if she wants anything, but she does have to justify why she wants it.A month ago I came home from work and there was a big brown splotch on my desk and my makeup brushes were strewn about. I had come home early so I realized that she was probably in there and assumed I wouldn't be back there for awhile. OK, so she's interested in makeup.I have a lot of makeup so I "destashed" as is the term and I gave a lot of my old stuff to her, or stuff that I didn't want. It wasn't just drugstore, there was some higher end items in there too. For her birthday which followed I took her to Sephora and I let her pick one thing she wanted. Yeah, she's 13, but she was taking such an interest and I didn't want to yell at her and put her off.My boyfriend had got me some really nice makeup items that I had wanted for Christmas and about two weeks ago one of the lipsticks went missing. The key he also gave me went missing. It is a very pretty key: silver with little rhinestones. He had it made for me. It is on my car keys usually which I hang in the main lobby. And then a few days ago my tweezers and my eyebrow scissors were missing, and my makeup vanity mirror was broken (the lightbulbs bust for some reason.) I decided to wait until my sister went off with her friends today and I searched her room. I found a LOT of stuff of mine! Not just the stuff I had noticed gone missing, but other things, things like bras, clothes, books, stuffed animals! I noticed some of my mom's earrings and my mom's foundation was in there (my mother doesn't wear it enough to notice it had gone missing) and there was a LOT of money. Money she definitely did not ask for or earn herself. I found some more expensive things too, like iPod cases, necklaces that definitely weren't mine or my mother's, expensive nail polishes, and some teen magazines. She had even taken my dad's camera that she denied she knew the whereabouts of and stashed it in her desk. It is one of those huge Canon ones and my dad had been tearing the house apart daily for weeks and it was really stressing him out. AND MY KEY!!!! Which I had cried to my boyfriend about BECAUSE I HAD LOST IT AND I FELT SO STUPID. NOW I KNOW I DIDN'T.My parents are wealthy but they worked hard and when I was younger they were pretty poor. I remember getting food from the Food Bank and sneaking into my dad's offices just to take toilet paper home. They got really lucky and so I work hard and make purchases with care. Everything I buy, I do so with the intention it will last me for a long time. Seeing as dementia runs in our family I was getting SUPER freaked out when I was losing stuff and my mom was too.Now I know she has been taking it. And it looks like she has been taking from other places too. I am not sure where she is getting these $15 nail polishes from. And other items. I've tried being nice to her and I've talked to my mom but we are at a loss. She flat out denies stealing stuff from us even though we show her that we found it in her room. She is being a major brat. I ended up taking all of my stuff, plus the stuff I gifted her, and locked it into a box and in my car. I told her that when she smartens up she can get it back. She just ignored me and played with the dog.What do I do? What can myself and my parents do? This is not something we dealt with before.Also as an aside she stalks my social media religiously. She quotes stuff I say out loud and kind of holds it over my head because my parents don't really keep up with that stuff. I blocked her several times but she makes new accounts. I had to privatize all of my social media which is fine because the new job I got requires a minimum of presence anyway.EDIT: My boyfriend got me a camera type thing which is hidden behind my stuffed animals and has a view of the room so I can record when she is coming in but I don't think that will hinder this behaviour.DOUBLE EDIT: She has had therapy before because I had cancer 5 years ago. However she was only 8 and she was more interested in looking at the babies on the ward because I was in the children's hospital at the time. We went separately and as a family because it was quite nearly fatal (ovarian) and I was diagnosed with anxiety and my parents were a little depressed for awhile but the therapist said she was a happy normal kid. Is it retroactively affecting her, do you think? **tl;dr**: Sister is stealing stuff from family members and from other places (unknown) and she is denying it when we confront her. We have talked to her nicely several times but I think extreme measures have to be taken. Thanks for the help in advance [info] None [info] 1425187199
hairenya [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and although my meds work pretty well, I am still affected by the following triggers:Large groups of peoplePhone CallsEye ContactShop at Walmart (sounds funny, but I'm actually serious)When my family members are angry or stressed. Being Late or Off-ScheduleLoud NoisesUnfamiliar People or SituationsWhen I am Solely In charge of/ Responsible for SomethingDrivingLast Minute Plan ChangesGood luck at the dentist! I've had my top wisdom teeth out, didn't hurt that bad. The pills they gave me were awesome :)   [info] http://www.amazon.com/gp/registry/wishlist/1JH3EWY5G2Z1P/ref=top [info] 1389269986
anxiouslawstudent [info] Crippling anxiety, 1L thinking about dropping out The older that I've gotten, I've noticed my anxiety getting worse. When I was younger, I had very little issues with public speaking and such but as the stress has piled up, things have been hitting the shitter. This year I was diagnosed with anxiety by my psychiatrist and prescribed meds, I decided against taking them and opted for the miracle drug, propranolol, that helps with my public speaking. However, I really hate the idea of being on it every day, it's not very pleasant and has caused me some sexual dysfunction in the past. I really don't know if I can survive this socratic method style of teaching, I'm just a bundle of nerves. At the same time, I do have a full ride to a t50 school and I feel like dropping out would be a gigantic waste. Has anyone or is anyone suffering through anxiety and has gone through law school? [info] None [info] 1440552159
lady_fire [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety long before fibro. The fibro symptoms started a couple years after the anxiety. I used therapy and meds to help with the anxiety and have been able to stop both successfully. Now I use yoga and walk to help manage both.  [info] None [info] 1517788554
Mere-chan [info] Diagnosed with ADHD as a child, wondering if I'm in fact ASD I've wondered this for a very long time, whether I may have a high functioning form of ASD. I was diagnosed with adhd when I was 6 or 7; 8 at the latest. I was failing 1st grade in public school so my mom took me out and homeschool me, where I flourished. I was dyslexic(and still am to a degree) and had to be taught multiplication with actual objects because I could not grasp the concept. I'm almost 30 now, and ASD wasn't a common diagnosis back in the early 90s.In fact, I didn't know what autism was til I got pregnant with my son and read all those baby books. As my son's ( who was diagnosed asd at 2) gotten older, I've noticed striking similarities in our behaviors and the things that bother us, beyond just being "just like your mother". Certain food bother me, mostly the texture. Like cooked fish. I gag just thinking about it. I get frustrated easily, and zone out when I'm focusing on something. If someone is talking to me and I'm thinking about something I can't hear them, or rather, tune them out  completely. I'm also super obsessive with projects or favored video games and shows, and tend to no life them til complition. The thing that sticks out to me though, is always feeling different, even when I was very very young. I'm often misunderstood or come across as rude in my tone when I dont mean to be. I was bullied my entire school life, until I got to college and embraced my personality. I'm honest, blunt, and don't tolerate social injustices ( people being rude, picking on someone, liars, etc etc) In addition to my adhd I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and at times I can get really overwhelmed. I also have high intelligence and have always maintained a 4.0 or higher (erm not boasting but you know u.u)I'm thinking about getting tested for asd in the next month or so when the new insurance kicks in. But in the mean time it's gonna be a constant thought in the back of my head, so I was hoping for a little insight and opinions. If I do have asd, I would be relieved to be honest. It would mean all those times I was called out for bring different weren't just because I was a freak, but just someone who sees and thinks differently. It would be....a confidence boost for the future. And another link with my son, maybe even an explanation of his own asd (I'm under the impression it's genetic) Most of all I just want...clarity. Does anyone know the likelihood of going through life without knowing? Is it easy for adults to get tested for asd? Any info would be great :) thanks in advance! [info] None [info] 1435465640
LivingMeme101 [info] Anxiety, Passive, and Lack of Confidence.. Which should I fix first? Some things about myself that I have noticed lately is, when I'm in a situation that I'm in and should stand up for myself in some way, I don't do it. I just let the situation pass because I don't like confrontation. I've always had a lack of self confidence, ever since I was a kid. To make matters worse I've been diagnosed with anxiety since a very young age. I don't make decisions on something until I am 100% sure they are the right one. Well, that's what I tell myself I think, just so I don't have to deal with the situation. I also over think/overanalyze just about every situation. One example is this girl hung out with me before classes ended a few weeks ago.. Lets just say that she was into me and I didnt listen to my gut, which resulted in her moving on  after that and kind of ghosted me. I've been over thinking the situation since then, some days it won't even be a thought, other days it messes with me. Its something that happens to me every time an opportunity comes to me and I just let it pass.  I tend to beat myself up for stuff like this. I avoid making mistakes constantly, or try too.Anyways, what stuff would you guys try to fix first ? Felt like I was a little scattered with my writing. All of these problems seem to interconnect so I don't know exactly how to nip it in the bud. Thanks to everyone ahead of time! [info] None [info] 1527025716
MakeMammaProud [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety. My parents took me out of therapy really quick though because my therapist called child protective services on them once she asked me what was going on at home. I just learned to deal with it on my own. It’s been two years since, and I’m much better now. My religion really helped me get through this time, but that’s just from my own personal experience, so I’m not recommending relying on religion for mental health [info] 18 [info] 1555224411
mithedthiel [info] I used to work as a barista and was super into coffee until I was diagnosed with anxiety and decided to quit drinking it. (I had to stop pursuing bartending as well because alcohol was also triggering anxiety symptoms).I switched to green tea and it makes a huge difference. A nice zen like awareness, rather than coffee jitters.  [info] None [info] 1547605952
JennyTommy [info] I’m surviving for other people and are absolutely miserable. WARNING RANT BUG LOOKING FOR HELPIf you couldn’t tell, I’m suicidal. Have been for more than 4 years since probably middle school and I’m 20 now. I was diagnosed with dyslexia in fifth grade, generalized anxiety disorder in 9th and adhd and major depressive disorder this year. All of these run in my family so I was doomed from the start. I have been to 3 different therapists (insurance is stupid) and I’m tired of playing the game. I know how it works. They let you rant, the focus your rant, gain your trust and recommend meditation. Every therapist has this formula and I’m tired. I hate meditation. I can’t sit still and I don’t like how it makes me feel but they recommend it every time, multiple times. And then I’ll be all happy when I’m working with them and think I don’t need them anymore and I’m back here. Back at the bottom. I’m on meds too (lexipro) and have been since I was diagnosed with anxiety but they don’t have the same effect as the used to. I’m just anxious and sad all the time all over again. I used to be worse honestly. Before the meds and therapy I would cry every day and get really low. It didn’t help either that I was in an emotionally and sexually abusive relationship. I’m out of it now but I apparently have ptsd from him and a string of bad relationships and situations around sex. It took me a year after I broke up with my ex to just kiss someone without freaking out. Then I had an amazing relationship and he cheated twice because I couldn’t give him sex. I feel like I wasn’t good enough for him or any of them. I know it’s a victim mindset but I can’t help thinking that if I was just better or did more then maybe they wouldn’t have miss treated me. To an extent it is true though. My ex told me after we broke up that he wanted to break up with me at one point but didn’t because he was afraid that I would kill my self. Now I’m overly concerned that I will give off that vibe again to someone because I know that can be damaging for the other person. The other issue is my friendships. I run under the assumption they don’t want me there so that when I find out they actually don’t it doesn’t hurt so bad. Last night was rough for me for this reason. I was going to go to a party with some friends but they essentially forgot about me. I got all dolled up and got my hopes up for nothing. It’s happened to me a few times (ie no one showing up to my birthday)and I can’t handle those emotions. They aren’t really my friends I’m just kept around out of pitty. People don’t invite me to things either. I try to be good. I’m really social but I just can’t get people to like me long term. They see how annoying I really am and then don’t want me anymore. Another thing is that my dad is close to disowning me and I had to grow up learning how to diffuse people so that I wouldn’t get yelled at. There’s more details in my post history if you want but that’s the gist. On top of that I have never held a job and I don’t know what the fuck I’m doing and with school being so hard I don’t know how much longer I can keep this up. I’m not even in a hard major, it’s liberal studies for gods sake and yet I’m struggling. It’s so stupid and yet I’m falling apart. I don’t even know if I want to be a teacher, but I don’t know what else I’d do. I’m just tired. I’m so so tired. It’s like this every year and every year the same thing happens. I’m tired of interacting with people and having the same conversations with strangers and friends and the monotony of the cycle of life. I have to eat, sleep, bath, socialize, do homework, be a good daughter, go to class, etc. I’m tired of it. And I don’t even know what I’m doing with my life. I’m honestly too stupid for anything. I’m also concerned I’m a budding compulsive liar and going to become an alcoholic. The compulsive liar is because I tend to tell the part of the truth that fits me and twist the rest or omit the rest. It’s disturbing and it’s gotten me into sticky situations but I can’t help it. I don’t know how to be 100% honest. The alcoholism is because I got drunk a while back and the only thing that I can think of since is getting drunk again. I’m not 21 so I can’t buy it on my own and that’s the only reason I’m not drinking 24/7. I want this to end yet I know at least some people will miss me so I stay alive for them. There’s more too my issues but I don’t want to bore you more. I just don’t know what to do anymore. I’m depressed right now for no reason and I just want to escape. TLDR: everything is fucked, I’m not smart enough to do shit, I’m socially inept, and I might loose my support system (family and friends). I want just to escape it all. [info] None [info] 1569150368
C-4 [info] Xanax, Lexapro and some questions about anxiety. Ok, so I was diagnosed with anxiety last month due to feeling like having a heart attack and went to the ER and got all sorts of tests done.  Now, I've never took a pill other than aspirin in my life but they described me a generix Xanax and i've researched it before I took it and I've seen its addictive and all that which is why my family doctor just didn't prescribe it to me and i'm upset.  I realize the medical reasons why some doctors don't like to prescribe it but it calms me down, and it makes my chest not feel like a heart attack. My doctor prescribed me Lexapro the other day and I hate the way it makes me feel, he said he won't prescribe Xanax.  How do I get to get a doctor to prescribe me either that or a generic form or at least a pill that does close to the same affects as that without sounding like a pill popper or something like that? Because my anxiety really sucks and I'm starting school in January and I really don't want to feel like having constant heart attacks.  BTW please don't suggest other things to help with anxiety or say buy these pills illegally, I do not want to do that, but just the way of getting them prescribed.  Thank you. [info] None [info] 1323806551
Casualjeeper [info] If you quit before your first day you're basically throwing away any shot you have at a job in the future. Think about how many people work for the postal service. You can do this. I was diagnosed with anxiety by my therapist and here I am 3 months later (as a CCA) freakin getting it done. I like to think this job has made me mentally stronger and better at handling stress. Now I look forward to work everyday, they have me working 6 days per week, it's tough but I'm just happy that money isn't an issue anymore. [info] CCA [info] 1566773705
TheOtherCatboy [info] Hey there. Thought I'd peek in after lurking.I was diagnosed with anxiety and told I was HSP (highly sensitive person) at age 20 after what felt like a lifetime of having a dysfunctional mind. After an entire school time of bullying and tons of family pressure in regards to grades, I quit my education. I tried to get help from a psychologist, but after just 3 sessions all contact just stopped. After that I fought my way through legal cases to be able to keep my drivers licence after crashing my car after falling asleep behind the wheel - something that was later attributed to severe B12 deficiency.Now, three years later, I am finally trying to get my life back together, although I still live at home. After having some talks with my new psychologist (a great guy btw) and my parents as well, I've figured out that I've been anxious since age 1-2 where I would refuse to leave the house and fall sick with a fever if we went anywhere (and the suddenly being fine when we got home). At age 5, I had recurring nightmares about nuclear meltdowns after reading the newspapers at the time.Anyone else here have experience on growing up with anxiety and not really remembering a time where you were not constantly anxious? I would love to talk to someone with similar experiences! [info] None [info] 1498683242
OGGS30 [info] Need advice with dad So about 7 months ago I made this post: https://www.reddit.com/r/trees/comments/35c0lp/told_my_parents_i_smoked/tl;dr Told my parents I smoke, dad tried it with me, mom didn't like the fact that we smoked together, dad liked itSo it is seven months later now and things have gotten out of hand. My father is pretty much always high now and does do anything. Fucking nothing. I didn't realize how bad it has gotten due to me being away at University. He said he had a productive day yesterday. The day consisted of him forgetting to pick up my prescription and sending two emails that would take a normal person no more than 5 minutes. He also is super fucking annoying. He just tries so hard to act like a stoner and it's sad for a 45 year old man. "Whoa man, this is like so trippy. Have you ever watched the Discovery channel high?" Like you can tell that its all part of this facade to seem cooler I guess. In addition, his eating is out of control. He works out at home so he doesn't gain too much weight but he eats all of my food. I got oatmeal for breakfast yesterday at Walmart. I come down stairs and he is opening the last pack. He just says sorry and he'll get more but he doesn't leave the house so I know that's a lie.  He acts like it isn't a problem. The worst part is that I am his dealer. The only reason I don't cut him off is that my mother says he is no more productive when he is out of weed. He just sits there all day but he is sober and less tolerable. He starts drinking and used to be an alcoholic. I'm sure he is replacing it with weed and I feel responsible. What should I do?This isn't about weed but I'd like advice on this as well. I was diagnosed with anxiety and have started taking prozac. I told my mother and my mother told my father (something that I didn't want to happen). Now all he does is talk to me about it. Seems like he's caring but he's one of the main reasons for my anxiety. His years of abusive tendencies to due his alcohol and steroid abuse during my childhood has taken it's toll on my mental health. How do I go about telling him that I don't want to talk about it? I have been direct saying I don't want to talk about it but he just continues to push. I don't want to tell him I hold him partially responsible because it'll just piss him off and he'll take it out on the rest of my family because he knows I don't care. He'll just sulk around until someone confronts him and then he'll flip out. (Happens everytime he doesn't get what he wants.)Thanks for any advice/insight. [info] None [info] 1450532745
fatcattastic [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as an adult, and looking back on my childhood there were a ton of signs similar to what OP is describing. I wish I had communicated to my parents what I was experiencing, because early intervention would have saved adult me some money on therapy. [info] None [info] 1556111684
leahnopants [info] I mean like most universities, if there is something that you are challenged by or something specific that was out of the ordinary that prevented you from reaching your full potential, they'll listen to you. Ex. "I  have had anxiety for 10 years"..Well maybe by then you should be trying to manage it / making a difference vs "I was diagnosed with anxiety in my 2nd year and as you can see by my transcript I've been improving my management of it". If you think its extenuating...might as well toss it in there. I'm sure lots of people try and bs their way through it. [info] None [info] 1568760441
drowningGreenBean [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 8 and have been taking anxiety medication on and off since then. I got diagnosed with ADHD (primarily inattentive) in my first year at college. I am now in my 3rd year of college and I take medication for both anxiety and ADHD. I have asked this same question about myself and I don't think that there is a chicken or an egg for me. Rather, the anxiety and ADHD build off of each other. If I am anxious I have struggle concentrating. Conversely, if I can't focus my anxiety gets worse. Hope this helps! [info] None [info] 1488244970
bergamot1 [info] Meds Sorry in advance for the long post!&amp;#x200B;I was diagnosed with anxiety in middle school and ADHD in high school, never took anything for the anxiety and the neurologist who diagnosed me w anxiety gave me Vyvanse. I believe we started at 20 or 30 mg and made it up to 50. On the Vyvanse I was incredible in school but completely miserable and insufferable as a person. I could write 70+ papers with ease but I'd never shut up, was super snippy after lunch, developed a skin picking disorder and lost 30+ pounds due to lack of appetite + compulsive behaviors exacerbated by my anxiety. The neuro had transferred me over to a psychiatrist who consistently told me that she didn't believe I had ADHD, and used the severity of my symptoms as justification to take me off the stimulant &amp; instead tried Guanfacine and Strattera (neither of which worked).&amp;#x200B;Now, I'm on 36mg of Concerta. I took Ritalin for a while but my college schedule often has me in school \~10 am - 7 pm and the short acting medication just wasn't cutting it.&amp;#x200B;I find that when I'm in school and I take the Concerta, I do okay because I'm so busy either in class or finishing things in between classes that I don't really have a moment to stop and breathe, and it helps me keep up with this demand to some degree. &amp;#x200B;However, when I'm not in school and I take Concerta to try to get some schoolwork/chores done at home, I find that the medication makes me feel disorganized and panic stricken, I get so overwhelmed by the magnitude of things that I have to do that I either start all of them all at once and make a huge mess, or I don't do anything and I panic quietly while watching stuff on hulu. &amp;#x200B;I'm seeing my psychiatrist again soon, and I don't know if I should ask her to try a different medication. I would like to continue taking a stimulant, but find one that affects my anxiety as little as possible so I can be effective in school and at home. I've read other posts by people that when methylphenidate medications weren't working for them and they switched to Adderall it was like night/day or vice versa (switching from amphetamine to methylphenidate), but my concerns with asking for Adderall are that it may be too similar to my awful experience with Vyvanse. How much variation is there between different branded medications of the same drug class?I am not interested in taking any antidepressant for the anxiety or ADHD/anxiety combo. [info] None [info] 1560117553
artfullyjaded [info] I know. I have been struggling with this lately, too. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD in the last year too, and it's especially scary when I'm having really bad anxiety on a day when I am more likely to have a seizure. Also, when my anxiety gets really bad, it is hard to focus on anything, and that's eerily similar to an aura for me. I feel kind of fuzzy and "off", and if it happens at work or somewhere where I am talking to people, I'll notice myself stuttering and slurring my speech. It's so very similar to that pre-seizure feeling for me.When I find myself in those situations, I remind myself that I have had anxiety attacks before, and that this is what they feel like. I'll remind myself that I took my medicine that morning, and that I didn't forget. And then I breathe, inhaling and exhaling at my own pace to calm down. The not knowing is definitely the hardest part, but you're not alone. [info] Briviact 150mg [info] 1570507658
DubbleB [info] I wonder if it is common to have all three? I am the same but I have been diagnosed with anxiety issues aswell. I hate my brain. [info] None [info] 1353664342
deathbymcat [info] I think that's bullshit. We all deal with anxiety. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and even had meds prescribed to me, but I don't think it would be fair for anyone to get extra time. Are you going to get extra time during surgery? Or can you freeze time when you have to make a split second decision or answer a patients question?  [info] 510 128/126/128/128 [info] 1471631894
DisneyBelle87 [info] Are there services where he can take exams alone? I was diagnosed with anxiety and I'm allowed testing in a separate room and time and a half. I had a doc diagnosis though so I'm not sure how your school would go around that. But by federal law he's entitled to accommodations if they can be shown by a doctor. Good luck!   [info] None [info] 1468206223
Glitter_Cunt [info] Wow that sounds like an amazing experience--but very concerning that you don't have access to the mental health resources you want and need! When I studied abroad in undergrad I remember my doctor was able to write a prescription for my medications that let me pick up many months at once--I wonder why your psychiatrist wasn't able to arrange something for you? Although I guess at this point you probably have a routine that's working. Maybe if you visit home you could pick up a year's supply or something? I was just diagnosed with anxiety (like literally just a couple of months ago) and still kind of wrapping my head around the fact that not everyone is so stressed out all the time. It must be so frustrating being surrounded by people who don't take it seriously :/ Like I can tell when my reaction to something is disproportionate and caused by my anxiety, but that's different from the anxiety being made up and that doesn't mean that I can just control it... Gosh that makes me so angry on your behalf! Congrats on losing 20--that's awesome!! A food scale can be such a game changer :)I know--my doctor is kind of awful. I got those odd iron results and she had literally no idea what it could be and just said to monitor my iron and retest in three months. Didn't even say how much iron I should aim for--just said I should track it. I told her I track my food consumption anyway and would be happy to total up my iron consumption over the previous three months--nope wasn't interested. Whatever lol. I have an appointment with a specialist to get my thyroid sorted and that's at a top ranked teaching hospital so I plan to ask for a referral to a GP in their network and just stop seeing my old doctor who I don't really trust anyway (idk if you can tell a lot of my anxiety is medical anxiety? Haha)Thanks so much you're so sweet! Same goes for you of course :) and gosh I feel like such an old person--I don't even know what kik is haha [info] 5'6" | 90 | 14.5 | -25 | F [info] 1464913890
cantremembersn [info] Questions regarding medical history and enlisting. Okay guys, so I haven't formally met up with a recruiter yet but I figure this crowd would know more about what to expect than anyone else.When I was 15 I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and eventually got myself hospitalized for a week when I had an outburst. Since then I was put on Lexapro (anti-depressant/helps with anxiety) for 2 years, went off of it on my own and the rest is history. In January of 2013 I went back to my psychiatrist for a check up and he prescribed me with the meds again. I haven't taken them because I simply don't believe I need them anymore.After a lot of deliberation I've decided I want to enlist. My questions are as follows:-What's the general attitude surrounding things that happened when you were young/a minor? In hind sight the outburst was probably a mixture of teenage angst and anxiousness and my parents didn't know how to handle it.- I technically self de-medicated myself rather than have my psychiatrist take me off, even though he know I stopped taking them a  couple of years ago and haven't taken the ones he recently prescribed me. If anyone has any experience with something like this it would be appreciated: How would I go about documenting this?- If it states I have been technically 'on' the meds since January will I be DQ'd?Any response would be appreciated.Thanks guys. [info] None [info] 1365976803
SgtOceanus [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety. I feel like it's different from what I see on reddit and that.For me, everything is normal until either A. i remember something small, or B. Have something happen to be that seems super important.For A, I start panicking and worrying, going straight to the worst possible scenario. It's happened with leaving stuff by my computer, not remembering if I left my door open, or even which pen I took to school.For B, it's insane. I was working a double shift on Friday, and trying to hurry up so I didn't get left behind and make my boss (who is also my grandpa) mad. While adding whipped cream to a pie piece, I blew whipped cream out the back of the bag all over my apron. I was alright until I realized that I had tracked it on my shoe. Then I wanted to burst into tears and cry.B also makes it hard to fall asleep. I realize it's taking me longer to fall asleep. If I don't handle it quickly, I panic even more, and the cycle continues.Also intrusive thoughts but working out has helped so much with that. [info] None [info] 1497833252
sarty [info] Exactly the same thing happened to me.  Was diagnosed with IBS and they gave me something called Levin/SL (a little tab to put under my tongue that basically makes part of your nervous system chill out and stops the cramping).Later, when I was diagnosed with anxiety, the SSRI and/or the benzo that I took made that symptom go away.  It was always worse in the mornings and always if I had to go somewhere (no pun intended, ha!).  If I were to stay home, it wouldn't happen.   [info] None [info] 1364011813
jacob_v [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as a kid so i had to go and do some psychology test then have a doctor say i was clear and then just recently i had to get a waiver because of my concussions from playing football [info] None [info] 1543941196
NorthboundXVC [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and about a year ago I went to a treatment center. it helped a lot at first but my mental state has been declining this past year with no signs of stopping even when I have sought out help  [info] 17/M/Gay/OregonUS [info] 1508804298
SnackRaptor [info] So I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues for the past 17 years here and tried just about every SSRI out there (most "pooped out" after a few months, didn't help, or the side effects were unbearable)... Effexor is the only one that's worked right for me (for 4 years now) and that didn't need to be increased (in fact we even decreased it a little and it still worked!). Everyone's different, and there's a lot of trial you may have to go through to find the right one(s) that work for you.  [info] None [info] 1524274068
Txeas [info] Well,  I was diagnosed with anxiety recently so since then I have been stressed with the subsequent health issues I've experienced.  (I'm not entirely convinced it actually is anxiety). Thanks for that info. . Very interesting that stress could be the cause.   [info] None [info] 1452651977
smokingpickles [info] It's strange to me how often it isn't characterized as that though and how often people think of anxiety disorders as intrusive thoughts when many people just have real life stressers that cause them to feel out of control and deal with it in other ways. I was diagnosed with anxiety but it turns out most of my anxiety is career related-I worry about not having a job or not having a job that is good enough. If I can convince myself that I am working toward somethings in my career, everything seems to fall away. Not entirely, but not in an insignificant way either. What you have going on sounds awful, I am happy to hear you have a therapist that is able to work with you and help you get to route of the problem. [info] None [info] 1536018390
A_random_passenger [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety. Essentially, anxiety is nausea/fear of vomiting, for me. Nothing more.So yes, they are definitely bound together. [info] None [info] 1564085630
pinkchariot357 [info] Need recommendations for high impact sports bras Hey guys, I’ve had Reddit for a little while but this is my first post (posting from my phone). I’ve had anxiety about adding a post, but I think it’s about time I find the answers I’m looking for! So here’s a little background.. I’m 21(F) and i weigh about 110lbs and I’m 5’5”. I don’t know if too much information is a thing on Reddit, but I’m a 32DDD (roughly). My issues with bras in general is that the cup size never seems right no matter how many times I get measured. My issue with sports bras specifically is that they never support me enough. I won’t say my boobs “sag,” (although who cares if they do) but they’re not the perkiest and I want to say that’s my problem. So I love doing anything athletic, I used to be in really good shape in high school. I also never paid to much attention to how my bras worked for me back then. A year ago I was diagnosed with anxiety, and I had a really hard time dealing with it even though it’s something I’ve had me entire life without my knowledge. I didn’t go to the gym for half a year and a few months ago I started going back. I feel really uncomfortable with myself there, honestly. Not because I lack gym knowledge but because I’m insecure with myself, and insecure with my boobs. They hold me back from doing high-intensity workouts and running in general. I’ve also always had a love for basketball, and I can’t get myself back into playing because I cannot find a sports bra that supports me enough. Does anyone have any recommendations for sports bras that fit what I’m looking for???I know this was long, but I truly appreciate anyone who took the time to read or help me out!!Long story short, I’m a small/busty women in search of the best possible sports bra for athletics. [info] None [info] 1540508046
alimcfar96 [info] I'll list my symptoms...tell me what's wrong Im a 21 year old female. For the last year or so I've had a bunch of different symptoms. Any ideas on what's going on or what to do would be so helpful.-I'll start with the most concerning. Hair loss. I used to have really thick pretty hair and It's thinned dramatically since the beginning of 2017. Thinning from all over, not just certain areas. There's a couple places near the top you can almost see through to my scalp so I have to style it in different ways. Huge clumps of hair used to come out in the shower. I got my hair cut last month and that seemed to help reduce the amount of shedding. For the last 10 days I have also been using head and shoulders almond care shampoo every time I shower and nizoral treatment shampoo once every 3 days. It seems to have helped a lot, nowhere near as much hair comes out. I still notice more hair loss and breakage than I would like though.-I have an itchy scalp. Especially in 3 spots. One directly behind my left ear, one right below that where my hairline ends above my left shoulder, and one at the bottom of my hairline on the right side. In those 3 places it is scaly and rough, and very itchy. Everywhere else isn't quite as itchy but does still itch. I am hoping these new shampoos and treatments will help this as well, but I've only seen a small amount of improvement so far. -even as a teen, I always had very clear skin and even one pimple was rare. My face is breaking out and I have small pimples on my neck and my all the way down and across my back as well. The ones on my back come and go but every once in a while I'll have a couple large enough to be painful. The ones on my neck are small and I don't have too many on my face usually but all my pores feel clogged. It's just so strange for me because I've never had acne before. - my face is almost constantly somewhat flushed red and the formation looks like a malar rash to me. (Butterfly rash). This just started to occur last year.-i tend to get sick very easily, my immune systems not the best.-I don't know if this needs to be included, but I went off the nuva ring in December of 2016 and it took me until November of 2017 to have a period again. I have not had another period since the one that ended on November 27th 2017. -2017 was a very stressful year for me. My grandpa died in January, I was working 2 jobs and going to school full time. I quit a job I had been at for 6 years and started a new one. I also graduated college. I'm in a much less stressful place now but the year did a number on my mental health. I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 17 but it definitely acted up more last year with all the stress. I can feel things calming down for me now though. I guess I'm just looking for advice, maybe a way my symptoms tie in with each other, etc. Thanks for reading! [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1515913300
iforkedthelaw [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1568872507
Mistery8390 [info] I've just realized what my addiction has done to me Hi, so basically, i think i have ED.  I have a Partner now, and it's been fucking miserable. It happened twice already, we made two tries, and both time i was completely limp when it mattered most. On one side, i think the condom thing and the performance anxiety played a big part (i am diagnosed with anxiety, i'm a virgin, and i was rock solid while we were just kissing etc) and i have also had some problem with my circulatory system. I won't go into details about it cause it's caused by so many things and it doesn't really matter. I'll see a doctor, but i am pretty sure, that the problem won't be physical. I'm in great form. My shape is kinda not big (ectomorph here) but i'm a very resilient guy and i've always spent time doing some form of excercise.   However, my sex drive has always been a thing. I know, i know i have it. I'm used to being the perverted friend in the group. Performance anxiety is a thing, i'm sure. I'm a very anxious person. However, i'm not anxious with her. She literally knows all of my shit. All of it. And she loves me. she's even supportive with this problem. (ok sorry i'll cease the rambling about how lucky i am)Anyway. I'm pretty fucking sure that i have PIED. I've been watching porn regularly for 5 years. I've always been into squirting porn only. That has been my thing. Although i would mix it with some shit about extreme toys or BDSM.   I think that's my cause. I think i have become desensitized about it. I never had any thing really going sexual. So i thought that was just, the norm... I've also never Md on a crush of mine or something, funnily enough. Only girls that i knew were out of my league or that i actually didn't sentimentally care about.   I've decided that i'm going to leave this, once and for all. I have a person i desperately want to please, a life i want to live, and an addiction to beat. I am willing to beat this. However, here's my question. Apart from ceasing with porn sites, what can i do? I feel like i need to get this over quickly, if you know what i mean. I want to be a perfect partner. Do you have any suggestions on how i could help rewire my brain faster outside the cycle of porn? I need some guidance, i'm new here. [info] 34 Days [info] 1533975087
iYNS_55 [info] I act non-anxious, confident and "the tough meat", even though I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1565182607
goldenruppers [info] This is going to be a long story as i am still undergoing this in my family and I am unsure whether to count this as having abusive or toxic parents so any advice is greatly appreciated. To give some background, i am a jc student in a pretty "elite" sch in sg. My parents (mainly my mum) is obssessed about my studies and i have been studying under her very strict supervision for the past 17 years of my life. She feels that i am unable to study by myself as she doesnt trust me, constantly belittles and degrades me by hurling vulgarities, or simply rant at me for not being able to catch up with the fast pace of teaching simply because i am stupid. As i have been hearing this kind of insulting comments ever since young, it has definitely taken a hit on my mental health as i am diagnosed with anxiety when i was in sec 2 (the year was the worst for me) and i feel that i can be quite socially awkward and i really beat myself up over it as i really want to make more friends and have a wider social circle, but really cant seem to due to the "serious"vibes i give off.To give an extent of how much she interferes with my life and studies, as i am in a sports cca she is extremely paranoid about me reaching home beyond 7.30pm, as afterwards if i am not back home (which often happens) she would start spamming my phone to shout at me to get back. There was once when i was not keeping track of time and only answered her al at 8.15pm, whereby she really went berserk on the phone; and sounded as though she was going to break down and threatening to call my cca teacher to withdraw me from my cca all the time or remind me how many tests i have upcoming and scolding me on how i have the audacity to stay in sch until this late. The worst part is that she just keeps telling me to quit school nowadays to save her from the stress of teaching and coaching me. Honestly i can tell that her strict supervision has affected both of our mental health but i really cant do anything about it as she really refuses to let me study alone. As a result of all these trauma, i have become extremely insecure and unhappy over the years as i seldom go outside to even have a break nowadays as well. Over the weekends i would just be cramped up at home while i see all my other schoolmates enjoying good food and having fun just makes me want to cry sometimes as my mum feels that there is already barely enough time to study. I am getting really tired of my life of eating the same food, ( i apologise if i sound spoiled here but every weekend i am just kinda forced to eat the same food bought frm the nearby coffee shop which is really sickening but i cant do anything abt it).I honestly dont know how i am going to be able to put up with all these until a levels. I already have a fear of exams due to all the pressure of not wanting to waste the efforts i have put into studying that has caused me to blank out several times, and my mediocre grades dont really help either. I scored 1B, 1C, 2E, and 1D for the recent block tests and my percentile is around 40-60. I want to improve but i am just kind of in a slump (just the same situation i have been in for the past 7 years of my life). Thank you for reading thus farr, i really needed some listening ear to this . [info] None [info] 1566401449
anonbff [info] I went to therapy. I learned that behavior can be a symptom of anxiety, which I didn’t know I had. Therapy taught me a lot more about myself. Like how to spot when it’s just me having a moment and what to do. After I was diagnosed with anxiety I went to my doctor and started taking Zoloft which was the best thing I’ve ever done. The change started at the root of the problem, the relationship. Though we loved each other very much, I knew I had no. There was no way for me to move on and grow from my old habits. I needed a clean slate. My next relationship was leaps and bounds better. We are both in a good place of mind, which makes our relationship all the better.  [info] None [info] 1550927391
Bubbline [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety induced IBS. After taking several medications for it with no relief, I diagnosed myself with Endometriosis. I had to quit my job, drop out of college, and pause my life for a Stage 4 Deeply Infiltrating Endometriosis diagnosis. 4 years, 3 surgeries, a radical hysterectomy and 27 doctors later my life is finally starting again.  [info] None [info] 1551676750
lachesepia [info] Oh god I'm 19 and I still have those thoughts. I gotta beat the panic down lol.... Yes I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders [info] None [info] 1560630867
Fiva1609 [info] This might be long so please ignore any grammatical Errors thx. When I was 9 one day before my then the birthday I got Bell’s palsy. So half of my face became useless it couldn’t move and my eye could not blink half of my mouth would not open and I could not taste of one half of my mouth. One more story when I was twelve in one week my dad got in an accident I could not walk for weeks and needed life altering surgery my grandma got cancer again and my mom found out my brother collage money was gambled away like wtf I also had like 20 panic attacks that week ( I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was like 3 due to the many surgery’s I’ve had and stuff like that I still think that I have my problems like I have sociopathic tendencies ( I used to make up problems to make my mom and dad to make problems like my dad yelled at me and tell my mom even if he did not so my mom would be mad.  But that was when no was younger today my grandma is healthy my brother is better and I love my mom and dad guess how old I am. Am 13 🤫 [info] None [info] 1562726370
unknown989898 [info] Diagnosed With anxiety but currently unsure about the validity of that diagnosis now I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2014, when I was 16, following a drug addiction and bad drug related experiences which gave me an anxiety disorder. I am 19 now.Since then, I have had these symptoms come on:- dry mouth at night and when I wake up- sore throat when I wake up- feeling extremely tired when I wake up, as in, so tired I feel like I can hardly make myself breathe or move- dizziness, all around just feeling weirdly not connected to anything and it feels like I cannot open my eyes enough and cannot hear enough- weird feelings in my neck, slightly sharp, sometimes in my head also- dry nose, mysterious allergies that don't get better with any medication, difficulty breathing (it sort of just feels like I can't breathe normally but I am very used to this feeling)- difficulty focusing properly, feels like I am zoned out always- coldness in extremities, especially a finger or two will be cold- random soreness in my legs and hips that goes on for a few days and then disappearsWhat I do not experience is any panic, fear, sudden onset of symptoms, etc. I used to have all of the anxiety symptoms, all of the panic, fear, and feeling like I am dying. I have NONE of this now. Doctors have done EKGs, listened to heart and lungs, had me try to walk in straight lines, checked my reflexes, blood pressure, etc.I eat a paleo diet, and used to eat vegan (loads of carbohydrates) and very little difference between how I feel now. I used to eat way way more than now and felt literally the same, so increasing my calories doesn't help either.My doctor is lost on what to do. I have hypothyroidism and take medication. It could also be related to that, but it seems odd that I really feel no better since increasing my medicine. My iron was low but I have been on iron pills (and eating meat now) for two months, so there's no reason I would be feeling worse due to that either.I know that sometimes thyroid medication doesn't work well if iron is low, but as I said, my iron levels must be higher by now since it has been 2 months of a heme iron source plus the pills.Any ideas? My doctor prescribed Wellbutrin because it was the one medicine I might be willing to try. CBT doesn't work because I don't have any anxious thoughts. I feel like trying medicine might be the only thing to do. [info] None [info] 1499550646
Aroon777 [info] Scary Stories I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago, and even before that I tended (and still do) have anxiety hallucinations. One time I was at a Colorguard competition. We were putting away our show stuff, and I thought I did terrible. I thought I was the reason we were gonna get bronze. (We didnt, we got gold.) So my anxiety was really high, and I was freaking out. Out of the corner of my eye, I saw this tall ass figure. I looked closer, and it was gone, so I shrugged it off. A few minutes later, it showed up infront of me. The room around me darkened. The figure was pitch black, had pointy limbs, red, spiral like eyes, and giant pointy teeth. Thinking back on it, it seems stupid. The figure still follows me, sometimes is scary, but I think of it more as a companion now. It dosent try to scare me as often. I still havent told my therapist. I had an anxiety (panic?) Attack at the comp after I saw it, and people were too busy getting out of their uniforms to see. Tbh I thought I was having a heart attack. So yeah. That's my scariest story. [info] None [info] 1586723409
joelthezombie15 [info] Been diagnosed with anxiety for years but only really noticing it now, How do you cope? I've been diagnosed with anxiety for probably 13 years now, It was never a diagnosis that entirely clicked with me but I definitely did feel very anxious occasionally and I had and still have bad social anxiety. Recently though, through talking to people with anxiety and things, I've realized I was looking for the wrong symptoms in my anxiety. I was thinking you could only be diagnosed with anxiety if you had panic attacks damn near daily and crying fits and genuinely feeling like you were being hunted 24/7. I've now learned thats of course not the case and I'm noticing I feel anxious ALL the time. My hands and arms feel weak, my lungs almost feel like they're shivering, I have this overwhelming urge to run away all the time, I'm struggling to focus, everything freaks me out. These things all happened before but I didn't notice them as much and I didn't attribute them to anxiety (for whatever reason) but now that I know those are the symptoms of anxiety I notice them ALL the time and I'm really struggling this last week or two. Since I never really suffered from regular anxiety I never really picked up good coping skills. It was always triggered by something specific like being in public, so I'd go home and isolate myself to calm down. But now there is seemingly no trigger. So I don't know what to do.I'm not really asking for actual medical advice or anything, just things that seem to help you guys out. I've tried listening to calming music and laying in bed but I find that I just freak out that I can't hear what's going on around me, and if I sit in silence that freaks me out too. I hope this post is acceptable here, I'm just really desperate to find something to at least help a bit that I can do easily. Thanks. [info] None [info] 1549959787
mathnugget [info] Dealing with physical symptoms? After having a complete mental breakdown last year I was diagnosed with anxiety and emetaphobia (phobia of being sick) which in turn makes me dry heave or gag in certain situations (college, speaking to people) etc. If anyone can relate how do you deal with the physical symptoms and how are you doing now? [info] None [info] 1394389373
divinecore [info] Physical appearance, usually. And yes, I do get worried that I might owe them something or that I’m leading them on simply by being nice to them :( or that they have ulterior motives. It makes me want to go home and lie down. I have been diagnosed with anxiety before. Not sure if I just don’t like that kind of attention. I’m fine with attention if it’s because I’m being funny, though. I get scared that people might get too close to me. It just makes me sad for a reason I can’t explain! [info] None [info] 1528085283
UnimpressedPenguin [info] Hard times Hi. In December 2018 I was diagnosed with anxiety. It started off as mild anxiety but for various reasons has worsened. I am not ashamed of my feelings but I do find it hard to talk to friends. The first person I tried to talk to was a friend who I knew also had anxiety so I thought she might be able to give me some coping tips. I was wrong. She totally undermined me. She said "I wish I only had 'mild' anxiety. I take so much medication, I rattle." This stopped me talking to anyone for a while.Now I am struggling. Testing for Coronavirus in my country is limited but I am certain that my dad had it.  I work in retail, so with my dad's health in mind I couldn't control my irritation with customers coming up to me and reaching over me. Combine that with the pre-lockdown panic which was horrendous, busy, noisy and hugely overwhelming and my husband losing his job, my son's birthday approaching and trying to explain that he won't be getting much and I am pretty much a mess. I had a meltdown at work and walked out.I am taking some leave. I feel incredibly guilty but I also know that I cannot cope in my work environment right now. I need to get out of retail but that isn't possible in this current climate, but I am letting my colleagues down at this difficult time. I know that taking time off and staying home is the right thing for my mental health but weighing that against finances and dropping my colleagues in the shit leaves me feeling incredibly conflicted.It feels good just typing all that out. Thank you. [info] None [info] 1585687382
Chrispat91 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 19. I still struggle with it from time to time, but seeing somebody has been the best decision I have ever made. I still see my guy at least once every 2 weeks, and I can manage the anxiety and paranoia very well. [info] None [info] 1378905691
fancypattie [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in the past. I do have that pretty well under control. For example I would be afraid to be in public places., be afraid of an intruder, have panic attacks which required being medicated. So I don't know if it's just a branch off of that. I also didn't have this fear with my son's father. I feel like I loved my SO and my son so much that I'm always worrying about their safety. [info] None [info] 1556831759
jtmac6 [info] Preface: I'm 23, almost 24.  I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was about 12.  This is how I would describe the experience of a panic attack and the process of calming down.Think about a time when you've experienced a fight or flight situation.  This may be something like a near death experience, or almost getting in a car accident, or being chased by something.  Most of the time in these situations you feel your muscles quickly tense up and short burst of this tingling feeling in your spine/neck.  This is adrenaline being pumped through your body.  This is what is happening when a person is experiencing a panic attack except it is usually more drawn out rather than a quick burst.  This response is usually initiated by fear, stress, or more likely, a combination of the two.  The fear doesn't necessarily have to be your standard-horror-movie-freddy-kruger-coming-to-get-you type fear.  For most people, it won't be. A more common fear is something like, "I'm afraid that if I don't do well on this final that my gpa is going to tank and I'll lose my scholarship."  Stress can also be thrown into the mix with fear.  If you have a lot of things that you need to get done and a lot of things to keep track of in your head, you can get overwhelmed.  Stress is cumulative and little things that stress you out throughout the day can creep up on you and help push you over the threshold where your body starts pumping adrenaline.  Once the adrenaline is in your system it doesn't just up and leave when someone tells you to calm down.  Every situation is different and the time it takes for a person to calm down and get back to normal depends on a lot of things.  Anxiety can breed more anxiety and if you let it, it can snowball into something much bigger than the original feelings that caused it in the first place.  I've found that the quicker you can recognize what it happening and why it is happening, the quicker you can attempt to resolve these issues in your head and calm down.  Also doing general things like deep breathing, laying down, keeping your body still, etc. helps a lot. Personally, with time and practice, I've gotten a lot better at calming myself down and can now do it fairly quickly in most situations. However, the real skill to master is living your life in a way in which your fears and stresses don't boil over and cause panic attacks in the first place.  This means doing things like eliminating, avoiding, or dealing with the things in your life that cause you to feel fear or stress.  This also means doing things to promote calmness such as meditation, exercise, healthy eating, or doing whatever helps you relax.I hope all that helps you understand things a bit better. [info] None [info] 1407085436
Dewdeaux [info] Interesting. I was diagnosed with anxiety in college (several years ago), but I never had panic attacks. It was more like insomnia and an inability to turn my mind off of intrusive thoughts. Are panic attacks triggered by underlying anxiety and stress, like delayed reactions? Because when these episodes happen, I’m not particularly worked up about anything.  [info] Son born 6/26/16; ? due 3/1/19 [info] 1544121740
Caliboy50124 [info] I'm kind of similar. Last year, I really enjoyed weed, then one day the day after smoking, I felt Dr. Thing was it didn't go away.  Months later I still "think " I have Dr, but only when I think about it. When I do things I never consider it there.  I've also thought I'm just paranoid and I convinced myself I had it ( I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I am the type of person to think he has a fatal disease from the slightest pain). Anyways I started smoking slowly a few months after and I'm fine. But I know how dp/Dr feels and I don't want anyone to experience it, especially the months I did. The only thing I can say is, and this worked for me, start smoking with a small amount, in a good environment, and if possible not alone. For me, getting high with friends takes away most of my paranoia and bad times during my high because you are having more fun and having a  conversation. Anyways, good luck, and if you do start smoking again, don't rush into it. Baby steps. [info] None [info] 1514349307
kantrida17 [info] Migraines Has anyone else had problems with really, really bad migraines caused by anxiety/anxiety attacks/panic attacks?A little background: I’ve had problems with all sorts of headaches since childhood but doctors always said ‘it’s genetics, not too much to worry about’. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 10 and been dealing with it since then (I’m F, 23 now, and going to therapy regularly). In May 2017, I stopped taking meds because both me and my therapist agreed I got well enough to work on my anxiety problems without meds. Last summer (somewhere around August 2018) I started getting these awful migraines. Went to the doctor, got myself checked and he said that those migraines of mine are most probably caused by my anxiety (high levels of stress, both mental and physical, may occur after a panic attack etc). Never really thought of it that way, but it makes sense, due to my job and everything else in my life.I just wanna know someone else’s experience and how they’ve dealt with these things because I’m scared of going back to taking meds. [info] None [info] 1568789727
CamTheManWithThePlan [info] An Irritating problem regarding memory and Social Interaction Hey‚ so I have been having this problem for a few years now‚ or maybe more‚ I can't remember exactly. But anyways‚ first I should mention I am 17 and that I have autism‚ and I am not diagnosed with any memory impairment issues‚ I am prescribed with Vvyvanse 40mg‚ and I am diagnosed with anxiety as well‚ other then that there has been no doctor that has said that this was an issue.So I usually have great memory‚ I can remember tons of information‚ yet even the most simplest things I forget constantly‚ often after thirty seconds or a minute.Like someone could be telling me something important‚ and even with my full attention with full eye contact‚ and restricting my thinking to just what they are saying...I somehow forget almost all the time.But yet other times I can remember things perfectly‚ and when I don't forget what someone was saying I often hear the direct opposite of exactly what they were sayingAnd often when I hear the opposite of what people tell me to do‚ it is so vivid and clear in my mind that it seems incredibly real.And this has been a huge issue with having friends and possibly the reason why for the longest time nobody was really interested in me anyways.With friends‚ I often completely forget what they are interested in (often after they say it) and it is incredibly irritating for both me and the person in question because I can't talk to them about what they like because I don't know what it is.But yet this is inconsistent too‚ as sometimes I remember exactly what people like and what their interests are.And even after multiple attempts to remember what it was I can't remember the right information.Like for example a while ago my mother had a bike in the yard that she was repairing‚ and instead of the obvious choice that it was her bike‚ I somehow thought very thoroughly that it was here friends bike‚ (despite the fact that she has no friends that have bikes or go to her for repairs). And then after that I went up and said to her that I didn't know what she was talking about earlier‚ and when she does explain it‚ it takes nearly three to four times for me to get it in my head.So is this normal to be this inconsistently forgetful about things? As I have not found anyone who relates to this issue at all.Please comment if you have any answers. [info] None [info] 1561836094
rosesinthehospitalx [info] Romance/Relationships make me feel like a weak person TL;DR: Relationships make me feel like I'm weak and no longer an individual, I have a history of mental health problems but I'm not sure if this is relevant, any advice appreciatedRight, so I'm 16 years old and have only been in one short relationship previously (though we never actually called one another boyfriend/girlfriend) and I ended up breaking it off after about a week despite knowing each other for years because I felt like I wasn't an individual anymore and it made me feel almost weak. It wasn't toxic or abusive and he genuinely loved me but I just didn't feel right at all.Despite not being in any relationships since I have had flirtatious friendships with guys and girls but as soon as they start showing me any romantic gestures I freak out and again, feel like I'm not an individual. Another friendship has spiralled into this situation and I genuinely feel attracted to him (sexually) and we have so much in common, but I'm already nervous about him inevitably asking me out because as much as I do like him as a person I feel like he's an extremely romantic person and I'm definitely not ready for that.I'm just curious if anybody knows why this happens, for some context I have been diagnosed with anxiety and anorexia and go through periods of cutting, and I almost feel like being isolated is part of my personality. I don't know if this is relevant or if I've been alone for so long that relationships are just something I find harder to adjust to than most people. Any words of advice would be greatly appreciated. [info] None [info] 1567170218
rabidhamster87 [info] I feel like a lot of people who suffer from anxiety think that they're the only ones who do.  I can't tell you how many people I've met who define themselves by their anxiety and act like I wouldn't understand... But I've been diagnosed with anxiety too... I just don't like to announce my diagnoses like that.  It's very annoying to encounter these people.   [info] None [info] 1479751332
intergalaxy9 [info] my immediate supervisor thinks i stole something of hers. its causing me so much emotional distress. i’m in a tight spot at work because my immediate supervisor (NOT my boss) had her vape stolen last week. and i’ve been feeling her disposition towards me change which makes me feel like she thinks i did since i vape as well. but i pushed those thoughts aside thinking that she might just be tired or busy that week.however, today i was summoned by the admin representative of my department and questioned about the lost vape. i felt it was an insult but i was polite and i answered their questions truthfully.but now i am sad cause now i know that my coworker REALLY thinks i did it. and now i’m pretty sure the admin believes her since they questioned me.its really upsetting because its just my 3rd week on the job and i’m 23 and this is my first job. and she’s 50 and doing what i feel are very childish things like ignoring my “good morning”s and such.i am sad that our relationship turned out like this because i really respect her. now she doesnt even meet my eyes. and its awkward because her work bay is right next to mine. i cant work properly. i am diagnosed with anxiety and the creeping feeling that people hate you or are talking about you behind your back is the worst thing to me.i want to tell my boss what i’m feeling but will i seem like a tattle tale? i dont want to tattle. i just want someone to talk to. its my first ever job and i’m such an outlander here. i just want this to be cleared up and over with so that i can work comfortably again. and also for the sake of my integrity, especially in the eyes of any future employers i might have.TL;DR: I’m pretty sure my immediate supervisor hates me because she thinks I stole her vape. I was summoned by the admin and questioned about the stolen vape. I feel insulted and i am very upset because its only my 3rd week at my first job ever. What should i do? [info] None [info] 1549278746
HappyFawn836131 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and add at the same time, I’ve never had any actual problems before this. My doctor prescribed be strattera. Me and my mom did a ton of research all over the internet to find out about this drug. And we both firmly decided we didn’t want it. My mom and doctor then came to the consluison of a script of 60x 10mg adderal irs. She encouraged us to mess with the dosage and tweak it just right and such (Mom held the bottle, I didn’t get the chance). They both believed that my anxiety stemmed from my add, therefore causing me to get anxious. 2 months later and not a drip of anxiety left in my body... I don’t know what do tell you man, but the best explanation in my opinion would be that everyone’s body is built differently, and no drug will effect anyone exactly the same way... [info] None [info] 1522061476
thekiwiforest [info] Asthma, Allergies, or Anxiety?? For the past 2w I’ve been dealing with shortness of breath, tight chest and throat. (No fever or other covid symptoms!) It started when I got a piece of unchewed steak stuck in my esophagus. It was pretty rough but it eventually came out. When my shortness of breath showed up a couple days later, I thought maybe they were linked? Went to an EarNose&amp;Throat doctor who told me I have acid reflux. Went on meds but no relief. Had a barium swallow study to make sure my esophagus wasn’t injured, everything turned out normal. So I contacted my GP hoping he could tell me if maybe my asthma is coming back or if this is allergies or? He didn’t want me to come into the office so we did telehealth, but there’s no way to listen to my lungs virtually. He put me on a steroid bc whether it’s asthma, esophageal irritation, or allergies - it should provide relief for each of those possibilities. I have 2 days left and I’m not feeling that much better. MAYBE some relief but I can’t tell. I also have a history of breathing problems like this where I keep going to the doctor and they find nothing wrong with me, chalking it up to “just anxiety”. So I’m not sure if I can trust myself and what I’m feeling. Does anyone else experience nearly constant shortness of breath, throat/chest tightness with anxiety?? It’s always hard to believe it’s anxiety bc I wasn’t anxious until my breathing went out of wack like this! I’m in therapy and I have been diagnosed with anxiety &amp; OCD, so I’m definitely no stranger to the anxiety world. Hypochondria is also a big thing for me. Anyone else with similar experiences?? (Thank you if you’ve read this far!) [info] None [info] 1588033412
threeyearwarranty [info] People always talk about doing something you fear so that you can conquer it so why is this being viewed as a bad thing? Dyeing your hair is a concious choice.. and for some, it's a choice to be more confident.. or at least the chance to pretend to be...Also, sometimes people just want to change their appearance for *themselves* and they dont necessarily take the time to think/care about the effect it will have on how others would view them.PS. I've been diagnosed with anxiety but I actually do want to dye my hair somehing bright. (Am a straight guy) I just havent been able to yet. I've spent a lot of time thinking about the attention it will draw (which terrifies me, like you said) and honestly I still want it bcs I still think it's hella cute. I'll probably regret it afterwards bcs my self confidence will still be shit but honestly I'm kind proud of myself of actually wanting to try. I dont know what else to tell you. [info] None [info] 1556197729
ChristianityBot [info] Logged [comment](http://www.reddit.com/r/Christianity/comments/2q1s7i/struggling_with_my_anxiety_disorder/cn28fso) posted by /u/Inamullah-Mumtaz at 12/22/14 15:13:16:&gt; You have anxiety brother because you are confused inside your mind to follow Christianity... I invite you to talk to me and find your unsolved questions (q.d.c.i)... in response to submission [Struggling with my anxiety disorder](http://redd.it/2q1s7i) posted by /u/goldinkstar at 12/22/14 07:10:13:&gt; I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and have had it for near 8 years. I know that the gospel tells us to worry for nothing for God is our provider, which I whole heartedly believe in. But, sometimes I am wrought with fear and am flooded with so many "what if's" and that everything is going wrong and I wonder if I am really doing what God wants. After lots of crying I usually calm down, it's a typical panic attack for me. But I am embarrassed that as I christian, I suffer from anxiety. Of all people, wouldn't it be thought that christians would be the least likely to suffer from anxiety? And is my anxiety a product of me not trusting God enough or perhaps a product of sin?  And should I share the fact that I have anxiety with others? &gt; Thank you [info] None [info] 1419264002
Elzahex [info] Don't know if these are symptoms of this or not. I've had these "tics" where my jaw, finger tips, joints would feel weird and I have to touch them to relieve them. Or even things I'm not touching, I feel like I have to feel them or do something to get that feeling to stop. These have been present for the majority of my life and my dad has major ocd and anxiety. I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well. Not sure if these feelings are correlated with ocd or not. Just would like some of your guy's thoughts. [info] None [info] 1461098559
alex-smith321 [info] getting accepted to colleges really stressing me out sooo basically im getting my results back from schools one by one. I applied to like 16 different schools (I know, its a lot but my grades don't reflect well on me so I needed all the opportunities possible) long story short I've gotten accepted to 7/16 schools so far without being deferred or rejected. a part of me is really happy and excited because I got into the majority of my reach schools already but the other side of me is confused and it's consuming me. I find myself with 7 tabs open on my laptop all at once researching each of the school's acceptance rates, average sat scores, average GPA, etc. I feel like I don't deserve a spot at these schools bc my grades all fall in the 25th percentile and its so hard to wrap my mind around the fact that they really chose me. I should be ecstatic but my anxiety and need to know the reason behind my acceptance is consuming my happiness. how should I deal with this??I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I always overthink but it's hard to control it bc I don't realize that im doing it until someone says "wow that's crazy you overthink soooooo much". [info] None [info] 1580690639
CantsleepniaThrwAwy [info] I think I'm dying from lack of sleep I can't fucking sleep. I've gotten maybe two or three hours of it in the past three or four days. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. I'm 19, female. 110 lbs.I've always had insomnia that got bad from anxiety but never this bad. I used to work at a corporate coffee chain that needed me to be up at 4 am and some nights, I would go to bed at 7 pm and literally lay awake staring at the ceiling. Never once getting some shut eye. My sleep got better since quarantine, but now it's completely gine.I've had no caffeine at all the past week and I'm tired as fuck. I'll lay in bed all day just *trying* to just get some sleep, but I'm restless and at some points, feels like I'm shaking or twitching. I feel like I can hear every little movement in the house, and I've even tried ambience through headphones, but it gives me migraines and makes my inability to fall into REM worse. My head is poundings and it hurts so bad. I can't focus on tasks and I have no apatite. Any tiny bit of light destroys any drowsiness I had. I feel sick, nauseated, but have no fever. My body feels like it's moving through syrup and aches everywhere. I can't do simple things anymore and I get confused and brain foggy.As I type this at 2 am I feel like I can hear people talking upstairs above me, but I have no idea if I'm hearing things or not. I'm irritated and just want to fucking sleep. I think I'm displaying a bit of paranoia. I'll lay down for hours and get so anxiety ridden, I just start crying because I want to sleep so badly but can't.I don't want to go into the clinic because I believe they're overwhelmed with Covid-19 patients. I wouldn't even be able to drive to the clinic with how impaired I am. Plus it puts me and the elderly couple I live with at risk.I literally feel like I'm dying from lack of sleep. It's taken me literal hours to type this up in the best format and create a new throw away account. I don't know if it's medical (sorry for breaking subbreddit rules if it so) or mental or what. I've tried everything like; melatonin, warm showers, eating a full meal, etc, all to no avail. I can't get over the counter sleep aids with this lock down. I'm otherwise a fit and healthy young woman. O'm even good at staying realy hydrated.I don't know what to do or steps to take I just want some sleep pleaseEDIT:I have gotten 2.5 hours of sleep in the past 80 hours. I need to sleep but I *cant* [info] None [info] 1587544362
hubjub28 [info] Freaking out every single day Let me start by saying I was diagnosed with anxiety years ago. I took medication, got much better, and have been off of it for 7 years. But this past month, my anxiety has been getting worse and worse, making me think it’s not anxiety and something else is wrong. About 2 years ago, I had my heart tested with an ultrasound and one of those take home monitor things. The doc said everything looks good. That was two years ago Last month I started having bad pain in my stomach. It was so bad I went to the er. While getting my vitals, my heart rate jumped up to 160 bpm. They took me right away and I managed to get it down to 120. I told them I have anxiety and they seemed to understand. So they did a cat scan of my abdomen. They said all the blood work is good and that I have mild colitis. They let me go. The next week, the pain worsened so I went back. This time tho, I had a full fledged panic attack and almost passed out. They did and ultrasound of my abdomen and organs on the right side of me. They said it’s all pretty good and that I either have an ulcer or gastritis. The thing is, everyday, I have such a hard time breathing, my legs feel dead, tingling and numbness throughout the body.  Every time I stand up, it’s so much worse. Like all the blood is disappearing and everything starts to get blurry and tingly and I get lightheaded. I have this overwhelming thought that this is not anxiety and something is wrong with my heart and or lungs because they didn’t check those things when o went to the er. I had my heart checked two years ago, but isn’t that more than enough time for something to develop? I haven’t eaten a lot on almost two weeks. Every time I eat I feel out of breath and can’t continue. Everyday is a struggle to get out of bed, just knowing I’m gonna freak out today l, even though nothing happens! I’m so scared. I’m so alone. It feels like my chest is going numb. [info] None [info] 1557801284
thrwwy957 [info] Work/life balance Hello,I am a software developer in a local company. This is my first job in the industry and it has only been ~7 months since I started. So far at least half of my time has been spent on learning whatever technology was used in the projects I was assigned to. Currently I am putting together a demo web app using JavaScript, jQuery, Bootstrap, Node.js, etc. I started working on it just 2 weeks ago with no prior knowledge of JavaScript. My first day working on it was very frustrating because I didn't understand anything from the tutorials I read. The next day a coworker spent almost the whole day to help me get started with JavaScript and jQuery, which was a huge relief for me. Since then I learned a lot of stuff about all the technologies I mentioned earlier, but I'm still a beginner. Fortunately my coworkers have a good amount of knowledge and help me whenever I get stuck. However, I still feel frustrated. For example, this morning I got stuck at something for a while, then asked a coworker who was able to help, but I felt very angry because of my lack of knowledge.I am aware shouldn't blame myself for not knowing things, and I'm doing my best to learn as much as I can. My coworkers gave me thumbs up for being open to learning and taking initiative, which tells me I'm doing something right. But I still get very frustrated for not knowing enough. Unfortunately I can't just take a week or two to study because of deadlines. And I feel very uncomfortable jumping into something without gaining a certain amount of knowledge about it, which people at work are aware of. Sometimes they tell me not to spend too much time on trying to learn everything and just finish the task however I can (for example, when we do a proof of concept), which leads me to my dilemma.I can study outside of work hours to catch up with current technologies. That would fix my problems at work, right? But I already spend almost all my time at work ( I work until 6 pm) and when I go home I feel tired and don't want to do anything. At home I force myself to do my workouts, and by the time I'm done with exercise and dinner it's time for bed. Saturdays are mostly spent on sleeping because I have trouble sleeping during the week (it's really bad, my doctors are still trying to figure out what's wrong). Sundays are completely spent on chores like groceries, cleaning, laundry, cooking for the week, etc. I feel like I'm not doing anything anything for fun, which is why I don't want to do anything work related outside of work. For context I guess I should mention that I am diagnosed with anxiety and major depressive disorder, and until the end of last year I had been a student. I spent the last 10 years at grad school and as time passed I became more and more burnt out. A month after I started my current job I got hospitalized because I was overwhelmed with everything and I was highly suicidal. It took a small army of medical staff and months of self care to recover a bit from a lifetime of troubles. I don't want to relapse, and I don't want to pause life to get work done like I did in school. So, I don't know if this makes sense, but I don't want to spend the limited time I have outside of work on more work stuff. I want to have a life, have a couple of friends, have some hobbies... But that means I will keep getting frustrated at work. I really don't know what to do other than to accept the situation, which I think is the logical thing to do. However I'm not doing that, am I?I don't know what I'm really asking. I guess, how do you balance life and work? Or how do you have a fulfilling life? Or some advice?.. [info] None [info] 1507312149
coffeeandpaper [info] Oh, I am certainly not downplaying their role as a legitimate medicine for those in need. I actually keep some on me in case I get serious panic attacks; I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was a young teenager. It's the reliance, as you mentioned, that I am staying away from. Particularly a daily basis. Perhaps it's because I haven't done a lot of them at once, but I don't get any feelings of euphoria or "not giving a shit," like booze does. Really, if I take them during an anxious episode, I feel "normal," whatever that means. Kratom, meditation, better exercise and healthier eating has allowed me to avoid taking benzos all these years. [info] None [info] 1484454061
floormopthews [info] I'm turning 16 next month and I am not looking forward to it (You can skip this post its just going to be me ranting)I know that as soon as I turn 16 I'm going to be expected to be more responsible and to get a job. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and agoraphobia and am terrified of getting a job. My parents know this, but that doesn't stop my grandparents and other family members constantly asking when I'm getting a job.  My grandparents constantly tut at me because I'm "wasting my potential". Because I'm the most "academic" and "the smartest" of my cousins, they see me as a disappointment. They also constantly ask me when I'm going to get a boyfriend. I don't know if you've looked at me Liz but I'm not exactly desirable. It's fucking draining constantly being told to get a boyfriend, I'm trying goddammit. I'm trying my best. I'm trying to live the best I can with this stuff that I can't control. Medication can only do so much and you constantly pulling me down isn't helping. [info] 16 [info] 1560082952
LegendaryConfusion [info] should I find a way to ask for anxiety medication? I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder last year but it was never much of a problem but started getting so intense last month. It's constant. I try every day to do anything to make it easier to leave the house, i shower and dress nice and charge my phone and get my purse ready and know all the shortcuts to avoid people. But it never works. I try so hard but it's just not working. I've been trying the "just force yourself" thing but nothing and it's getting to a point where it's so bad I can only eat around twice a week. I never have enough energy to study or work. If I can find a psychiatrist, is this enough to be able to ask for medication? Will the psych think im overreacting and tell me to try harder? Has anxiety medication worked at all for you? How about if you have substance problems and dont wanna give up your weed and alcohol? [info] None [info] 1438715283
unityway [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety. tbh it’s probably nothing lol it’s just kinda weird because it never used to happen until now  [info] None [info] 1534554704
IAmASpy [info] Confirmed, before I was diagnosed with anxiety issues I'd use cigs every time I got really anxious. I started smoking a lot when I first started and whenever I got upset I'd at the very least stick my hand in my pocket and touch the filter of a cigarette. [info] None [info] 1302129114
jimmyscorncracked [info] I can't speak to exactly what you are going through since I can't handle Keto (brain fog, worst headaches) but I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder and panic attacks. They have been under control for years but when I started intermittent fasting 16:8 they started to come back, especially after I break my fast. I had read and heard that adrenaline (epinephrine) is produced in much higher amounts when you are in a fasted state. Dr Jason Fung explains the logic behind this pretty well. Basically if you have no food, your body gives you the adrenaline to go out and hunt for food or to go out and gather it. Adrenal spikes in today's sedentary society manifest themselves as panic attacks. That could be what is happening to you.Ultimately though, listen to your doctor.  [info] None [info] 1493490268
EgaoNoGenki-III [info] What jobs have the least stress, and may even RELIEVE stress in the line of work? I've been diagnosed with anxiety issues, so you know any job in the military isn't the answer.If you can help me find any of the *least* stressful jobs out there, and whose jobs could even *relieve* stress, I'll get you Reddit Gold through the pay I earn in that job if I get in it.I wish I was blessed in the gene pool with a better stress tolerance. [info] None [info] 1388727526
Top-light [info] A week long anxiety attack - help? Ok, so, I am diagnosed with anxiety, I attend therapy. I know how to deal with panic attacks, but I haven't discussed anxiety attacks yet. Last week a new semester at my university started, I had a pretty upsetting situation in my family, and I guess my brain had enough. Since then I can't sleep, my heart is racing, I am anxious all the time and of course tired - needles to say, I am already exhausted and I don't know how I can help myself. Any ideas? [info] None [info] 1583674906
Thelostbky16 [info] Advice: Working in Public with anxiety Right now I am in my final year as an accounting student.  Throughout my time, here my accounting professors have been placing a lot of pressure on me to go to work at any of the Big 4 in NYC. They mention that if I do not work at any of the Big 4 Accounting firms than my career is meaningless.  They do not know that I struggle with anxiety since I like to keep my health related matters private.  So I was curious if any of the Big 4 are good organizations to work for if I am diagnosed with anxiety? [info] None [info] 1571839885
meowmeowfig [info] First anxiety attack in over a year... Hi everyone, I’ve never made a post here but I’ve been suffering with anxiety for seven years now. I didn’t start getting full-on anxiety attacks till I think my third year at secondary school, but before then it would always be stomach pain so severe I couldn’t walk, and I’ve always been an incredibly socially inept child...my parents have always done everything for me. Anyways, today I had an anxiety attack, in front of my whole family, at dinner. For the past few days now I’ve been feeling extremely nauseated, with headaches and a fast heart rate. I assumed this was withdrawal from a drug called accutane I completed two weeks back. It may have been anxiety this whole time. When my anxiety was most severe, I would sleep on a pounding heart and wake up hours later to be drenched in sweat, uncontrollably shaking and then vomiting. I’d feel this exact way for days after, at most was eight days and I was crawling on the floor because the nausea was so strong. A year later I was diagnosed with anxiety and prescribed beta blockers. These seemed to work and the presence of them just being there stopped anxiety attacks overall. I’m just afraid this corona lockdown is going to set me back to how I used to be. I’ve been pretty much anxiety-free for a long time now, but this event has led me to overthinking everything and panicking. Being unable to see my boyfriend, who really is a key factor in keeping my anxiety down, it’s impacting me a lot. I’m also facing a condition called Vaginismus which very well likely is a product of my anxiety disorder. I put myself under a lot of pressure to be perfect all the time, so it makes sense. Dealing with this has bought up the memories and overthinking that I usually push aside to not trigger a attack. I guess I want some form of reassurance and advice, I really just wanted to vent. Thank you for listening :) [info] None [info] 1588272668
TaRo_PuNch [info] Hi there! This is my first post on reddit. :)The fact you posted here is telling me that you haven't given up hope yet even though you feel hopeless at this moment. You're still trying to reach out for help. I'm glad you did. And I want you to know that you're not alone in feeling the way you feel. You said "I pray I don't wake up tomorrow morning." I used to feel that way too almost everyday for months (I stayed in bed most of the time during that time). I felt lost and didnt know what to do with my future. I got better after getting into the university that I really liked. It sounds like you feel accomplished when u landed a job before u graudated and came out at the top of your class. I think you were happy sometime during that period. It can't be all bad. No emotion or feeling are permanent. They come and go (but our brain is wired to hold on to the negatives longer than the positives). Although I was stressed out and frustrated a lot during my college years, I'm grateful for the people that I have met and the things that I got to experience. After I left Uni the thought of not waking up is coming back to me. Because I also feel like I got no social life, no friends that I feel completely comfortable with being myself 100%. I felt alone. My parents don't understand neither. They got problems of their own. As for sex, it will come eventually when u meet the right person. I assume u don't want sex with just anybody right? As for trying new things. It's ok to feel too tired to try new stuff right now. You can always try new stuff later when you feel like it. They are not going anywhere. :)I've been struggling with this life of mine since age 11. Now I'm 25. I was diagnosed with anxiety at age 17 and mild deprsession at 22. I'm currently also struggling to adjust and build my life after college. So, you're not alone.A question that my college counselor asked me almost every therapy session was "what do you appreciate about yourself today?" It always helped me feel better about myself. So I want to ask you this, too. What do you appreciate about yourself so far?Holy cow! I literally wrote a five paragraph "essay." Thanks for reading my long post. :) [info] None [info] 1454644240
MuddyGirl1023 [info] Time management tips? I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year ago. Honestly it came as a surprise to me but has explained so much. I keep finding new things that I thought were normal that I now know are a result of my anxiety. For example, I was always on awe of people who just knew how long it should take to finish a task. I have never known, things that should take 5 mintues take an hour. Some things that I think should take an hour I complete in 15 minutes. Any tips for time management around anxiety? [info] None [info] 1568636515
iwantostayanon [info] I need some advice. I have an asshole friend who used to be nice to me, but I can never muster up the courage to say "hey man, I don't wanna be friends with you". I have been diagnosed with anxiety (i do take therapy) and I have a really hard time confronting people. Every time I try confronting him I always sympathize to much for him, or reminisce on the good memories. I have him in almost all of my classes at school. We don't talk anymore, and he's been kind of acting like a creep. If anyone can suggest a less confront-y way of ending my friendship with him, or advice for severing my sympathy for him, I would appreciate it a lot. This has been on my back for nearly 9 months now, and I think I might snap if I keep worrying about it. I've made progress on severing contact with him, and sometimes my mind is all like "nah, you're fine" and other times I'm having a complete breakdown. Am I worrying over nothing? And if not, tips for ending my friendship/ceasing contact or talking with him. For a few ideas I've had, I've thought of telling him online, which I am usually more comfortable with as I am much better socializing online than in real life. Sorry for the long post, but if you have the time to read all the way through this and help me out, you've saved my mental state. [info] None [info] 1544138563
DoneDIL [info] Advice Please - Breaking News to MIL... LTL, FTP, first time reddit post ever too!First, I would like to say that I love this forum so much.  In addition to showing me that I am not alone it more importantly gave me some tools to use and taught me that as a grown adult I have the right to put in place some boundaries.  It also helped DH see that he isn’t alone too.  We also finally found the term for the face she makes 90% of the time so that has been great too!While I am not yet ready to 100% share the lovely stories of my MIL, I do desperately need some advice as to what to do for my current situation.  For some slight background my DH is not full SG but certainty not the GC.  MIL is bored with no hobbies and basically no friends and lives her life 100% through her baaaabies.  She is of course very opinionated and always right.  Since her divorce she also refuses to compromise on anything and since you have to compromise sometimes in relationships wont date again.  DH and I have been together for a decade, married for the last 5 years.  For the past 8 years we have been living next door to my DH’s entire family in a place owned by MIL.  Silly silly us thinking that this would be wonderful and helpful and the whole family can be together and help each other out.  We moved in when we were very young and out of college.  I moved to a foreign country for DH so having a family support system was very helpful.  I also made minimum wage in a very expensive city so the free rent was nice especially since DH was still a student.  Eight years later of course I now know that nothing is free.  I did not pay in money but over time I have paid in stress to the point now that over the past year it has been impacting my health and happiness.  Last year some incidents happened that a year later I have still not fully processed.  I cannot afford therapy right now though I know it could help.  In college I was diagnosed with anxiety.  I treated it for about a year and a half and then it mostly went away for almost a decade.  Well it has certainly come back.  The stress I was put under last year also gave me high blood pressure, among other health issues.On the plus side, her absurd cold unprovoked actions to me opened DHs eyes to the fact that we needed to GTFO ASAP.  I never wanted to be the one to force a move and wanted to be 100% sure that DH was ready and motivated so I never pushed and suffered for years in silence.   We also lived for the past 8 years with ZERO spines.  Except for very few exceptions we never spoke up for our boundaries, or defended ourselves against rude comments and behaviors.  At the advice of the forum I started a notebook to write up all the bullshit she pulls and there are many many pages filled in by now.  So anyway, back to the situation for which I could use some advice for.  DH and I decided last year that it was time to move.  Yaaay he wanted to move away from mommy, FINALY!  We hesitated between renting and moving.  At one point we even discussed renting just a studio for me so I wouldn’t have to deal with her on a daily basis anymore but I figured what was a couple of more months after 8 years.  We also wanted to buy so we decided not to spend on rent and save up as much as possible for our down payment so that not a penny of family money went into the purchase so there would be no strings attached.  It all worked out and so we bought a house in June, in secret.  No one on DHs side knows but I made the stupid mistake of telling my parents.My parents as supportive adults were very excited for us.  However now I have a slight issue.  My father has some Narc tendencies.  He also **loves** my MIL.  When she was spewing her hate speech to me last year he would even defend her while anyone else with a brain noticed she had some mental illness at best and at worst was just a nasty bitch.  So our house has been renovated for the past couple of months and we are slowly approaching the completion date.  As we get closer and closer to the date my dad keeps on telling me that he should come for a visit so that we can announce our wonderful surprise to the both of them together.  He is so scared of my MILs reaction and thinks she will be so hurt.  DH and I aren’t sure this would help the situation at all since we also want to use this announcement as a moment to show that we are an independent adult couple doing what we want with our money.   So we are torn as to what to do.  If she does feel hurt I also feel like it’s only because of her own bullshit that her kid decided to buy a home without telling her.  We felt that if she was involved we would, as always, have to do what she wanted and she would pick everything.  We don’t regret doing it on our own, while stressful at times the long and at times complicated process of buying a house together has really strengthened our relationship and I finally feel like the priority in DHs life.   We are also SUPER excited at the idea of living alone further from the family.  Granted we will be only 30 minutes away but after being 3 seconds away for years its already major progress.Any advice also as to how to break the news would be helpful.  We’re planning on telling MIL about our move about a month before we do so because in the country we are in that is the proper notice period.  Of course because of this forum I will first make sure to move over any essential belongings and documents in case MIL decides to act out.  However since DH has grown a spine and more distant from her since the past year, she’s been behaving better because I think she senses she’s losing him so I am hopeful things will go better than worse.   Thanks in advance and I promise once we are out to share the lovely stories I have amassed ! [info] None [info] 1509294120
Freshman50000 [info] I told my boyfriend Last night I finally told my boyfriend that I’m almost positive that I have OCD. I was diagnosed with anxiety and Tourette’s, but I’ve suspected for a while that I really have OCD. After research, reading (the book “because we are bad” by Lily Bailey is amazing) and combing through this subreddit, I’m sure, and looking at next steps. So last night, I finally told him. I told him that when I said I’m anxious, that’s not even the half of it. I tried to explain intrusive thoughts, which is hard because I wanted to get across to him how seriously they affect me, but I didn’t want to scare him- and I didn’t want to make them seem like normal intrusive thoughts that people without OCD have. I talked about how I worry all day that the gate is open and my dog is gone, or that when I don’t finish a conversation with “I love you” I see my parents getting hit by a car, and that I’m nauseous constantly worrying about this stuff and it never goes away. I was so scared, but when I explained it all...he hugged me 😊 He was so surprised, he kept saying “holy shit, no wonder you’re always so tired,” and hugging me and reassuring me that he understood and that he’s glad he finally gets it. We were a bit stoned so I really hope he remembers all of this today because it was an insanely good moment in a time where I haven’t had many 😊 [info] None [info] 1558207032
boosegoose [info] For me autism is normality so it's hard to explain it. I have aspergers and I wasn't diagnosed until I was 29 so I am considered "high functioning".Basically I was diagnosed with anxiety and a high intelligence from a young age so people used to kind of put a "sensitive genius" label on me rather than autism because I was a girl and girls tend to get diagnosed later than boys if at all.What was interpreted as anxiety, which is generally a comorbidity with autism, was my trains of thought moving too quickly combined with my sensory issues. I have multiple trains of thought running at all times. They run fast like bullet trains and when I can get them all running in the right directions I will have a really amazing and productive day. Usually a couple will fuck up and go all over the place though and this is an average day. I'm either trying to ignore it or manage it. Both take energy. So with these trains of thought, I might be doing really well with them and then suddenly someone comes into the room wearing perfume, or maybe I'll walk into a room with a horrible colourful patterned carpet. Whatever it might be, it is so strong to me because of my sensory issues that I can't process anything else and it basically derails all the trains. When the trains derail I have what is known as a meltdown.For me my mind sort of shuts off and I lose my ability to speak. I become non verbal and need to shut myself away in a controlled environment to reset my mind. I also don't like people to see me like this as I tend to rock back and forth and tap my head with my hand, and tap my feet rapidly. I look odd to someone who doesn't understand. I used to run to the bathroom to engage in this behaviour at school. Probably another reason didn't pick up on me having autism until much later. I've always taken things too literally. Jokes have often gone over my head because I miss things. I need more time to process what people say because I take language very literally and take things at face value. You can't be passive aggressive with me. It won't work, I will not pick it up. If you tell me you are fine and you aren't too bad. Also as I take my context from your choice of words rather than tone because tone is harder for me to read I need you to choose them carefully. This also makes vagueness harder for me to stomach because I rely so much of the specifity of your words. For instance "Soon" is too ambiguous a word. Give me specifics. Ambiguity gives me intense anxiety. If things are ambiguous I can't put them in a list or schedule in my mind. Everything for me needs to be timed and categorised. I couldn't stop it if I wanted to. It just happens automatically.For instance when I meet someone new my mind pulls out a checklist from a file cabinet in my mind and tells me what I need to do. Smile. Make eye contact. Say hi and introduce yourself. Offer your hand to shake. It's not a choice I made to make a list and see a file cabinet, it's just always been that way. Relationships are difficult because of my tendency to take people at face value and struggle to read between the lines. People can also struggle with my frankness, and how chatty I can be if you get me on to a topic I consider a special interest. I don't always realise I'm not letting anyone else get a word in because my brain is moving so fast I feel like I've only said a tiny amount even though I've been rambling on and on. I also tend to be very black and white. There's a strong sense of right and wrong because I dislike ambiguity. I try very hard to process grey areas but they just sit so badly with me. I tend to cut people out of my life who disagree with me if they keep talking about it because it causes me physical distress to think about it. I have a checklist for peacefully resolving things like political disagreements now though where I take a deep breath, say we shouldn't discuss this subject any more, agree to disagree and either shake hands or hug it out depending on my bond with the person. I also find neurotypical people want a lot more from me than I am at times capable of giving. Like in a romantic relationship they can move very quickly and feel things in the early stages and want a lot of my time which I find intense and off putting. I need a reasonable amount of alone time each day. If I don't have that I get really distressed and have meltdowns. I find I spend a lot of my time managing the expectations of neurotypical people and it's very tiring. I also think there's a misconception that people with ASD don't have as much empathy or care as much but for me I feel like it's the opposite. Like externally I appear shut down or I might now show emotion but internally it's like a raging sea. When my cousin died I was a wreck inside but maybe externally people might think I didn't care much because I seem so stoic and unmoved. The reason I shut down is because I feel so much I can't process anything else. I guess in summary for me I guess the world just feels faster, louder, brighter, and smellier than it does to most people. It's more confusing because things for me are more black and white and I can't always tell if people are saying what they mean or how they really feel. I often feel like the world would be simpler if more people just said what they wanted instead of expecting people to guess.  [info] None [info] 1485437989
pink_mango [info] Before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I used to go to the dr quite often for issues. Back aches, stomach aches, random pains. I would get stomach pains every single night before sleep. Aside from an actual back issue I had, everything else came back normal. And typically as soon as I went to get it checked out, I would feel better. This sure made me feel sane...Then I had an anxiety attack due to a very stressful job (quit shortly after), and went to my dr. He gave me this form to fill out to evaluate my anxiety, and looked at it after like "you've been dealing with this and didn't tell me?". Well I didn't know what it was, it just slowly got worse and worse over time and it felt normal to me. I went on medication, and within a few weeks I was feeling SO MUCH better, both mentally and physically. No more random pains, no more stomach pains, sleeping was so much easier.  [info] None [info] 1495812202
keshi [info] Sounds similar to me, I had bad reflux for months then it went away and soon after I developed chest pains. After several visits to A&amp;E worrying about a heart attack (so many blood tests, x-rays, ECGs, etc.) I was diagnosed with anxiety and given pills.I wasn't doubting my anxiety, but felt that it was the chest pains causing it, not the other way around!Unhappy with the diagnosis I went back to see another GP. She pressed into each of my ribs and sternum and holy shit did it hurt on the top rips (but not at all on some of the others). She offered a working hypothesis of Costochondritis and it seemed to fit my condition.I felt much better after that visit and my anxiety went way down as I could tell myself it was just some rib pain. After having it for about 8 months I have more or less gotten used to it.I too feel it worst when I am hungry/tired/dehydrated. Night times are the worse, I generally use some anti-inflammatory gel on my chest if it's a rough night.I went back to see my GP this morning as a check up and she has referred me to a reoccurring muscular condition clinic for a second opinion and to give me some advice on stretches/how to deal with it etc.I too have wondered if the reflux is related to the Costochondritis and I really should clean up my diet via food elimination to check to dietary inflammatory responses.Good luck! [info] None [info] 1549882407
throwaway33242 [info] Anxiety Attack I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was like 10 but I dont think i've ever had an anxiety attack or at least didnt realise I had one or remember but today I was talking to my crush and she sent me a "&lt;3" and I had an anxiety attack, I don't know why it was just a fucking &lt;3 that triggered it because she's told me she loves me and stuff before. [info] None [info] 1506657889
poppycola [info] Hallucinations and delusions or just over active imagination??? I was diagnosed with anxiety induced psychosis and my doctor said that the only reason i wasnt diagnosed with schizophrenia was because of my age and that i just have an over active imagination??? does that sound right?? im too scared to ask my parents to get a second option. help?? i cant tell the difference between my "imagination" and the real world. its really scaryyyy [info] None [info] 1564565861
epicfu [info] Can someone help me identify this? I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder years ago when I kept panicking like I’m on the verge of death. Quite recently though, it was not the feeling of dying, but a general nervousness and scared and a feeling of something’s wrong and it’ll last for 2 hours. I have not identified any triggers that could’ve caused this though as nothing came into my mind. I hope I’m not alone. [info] None [info] 1512661615
holmesrjk [info] What modifications should I make with Armodafinil? I have been using armodafinil 150mg only on the days where I need some extra boost. Perhaps mostly 3 - 4 times  a month. However I have found that now I feel more sleepy or lack of concentration on armodafinil. Here's a little history I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder my signs and symptoms are as follows : 1.) Cold extremities 2.) Leg movements while asleep.3.) Daytime sleepiness ( it reduces down by evening and I gain my full cognition after an intense workout) 4.) Palpitations 5.) I'm unable to complete studying for an upcoming exam and I happen to procrastinate a lot ( feeling lack of motivation and sleepy even on doing things I enjoy) 6.)Extreme stiffness in my body particularly my back. Medications I am on currently : Flouxetine drops 0.6ml and Atomoxetine 18mg per day since 2 months. Magnesium glycinate 450 mg, Vitamin D3 sachets every week 6000IU. B12 is in normal range. Omega 3's 1250mg EPA. Ahswagandha 250mg and L theanine 200 mg a day. I drink 2 cups of coffee and I do'nt smoke or drink. My diet is extremely clean,however not OCD over food do indulge with some cheat meals here and there. However I feel lacking confidence studying for my exam and clueless and feel very stagnant. Question : What modifications should I be doing? Lowering and adding daily dosages of armodafinil ? Lifestyle particular changes? Dietary inclusion ? Please Help&amp;#x200B; [info] None [info] 1543902533
Ralpharen [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder about 3 years ago, I used to have some pretty bad symptom both physical and psychological, both terapy and meds helped me a lot. However it is not a simple process you will get frustated, it will seem like you are going nowhere, the meds side effects are a bitch at the start, but with a little patience things will start to stabilize. The thing is we usually will fall into the same hole multiple times before we can start walking through another street. Seeing a psychiatrist and/or doing therapy is something hard to admit, people don't get how hard it is, therapy is very usefull but you must want to go, or else it does nothing. In the end it's a slow process you have to take very little steps to overcome the problems, but if you are willing to, things start to change. [info] None [info] 1407937446
darkcooger [info] I have anxiety which manifests as stomach and intestinal pain, and it's just like you describe: I get anxious, my stomach goes wonky, I get more anxious because of my stomach, my stomach gets wonkier, and so on. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety and starting learning how to deal with it, I was certain I was physically sick and couldn't eat due to nausea, even to the point of losing about 50 pounds.It's amazing how our brains work. Keep that stress managed! [info] None [info] 1414496733
kittychanboo [info] Best I can do is tell you that you aren't alone. I went to get checked for ADD when I was diagnosed with anxiety. Unfortunately I haven't overcome the distraction issues. [info] None [info] 1441367311
thatlittleging [info] That's what I try and do. I was diagnosed with anxiety but the medicine makes me feel wrong so I don't take it. It's to the point where almost everyone around me reminds me that I'm doing it [info]  [info] 1564592386
crys279 [info] I get where you're coming from.  I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and for a while, I thought my Dr was wrong.  I refused to accept it because, like you, I felt like everyone was using it as a fashionable drama outlet.  It wasn't until the third time I tried to take myself of the medication the Dr prescribed and the heart palpitations returned yet again that it sank in that I really did have a problem, and it wasn't made up.  Then suddenly after hearing about my diagnosis and the resulting medications, several people close to me 'developed' the same issues.  ~sigh~ [info] None [info] 1470346918
squid_deity [info] Questioning if I'm on the Spectrum? I've been wondering if I might be on the spectrum for a few years now. I was diagnosed with anxiety/social anxiety when I was younger and prescribed medication. It helps me to not feel as anxious during social interaction and dealing with daily life but I feel the issue is closer to asd/aspergers than anxiety alone. I have always been sensitive to certain sensory things and social interactions are a mystery. When I was diagnosed, the doctor even said my symptoms "seemed sort of like aspergers". Should I try to go back for a asd diagnosis? If I did, are there any tips for an older (19yrs old) person looking into an asd diagnosis? [info] None [info] 1570837563
NotEzrasWife [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety for years now, over ten. Today, I was diagnosed with agoraphobia and social phobias as well. For me, today was a bad day. It felt like I couldn't control anything. I felt lost, overwhelmed, miserable, ashamed that I am who I am and angry that I've ruined everything I. My life to end up at this point. I had 3 appts I HAD to go to. There was no avoiding them anymore. I've avoided them to the point of a full-day severe panic attack. I've avoided them to the point where I had payments cut completely for not attending (I'm on a single parent pension - Australia) and I've avoided phone calls to the point where I almost racked up a $4000 debt. Physically, it feels like my head is going to explode, like I can't breathe, my entire body aches (I found out today my chronic pain is caused by my anxiety). I feel strong, tight, cold-burning sensations in my chest and upper back. My heart races, and I feel extremely hot and sweaty. I shake uncontrollably and cry hysterically while hyperventilating, or go completely numb while also being hyperactive - sometimes both. I become hyper-aware of my surroundings. If somebody 10 seats over from me moves their head, I know. If someone crosses their legs, I know. If someone sighs, maybe I've somehow annoyed them. I swap between extreme paranoia and embarrassment of myself, to anger thinking people should be more aware and understanding of anxiety. I'm not crazy, I have a mental illness. I feel like I'm letting everyone in my life down, I can't understand why anyone likes me. Maybe they're just pretending. Maybe they just feel sorry for me. I can't be fun, or funny, or smart. I feel like I'm letting myself down. If only I tried harder, was a better student, sister, friend and mother. If only I was smarter. Studied harder. Stuck to my decisions. Stood up for myself more. For me, crowded places send me in to overdrive. Anywhere that isn't home, or somewhere EXTREMELY familiar and comfortable, is hell. My family is home, and I can deal with these places with them around most of the time, but even then it's not easy. I hate appointments. I hate phone calls. I hate people knocking on the door. Sometimes I even hate seeing my neighbours, who I'm extremely close with. Paying for things is excruciating. Maybe there won't be money on my card. Maybe the item is more expensive than it's marked and I don't have enough for it. Maybe my cash was robbed from my purse and I don't know yet? Thankfully, today, I made my appointments. I had my anti-anxiety meds increased and got a medical certificate so I can take some time to settle, be still and recover. Today was probably the hardest day of my life.  [info] None [info] 1481200132
ebwinning [info] Hey, great follow up question. My onset was 2 small plaques on my torso and it has grown from there slowly at first up to now where I would say about 30% of my body is affected. Drinking age is 18 in new Zealand but we all drank from 16+ (not uncommon for NZ and Australia). My psoriasis has increased drastically in the last4-5 years but also I have been diagnosed with anxiety during this time too which could also be a triggering factor to the drastic increase. The only way I have found that keeps my skin from breaking, cracking, and bleeding is not drinking. But hey it may not work for everyone but it’s got me to a point I can live with it, and that all I can really ask for. [info] None [info] 1537173800
emheybug [info] Obsessive thoughts/ I've been diagnosed with anxiety pretty much my whole life. Back in February I had 3 days of the worst panic attacks of my life and then I started obsessively thinking that I was being spiritually attacked by the devil for about 12 days. I literally was getting sick, throwing up, not eating, etc. I had relief for about a month and then it started up again. It has gotten to the point where I was having intrusive thoughts about killing myself and feeling as if I am fighting my brain. I'm not sure if this is OCD or not. I see a doctor and she said it's possible, but there's no real clarification from her. (just my primary care doctor)She put me on Zoloft and I've been taking it for about a month. I upped to 50mg around 2 weeks ago. I see some improvement with my thoughts (no longer thinking about harming myself) but I'm still obsessing over the devil + God. Anyone here take Zoloft and does it help with your unwanted thoughts? [info] None [info] 1555697180
indistars [info] Thank you so much for this. I’m definitely going to try joining a club maybe. I did try therapy (I was diagnosed with anxiety) and I got super comfortable with my therapist but she moved away and I haven’t been able to find one that I can just start over with. I am going to be moving away to a whole new country but I’m worried I’ll be too anxious the whole time.  [info] None [info] 1551713388
BunnySpice113333 [info] Struggling with my mental health during quarantine I feel like I'm loosing control. I was barely keeping it together before all this covid19 stuff but now I have lost all hope for my mental sanity. Even my suicidal thoughts have gotten worse. Soemtimes all i think about is how to die and what's the best way to go. Its gotten so bad that I even have dreams about jumping in front of a speeding bus or car. I also keep having outbursts of anger randomly throughout the day that are putting a strain on my relationships. Some days I have weird fantasies about beating up people and even animals with a baseball bat. It feels like everything triggers me, either the lights are too bright or too dim or the water is too warm or too cold. Things that were normal before are now triggering me into outbursts.  I talked to a psychologist who told me that everything I'm feeling is normal and that half of the world is experiencing what I'm experiencing so I don't have to worry and just find a hobby to do to get my mind off whatever triggers me. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and that's about it. Is this a form of anxiety? How do I control it? Is anyone feeling the same? [info] None [info] 1587928504
k10morgan [info] When I told my parents that I was diagnosed with anxiety, they said "oh, that's not anxiety, you're just an introvert. We feel those things too!"Since they both have degrees in psychology, I think it's just that they've been taught to keep their potential anxiety hidden too and to not acknowledge it. [info] None [info] 1483984303
xLordValx [info] My anxiety is interfering with my sleep. I take medication for anxiety and it ignores everything. Help? So here’s my main problem, I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and take medications that I’m balancing out right now. Any time I attempt to sleep from the times of 9 AM to 8PM I’m jolted awake with a panic attack. Usually I can take my anxiety meds and just chill, but it ignores them completely during the day. I’m not anxious lately at all and haven’t no reason to be. This entire nocturnal anxiety started after my cat died in 2016 and I have had time to grieve and accept, so I don’t understand why this happens. I’m absolutely frightened to sleep and can’t nap at all if I haven’t slept due to being terrorized by these jolts of anxiety. [info] None [info] 1565801055
MrsNacho8000 [info] Do you guys think there's something wrong? Hi internet parents,I lost my mom last year and I've been having a really rough time lately. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and sometimes I see a therapist, but I'm starting to wonder if maybe something else is wrong.It's a struggle for me to get up in the morning. My alarm will wake me up but I just lay in bed and have no motivation...I wait til the very last second to get up for work, and I do that reluctantly. Every day I consider calling out of work and don't care about getting in trouble.I'm a big girl and I've recently lost 60 lbs, only to put it all back on. I hate myself for it.I used to love going out and doing things, anything really. Now I cancel plans to sit at home in my pajamas.I'm turning 32 next month so I'm not sure if I'm depressed or just getting older. Can any internet parents weigh in here? [info] None [info] 1583750246
rahbunny [info] You are describing my disposition before I was diagnosed with anxiety, that may not be the case for you, but I would highly recommend talking to your GP about how you feel. [info] None [info] 1442230961
jennyfromthebloccc [info] Things are falling into place for me for the first time in a while and I am so happy about it that I feel the need to share (lol) This is my first post on this sub - you are all so amazing!So here’s the deal, I’m a junior at an incredible university majoring in Human Resource Management - only problem is that I hate human resource management lol. Going into uni, I had no clue what I wanted to major in and HR seemed convincing and the fact that I am a people person made it seem like a decent fit. Over the last 2 years I have had 3 INCREDIBLE internships at very well known and large scale companies but I was absolutely miserable at all of them. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was only 11 years old and after starting college, it got severe and led me down a very dark and depressing path. I cut myself off from my friends, family, peers, and just about anything fun. It was bad. I figured, let me just get my degree and figure it out maybe it’ll grow on me. Fast forward to this past summer and I got a very random opportunity through a family friend to intern at a Superior Court in a judges chambers. From the first day of this internship, I absolutely loved it and truly believe that I have found what I was meant to do. I always had an interest in law and the legal system but never knew where to get started. Now, my internship has been extended to the fall semester and the judge PERSONALLY said that he sees incredible potential in me as an attorney which means a lot coming from him (he’s a pretty big deal). Fast forward again to this afternoon where I used the money I made from this summer to buy very expensive but necessary books to start studying for the LSAT and have already begun research on law schools that are likely within my reach.  I have never been this happy and PROUD of myself. For some, this may seem silly of me and you may be thinking “well yeah - a lot of people find something they love and want to pursue”. I never thought this would happen for me. I was prepared to sit in an office for the rest of my life and become a robot. I am so excited for myself and this journey I am beginning. Much love! [info] None [info] 1568689323
i386755 [info] Persistent Cough, Many Dr. Visits and Not Confident in His Competence Hey all, Never posted here before, but I could use a little either validation or advice on an issue I've been having. Around 8 months ago I got a cold and developed a cough. That cough didn't get better once the cold went away, and ever since, it's been a constant annoyance. It varies from a slight feeling of needing to clear my throat (usually some flem comes up) to a sort of deep chest discomfort that makes me cough really deeply. The doctor had told me it was a simple post viral cough and to just be patient and it'll go away. I asked how long and they said to come back in a month or 2 if it's still there. This is a university doctor who didn't seem to think too much about it. So a month and a half or so go by and I'm no better (no other symptoms except an annoying cough). I go back in and he starts telling me I have asthma and/or allergies and I should start this anti inflammatory inhaler (flovent I believe). I tell him that about 8 months earlier I had a full panel of allergy rests (blood tests) and came back negative for every allergy they tested. I also passed all the asthma tests they gave (I was going to them to diagnose a weird skin allergy I have where if I don't take fairly regular antihistamines I get hives when touched - that's a whole different story, but that doctor had never heard of dermatographic urticaria, or whatever it's called, which I believed it was and wanted to rule out environmental allergens). So I wasn't convinced by this diagnosis, but as the steroid inhaler should've simply reduced inflammation, I gave it a shot. One month later, no change, I start a nasal spray with the same medicine and do a course of antibiotics, one month no change, I get a chest x-ray, nothing significant shows up, I'm told to continue the steroids all summer and wait to see if it goes away. Summer ends, I'm no better but I get busy and it's not so bad that I can't stand it. Eventually I get some time and go back in. At this point I've gotten sick of feeling like I'm getting the run around. I've been coughing for months and I wanted to know why. I also have occasional stomach problems so I pitch the idea of acid reflux. They're reluctant because I don't have acid reflux, but I explain that there's a form that usually just presents with a cough. They give me the same lines as before, but they agree to put me on renitidine and finally decide to test me for microplasma pneumonia. IGG very high, IGM above threshold to be positive. I immediately start another round of antibiotics (zithromycin). I discontinue the pepcid because antibiotics upset my stomach and the packing warned against taking them together (doctor agreed). A few days after I finish the antibiotics I go back in as instructed with no change in cough. They tell me to start back on the steroids and pepcid and come back in 2 weeks to get IGH retested (which, according to my googling, is not a reliable way to know if I've cleared the infection). Did that today, but I'm honestly feeling worse than ever. Doctor thought I might have cough a cold that's going around campus on top of what I had before. Because at this point my confidence in this doctor is low, I asked for a referral to an ENT, but I'm getting really disheartened. I've been coughing for half of my graduate career now with no significant change. I'm so tired of it. Some other details that might help. I don't smoke and haven't ever been a smoker. My girlfriend who I've lived with for a few years has never gotten sick with these symptoms to my knowledge. I don't have any other diseases that I know of which might compromise my immune system. I'm 27 and go running fairly regularly despite the cough. The cough has always been productive (flem and stuff), and the only thing that's helped it is cough suppressants (nyquil, benzoatitate or however it's spelled). I have been diagnosed with anxiety and have considered the idea that some element of the cough is psychosomatic. The cough gets worse at night and after eating, but is generally most calm in the morning right after waking up. Current leading theories are:1. Acid reflux + microplasma2. Just microplasma 3. Microplasma and now a viral coldI think that's it! My main questions are:1. Have I done the right thing so far going along with the doctor and pitching my own treatment ideas? 2. What else could be wrong with me? Thanks in advance and sorry about the huge history! [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1449107608
sazken [info] Studying / Working with Kava? Hello, r/kava:I hope this finds you all well!I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD a while back, and I have been searching for a natural way to help focus while working. I ordered a couple of strains from Kalm With Kava (amazing company, by the way!) and tried their Pouni Ono one night before sleeping. I had been using kava to sleep better for about 6 months at this point, and I was shocked that the Pouni Ono actually woke me up instead of putting me to sleep! A month or so later, I tried knocking back a shell of the Pouni Ono before a work day. I found that it helped me focus far better than anything else I had ever tried. A few shells of it throughout the day kept me awake, relaxed, and 'in the zone,' especially with a few puffs of an e-cig along the way. Has anybody else experienced anything else like this? I think heady strains of kava might be a wonderful 'nootropic' and am interested in looking more into kava as a study/work aid.I'd love to hear any of your thoughts.I also notice, however, that kava does not mix well with coffee (for me). Blending the two almost always leaves me a little sleepy. [info] None [info] 1498074117
bebahf23 [info] As someone who suffers from anxiety issues, it sounds to me like this might be your issue as well. Paranoia and over-thinking everything along with self diagnosis of random disorders is something I used to do A LOT. I went and talked to a counselor about all of this and I was diagnosed with anxiety issues. Which is very easily treatable. All of these actions just stemmed from my anxious thinking and state of mind. I took a small dose of anti anxiety meds and kept this in my concious at all times and it really helped. I hope this helps at least make you feel like you're not alone. Good luck in your quest for help! [info] None [info] 1364459821
loserkidtbh [info] Hard disagree. I've been a picky eater since I can remember. It's been linked to my anxiety disorder about trying new foods, texture issues, etc. I will try new food at home, but it takes a bit of working up to it. Also I can't explain to you the anxiety picky eaters feel when they go out to eat with family and friends. I've had to settle for just a water before because I was 2 seconds away from a panic attack if I got food. I know, all this sounds completely ridiculous to you and it sounds it to me too. But, I don't think you'll fully understand a lot of us don't want to be picky eaters. A majority of us aren't doing it to be "cute" or whatever. Anxiety just gets in the way of it. I've dealt with anxiety disorder since a little kid and I was diagnosed with anxiety around age 6? 7? That's also when I became a picky eater. Just give us a break, dude. We aren't harming you at all by being a picky eater. Like I said, a lot of us don't want to be one. We just are trying to push through it like a lot of the other stuff we have to push through.  [info] None [info] 1541764333
misterbecca [info] Given I'm not as old as you are (I was just diagnosed at age 25), I never really considered that I could be on the spectrum until my most recent therapist suggested it. My brother was diagnosed in high school and I work with children with autism for my job, but they all seem so different from me that I didn't think I was also autistic. Similar to you, I was diagnosed with anxiety and always just assumed that I had social anxiety because I was awkward and that was that. I have sensory issues but always just told myself I was being too sensitive. I stim, but learned to primarily do it in "socially acceptable" ways like knee bouncing, and always told myself that was just my anxiety. I have other compulsive behaviors (I was also diagnosed with OCD on top of the ASD so who knows what the root of that is, but point is, it was all chalked up to general anxiety until recently). Basically, I blamed all of my "quirks" on my anxiety and didn't think I could be on the spectrum like the other autistic people I knew because it presented differently in all of them. I'm also struggling with taking the news in, and feel like I'm going back and analyzing every experience I've had and thinking about how it's been affected by my ASD. I also am paranoid now that other people see me as really awkward--up until now, I've felt like I've masked the awkwardness pretty well, and as awkward as I've felt, I've had some confidence that others can't see it. But now I don't know. I like to think I'm self-aware and decent at reading other people's emotions, but now that I've been diagnosed with ASD, I don't know if that's possible. It's hard not to keep internalizing the generalizations about ASD that I've heard about all of the other autistic people in my life. [info] Recently Diagnosed [info] 1555532809
dogtale123 [info] Medication advice please : SSRI So I have been given Sertraline HCL 25MG by my doctor last week for anxiety and OCD. I began taking it Saturday. He recommended me taking the capsule apart and taking a bit of the meds for a few doses to see how it worked. I did that for 2 days. I guess I should have done that longer.. I started taking the whole capsule and today is day 3. Today I feel fatigued and a bit light headed. Now I’m starting to give myself anxiety thinking I’m giving myself an overdose or something. I have lorazepam from before I was diagnosed with anxiety. Back when I was having a few panic attacks. Can I take a lorazepam to calm myself down? Or can I not take it since I’m taking the SSRI’s now. Are these symptoms normal?Edit: adding infoI’m also freezing under a blanket and my fiancé is in a T-shirt and says it’s not cold [info] None [info] 1586384432
throwaway-1101010010 [info] it’s been more than a month. i am diagnosed with anxiety so that doesn’t help lol. thanks for the input [info] None [info] 1566678664
TheMythicalShelBeast [info] If it makes you feel better, everytime I get settled on a medicine for one thing another comes along and screws it all up. First I was diagnosed with anxiety and given a low dose of cymbalta. I gained 60 lbs on that shot in under six months so they figured I didn't have anxiety and upgraded me to panic disorder. They put me on Zoloft but that opened up the opportunity for my OCD, Depression, and self hatred to rise to the surface so they added a benzodiazepine into the chemical concoction. Then they decided I need two shots and to get my blood drawn for extra testing. I have extreme needle phobia and so they told me I could get one shot in the form of nasal spray. Then of course they happened to be out of nasal spray so I left with three holes. Then we finally get the results after three weeks and they send us to a pediatric gyno who takes one look at my blood work and wants to know how the fuck nobody realized that I have had PCOS this entire time and the meds I was on reacted negatively with the PCOS. So she puts me on birth control but decides that I need more blood drawn. Flobotobitch said, "tiny needle, you won't feel a thing." And pulls out the thickest fucking needle I've ever seen and legit jabs it into my tiny vein. Needless to say, the vein leaked and my entire inner arm was purple for a few weeks. Then they tell us I can't take any of the good medications until I get an ultrasound to see if I have ovarian cysts. But they can't get me in for another month. Meanwhile, I can barely stand up straight because my uterus is swollen and every time I move it pulls on the muscles and hurts like a bitch. Then they say when I get my ultrasound they will prescribe me a two week course of pills that will shred the uterine lining and I will bleed out for a month and then I can take the medicine that will actually help me. But, the shredding overlaps with exams at my school and then my birthday (I'll be seventeen in three weeks) which was supposed to be a camping trip in the middle of nowhere. Meanwhile my personal trainer is putting me on a HIIT circuit and I have to work out four times a week and I can barely fucking move.  Now they want me to get food sensitivity testing done which is more needles and I have been stabbed more times in the last three weeks than in any year in my life. And last night at therapy my psych was diagnosing me with sensory sensitivity and other annoy little conditions. That should be treated by my current meds but aren't. And the other med that should help counter reacts with the birth control I need for the PCOS. FML [info] None [info] 1494055417
candiedbug [info] I have the monitor because I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I thought I'd better keep my eye on my bp and see if anxiety made it spike. I guess I have my answer. I've been taking phenibut and L Theanine for it. I wonder if stacking before playing would keep the bp numbers in check? [info] None [info] 1412960930
soverycute [info] I don't watch KL but based on what you mention I can compare the too a little. Regarding anxiety (I have been diagnosed with anxiety and am definitely not comparing how people experience it) I once read a post of KL explain why she couldn't upload and she mentioned anxiety as the main reason. I thought this post was very informative and down to earth. JH seems to mention her anxiety in irrelevant situations and exaggerates extremely sometimes. She also talks about essential oils and not taking dr prescriptions of medicine as if she is NOT an influencer. I find this worrysome. Regarding brand loyalty I think the world is annoyed with Morphe and BGS promoting it every second everywhere. JH shows everything from Morphe she unboxes and once in a while she shows 1 other product of this one other brand. From what I've heard or assumed (this may be not true) KL doesn't do this particular thing with Colourpop. Also I personally see JH flaunting her wealth constantly even though she keeps saying 'stuff is just stuff'. After one quick scroll through KL instagram I don't see the flaunting that JH does. This flaunting in combination with always shilling Morphe like crazy is bothering for some people. I can't say much about KL uploading schedule but JH uploads once every blue moon and it's the same thing every time. Together with the excuses; 'sim card' (sim card tho really Jaclyn?) lost because she ALWAYS puts it in her bra???This is just me comparing a bit. What Im stating about KL may be total wrong assumptions because again, I dont watch her. Please correct me if I'm wrong anyway regarding facts [info] None [info] 1483995942
PapShmear [info] Getting semi-decent grades in college, living on my own with a fantastic job and apartment, two cats, 5 year long term relationship. I was a fuckup in high school and now I'm 23 and life is great (albeit stressful still 99% of the time). I was diagnosed with anxiety after HS graduation which gave me perspective on my inability to succeed in that environment.  [info] None [info] 1501573780
ToriBeth214 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I can confirm. My Aunt even asked me how I move my legs so fast, and didn't even realize I was doing it.  [info] None [info] 1511244250
love-pillars [info] Unsure..? I'm 23, F. At my workplace, there's a bunch of girls I never liked. The reasons were unknown but I feel extremely uncomfortable seeing them around. My workplace is like a community building or something, there are units for rent and my boss rented a unit here so here I am, working alone everyday(since she rarely comes in and I've stayed for a year because I'm comfortable and happiest working alone). Back to what I was saying, I've never liked those girls- never talked or interact with them either. Many times I've bumped into them in the bathroom. If I was in the cubicle, I'd hide until they leave- no idea why. Just earlier, I was going to take the trash out and saw they were walking towards my direction and I panicked- so I walked away and hid although they already saw me.Shortly after throwing trash and heading back to my own desk, I started breaking down, crying uncontrollably and just shaking a lot and balling my fists that my nails would dig into my palm until I finally calmed down. It was only then I realized my behavior pattern the whole time(which I've always thought were normal considering I was diagnosed with anxiety). I wasn't officially diagnosed or anything for autism but i realized have been showing signs of borderline autism when I look back in my life and realizing this only made me cry even more. I wouldn't know how to tell my mom this or anyone for that matter, I don't really know what to do hdskjhfks  But I have to say, after realizing it, everything started making more sense to me. [info] None [info] 1580960445
ieffinghatemayo [info] Wish that when I was diagnosed with anxiety they would have understood it better. Not coddled me per-say, but maybe understand how  scared I always was and maybe been more compassionate. [info] None [info] 1562995191
cy3n [info] Don't do that It will literally cripple you internally Like what my physics teacher has said "any questions isn't stupid" don't fear the "embarrassment of not knowing" Honestly take heart and just ask At the end of the day you will be the one on the top I relate to cou,as in the fact I calculated all of my actions:tried my hardest at PE (2nd in class),Joined Guitar ensemble without any knowledge of it in J2,Tried my hardest to excel in my subjects for CT :ABD/ES But inside I was broken(had family issues,mental breaking inside to the present where I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder) I tired my hardest to hide my imperfect life by being another person. Please live yourself [info] JC [info] 1573917373
treefarmercharlie [info] I have the same issue.  I was diagnosed with anxiety issues about 15 years ago but cannabis didn't make it worse until recently.  I honestly don't know if cannabis is just amplifying my anxiety, or if it is creating more, but I have cut my consumption back to only two days a week (Friday and Saturday) and that has helped me a lot. [info] None [info] 1573153121
Brewskyandcats [info] I know I'm pretty content with my life as a teen but it's got this sense of something missing or like it could be polished- help/give input for me? Okay, this is my first post so I have no idea where to start. Let me give some background on myself then to set the perspective. I'm only 15, but I tend to be more on the responsible and mature side, I've been grown and still currently live in a religious (Mormon/LDS) family which until recently I agreed with, and I've come to be self confident which tends to be a rarity in kids my age. I've come out to my parents as bi, and they just ignore it now and I think they've convinced themselves that it was just a phase. I have also explained to them that I don't believe in the church, but they make me go to the activities as if they were even more of a priority than family activities (which makes sense in the church). I'm working to accept this massive waste of time on Sundays and weekdays with activities, but it does irk me that they don't give me much of a choice about it. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I take meds for it, but it's usually pretty well handled most of the time. It only flares up at church services/activities, certain areas of the school at certain times of the day when there's lots of kids, and occasionally at night when my mind wanders. But I have the ability to reason through my anxiety and my other small conflicts, because I've been through enough personal events that I don't care to share and counselors/therapists who have given me some amazing strategies to improve my mental state and therefore the state of my life through my perspective. The issue I'm confronted with is this sense of dissatisfaction that can't help but reach me a majority of the time, and I know that- logically speaking- I should be fine, because I'm privileged up to my neck and have all the tools I need to make my life great; I do have a great life! I just feel there's something missing. I just had a breakup, but I saw it coming, was treated well within the relationship, and am grateful it happened because my partner was losing interest, so that surely can't be it, if it is even what's affecting my mood anyway. I am discontented in living with my parents when I'm not comfortable at home, and I'm discontented in my age and the necessity to be patient until I'm 18 and can move out. These, however, are not new factors at all; I have felt this way for years. If I'm being truthful, I may have never felt better about those matters than I do now. My point is that I'm confused. I don't know what could be the source(s) of this feeling of dissatisfaction in my life. I should like to know which issue, if not all, to focus on addressing. And I would really appreciate some tips and thoughts on how I can solve this and put things right. Thanks :) [info] None [info] 1516496090
Bananabreadfun [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety too. I understand how crippling it can be, but I promise you, you can do it... you are stronger than you think  [info] None [info] 1542311316
Tipper92 [info] 27 [M4F] North West, UK - I'm back, looking for someone special in my life ***SORRY THIS IS SO LONG. I SUCK AT WRITING SHORTHAND***&amp;#x200B;(Firstly, I know looks play a large part in someone's opinion, and while judgement terrifies me ahaha, I think it's only fair to share [what I look like](https://imgur.com/a/okuzyWj)! I don't take a lot of photos of myself, but folks say they like my dimples)&amp;#x200B;It's hard to know where to begin. I used to be quite active on reddit during a point where the option of a social life wasn't really open to me, and met a good pen pal. Unfortunately, I find myself in a similar position again, seeking something closer both in location and heart. While I'd like to be social and have someone close and special in my life, the few people I did have like that left some years ago. I'm here hoping I might find that again.&amp;#x200B;I live in the Manchester area. Currently studying film production at university and work part time retail on the side. I'm lucky enough to have my own place, but living by yourself without anyone to visit you gets quite isolating. I like to keep myself productive, creative, and open and ready for opportunities! I also have a large policy on being honest and open-hearted, so I guess I'll just open up as much as possible/necessary here and hope I don't scare everyone off!&amp;#x200B;**About me:**1. I'm 27, but I've been told I look much younger, which is why it's difficult getting attention from people my age - they think they'd be talking to a teenager or something! I act even older and am a middle-aged homemaker at heart. I wear wool cardigans, enjoy nights in, like doing crosswords, make homemade stews and soups, and while I'm not a neat freak, I like to keep quite tidy.2. I'm quite short for a guy - 5'4". Again, this doesn't help me look any less like a kid haha.3. I know it's a cliche, but I very much like animals, especially birds. I enjoy collecting RSPB bird pins. In a more stable, free position, I'd like to work more with animals.4. I used to be slightly overweight, but nearly two years ago decided to start looking after my mind and body a bit better, and now enjoy a healthy lifestyle. I've lost about 50lbs and hope to keep going. I don't completely deprive myself of the things I enjoy, as I think moderation is important.5. In total honest truth, I've never had a romantic relationship. This also means a date, a kiss or otherwise. I had a very close friendship with someone almost like a brother to me when I was younger, but the friendship ended messy and left me with a lot of anxieties and self-image issues. I know baggage turns people off, but I like to be 100% honest, and I think everyone has some form of baggage or experience-driven flaw. That's my big one.6. &amp;#x200B;**My Hobbies, in favourites order:**1. Daydreaming, honestly2. Video games (pretty much any platform, though I don't have a Switch), films and music3. Watching Youtube videos (Youtube &gt; Netflix &gt; Conventional television)4. Video editing (hoping to do it as a career)5. Writing (stories, scripts and song lyrics mostly)6. Hiking and nature, when I can get out of the city&amp;#x200B;I am, in the best case scenario, looking for a relationship, and I think it would be a good idea to share what good traits I have in that area, so you know if it's what you're looking for. I will also share my flaws, in case any of them are dealbreakers so that you're not wasting your time in messaging me.&amp;#x200B;**Good things about me:**1. Again, I consider myself an honest person who doesn't like lying.2. Without trying to sound too forceful, I fall into many of the cliches that girls say they like about guys (funny, committed, long walks on the beach kinda things). I've been told I'm funny and wanted to be a comedian growing up. I'm also write comedy. I like nature and the outdoors, and having someone to hike in the country with would be cool! I'm also paternally and monogamously-oriented, and while I don't want to rush anything, it's my dream to one day be a husband and father.3. I don't like doing things for myself as much as I like doing things for other people. When I had a close group of friends, I lived vicariously through them, and it makes me happy putting my focus into other people.4. I'd say I'm quite empathetic and prefer to listen and respond, rather than talk myself.5. I'm a moderate, objective person. I know what I'm good at, and what I'm not good at. I take criticism to heart, and if I mess up, I'll not only admit it, but need to be called out on it. It's how we grow.6. I suppose I could be considered quite a sensitive person, I'm in tune with my emotions and think its important to recognise all of them. I can be angry or miserable, at times, but I can also be energetic, relaxed, romantic, jokey, fiery, and more.7. Even though I am inexperienced, I consider myself quite an exploratory and vigorous person. I'm bi, and enjoy the idea of opening up to experiences in that area, should it ever happen. I say this to let people know that I'm not cloistered or physically broken or anything.Bad things about me:1. This is quite a biggy and I suppose I could have mentioned it earlier, but I was diagnosed with anxiety in my teens and it can flare up at random intervals, either lightly or heavily. As a result, I get easily nervous and if I ever do struggle to open up or voice concerns, it's not due to being egotistical and macho, I'm probably just really anxious about putting myself out there.2. This comes with a slew of other flawed traits; low confidence for example, which is why I'd prefer to talk about you or other people than myself. I can also jump between optimism, realism and pessimism quite regularly.3. Though sensitive to what people are saying, I'm quiet a lot of the time, and I say what I think is honest and necessary in as few words as possible. Although, I *think* that's mostly down to not really finding someone I have a passionate, connective engagement with for so long, and think if I found the right person, I would open up verbally a lot more.4. I'm a late bloomer in most respects; I can't drive, I've only recently been drunk for the first time (although I'm not opposed to a drink at all), and similarly just went out of the country for the first time too. Although travelling has always been a larger dream for me, my current situations never allowed it, as I've never been a rich man.5. Gonna reiterate it here, I'm 5'4". I know some may be thinking "that's not a negative, that's just your height", but I rarely, at least in the location I live in, see girls more attracted to guys shorter than them, and it's something I'm quite insecure about.6. I have an average frame, a little bit of muscle but also a little bit of pudge. I'm working to make it better, as I said I'm following a healthier lifestyle, but it takes some time to get there. I think self-betterment is important, and I don't think it's fair to ask for anyone who looks after themselves if I can't get to the same place myself.&amp;#x200B;**The kind of person I'm looking for:** I think everyone has preferences and I hope I don't come off sounding exclusionary and egotistical mentioning my own, aha. Though I am bi, I get on far better with girls, and pretty much just have female friends exclusively as testament to that. The main thing I like in people is kindness and sweetness. A nice smile and a soft voice are my weaknesses. I also like talking with people about various creative things, so if you're into anything artistic - if you're a photographer, musician, painter, fashion, streamer, anything - it'd be something we could definitely talk about. Same with healthy living, if you're into exercise and home cooking, it would be great to share tips and help encourage each other!  I prefer girls my age, or younger, so between the ages of 20-27 would be preferable. Physically, my type is petite girls. Not necessarily fit, but I do go for shorter, smaller girls. This isn't a dealbreaker for me at all, so don't worry if you're not short or have body fat - I would be a hypocrite otherwise! If you're shy, or homely, or sensitive, and want to open up to someone more, then I think we would be in very similar positions and get on well. I don't smoke or drink much myself, but I'm 420-friendly and don't mind getting tipsy, if that's your thing!&amp;#x200B;**What I'm after:** In an *absolute ideal* world, I'm looking for someone who would be interested in getting to know each other, become close, and hopefully if we hit it off, have it develop into something more. If not romantic, then the minimum I'm looking for is to open up to someone together. Someone who would like a person in their life they can have a strong, honest connection with - that person that you chat with nearly every day and don't feel weird about sharing all your frustrations and emotions with. I do miss having a best friend, and I would like that again.If you live in the North West area and are in a similar boat, or I sound like someone you'd like to know, then please message me! And, as I said at the beginning, I'm sorry this post was so long. Still holding out to rediscover someone who will be very important to me.&amp;#x200B;(I do want to make a point to say, you don't have to be an overtly confident speaker, but as you can see, in an effort to carry on a conversation, I write quite detailed. I ask for more than one line replies, a desire to actually engage in topics, and don't be afraid to ask questions in your messaging and replies. I always reply to really cool-sounding people on here, who have written large open-hearted posts, but then when we get into messaging they write one line about the weather and don't help me to share or connect with them at all.) [info] None [info] 1562431154
CellarDooranon [info] The same thing happens to me. I justify it with the fact I'm diagnosed with anxiety and chalk it up to a really bad attack. [info] None [info] 1567111472
Uneeda_Biscuit [info] What an idiot. "I was diagnosed with anxiety, and prescribed medical Marijuana. I didn't want the diagnosis to hurt my career." [info] None [info] 1508049970
SourTongueTeaser [info] Yes, I was diagnosed with anxiety. The Zoloft helps a lot. It doesn't change me as a person, it just makes me a lot more calm. I don't lose my mind anymore when a too tall person stands over me or I am being stared at. When I first started it I had some sever emotional ups and downs but it eventually evened out.  [info] None [info] 1388904076
greffedufois [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, major depressive disorder and PTSD. I didn't really ask for help, when I got sick the hospital just starts giving you antidepressants. A lot of the procedures left emotional and mental scars along with the physical ones. That's where the PTSD stems from, but its on the milder side.  [info] None [info] 1393083761
phorensic [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder 7 or 8 years ago. I used to have panic attacks while driving to work. I had a big one that sent me to the ER while I was walking in the parking lot. Complete tunnel vision and total disorientation. I had no idea who I even was at that point, let alone have the ability to drive. I can imagine a scenario when having a panic attack you get to the point of passing out, which would be potentially lethal to you, passengers, and other people on the road. So yes, it would be the same as having one in a plane, the same potential consequences. Is one life worth less than 100+ on a plane? It has the same weight in my view. You might have been able to pull over "safely" while having a panic attack, but can others?? You should think a little harder about this. [info] None [info] 1540493143
casualthrowaway97 [info] IamA 18 year old going into her Freshman year of college with severe anxiety. AMA I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 12 so it's been a long ride. Orientation week for my school is boring and spread out so I need a distraction. [info] None [info] 1441238545
throwaway3848583929 [info] My [21F] boyfriend [20M] of 3 years has scared me for the first time in our relationship by grabbing my arms and lightly shaking me during our fight. I'm very upset right now and staying at a friend's place at the moment. I had a (stupid) fight with my boyfriend this morning but that's not why I'm posting. Some background info: I get dehydrated and overheated very easily and have had a history of fainting when that happens. Also, I have a history of UTI's because both my mom and I have a genetic problem that makes it easier for us to have urinary or kidney infections. Furthermore, I have been having chest problems and have been diagnosed with pleurisy and another time I was diagnosed with anxiety. So I've been to the hospital a lot and complaining about different things hurting.So today I didn't have a lot of water and was feeling pretty lightheaded. We were in the middle of a fight and I (kind of?) fainted. I say kind of because I didn't feel like I was out and if I was it was only for a second. This is how I usually feel other times though, where everything will turn white and I'll feel dizzy and just crumple to the ground. So I fell down and my boyfriend became very angry. He grabbed my arms and I guess was also frustrated that I was out of it while he was trying to pick me up. While he was doing this he said something along the lines of I always do this when we are fighting and was lightly shaking me. He was also mocking me and saying oh poor sick you, always sick or something like that (again, still a little out of it and it felt almost like a dream). So he picked me up by my arms and set me down on the couch and then gave me some water. So I had  a problem with this for two reasons. One, I think there's a difference between helping someone of the floor or completely manhandling them and I was not okay with that. Secondly, it really hurt that he treated it as if I was trying to get attention or something.  While I was sitting on the couch I had been crying for about 5 minutes and he asked if I was done with my pity party. This I do not get because every time I have been to the hospital with a complaint I have always had something wrong and required medication. Besides when my chest was hurting and a bunch of scans showed nothing so they thought I may have anxiety, there has always been solid proof from labs that I had something and needed medication. I think what's most upsetting is that it has been4 hours and I haven't gotten any apologies from him even though I think he should know what he did crossed the line. I'm not sure how to react to this because we have been together for so long and I obviously care about him. He has never done anything like this before and I know he's under lots and lots and lots of stress.  At the same time, no matter how stressed someone is or how little sleep they got it is never okay to be aggressively physical. I ultimately posted because I wanted to know some opinions. Can I chalk this up to a one time thing because he was frustrated (he's never done this before during our 3 years together and he didn't physically hurt me) or should I be afraid this may happen again?I also want to give a little more perspective because I realize this is very one sided. He is actually a very sweet guy. He will cook special dinners for me, buy me stuffed animals or some of my favorite snacks when I'm feeling under the weather and make me random gifts (he's into woodworking).  We are usually pretty good at resolving fights and compromising but this time was different. Also, when he is very upset, usually when fighting with his mom, I have seen him have to hit things really hard such as the wall or the bed. I have always assumed this is normal because I mean when I'm really angry I also feel like punching something. I'm wondering if there's something else going on though like an anger management problem? Any thoughts or advice would be much appreciated. tl;dr: Fainted during a fight and boyfriend picked me up and lightly shook me  while accusing me of faking it for pity.  We've been dating for 3 years and nothing like this has ever happened so I don't know whether I should chalk it up to stress (to be fair a lot has happened to him recently)  or if this is a huge red flag. [info] None [info] 1511139907
Fledman1915 [info] A Letter I hated who I was.I was raised by a great family in a small rural town. We were somewhat abberant in the fact that we listen to metal in an upper class area, where the norm is country and rap. Middle school was hell. I was bullied for the music I listened to. I thought there was nothing wrong with wearing a Slayer shirt to school. They begged to differ. I met a kid in 8th grade who gave me some hope. He was from a far worse background and made the most of life. He became my best friend. That is, until he moved away freshman year. We still kept up with eachother, and we still see each other once a year, but we have grown apart quite a bit. I kept to myself until about junior year when I somehow made a few more friends. I never really had "true" friends. I had people to bullshit with at school, but no people to hang out with. I was okay with this. Senior year, I made some more friends. We were all fairly different from each other, really the only binding tie being we didn't really fit anywhere else and we liked smoking weed. I'm now a freshman in college. We still keep up and hang out when we are all in the same spot.I hate college.I had high hopes for college. I would be able to redefine myself and make more friends! What a great opportunity! Except I am still who I am. I go to a very upper class college. I'm out of place. I've always been out of place. It's so hard to find common ground with anyone. Everyone is rich and preppy and wants to go to the next greatest frat party, I just want people to talk to. I sit in my room and listen to music and hate. Maybe it's the way I look? I'm a normal looking dude. I have piercings in my ears and nose. Maybe a guy with metal in his face isn't worth the time of day. Maybe it's my clothes? I wear band shirts some times. Maybe people are scared by the images on those. I don't know. I'm going for an IT degree. People in this degree aren't known for their social capabilities. Maybe I screwed myself. Maybe I'm right where I belong. I'm two semesters in and I've had maybe one meaningful conversation with someone here. Go to class, eat, homework, sleep. Repeat.I like her.You know that feeling when you think someone is just right for you? I think I feel it. I know what lust feels like, but this is different. I've dated two people before. I've never felt this way. It scares me. She has a much different background from me. I knew her in highschool and we started hanging out again. We have a lot more in common than I knew. I think she liked me back then. I don't know if she does any more. Her smile melts my heart. I'm scared to do anything because I don't want to piss her off. Romance is a fucking paradox, isn't it? I hate me.You remember the piercings and metal stuff? I hate it. I mean, I like the aesthetics and the music, but I hate what I think it has done. I'm the "edgy" kid. I'm an exotic animal to be looked at but not to be approached. Apparently shards of metal and music make me so much more different than everyone else. Even my own friends know me as the "edgy" kid. I'm not. I'm not so different from them. I just want people to talk to, people to care about. You know, without a black cloud of stigma following me. It's not fun. You know what makes it more fun? Anxiety. I've been diagnosed with anxiety. It sucks. It makes being social so difficult. I lose myself when I talk to people I don't know. I say and do stupid things, and then it replays in my head over and over. My mind runs a mile a minute. It keeps me up a lot just thinking about anything and everything. Endless worrying. I've gotten a lot better than I was, but I still need to improve. I don't know to change. Do I fundamentally change myself to be accepted by other people, or do I stay the course? I don't know. I think about it every time I pass by someone who gives me a weird look.I wanted someone to care. Now, I just want someone to understand. [info] None [info] 1517824093
GORGATRON2012 [info] It could be. But if you constantly feel that everything is way too much to deal with, all the time, and that you never get a break... you may want to take some time and talk to a psychologist. I felt that way in the middle of $8K of debt, preparing to move out, working full time and driving to see my GF 30 miles away... until I was diagnosed with anxiety issues. I'm on medication and currently seeking other treatment. My problems haven't gone away, but they've become a *billion* times easier to deal with. not saying it's 100% the solution for you, but just wanted to retell my experience. Good luck, fellow redditor [info] None [info] 1463749183
innerguide27 [info] Strange neurological symptoms - Clean Bloodwork, Brain MRI, EMG  Age: 26  Sex: Female Height: 5’2” Weight: 135lbs. Don't smoke, no drugs, no medication, occasional drinker. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I've had ongoing tendinitis and bursitis on my left shoulder (rotator cuff) for 3 years. So about a year ago (last November) I developed a sudden onset on myoclonus. My limbs jerked frantically (there was jerking at least every 20 seconds, 24/7, for 3 months straight). My hand would open and close by itself, my abdominal muscles would jerk my body one direction while my upper back muscles would tighten forcefully, only to release after 20 seconds or so while I gasped for air. Sometimes my throat muscles would twitch (I thought I would choke to death), my blood pressure would drop, I would get hot flashes, burning sensations, and pins &amp; needles all over my body.  I would feel myself go faint (but never did faint). I've been to the ER I believe 3 times over the last year. They would run tests, everything would come back normal, and they would dismiss my symptoms and tell me to go home. I consulted a neurologist, they've run test but the only thing they found "wrong" with me, was low ferratin levels so they prescribed me ferratin supplements and sent me on my way last December.  My neurologist did mention that my MRI showed some very small lesions on my spinal cord that could be caused by 3 years of chronic inflammation of my bad shoulder (I'm going to an orthopedic and physical therapist for this issue). However, it seems that they were so insignificant that he didn't even note them on my chart because my primary care provider said he didn't even mention them...The symptoms lessened in February of this year, but I still have ongoing myoclonus (My muscles jerk about 20-30 times a day now and my hand doesn't open and close often, still get abdominal muscle jerking and shoulder tightness). I still get occasional hot flashes/ burning sensations, and frequent pins &amp; needles. In July of this year,  I had sudden right calf pain and tightness while lying down, my heart sped up suddenly although I was calm moments prior due to the pain (I was lying down in bed) I felt faint as if my blood pressure went down, my limbs felt a tingling sensation and the left side of my face went numb. The episode lasted about 10 minutes. As the days went on I've developed a constant numb, and tingling sensation from my right knee to right toe. Went to the doctor, got dismissed, and to this day some nerve in my right toe feels weird and sensitive to the touch. I've gone on to develop stiffness in my arms, legs, and fingers.  Sometimes my right leg drags behind me. Got blood work done for arthritis and autoimmune diseases in September, and tested negative. Today, I was on public transport on the way home from work and my left arm, my jaw, tongue, and cheeks went numb. I was sitting straight and relaxed. The episode lasted about 10 minutes. I cried out of frustration of never having any answers. My doctors have all dismissed me, because I got diagnosed with anxiety when I was 18. It was situational, I'm 26 now. Anyways, any suggestions on what I should be testing for next?  Thank you to anyone who can help. [info] Patient [info] 1573617213
rationalomega [info] You're my fiancée! Well, I was her in senior year and my husband was you. I was/am pretty "Type A" and I would drag him to the library, make him get off slashdot, and put down the damn phone. He still barely graduated after failing a necessary class (somehow the prof passed him anyway after I wrote to her begging). I also made friends with the other people in his major.  Basically I was absurdly micromanaging his academic career. It was exhausting and after graduation I was diagnosed with anxiety. But he got through the major with almost a 3.0 If a court ever asks, I am absolutely entitled to half his earnings at least!  [info] None [info] 1446000837
apiaries [info] Exciting to see all of these new farms popping up! I haven’t been able to try a more “premium” CBD product and I would love to evaluate what a quality product does for me. I am diagnosed with anxiety due to some complex traumas and even low dose CBD helps with it, along with some chronic physical pain that I have from a wrist surgery and Lyme Disease hip injury (which I start PT for tomorrow!). It also helps settle things if my GERD kicks in. CBD allows me to stand for shifts at work, something that is agonizing if not impossible without, along with being able to enjoy my day. I’m not interested in opioids or pharmaceutical muscle relaxers, the former because of the side effects and ridiculous abuse potential and the latter because they don’t work for me. As far as anxiety goes, I would say that being able to control my disordered eating (binging) changed my entire life... I lost weight, am in less pain because I am now a healthy weight, feel more confident about my body, and am just living a healthier and better life. I’d love to try your product! I’m starting my senior year as a Mass Communication student in one week and I’m curious to see how my semester could be improved with less anxiety and more focus! [info] None [info] 1566233157
EmersonJay [info] My friend hasn't done anything but serve as a support system. She's an amazing person. I was talking about the angle of potentially having developed PTSD. That's the boat I'm in.A couple weeks ago, I woke up at 2 in the morning to a stranger standing over me in my bedroom. I chased him out, and there was more light outside. It was my new neighbor, who was ridiculously drunk. He kept saying he needed help, but only managed to tell me that his girlfriend was at my best friend's house before stumbling off. The guy was bleeding pretty good from his arm. So I walked to my best friend's place, because she's right next door to me, to figure out what the hell is going on. Sure enough, the guy's girlfriend was there, drunk and covered in dry blood, sobbing on best friend's couch until her dad could pick her up. Scary shit. I've been having nightmares and flashbacks and panic attacks (I have been diagnosed with anxiety since before my insurance ran out).  [info] None [info] 1504460894
justadudee1 [info] Fear of a brain tumor I’m a 19 year old male, roughly 140 pounds. My blood pressure is lower than average, but I’m considered very healthy. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, my parents both have it. Also, there’s family history of migraines. it’s started in September. It started with shortness of breath and chest pain that was like severe at work. I got home and didn’t sleep because it was a full panic attack. The morning, I was in tears thinking I was dying. My mom took me to the walk in clinic. I got a chest x-ray and found nothing. told me i was fine. Fast forward roughly a month. Same issues. went to real doctor. another chest x-ray. nothing. heart tests. nothing. even 2 urinalysis. Now, I have a daily headache, no chest pain, but I have shortness of breath, chronic fatigue and brain fog, and I just don’t feel like myself anymore. It stresses me out because I keep putting the thought of cancer in my head. the pain is mainly in the back and by the crown of my head. It sometimes goes to my neck and the top of my head above my temples. The headaches haven’t increased in pain. They aren’t painful at all. Just a dull ache. The brain fog, loss of concentration is 24/7 though. Side note: I have been sleeping less than 6 hours a day for a while now due to me constantly stressing out &amp; I struggle with drinking like any water. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1585532194
sircoxalot [info] I get this too and I've been diagnosed with anxiety. It mostly happens shortly after I've gotten really stressed out, which tends to happen when you spot an ex. [info] None [info] 1358814875
mappingmeows [info] MFW in the last 4 days, I was diagnosed with anxiety, I've been coughing up chunks, my 89 year old roommate had a mini stroke, my thesis has been freaking me out and my bf is no help at all and says "you're fine" or "you're not that sick". [info] None [info] 1475853041
spookymug69 [info] Fake it till you make it. If you act confident, eventually you'll become confident. And if you're worried about blushing or looking nervous, tell yourself this: 1. Nobody can even tell.2.And if they can; who cares? Wtf are they gonna do about it and what can you do about it?I was diagnosed with anxiety and had to take pills for it two years ago and it TERRIFIED me to even think about being in front of people. Now: I just got cast in the school musical where I have to sing and dance in front of people and thinking about it makes me excited. [info] None [info] 1509757881
douchebag_tom [info] I get dizzy, but it goes away when driving or playing a musical instrument. What's wrong with me? As I said in the title, I get dizzy for no reason that I can detect. Sometimes I get nauseous, but never to the point I'm going to throw up. Going for a walk, driving, and playing bass/drums makes it go away. It doesn't make any sense to me. I'm overweight and am terrified that I might get diabetes, so I try to eat earthy and exercise. I've been diagnosed with anxiety in the past, but I don't feel anxious or stressed anymore. I tend to get indigestion a lot and I am fighting off a sinus infection.i know both of these things can cause dizziness, but why would playing music help? [info] None [info] 1358126141
JustLetMeGetAName [info] Dizziness and heart flutters for a few days now, do I need to go to the ER? So first off I am diagnosed with anxiety and I am normally on medication for it but I have been out for a few days now. So I dont know if this is related to that at all, but I've never had this happen before. So since Sunday night I have been feeling dizzy and having heart flutters when I'm up and moving. If I'm sitting or leaning against something I'm fine. It feels like waves washing over me every minute or so. I just took a shower and I've been sitting down for about 15 minutes now and it still hasn't gone away. I tried googling my symptoms and of course I'm extra paranoid now. I also didn't want to call the ER and ask because I know they take heart stuff very seriously. I also am a recreational weed user in a non legal state so I also didnt want to be dismissed due to that. It happens when I'm sober or not. Thank you to anyone who has advice! [info] User Not Verified [info] 1585717240
nerdc0rerizing [info] Hey, yeah that's really rough. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders so it was definitely masking a lot. That's been my worst symptom of withdrawal is the anxiety and irritability. I just feel suspicious and angry all the time. I'm hoping to get through this hump soon. Thank you so much for your words. [info] 19 days [info] 1509028322
Cabbage_Patch_Itch [info] NAH Is it possible to try the party for a few minutes? I was diagnosed with anxiety as well. I absolutely do not live in your skin, but for me there are outings that were not nearly as bad as the buildup to the event.  Having more time to panic and hype up the event makes me more anxious.  Do you use any coping skills? Your anxiety sound pretty debilitating and that does make you a non-Asshole! But whenever you are ready to look into some permanent solutions, I recommend you should. Groups and mindfulness work for me. Maybe you can find things that can help you too! I know what you are going through.  Sorry my reply got out of hand. [info] Partassipant [2] [info] 1558660373
redemptionSung [info] Please help. Is Xanax/benzos not for me? Comedowns got me feeling short term memory loss, paranoia, emotionlessness, and kind of schizo after only a week of taking 0.5mg-2mg max daily. Low tolerance? I lowkey feel retarded as fuck A little bit about myself: I went to the doctor about a year ago with the sole intention of being diagnosed with anxiety in order to have xans prescribed for my own recreational use. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD, and got prescribed to take x2 .25mg daily but most of the time I was just taking them when I wanted to get high, obviously. I took most, but also got “rid” of some. 60 pills lasted me over two months. Being that I could not afford my insurance deductible really, I stopped visiting my doctor so I subsequently stopped getting them which was no biggie since I knew that the stuff is highly addictive and didnt want to go down the path. Then I found out I was actually an anxious person in nature.  This is where it all started. A couple of months passed since I last did xans and let’s just say that acquiring the xanax became way too easy for me all of a sudden. I was receiving batches of 1mg pills(alprazolam) for free sporadically over the course of about 3 months I think; hard to gauge time rn as I’m typing this. This time I was running out quicker; I liked them and was recreationally popping them more, especially before social gatherings. This was often accompanied by alcohol and had me feeling sooo nice. I was suddenly more social, relaxed, and less of a weirdo in my eyes which gave me a huge confidence boost. I felt like I was a new person.I started taking them for work, since I felt like I could function by taking only .25mg which made work such a breeze and was actually performing better than I had the past 6 or so months, especially in the communication aspect. They worked. I felt like I was doing better overall in multiple aspects of my life not just work; I even finally decided to quit smoking and switched to my vape for since asthma was also fucking me up. Keep in mind I’m sporadically popping them in larger doses(4mg + 5 beers over the course of 5-6 hours is the max I ever did in one night) and would occasionally take .5mg to sleep when I was out of bud.  I then started to feel my tolerance building up and started taking .5mg every morning for the past two weeks. I’m back at it focused and performing better than ever at work but by the time I get home I am mentally and physically exhausted. I’m not buying bud anymore to help me relax and sleep after work; I’ve replaced it with with 2mg of xanax a night to chill but its gotten to the point where it doesnt even help me sleep. I’m just sitting on my phone til 3-4am looking for benzo RCs cos Im running out and other random shit.Now for the past three days I’ve felt what seems to be the most fucked up comedowns of my life. Keep in mind Im a recreational user of MDMA[like every 4-6 months], cocaine[barely ever], cannabis[daily for the past 2.5yrs], and tobacco[4-5 cigs a day].  It’s a feeling of short term memory loss; I cant remember what I said or where I put something  5 seconds beforehand. I feel slow and braindead ; as if it takes me what feels like 30 seconds to process my thoughts just to reply to someone face to face to make sure what I’m saying makes sense? Im forgetting to do basic shit; today I wasn’t keeping track of my phone usage at work and let it die on me when I needed the GPS to get back home(new work location.) I literally winged it and got lost, had to ask for directions and took me about an hour extra to get home.Tonight was the worst. After getting home and feeling exhausted/anxious as fuck, and introverted, I hurry up and finish my online test cos I had friends coming over. In the meantime I go grab some beers and when I get home I pop .25mg. Crack open a cold one, the boys are here, and a blunt is lit. Im feeling pretty fucking good, then someone busts out the coke. I do the smallest line ever and I’m chillin for a while until the comedown comes. At this point Im only 2.5 beers deep.  I’m suddenly fixated on making plans for the night and getting my GF aboard even though shes not really interested(shes not the spontaneous type) and meanwhile everyone is splitting up and saying goodbye. After they all leave I’m still trying to convince my gf to come with our friends to hang out somewhere and she notices that I’m acting weird. At this point, maybe 5 minutes after they departed, I cant even remember if I said goodbye to any of them.This really threw me into a fucking loop. Was I acting weird in front of them, being pushy on my gf? Emotionless and dry, I stood there and ignored them as they tried to say bye to me, or maybe they didnt even try cos I was obviously fucked up and they noticed? I suddenly felt super awkward and paranoid in my head.  TL;DR: Feels like Xanax threw me in a loop feeling paranoid, emotionless, retarded, and socially inept during comedowns only on the the second week of taking 0.5-2mg per day. [info] None [info] 1517046165
missisabelle_ [info] Thanks so much! So I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 12 and since then I’ve been on and off medication and seen multiple psychologists. If I think back to it, it’s definitely always been a people issue for me. I’ve searched this morning for local companies that don’t have such a busy influx of patients so fingers crossed. Thank you again. [info] None [info] 1557192423
throwaway782323 [info] Yes! Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I thought panic attacks were not real. Apparently, I've had anxiety and panic my whole life and it seemed normal to me. In my 30's I used to have so much anxiety, I would get up at 2 am and walk outside for miles for 1-2 hours by myself. I was totally oblivious because mental health wasn't talked much back then.Every morning I wake up with a racing heart, sense of dread, fear, and panic about having to get through another day feeling like this. It has not been a good life, but I'm trying my best. I also put on a front so no one knows my pain except my SO. I've recently started telling me family. I wish there wasn't still stigma about it. [info] None [info] 1538509958
haraghah [info] Meeting new people problem This happened yesterday when I was walking with my two friends on holiday (that I know for about 5 years. I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year ago and I always felt anxious around new people. My friends and I ran into a group of people and they started to joke around and talk to each other. When they shook my hand I looked really nervous because I I kept looking left and right and the whole time I was there I wasn’t talking to them and I was looking down most of the time. This has been going on literally my whole life and it is such a pisstake. Afterwords my friend called me weird and said he was embarrassed by the way I acted and he called me a retard. Can anyone give me any tips on how to stop or help this problem of mine and if anyone can relate? [info] None [info] 1535780606
IRageAlot [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I take Xanax 0.5-1mg as needed, and 20mg propranalol twice a day. =)As far as the OCD, i've been discussing it with a psychologist. I am extremely particular, ritualized, but I don't think it is to an unhealthy point. The closest thing I think that falls into that range, which some people seem to make fun of for some reason but is actually quite a miserable thing is penile insecurity. It's absolutely compulsive. By the numbers my measurements should be something flattering. My wifes friends started calling me Big-Kyle out of the blue and she admitted she had told them some personal details about me, but mentally I break down when I think about it for some reason... The compulsive part is the totally unreasonable anxiety over it, and having to use various enlargement techniques that have had limited success to find relief. It has driven me to lose 60 lbs and drop my body fat percentage from 37%(estimated) down to 14%(bioimpedance); so there has been some good come from it. My psychologist has made comparisons to OCD-like behavior but mostly he compares it to anorexia and having a fucked-up and unrealistic body-image that is never satisfied.TL;DR -- You're right =) [info] None [info] 1316614849
Charming-ander [info] I used to LOVE horror movies! I was diagnosed with anxiety in my twenties and now I almost have panic attacks when watching them. 😕 [info] None [info] 1526632191
toccoto [info] I feel you dude. Can also be the people around you. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was younger and my mom would blame so much of my laziness on it. I'm not saying it wasn't hard but I wasn't working as hard as I could in life.I finally moved away to force myself to take care of myself and my life is really good now. Yeah, anxiety still attacks but I've learned how to deal with it. I think even diagnosis can lead to some using it as an excuse in life. Howeve,r I think people who really do suffer eventually get to a point where they understand excuses don't matter and learning to cope.. Whether through good habits, drugs, etc etc is what matters. [info] None [info] 1524800741
lyssa_lo [info] Freeway Anxiety Does anyone have any tips or solutions to freeway anxiety? I'm fine driving around town but the minute I think about going on the overpass to the freeway my heart instantly starts beating faster. Just 2 years ago I was able to take road trips driving on the freeway for 2+ hours, but since I've been diagnosed with anxiety that is no longer a possibility. I'm looking so hard for a fix because my boyfriend lives 2 hours away from me and I can't go visit him without driving on the freeway, which makes it very difficult. A month ago I was prescribed lexapro and xanax, and I was hoping that would be a solution to my freeway anxiety, but I just don't know how to conquer my fear still. Also I must note, I'm perfectly fine being in the passenger seat on the freeway, it is only driving that gives me panic attacks. [info] None [info] 1519690252
millkitty13 [info] How to quit smoking Hey guys, I know this subreddit is all about smoking tree, but I’m trying to learn how to stop or at least reduce my tree smoking. Reason being, I’m a college student, always strapped for cash, and I’ve come to realize that it just controls too much of my anxiety. I’m currently 21 but have been smoking consistently daily since about 16. Can’t even tell you the last time I had even a week of a break. I was diagnosed with anxiety,  panic disorder and PTSD about 2 years ago. and while smoking has helped a lot with that, I’ve come to realize I’m so mentally dependent on it, when my brain tells me hey we should smoke.. it’s so hard to turn it off, and then it just distracts me from my work and studies. So I’m coming to ask advice, I know I can just physically stop smoking, but my brain goes crazy and it heightens my anxiety and panic when I don’t have access to it. Any suggestions? [info] None [info] 1569958926
happybooksummons [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety prior to being diagnosed with ADHD years later by my primary care physician. I have a strong relationship with her and many years of trust built up. So I went to my annual physical with a list I had worked on for awhile. This was many years ago now, so I don't quite remember what was on that list. I did work on it for several months though. She suggested I try a low dose of medicine and come back in a month. I know that some doctors are more cautious because there are drugseekers out there (especially our age). I think I had a good amount of credibility with my doctor from a long relationship.On the other hand, I really feel like I miss out on having a psychiatrist or therapist to help me develop coping skills. I think that if you are speaking with someone in that camp, maybe you should focus on where you need help developing strategies and coping skills. By virtue of having ADHD, discussing time management skills or learning how to think before speaking will not only help you but will also build a solid base for this person that you do have these symptoms. If your primary care doctor is the one who won't listen to you, finding a psychologist and asking for help in these areas will definitely bring a positive improvement to your life. [info] None [info] 1573622432
VariegatedViewpoint [info] Welcome!  I too started last week because I felt that I had to do this or else I would miss my chance at starting a family.I was diagnosed with anxiety as well, so it will be interesting to see what effect this has on that area.I'm happy you are trying, and I hope this works out for the both of us!  [info] 842 days [info] 1358885630
forgette [info] Years ago I started getting sick at my stomach all the time.  After exhausting all "physical" causes for my nausea, I was diagnosed with anxiety.  At first I didn't believe it and walked out on the doctor right then and there, but the more I thought about it, the more it made sense.  I eventually returned and sought help.  I was given a prescription.  That made things worse.  I was given another.  It also made me worse.  And then I was given one that worked.    Even though the pill helped, I still got sick sometimes.  And over time I started feeling the "normal" anxiety symptoms.  My doctor suggested exercise.  I did not want to go to a gym, so instead I called a friend to play tennis with me.  I hadn't played in five years or more.  Anyway, playing tennis did help immensely.  I felt so good that I started running in the mornings.  And that winter when I couldn't play tennis, I did join a gym.  I recommend trying exercise.  I think your doctor may want you to have the social experience.  He might think you need exposure to being around people, and maybe that doing so while you can focus on exercise might help.  Just a guess.  But that's two benefits.  The exercise is good for the body and it's good for the mind.  And of course exposure therapy is a real and widely accepted treatment for anxiety.  If I were you I'd give it a try.  It sounds to me like you live in the UK (you would never get four months off work in the USA and it's difficult to even see a doctor here on many people's insurance plans, much less a mental health professional).  Take advantage of what's available to you.  If it doesn't help or you feel worse go back to your doctor and explain that.   [info] None [info] 1393789107
kikitoldschool [info] Anxiety and low self-esteem So I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and I've made improvements, but lately it's been getting worse. The thing is, things, objectively are going well for me, but I don't really feel like I should be okay with things. This got me thinking that a lot of my anxiety is out of fear of not being good enough. And I really have trouble to love myself. So this got me wondering a chicken-egg conundrum, is my anxiety caused by low self esteem or is anxiety causing it. Do other people feel similar to me if I made any sense? This has been bugging me a fair bit and fearful to reach out because I didn't want people to give me pity. While it's nice short term, I think it might make things worse. [info] None [info] 1417219582
meevis_kahuna [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD.  For a while I was taking benzos and Ritalin simultaneously.  It works OK but I ended up becoming extremely reliant on the cycle of meds in order to sleep properly (uppers in the morning, downers at night).  The ADD meds definitely exacerbate the anxiety issues and come with their own problems.   The anxiety meds also make it harder to concentrate.I agree with your doctors -- DEFINITELY explore the alternative diagnoses before you start mixing meds. [info] None [info] 1383064640
Rhaski [info] I hope I can help you a little here. Your experience sounds almost identical to my first year, and even now in my second year those feelings have come and gone. I discovered that the issue is not the career, or my ability to do the job, rather, it was more to do with how I deal with stress and my unrealistic expectations of myself. I ended seeing a therapist. I was diagnosed with anxiety, which is something I am now working on and making a lot of progress with managing stress. I would recommend is seeing a therapist about what you're feeling. Stress is part of the job, but it isn't normal to feel dread, fear and panic. This doesn't necessarily mean you also have anxiety, but it's clear that something is not right in the way you handle stress. You have worked hard to academically and professionally prepare yourself for this career so don't pull the trigger on leaving it behind too readily, give yourself a real chance first. Seek advice and tips from colleagues, mentors, etc as much as you can. Learn from them, find out how they deal with everything (I guarantee it doesn't involve them getting through every bit of work all the time). But seriously, book yourself in too see someone about how to handle your stress levels, and give yourself some credit. This is not an easy job,   it if you stick with it, it WILL get easier as you learn the tricks and everything stops being so new. In the meantime, acknowledge the progress that you HAVE made, and stop being so hard on yourself for not being a veteran in your first year [info] None [info] 1512435908
potterssuperhero [info] Volcanos.I was 100 percent convinced my house was built on an undiscovered volcano. Thanks "Volcano".I was also terrified of my house burning down to the point where I would get up four to five times before bed to double, triple, quadruple check the stove was off.I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was a teen. [info] None [info] 1567319254
SinOfMemesMeliodas [info] I can relate very much, while hospitalized for other reasons, I can relate to having a similar convo with my no (at the time she smoked weed in front of her three kids (I'm 17 now, PJ was 6 and Kaitlynn was 5 at the time). And lastly I can relate I was diagnosed with anxiety but I don't let it ever hold me back :) [info] None [info] 1551113956
Superi0rfemale [info] I’m suffering for a crime my step-father committed and EE will not help and remove an outstanding debt as they view the theft as a ‘domestic’ issue. My credit score is ruined and I am only 23. Good morning,I am desperate for legal advice. I will appreciate any help offered.Four years ago I ordered a tablet device from the provider EE. EE sent this device to an old address that I had moved out from, even though a year before they had sent a mobile to the correct address I was living at. My step-father, a manipulative and callous man, was living at the address they sent the device to and he signed for the product and stole it. I reported to EE that I hadn’t received the tablet and they told me where it was. I called my step-father and asked him to return it to EE but he refused to pay £9.00 for the postage. When I called again he stated that the device had been lost in the house as there were boxes everywhere because he was moving. I opened a police investigation but as the tablet was nowhere to be found little could be done. One year later I was told by my sister, who was living with my step-father, that he had gifted it to the daughter of his girlfriend of the time (my mother died two years prior to this incident). I immediately called the police and contacted the lady who had the tablet, she handed it into the police station and an investigation began. After interviewing procedures and evidence (matching the IMEI number) my step-father was charged with theft. I was under the impression that EE had received the device back from the police but they have informed me that they have no record of this. The matter was due to go to court as CPS informed the police officer dealing with my case that there was enough evidence to prosecute. Everything was underway and I, and others, were ready to stand and read our statements out and hopefully see this situation rectified. Not long after dates were set I received a call from the police officer dealing with the case, she told me that the CPS had decided to drop this case as the defendant received a medical letter stating he was not of sound mind when the incident occurred and it wasn’t in ‘public interest’ to prosecute, even though my step-father was a teacher. I was distraught and not informed of my rights. I let the situation go and tried to move on with my life, however every time I tried to open an overdraft, get finance or even buy my first car I was rejected due to the fact that this man’s crime against me racked up hundreds of debt and ruined my credit score. I tried to call EE and have them remove the debt but as they deem this a ‘domestic’ issue they won’t ‘touch it’. Regardless of the fact I have all the legal documents to prove I am innocent. I called Ombudsman to complain about EE but they will not help as this is a ‘third party’ issue. I called CPS to see if I could appeal the decision but as it had been two years since the verdict I could not. Now, CPS tell me they had sent a letter detailing the decision made and my rights. I NEVER received this letter because if I had I would have appealed in a heartbeat. The lady I spoke to sent the letter again and this time I was able to read just what had been declared. My step-father was apparently ‘confused’ about the ‘provenance’ of the device and had suffered considerable emotional upset the past year. These were complete lies, he knew that the tablet was mine and from EE just as I stated in my statement. This man had never had therapy, nor shown any signs of distress, he remarried soon after my mother died, he didn’t let her write a will and he took her ashes and we still do not know where they are to this day. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and had counselling to help with the trauma of my child/teenagehood. I had no idea that I could make an appeal, I was told that this was it and there was nothing I could do with regards to this case. Had I known my rights I would have used them as I am still suffering because of a crime committed against me. I am trying to seek legal advice as I am heartbroken by this injustice. I suffered years of physical and emotional abuse at the hand’s of my step-father. I am twenty-three years old, engaged, employed and trying to move on with my life but this event has quite literally ruined all future prospects of my life. I cannot fathom how cruel EE have been, not even to consider this extenuating circumstance. How can they deem it ‘domestic’ and refuse to help when I am innocent? I was over 18 and not living at my step-father’s address at the time of the offence.I would be very grateful for any advice, thank you. [info] None [info] 1544103691
orlandojesse [info] Late to this, but I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD. My therapist taught me a few in-the-moment techniques for when things become unbearable and I felt a seizure coming on:List five things you can see. Four things you can hear. Three things you can feel. Two things you can smell. Finally, if possible, one thing you can taste. Along with the sense-based technique, I carry a smooth pebble on my person. The cool sensation of the pebble and its smoothness allows me to detach from my anxiety. I also tend to have a bottle of water with me at all times - drinking the water really helps. In short term, (and could work for immediate), I make sure to regulate my breathing. Inhale for 5sec, hold for 4sec, breathe out for 3sec. Rinse and repeat. I can feel my body "unclench", if you will. In the long term, I practice mindful meditation. I accompany the breathing technique with some of the sense-based ones; for example, whilst pacing my breathing, I'll become aware of my surroundings, even fine details. I do this sometimes once I wake up, before bed - honestly, whenever I have a minute or two to spare. I've found myself to be far more level-headed from this meditation. I also make sure to do quick, basic exercises when I can. I haven't the time to go to the gym or anything nowadays, so if I have a bathroom break or something, I'll throw in a few jumping jacks or squats. That's something that I came up with personally that helps me. Honestly, if you're finding things really tough, speak to a professional. Keep pressing the matter if they are quick to dismiss you (which is what happened to me). I also take medication, which gave me that starting push to get my life on track. I hope this helps. Bless.  [info] None [info] 1487165606
unendinghiatus [info] Do toxic people know they're being toxic? I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I keep worrying that my behaviour might become toxic for my boyfriend and friend and family seeing as how I do require support sometimes. In the past I've come across people who were, as I was told later, toxic and manipulative. My question then, essentially is, do people choose to be that way and know that they're being manipulative or does it sometimes happen without them knowing and they won't know unless someone points it out? [info] None [info] 1544847874
armyofelephants [info] What happened to make you consider you might have an anxiety disorder? Even though I was always aware that I was painfully shy and had some unreasonable fear of social situations- I wasn't even introduced to the idea that I might have a condition until I was 28 years old (6 months ago). I hope I make sense from now on, I've never been good at consolidating information.The year before I had my first anxiety attack was probably the most relaxed I'd had in a long time. In March '15 I was released from a lengthy, unhappy relationship of almost five years. Basically, the end had been imminent but we had both avoided it. On his part, I think because he didn't have anyone to go to. On my part, because I wasn't sure where he would go if I left him. Irony, right?After we broke up, I was mildly disturbed with how much motivation I gained. Previously, I had worked a low-end kitchen job and quit when an unethical chef took over and basically left me no choice but to leave. All of the sudden, the thought of going back to school felt possible. So I enrolled in college. I entered a new relationship with someone who had previously been a friend and it felt (and still feels like) the healthiest relationship I'd ever been in. I started smoking weed. Before that, I had avoided it because the few times I smoked I had been disturbed by the lack of control I had over my own thoughts and because it occasionally made my heart beat uncomfortably fast.. just generally, made my (unrealized) anxiety worsen. It got to where I was smoking one or two spliff cigarrettes (tobacco+weed) a night. Occasionally, I would go to sleep and feel terribly worried about some random thing but other than that it was a nice release at the end of the day where I could feel completely relaxed. Skip to a year later (April). One night, I smoked a spliff as I do every night. That night, it was with my boyfriend. I didn't feel like I was "feeling it" so I smoked another about an hour later. Shortly after, we went to bed. And soon after I laid down, I started to feel like my heart was beating too fast and too hard. So I got out of bed and put my head out of the window to see if this would alleviate the feeling. It only seemed to feel harder and faster, my head felt light, and my arm started to feel numb. This went on for a few minutes before I decided to go the ER because for all that my unenlightened self knew- it might have been a heart attack.At the ER, they took my basic stats, did an EKG, tested for PEs, etc.. Decided it was a side effect from the weed, gave me something to calm me down and sent me home.After that, I had a few days of feeling like I couldn't get a deep breath accompanied by occasional palpitations- followed by another visit to the hospital where they referred me to a GP. The GP looked over my readings and decided that I was suffered generalized anxiety. He prescribed me some low-dosage Alprazolam, which helped with the breathing problems.In the months since then, I haven't experienced extreme attacks but have had occasional bouts of palpitations and small chest pain. I have started to  divert the idea that there is something horribly wrong with me. The more that I consider my experiences with increased heart rate, feelings of breathlessness, general feelings that something is wrong... the more I come to terms with the idea that it's all in my head.TLDR; I was diagnosed with anxiety at a late age and I'm curious as to what random experiences led you to be diagnosed. [info] None [info] 1470992769
SgtZabka [info] The old anxiety problem Hey /r/AskLEO so about 2 years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. At first it was bad, and I was given a mild anti-anxiety medication to use at night, every night, for 2 weeks. Well since then I have had very mild anxious episodes now and then (could go months with out having one) at random, but I can still function through them. About 4 months ago, my GP wrote me a script for a stronger anti-anxiety drug, Lorazepam, for those 'emergency situations', luckily I have never had to use them. Since then, I have been working in the Loss Prevention field in a somewhat violent city and have had no problem confronting shoplifters or 'throwing down' when the time calls for it. Now that I have had some college and security experience, I want to continue on my career into law enforcement so my questions are, should I follow my dream of being a cop even though I have mild anxiety time to time, and will the agency accept me with that inconvenient medical history?Thanks for your help! [info] Aspiring LEO [info] 1431821580
PhDOH [info] The emotional behavior bit is exactly what I thought. I asked my father once why he slapped me for crying after he ran over my foot, "you were such a whiny child!" Dude if you thought that I cried too much why the fuck didn't you do something more appropriate about it given I was diagnosed with anxiety attacks while still under 10?! I'm not sure how punishing a child for crying about being in pain by inflicting more pain is supposed to work.My nfather also got annoyed that I never told him anything. Why do you think? [info] NC Nfather NexstepM [info] 1493772021
mustafa80 [info] yeah being anxious doesnt excuse his actions. this is both blatant apologism and trivialization of that condition. I've been diagnosed with anxiety most of my life but I dont allow it to be an excuse for my shortcomings. stop trying to stick up for a man who already has a god complex anyways. [info] None [info] 1534370932
HypnoticPeaches [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety. That has nothing to do with this thread; please don't just shit on anxiety-havers by calling us pussies when that's not even what this thread was about./You said get a diagnosis. This thread was specifically about people like myself for whom medical advice isn't an option.  [info] None [info] 1416991883
mybrainhurts4954 [info] Anxiety and possibly undiagnosed mental health problems I have been diagnosed with anxiety but I feel like it could be something more. I often have racing thoughts and it feels like my thoughts trip over each  other (cant think of a better way to describe it). I spend long periods of time in a very low mood. I feel crippled by my brain and completely useless. I don't go outside and try to avoid contact with strangers as much as I can which goes to extreme levels. I went to the doctors once with my mothers help and they told me to call a bunch of numbers which I cant bring myself to do. I tried to ask for help but the level of help I think I need is more than I can ask of anybody I know. I feel like my health both physical and mental is getting worse quickly and i don't know how to fix it. I'm sorry this post is a bit of a rant. [info] None [info] 1493702726
dancinginthesunshine [info] First, if YOU are opposed to medication (not your SO...they aren't dealing with this), then what about a natural help? Magnesium has helped me a lot.Therapy isn't your only option, but its a really helpful one. I find going for a run helps too...anything to get me out of my own head.I've been diagnosed with anxiety for 11 years, but this summer was one of the worst yet. I coped through with meditating and magnesium for a while, and then finally I started therapy and went back on some medication. It's a long process of recovery. [info] None [info] 1538521206
TalkOfSexualPleasure [info] Personally I'm diagnosed with anxiety.  I'm very particular with who I tell that to (barring Reddit because of the anonymity) because if I feel like people are patronizing me it makes my anxiety worse.  There are some people who push the envelope for no other reason than attention, but grouping all of us into that category really hurts the ones of us who suffer silently to ourselves.  I personally have the fear of telling someone about my condition and being told they know better than my doctor's or told I'm out right lying, because my symptoms aren't visible, but personally my symptoms don't come out around anyone, they're clawing at the back of my mind, but in front of people my mind goes into go mode and decides no one can see how dysfunctional I am.  The muscles in my back will clench to the point of pain, my shoulders will cramp, and I can be all but having panic attack and yet I won't break.  The second I'm by myself, I can't breath, I can't think, I'm pacing, yanking at my hair, screaming, crying, and even praying to a god I don't believe in to make it stop.  And it never stops, it never goes away, it gets better, smaller, for at least a little while, but it never ever goes away. [info] None [info] 1552359370
smellofpaprika [info] Feel like my anxiety is coming back and I don’t understand why I’m 16 and I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was much smaller but my doctor stopped my medication years ago when I seemed to be making really good progress. Lately I feel as if it’s been coming back. I’ve been experiencing sleep paralysis, severe headaches and today well I was reading I felt a massive pressure on my chest and started desperately gasping for air and hyperventilating (not sure if this was a panic attack because I don’t remember ever having one when I was smaller). I really don’t feel like myself and I just don’t know what could be triggering this if it is anxiety.I was just looking to see if what I’m experiencing sounds like anxiety because I was really young when I was on medication for it so I’m not sure if I’m making a big deal out of nothing. [info] None [info] 1507750441
plazey [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety early in life (around 11?) I was also later diagnosed with OCD (13 years old). I've had periods of intense panic attacks and other time periods where the OCD has been completely out of control. My life at this point (25 years old) is relatively free of anxiety-related symptoms, though symptoms tend to come and go with what's going on in my life. I think that the large majority of relieving those feelings was defining what it was that was causing the anxiety in my life and doing hard work to remedy fears, issues, thought patterns and realizing an anxious thought from a rational one and using self-talk to bring myself down from high anxiety times. Developing healthy habits (meditation, less caffeine, more exercise, etc) has really helped as well.My point in saying this is that there are therapies that work and it is possible to work through these disorders. It takes some work and dedication, but you can totally do it :) [info] None [info] 1335551661
daemonsrose [info] It sucks, doesn't it?  I've been diagnosed with anxiety (social and otherwise), and just started some counseling.  I'm hoping that will help me.   [info] None [info] 1469009102
BelgianBoris [info] I started bodyweight fitness earlier this year. I was diagnosed with anxiety in November 2018, since then I've learnt loads about myself, through work on my body and on my mind. My anxiety would manifest itself as panic attacks about the smallest things (getting to work late, insignificant thoughts, anticipating distressing symptoms from another thing I have), at the worst of times I would straight be depressed and not wash or leave the house. At The best of times I always have constant worry. The only time I'm free from this monkey on my back is when I'm exercising. I play field hockey (currently 3-4 hours a week at least) and have done for about 20 years. Despite this I have always struggled with my weight and never been really happy with my flabby gut and noodle arms.I would obsess about finding the best ways to lose weight, forever pour over articles on what exercises to do in the gym, but I never actually took the plunge and used my meticulously crafted workout plans. why? fear of judgement, lack of confidence. Bare in mind the only sport thing I'm good at is hockey and I love it because I'm good at it, I've got a big ego but it's super fragile.Then I discover this sub. This incredible community, and one of the most rewarding physical things I have ever done.The first time I did the RR I was totally fucking hooked. The "crawl, walk, run" ethos is so satisfying and moving through the progressions is like crack. I love having control over how I can move my body; functional muscles, it feels primal. Some other person may have to prove their strength with a squat rack, but I'm in the outdoor gym doing shrimp squats, no equipment, usually alone, endorphins coursing.Everybody has noticed my weight loss, and how much bigger my arms and chest have become. I went from about 84kg last summer to 69kg a few months ago. Now I'm about 73kg, my hockey has improved massively, so has my control over my anxiety symptoms. I genuinely believe this is down to doing the RR 2-3 times a week, its so so rewarding (I can't stress this enough), and obviously eating better.This may get lost but I just wanted to take this opportunity to say thank you to everyone that has helped contribute to this sub from moderators to members answering questions in comment sections.Looking forward, I can't wait to find out what my body is capable of doing and how far I can push it. [info] None [info] 1558197706
emmysobes [info] Ugh, slight would be an understatement. I have been diagnosed with anxiety/ocd for over 20 years. Have had PTSD since I was a teenager. It’s ALL gotten worse since having my daughter. I didn’t realize how much of a delicate balance I had going before I had her. We tried for a baby because I felt great, normal even! But then once morning sickness hit...bye bye. I saw other posters mention rage; yeah, hello🙋🏻‍♀️ [info] None [info] 1560301110
prone_to_laughter [info] Same. I was diagnosed with anxiety at a pretty young age. Medication helps a lot, but it never stops. Life is good and worth it, but I wish I could slow my mind down sometimes.  [info] None [info] 1538017722
thelidhathappeal [info] I don't know how I feel about this. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and it took me about a year to be able to enjoy smoking. I have had panic attacks so bad they've knocked me unconscious (some when I wasn't smoking and some when I was), I think it might be more of a natural brain chemistry thing that people experience, not so much thoughts. It took time for my body to simply get used to it, I don't feel that it was any change in perception that did it. Regardless of how I got over it though, I am happy I did ;) [info] None [info] 1345433413
srxtparty [info] That I'm rude because I don't talk much. I understand why people would think I'm rude, but I've been diagnosed with anxiety, plus I was pretty badly bullied when I was younger because of the way I speak. [info] None [info] 1519319268
petsk [info] Hi I didn't realize I had a LD until I got into medical school.I had a formal $2000.00 assessment done  by a  neuropsychologist after a miserable first semester. It turned out I have a very high IQ but poor working memory and processing speed.  I tried studying faster and smarter but was never quite prepared during exam time. Along with that I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder (go figure!)Like you I was always the last to finish tests. couldn't keep up with all the memorizing in such a short space of time. In undergrad I always took 2 to 3 classes per semester. I always took I hard class with 2 light classes. For example I'm my situation, I would take Organic Chemistry, with say freshman comp. and a biology Lab.My school really didn't care in which order you took your classes.This is what help me in undergrad:Study/homework  groups Flash cardsI recorded my voice reading aloud my notes and listened to it when I rode the bus/ train to schoolMake use of your school counselor Transcribe important dates on your syllabus into your  daily plannerStudy in 25 minute blocks without distractions.Make sure you get @ least 5-6 hrs of sleepDo take vitamin supplement B complex, phenylalanine, COQ10. SAMAE (expensive) . Take a look in your local SPROUT store there is a whole shelve of supplements.ExcerciseReduce soda intake (fructose corn syrup)It been a year since I was dismissed from med school. All of this is all new to me. However I wish I knew this about myself before getting in. I am currently in the process of readjusting my life. I can't tell you quite yet that I'm an overcomer. Until such time toodles! [info] None [info] 1483051081
jason123_123 [info] 100mg dose of Fasoracetam Hey guys, so today I decided to try 100mg fasoracetam orally. I have tried 20-40mg in the past but doesn't seem to do much so that was my reason for upping the dose. Keep in mind I am 6'3 and 250lbs so maybe I need at least this higher dose not sure. But anyways, it was certainly nice. I took it on an empty stomach around 11am. It is now around 6pm and I feel the effects wearing off. The biggest perk I noticed on it was my enhanced mood, I felt a general increase in well being. I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past and this definitely helped my anxiety. I know these are 'study drugs' but I was out with the wife, we went to an art museum and I was interacting with the employees there in a very friendly manner. Normally I am more closed off and reserved but I had no issues laughing and engaging in conversation with strangers. I took 1.25 grams of phenibut yesterday and I would say the fasoracetam is a slight variation just not as strong. Maybe I was imagining it but I had a higher music appreciation, not like phenibut but there nonetheless. One drawback was my lack of sexual desire. My wife was playing with me down there and I remained soft, normally that is not the case lol. This was certainly one of my more favourite nootropics I have tried, I would say a top 3. I wouldn't say it gives me a glowing effect or anything though but I certainly feel it at 100mg. I got absolutely no headaches or side effects with this dose. I do not take any other drugs and do not supplement with choline. [info] None [info] 1540684039
nbgbernd [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder and can somewhat relate. I'm in my early 20s and used to have a normal sex life, but dating and having casual sex became impossible since I'm having serious anxious episodes and panic attacks. Last time I had sex is over a year ago...But to be honest what does it matter? I'd rather have no sex for the next 10 years as long I can live without anxiety. This shouldn't bother you, I think. I'm in therapy and slowly feeling better, I wouldn't be surprised if I even have fun with a girl soon. But I don't wanna rush this and becoming healthy is really the #1 priority here.&gt;I'm wondering if these feelings will ever change.Things will change for the better if you work on yourself. Anxiety disorder is curable, you don't have to be like this forever. Remember that thinking "this will be forever as bad as now" and "I'm going to be crazy forever" are normal thoughts when you have anxiety. This is your illness talking to you, its not the truth.&gt;My mom keeps bugging me for not having a girlfriend. I wouldn't be surprised if she thinks I'm gay haha. Does your mother know about your condition? You could talk with her about this maybe.PM me if you feel like talking privately.  [info] anxiety/panic disorder + depression [info] 1455803184
Kehndy12 [info] I've rolled only a few times and I've had edibles only a few times, mostly at music festivals. So I'm not an extremely experienced user, but I've read this subreddit a ton and I've done quite a bit of reading about MDMA.With that said, I don't think that you should think rolling will be like smoking weed. I'm diagnosed with anxiety, and edibles make me REALLY anxious and make my mind race. It seems I have to combine edibles with alcohol to get rid of the anxiety. (Note: Do not mix heavy drinking with MDMA or you risk blacking out.)Rolling, however, is completely different for me. Rolling puts users in a positive mindset. It makes people euphoric and happy. Rolling has inbuilt happiness that I do not find in edibles. There is not much anxiety except for the come up, and if you take a small dose, the come up will be minor.I mentioned to my friends how I thought it was bizarre that edibles give me anxiety but MDMA does not. They anecdotally told me that edibles are harder to handle.Some people will shit on the idea and say it's not worth it, but there can be value in taking a small dose. For example, [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/MDMA/comments/8dv04x/prepping_for_my_wifes_first_roll_tonight_wish_us/dxs3bgc/) a user told us about how his wife took only 75 mg of MDMA and "enjoyed every minute of it." (Note that she weighs 60 kg = 132 lb.)If you try it out, make sure to test your stuff with a reagent. If you don't have a reagent, order it soon to make sure you have it before edc. If you're not ready to try MDMA, or if you never will be ready, that's cool too. Only do it if you really want to. [info] None [info] 1524701629
Arwres [info] I've come across people in my teenage years that did the exact same thing after I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, "I have that too" was thrown around a lot it can be disheartening to think you're normal because everyone has the same issue apparently but I do hope you're getting the help you need and I hope that people who do self diagnose see a professional so they can seek the proper help they need too. [info] None [info] 1547658898
generalamitt [info] I think something may be wrong with my heart. I'm a 23 years old male, diagnosed with crohn's-colitis and ankylosing spondylitis.  I've been on Cimzia for about a year now which works great for my AS but does nothing for my colon inflammation.Roughly 10-7 days ago, I started feeling uncomfortable in my chest area. I am not sure how to describe it. It doesn't hurt, it feels almost like my heart is "missing beats" if that makes sense. I am restless and get the urge to move my legs. It is more noticeable during the evening hours. Yesterday I went for a run and had minor chest pain and nausea and had to stop short of my usual route.  I am feeling a bit nauseous right now actually,I never had any heart problems, and my family doesn't have any history of heart disease.  Could it be psychosomatic?  Side effect of Cimzia?   Getting tested right now would be a pain with how things are, should I wait a few more days or do you think I need to get checked today?&amp;#x200B;Edit: My ECG turned out normal. I was diagnosed with anxiety and was sent home. [info] None [info] 1585159413
CrocodileHearted [info] Hey if it helps by all means. I'm just personally afraid of them because of past traumas with relatives... even when I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and had to take meds for that I was afraid of it every time... they helped... but what do you think happens when someone who already lacks empathy cranks that lacking up to 11. I felt like a god damn drone. They also managed my anger which was a 'bonus' to those I lived with. Didn't like it.I've been off the meds for a long time now when I realized they became worthless and the anxieties came back. Developed a (healthy) coping mechanism, haven't had a panic attack for the longest time. My favourite emotion came back though. I too want to get better with whatever the hell I have. Lacking empathy, it really does leave some kind of void in you. It's like being thirsty but you just keep drinking seawater. I never turned to drugs to fill it because of my fear of them.. so I fill it with porn. And memes. Lots of porn and memes. It works. [info] And a dash of cold blood. [info] 1565333512
greenbeencasserole [info] I have a lot of the same tics that OP posted. I’m so relieved to see that someone else experiences the same ones, nose twitches, throat clearing, interesting breathing techniques... I also flex my stomach and *other* muscles... wish there was more insight into what all of this is.... I was diagnosed with anxiety but medication didn’t seem to help my tics and I feel like it made me complacent... like I didn’t care about anything. [info] None [info] 1532283959
triagonalmeb [info] I thought it was an allergic reaction to eating cup noodles for the first time and never ate it again. I felt nauseous but for some reason I was terrified of throwing up. I had no idea why, it was never an issue, but it was like suddenly vomiting was my worst fear. And that made me terrified. I would start shivering hard, get palpitations, cold hands, cry a lot and run to my mom. Sometimes I couldn't sleep because of it and had to go to school super tired. Years later someone mentioned panic attacks and it clicked. Even more years later I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1522096163
Snapley [info] Can I ask a question about your panic attacks? I used to experience both panic attacks and anxiety attacks (I think they are different but they could be the same) Please ignore the rest of the comment if you don’t want to answer or you think it’s too sensitive a question.It felt like two different things to me, and I am diagnosed with anxiety by a professional, but it hasn’t been a big issue for a while. One type of attack felt like worries were in my head and I would get all the emotional and physical symptoms.But the other type of attack didn’t seem to be triggered by any anxious thought, it would come out of nowhere and literally be the scariest thing. It’s been ages since I had one but from what I remember it felt like my heart was beating out of my chest and my body would shake and I would get the worst tingling in my stomach. This one would come on randomly, like when riding a bike with a friend or walking home.Which one sounds more like a panic attack to you?  [info] None [info] 1534488980
TorradaTorradinha [info] What do you mean by dissociated? I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was like 4 years old but I'm 19 now and idk if it might have gone away or evolved into something else, I don't wanna say I have a condition without proper diagnosis [info] None [info] 1570675701
drpond [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I definitely notice it is MUCH worse during PMS. I have medications which get bumped up for 1 or 2 days to help control the surge of hormones and I've found it to be quite helpful and successful! So talk with your doctor about things to do specifically during PMS. [info] None [info] 1352696728
DarkKnightCometh [info] Hmm. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and even prescribed Xanax for it... "Lazy" is not the word that comes to mind when I have an anxiety attack. [info] None [info] 1548388451
JohannSebastianBlock [info] Yeah, When I was about 10 years old, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder NOS. I show OCD, GAD, and some phobic symptoms. But didn't meet the very specific criteria for any of them though, if that makes sense. [info] INFP 4w5: Longing for something. [info] 1438780929
lmdean95 [info] Wanting a diagnosis I have not been diagnosed with anything yet, but have been actively trying to align my symptoms with a diagnosis. I am a 24 year old female.For about 3 weeks now, I have been experiencing what started as me saying "my bones hurt". The pain has definitely escalated since then and become more prominent. The pain is in both legs, hands, arms, and was once felt on my jaw. The intensity of the pain definitely comes in waves, but there is always some level of ache at all times. In addition to the pain, I have also been experiencing intense headaches lasting about 4 hours each. I have never been a great sleeper in general, but this pain is definitely affecting my sleep even more. This past week I was feeling nauseous and overall more tired than normal which is unlike me as I am usually pretty active. I have had a few days where my breathing has felt off - more short of breath than usual. I had blood work done this past week which all came back normal. I am waiting for my doctor to call me tomorrow to discuss what avenue he would like to venture down next to find out what is going on. Based on many of the symptoms of Fibromyalgia matching what I am experiencing, I believe that is something that I should bring up to my doctor. I have been diagnosed pain medicine until we figure out what the issue is. I was diagnosed with anxiety about 2 years ago but do not take medicine regularly for that. I have to honestly say that my stressors at this point in my life are very minimal. I would love to hear any input on thoughts or experiences with similar symptoms. The waiting to know what is truly going on is the hardest part for me. [info] None [info] 1575832669
Rogue106 [info] JNM - waiting eight years to tell a diagnosis Thank you everyone who supported me in my last post, it’s given me the confidence to say more about my JNM. For now, I’ll write about a couple years back when I still lived with my mother. During this time I was of high school age and attended a school that took an hour by train.  My younger sister (S3) was also attending another high school that required a bus caught by the station to reach. Our house was a half an hour walk from the station so usually we could guarantee a lift from JNM but we always had to take due care in the mornings because at the flip of a switch, a comment would annoy JNM and she’d tell us to walk. Bit if background for me, I was diagnosed with anxiety at 8 but had no idea. My heart palpitations and random feelings of being overwhelmed were always a mystery to me. JNM knew my diagnosis even if I didn’t, but it wouldn’t stop her from telling me to walk the half an hour to the station when she was in a bad mood. Essentially she was intentionally making me late which would give me a mild panic attack every time. When this did happen, I would freak out and begin to hyperventilate, my chest would seize up and everything would feel too much. I’d have to go to my mother, apologise for whatever it was that annoyed her in hopes she’d change her mind. It was a really good way for her to have control of me in this time, having the power over my transport. It wouldn’t matter what the argument was, whether I back chatted about always being made to do the dishes or if I hadn’t put away my washing while getting ready. I’d have a similar experience when coming home from school. Time was always lazier in the afternoon, I would walk back home taking my time to climb the hills and pet dogs, only getting a lift if it was raining. The first part of this walk was a small road leading to a steep incline. Whenever I got off the train to go home, I would feel my chest seizing up and it would become difficult to breathe. I didn’t realise at the time but this was a mild panic attack, I thought I was winded, maybe I had fluid in my lungs like in TFIOS??? I eventually went to a local GP who sent me to get X-rays of my chest. Of course there’s nothing wrong. He tells me I have anxiety and hands me an asthma puffer. I’m confused, but take it and go home to tell JNM. Her response was ‘Oh yeah I could’ve told you that. You were always an anxious kid. I got you diagnosed after you couldn’t breathe when jumping on the trampoline at eight.’I was floored. ‘What do you mean you knew? I had no idea.’‘Oh it doesn’t matter, you’re healthy anyway. Just work out more and I’m sure you’ll be fine.’When I moved away to attend university, my anxiety got a lot worse. I didn’t have the constant distractions of siblings in a hectic household to stop my mind overthinking. It got to the point of crying ten times a day over the stupidest things. I sought help on campus and was put on anti-depressant/anti-anxiety medication which has since helped a lot. The worst part of all this I think is that S5 shows the same signs as me. We used to call her a crybaby as kids but she hasn’t grown out of it. I’ve made it my mission to ensure she knows what’s happening and why she cries all the time, and offer for her to call me if it’s ever too much. One day I got a call with her crying, she told me she just couldn’t stop. I was heartbroken, I wanted to sit with her and hug her so badly. But I did what I could and told her it’s okay. This is normal for us. Take a minute to breathe and it’ll be okay. You can’t help it. She calmed down and told me she was scared, her friends would tell her she’s scary when she gets upset. I promised to talk to JNM and ask on her behalf to go see someone. I called JNM and got half hearted promises to take her to a counsellor. Nothing happened of course. Come to early December and it’s SF birthday. We’re having croissants with jam as a treat. S5 asks for strawberry jam but we only have raspberry. She starts getting upset, very quickly turning to tears because she’s tired. I pat her arm and tell her it’s okay, take a sip of water and breathe deeply. JNM berates me, ‘Oh leave her alone. She’ll stop in a minute.’ Obviously JNM isn’t taking S5 seriously, and I’m upset once again by her treatment. This came to a head when I got into a text argument with her, about two weeks ago. I’ve repeatedly asked her to take S5 to see someone or even take classes herself to learn about kids with mental illnesses, but her response is always no, that I am not her legal guardian so I can’t decide things for her. This argument was the last time I spoke to my mother, I guess making me NC for now. [info] None [info] 1515547324
joooh [info] Could it be anxiety? I was diagnosed with anxiety but I don't know why I would be very anxious about a TV show. [info] None [info] 1511287255
chaimeanstea [info] I agree. It wasn’t until I was diagnosed with anxiety that my dad confessed to me how bad he had it. It made me notice that over the years I’ve picked up a lot of my dad’s habits because of how much time I’ve spent with him. I’m not blaming him for my issues, but it was insightful and helped me identify areas where I needed to change. [info] None [info] 1571326251
Sobersalesman [info] I wonder if I would have quit drinking sooner.... I was diagnosed with anxiety and I wonder if that was the root cause of many of my problems.https://thesobersalesman.wordpress.com/2017/08/24/the-chicken-or-the-egg/ [info] None [info] 1503609105
michbelles [info] Haha yeah I was diagnosed with anxiety and I was mildly offended by this 20 secs statement [info] None [info] 1513546969
justhereforthemems7 [info] It’s been a year since I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1564957354
pastypirate [info] You pretty much just described exactly how I feel when I'm getting ready for ANYTHING. I have such a strong desire to HAVE to be on time for everything which results in me always waiting around for others as I'm early. Being late and not doing things in the 'windows of time' really stresses me out. I have been diagnosed with anxiety though so I guess that may enhance this haha [info] None [info] 1423352340
devp0ll [info] I’m with you. I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2006 and I will say avoiding it the WORST thing you can do for it. Embrace it and attack it head on, and know the facts. Uncovering as many truths, for ME, has been the best medicine for my anxiety. .02 [info] Series 4 | LTE | 44mm | Space Grey Aluminium [info] 1560694805
Kevinpierce93 [info] Does anyone else feel like they are dying everyday? I feel like everyday I am going to die even though I have been to multiple doctors and they have all told me I'm perfectly healthy. I was just diagnosed with anxiety and I seem to over think everything that happens to my body. Right now I have running in my throat and I think it is brain matter or something and that I am going to die. I feel like my brain is trying to shut off my body or something. Sometimes I randomly feel weak and lightheaded. I just hate feeling like this. Does anyone else have any problem similar? [info] None [info] 1477880092
bitterweetsilence [info] I'm starting to hate my job but don't know how to approach my boss about it. I'm 19f and have been working at my casual retail job for a year and eight months now and this is my first job I have ever had. I often have to do a four hour shift by myself, this happens three times a week, or sometimes I get to work with another girl who is also 19 (this girl is the boss's daughter) or the boss herself for a six-eight hour shift. Lately, it seems I've been a bad employee  for the shifts when I'm on my own. Like there was the time I didn't have enough money to make a float for the next day, so I grabbed some money from the back room safe which must be replaced by the end of the day but I didn't have enough money in the till to replace the safe so it couldn't be done. Or the time the boss left me with her keys, but I didn't know that the boss's daughter had left her keys as well so I ended up locking the shop with both keys inside and we couldn't open the shop the next day and I had to pay a door-unlock company's quote fee. Today, a customer was chasing the last copy of a book we had behind the counter, and usually if it's behind the counter, this means it can't be sold to customers but I sold it anyway. So now I'll probably get into trouble tomorrow. Or letting people slip past the credit card minimum due to their crying. Or, a regular customer phoned to say she couldn't come in to collect sometime that we had to send back to the supplier on that particular day, and she said she would come in tomorrow to collect it, but she never collected it so I'm worried I'll be in trouble for keeping something we absolutely had to send back. I just don't know how to win, because I thought customer service was the most important thing but I can't ask for help from anybody because I do most shifts alone. If I need my boss or the boss's daughter urgently, I call their mobiles but neither picks up the phone most of the time. I'm starting to hate my job because I wonder if I'm making more mistakes than doing good jobs, and our business is already in trouble and we're probably going under shortly. I don't know what to do. When I need to talk to my boss about something it usually is a few weeks before she's free and by that time all the trouble I'm in escalates because it can't get sorted out. I don't want to leave for a new job because I need the money and I struggled to get jobs in the past and I only got this one due to desperation and luck in the interview. I'm so stressed. And I've been diagnosed with anxiety which doesn't help the matter however the boss doesn't appreciate this as a concern as her daughter ''has it worse'' and her daughter's constant complaining annoys her. [info] None [info] 1502691466
Stuckinmyhead13 [info] Coming off ssri s I wrote this is r/antidepressants, but wondering if anyone else experienced this. I've been on and off ssris a good chunk of my life. I was diagnosed with anxiety and pure o obsessions. I've tried just about every ssri out there. One thing I noticed is the widthdrawal and tapering off them., everyone I've talked to says it's the worst thing coming off these meds. I'm totally opposite in the sense that I get ZERO effects. I could stop cold turkey after taking them a year and zero withdrawal effects. No nausea, vomit, sleep, jitters, all the bad effects... Is this normal? I can skip a dosage for several days and nothing will happen. [info] None [info] 1540568691
Evergreen19 [info] I had the same problem until I was diagnosed with anxiety and started taking Prozac. You should probably see a doctor. [info] None [info] 1559847382
gazork_chumble_spuzz [info] That's the spirit! When I was diagnosed with anxiety and was talking it all over with my doctor, he told me that it was going to be hard to deal with it and it would take a lot of time, but that we have to *fight*. That really stuck with me. It is a fight. [info] None [info] 1423062126
Anonymous3687 [info] Everyone gets anxious at one point, wether it’s graduation, getting on stage, presenting, etc. I am diagnosed with anxiety and I bite my nails a lot and I feel like I can’t breathe. I would talk to a therapist about looking into it. There’s a lot of free in home therapists, they help you a lot. Therapy is eh with society but it doesn’t mean you’re “special” it helps your social skills and is basically counseling. [info] None [info] 1560652182
kwier123 [info] Really struggling Im not sure if anyone else has this problem or if its really common, but I am afraid to talk to people. In almost all conversations I find myself responding with the purpose of ending the conversation as quick as I can. Its not that I’m not a nice person or not friendly. Its just that I overthink everything I say, nothing sounds right coming out of my mouth, I feel like everything I say is wrong or sounds weird, my palms get sweaty, my heart starts beating rapidly. Im genuinely afraid to talk to people and I avoid it as much as I can. This affects me in almost all aspects of my life, I am unable to carry a normal conversation, I am unable to meet new people, I am unable to create close relationships with people. I was diagnosed with anxiety and the doctor told me I should go to counseling and thats it. People know I have anxiety but nobody seems to recognize it as a real problem. Friends wonder why I never go to the bar or go to parties, and wonder when I do why Im not more outgoing or talkative. I feel like nobody truly knows the real me because I am unable to express myself or express my emotions. I have people around me but for the most part I feel alone. This is a very lonely life to live and I have no idea how to change.Edit: I realize that all the problems that I have are my own, I realize that none of my problems will be fixed without me taking the necessary steps to fix them, I realize that nobody can help me without me helping myself. But the best way I can describe it is that I’m trapped inside of a shell of myself with no way out. The real me has no control and I am forced to live my life through this hollow lifeless shell of myself. I’m not sure if this makes any sense, I’m not sure what I expect you to say but I just need to say this. [info] None [info] 1516826879
Thadwater [info] I'm feeling not the greatest. I have a loving wife who knows I am depressed, but I truly don't feel like talking about it at the moment, so I am just going to post here. It may help. I have everything I could ever need, yet feel sad, empty and dull. House, wife, pets, a great job, but I still feel like crap. This last week has sucked. I hope it gets better soon. I take antidepressants under the guise that they help with migraines and anxiety. I would go back and get officially diagnosed but that would just give me another 5 years of being denied extra life insurance. As I try to be a responsible adult, I try to get enough to cover my expenses in case of an accident or something. I've been denied 4 times to have an increase above the minimum my company allows. I think I will be eligible this year. You have to be 5 yrs removed from any new diagnosis and it was 5 years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. (What a backwards system...)So I'm a bit stuck in that department. Like I wrote above, just hoping this gets better soon. I am tired of being tired. Haha.  [info] None [info] 1521303014
turtlert [info] Oh my gosh we sound so similar! I’m turning 25 in 1 week, dating a 9w1, and I’m currently in part time ministry. I was pursuing social work and I realized I was not cut out for it, so now I’m pursuing my music. Also I am diagnosed with anxiety and I just went cold turkey off my pills last week because I’m sick of being medicated...so I get that. Anyways, so fantastic to learn about your life!! [info] 4w5 [info] 1554581915
Passthesaltshaker [info] Constantly sweaty hands and feet...hard to function I have been having constantly sweaty palms and feet,for a few months now...I think. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder. My feet are so sweaty that my mattresses get soaked,I have to constantly wipe my hands. Worst thing is,I may not be in an anxious situation but I keep recalling situations which made me anxious,such as people putting me down,being in an abusive friendship(I cut off contact from her,but I'm always afraid she might show up somewhere near me). I have been prescribed with 100mg quetiapine. I think I need to take the full dose. Previously I was hesitant to take the full dose due to weight gain n sedation. But I think I have no choice. Whenever I apply for jobs I get anxious,even when I haven't started going through the interview process. Does anyone have any tips? Anyone can relate? [info] None [info] 1562514421
muddypaws1 [info] I'm scared to start my meds. My anxiety has gotten way out of control. Every month I end up at urgent care or the ER because I feel like I'm dying. I feel like my chest is caving in, my throat is being squeezed shut, pressure building in my neck and head and I can't think straight. If it's not a heart attack, it must be an asthma attack, heart failure, collapsed lung, blood clot, SOMETHING is causing me to suffocate. I was diagnosed with asthma last year, but the inhalers and meds they gave me made it even harder to breathe. I gave it about 6 months before I quit all meds and begged my doctor to check my heart. Instead, he gave me a prescription for lexapro. It's been sitting in my medicine cabinet for 4 months. I know I have anxiety. I was diagnosed with anxiety 10 years ago. I was diagnosed with GAD and OCD almost 2 years ago. I live in a constant state of anxiety, sometimes intrusive thoughts. I've tried therapy. I know I need to do something to help my anxiety, but I'm so scared. I don't want to be on meds for years or life. I don't want to change my habits. Can I still drink wine on lexapro? I gave up smoking months ago, but now I drink coffee and herbal tea. Can I drink those while on lexapro? Will it interact with other meds? My birth control? My doctor prescribed an antacid with the lexapro and the pharmacist told me I can't take them together. My doctor didn't tell me anything about how to safely take the lexapro, how it will help me, what to expect. What if it's the wrong prescription? What if it makes me feel even worse, like the inhalers did? Will it change me? Will I be a zombie? I have kids to care for. I was up literally all night last night because I couldn't breathe. I'd try to sleep, but eventually I would sit up gasping for air because the pressure in my neck was too much. I cried. I told my husband today's the day I start taking the lexapro. I just need to know that I'll be ok. [info] None [info] 1557864069
rayfraz5585 [info] Hey, no worries. I live by the beach. Every other little gift shop sells kratom, so it’s all around me.  I’d pay $45 for 100 capsules. 40 a day and you’re looking at almost $200 a week. I didn’t make much at my job and if I’d wake up without Kratom, I’d call in sick.  I did that too many times and lost my job.  When I didn’t have the money to buy more, I’d pawn things. That’s what I meant by losing things. As you can see by reading this forum, kratom is highly addictive. Not like weed. People don’t taper off weed. I’m glad it’s going easy for you, but everyone is different. I was diagnosed with anxiety which I why I started taking kratom. When I didn’t have it, I’d get the worst anxiety attacks. Anyway, with the help of the kind people of this forum and AA. I’ll be 30 days clean on Friday. I’m proud of that. Take it easy and I wish you well. Ray [info] None [info] 1545224176
phoenix464 [info] This. I was diagnosed with anxiety after about 7 years into my active duty time. I was required to go to appointments at mental health, and prescribed Zoloft. Aside from getting the help you need, it's important to get it in your medical records for disability claims with the VA after you separate. [info] None [info] 1433077890
myparadog [info] I had a kinda similar experience with the ADHD episode but I have to give some background first. So this will be a long post. You can skip this middle part it just kinda explains how I used to think.I was diagnosed with ADHD when I was 12. Meds were thrown at me without any real explanation so I fought back hard. I’m very stubborn and strong willed. Something I’ve apparently inherited from my dad. For better or worse. I’m very logical in my thinking though. I have to have evidence and proof and then I’ll make up my own mind about things. I wasn’t given that and was told I had to take these pills. So I fought to the point of hiding and throwing away pills until my mom gave up trying to fight me. Nothing was ever explained as to why I had to take them. It was just said that it will make it easier to concentrate. That wasn’t a good enough reason for me. Then at 13 right before 8th grade I was taken to a psychologist or something. I don’t really remember. My grades were all over the place from 6th and 7th grade and my mom was concerned I would end up failing 8th because they changed the grading scale. They had actually changed it in my favor come to find out but that didn’t save me from being dragged quite angrily to this appointment, where my mom, dad, and I were told the same thing from the previous year. They gave me the same prescription but a stronger dose and sent me on my way. I was livid. That proscription never made it to the pharmacy. Later that day I went in my mom’s purse where the prescription was sticking out, I took it out and shoved it under the tree rack thingy. My mom confronted a few days later when she remembered about needing to drop off the prescription. She asked me if I threw it away. Which I told her I didn’t. Which wasn’t technically lying. She eventually let it go because she didn’t want to keep fighting and I put up a good front on trying to “help” her find it. I can be devious when I need to be. I waited months before actually throwing the prescription away. I had more trouble with school that year but mostly because of my previous teachers just being horrible. The 2 previous years I had very vindictive science teachers. One even shut a door in my face and later yelled at me because of something a “friend” said about another “friend”. Middle school was horrible! Between feuding friends, teachers yelling at me for no reason, and slamming doors in my face is a miracle I ever did pass.Now I’m about to be 30 at the end of this month. All that was back in 2001-2003. I’ve been through a lot since then that has opened my mind to all kinds of things but it wasn’t until I heard the ADHD episode where I was kinda able to diagnose myself (knowing I had already been professionally diagnosed) but it was explained in greater detail and firsthand experience was given. That had never been explained to me like that before. It was pushed on me as a reason I was failing classes. When in reality I don’t think that was everything. In all honesty I really do love my ADHD tendencies it’s very freeing and I can be super creative, the meds stopped that. Which I told them I didn’t like but I was a kid and ignored. I never thought they did enough investigation into what I was really going through. They just wanted a quick fix and I wasn’t going to get the fast food treatment. December 31, 2018  after 2 weeks of anxiety attacks every other day I was diagnosed with anxiety. The day previous I nearly lost my job over an anxiety attack caused by my manager. I’m on Prozac now and I’ve never felt better. I honestly think the anxiety had more of an effect on me than anything else I faced. Even as a kid it was crippling back then at times. I missed a lot of school because I couldn’t face being around people some days. To know what’s truly going on and able to put a name to it, not a label or excuse, but to really know there’s a way to help... I’ve also taken quiz prior to all this that say I show 66% OCD tendencies and after listening to Stuff You Should Know’s episode on Dyslexia, I have some of those symptoms as well. It’s a good episode and goes into detail about it and it not what most think it is because those with it have a hard time explaining exactly what’s going on and it effects everyone differently.I’ve always been smart and can be taught anything... as long as it’s taught in a way I understand. I am notorious for hearing or reading a sentence and can’t understand it unless it’s explained in a different way. But even if I don’t it’s still something worth looking into because it could lead to understanding something else about myself.Sorry for such a long post I totally did mean to write all that but I kept thinking of things to add. I say all that though because I totally understand how empowering it can be to really understand yourself. [info] None [info] 1552441715
Willow_Queen [info] I (18f) is away from home for 2 weeks staying with boyfriend’s (22m) family and need help managing my anxiety from being away from home Hello everyone! I guess I should start with some back story to give you a better picture. (Also sorry for and grammar issues as English was never my strong point in school even though it’s my first language)Anyways I was diagnosed with anxiety about 2 years ago but had it ever since I was a child. I’m taking medication for my anxiety but it doesn’t seem to help too much. I also have disability called dystonia which came on at the age of 5; it basically renders my right side completely useless. My family life isn’t amazing either as my dad has narcissistic tendency. My boyfriend and I have been dating for about 3 months now and we drove up to Idaho from California to stay with his dad’s side of the family for Christmas and New Years. I’ve met his dad and step mom once before this so I am nervous about staying with them especially so far away from home. Last time I traveled far away from home was to my long distance boyfriend(now ex) who lived in Florida for my 18th birthday and that didn’t go so well as his family was very mean to me and I just didn’t feel welcomed. My current boyfriend is really understanding about all this which I’m thankful for but I do want to him proud of me by not freezing up when someone asks me a basic question like “what do want to eat?” How can I get through these 2 weeks and be as social as I can without breaking down? Anything helps. Thanks in advance! [info] None [info] 1577118531
aptrcki [info] * **Name/Nickname:**  Patrick/ptrck or aptrcki* **Age (optional):**    21* **Location:** US (TX) CST (UTC/GMT -6)* **Platforms:** PCSteam: http://steamcommunity.com/id/risedown/ Origin: aptrckiUplay: aptrcki         * **About Me (optional):**I'm really bad at talking about myself because I can't ever figure out where/how to start. So uh, I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 14, hasn't really been a huge issue. I haven't been to a Doctor in a while, but I do get pretty depressed quite often. More so now than ever before. I'll typically play something casual and listen to music to cheer me up and I sure wouldn't mind a few partners.* **How to contact me:**I'm always up for conversation, just add my Steam or PM me on here. (or go in IRC) [info] None [info] 1454463777
DamJennaUFresh [info] Anxiety about the apocalypse. Need help. Hi Reddit. I just woke up from what would've been a fat nap if I hadn't have had a nightmare about, including but not limited to, saying goodbye to my beloved pets and being forced to leave them to die, terrible floods, a sea of lava rising, asteroids beating the earth, suffocating due to lack of oxygen, never being able to rest as we're always running from bizarre natural disasters, and right before I woke I fell off the "edge of the earth" and remember watching everything disappear as I fell into the darkness unable to do a thing but fall forever. I know most of these things are impossible, but this dream was due to being paranoid at every moment of my waking life.I'm not kidding when I say I'm paranoid at every waking moment. I am always thinking, wow everything seems calm right now... What if an asteroid just slammed earth right at this moment of peace and wiped us out? Daily, I see people take this information that I have been hearing a lot lately, "if we don't change our ways, we will all be dead in less than 80 years," the information goes in one ear and out the other. No one cares, no one wants to change their lifestyle even if it means saving our planet and our species even if it's just for a while. Not even my own family (who I live with) will change.I need help. I know I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but this whole being paranoid about apocalyptic and/or inevitable natural disasters is something that's gotten so bad these past few months and I feel so helpless. I don't want to spend every waking moment worried about how I'm going to die in some bizarre natural disaster caused by humans not changing their ways even when shown scientific proof that our actions are what will cause our own demise, and soon. [info] None [info] 1566968950
Martin_2016 [info] Love? Or something like that.... This isn't your usual love story, tbh i don't even know if this is a story at allAnyways... it goes something like this....John and I met a few years go through our mutual friends at a party. Our mutual love for sports and wanting to succeed in life kind of drew us together. At that point we were really good mates, but not really the closest ones (or at least not how we are now)11 months ago my girlfriend and I split. It was a really hard time for me, as I was going through the breakup. I felt really strange and the things/ feelings that were going through my mind were something I never experienced before. During that time I was also promoted at my job which added more pressure on me. One weekend John was over, he was helping me moving into my new apartment and as I was falling behind with my project at work with the stress from the breakup I finally broke down. Growing up as a kid I hardly cried, not many things could make me angry or sad on the outside, Inside it was a different story...but that day I felt everything that I have kept inside for so many years finally came out of me. John (who I thought at the time was cold and never showed a lot of emotions) just hugged me and stayed with me..That weird feeling wouldn't go away and later I was diagnosed with anxiety. I finally understood why sometimes I was feeling so nervous and why my stomach was hurting for no reason..From that day onwards John and I grew closer..I must admit I was wrong about John, he isn't as cold as I thought and is actually one of the most amazing human beings I have met..Fast forward to this year and this is where I am starting to be a little confused in terms of our relationship so heres the thing...John and I talk daily, we send each other texts with "ILY" or "miss you" or things that remind us of one anotherWe laugh a lot and give each other nicknamesSometimes I would grab his hand (when I'm cold) and hold it. He would hold mine tooDuring our drunken nights we have cuddled and hugged. We have slept in the same bed. I've seen him naked and vice versa.. We hug each other all the time now. I have kissed him on his cheek multiple times, slapped his butt and he has done that to me alsoWe are really close. We fight like a couple and when we fight it really hurts until we sort it out...My anxiety goes through the roof when I imagine him not being there or when we fight. It's really strange I have never had this kind of relationship with anyone!! Especially not with a guy..I don't know somehow I can't imagine my life without him. Is this love? I mean it's hard for me to imagine it's anything else. I don't know what I would even tell him..Or is there many kinds of Love?Martin [info] None [info] 1453746827
Rokelu [info] Possible sleep apnea. Yet to be tested Hello, I am a 23 year old male standing at 6’1 and weighing about 270 pounds. I have made a decision to make great changes to my lifestyle in order to lose weight and be healthier. I am from Ohio and I just recently graduated from college. During college, I gained about 60-65 pounds. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I take Zoloft (I haven’t in about a week due to running out and being on vacation.) recently, I have been having issues with sleep, and I don’t feel tired during the day, but I don’t feel well-rested either. Late last week, I woke up holding my breath(this was after drinking a bit too much wine, I haven’t drank since because I’m trying to cut alcohol out.) It was very subtle but it was odd; something I have never experienced before. I have been told I snore quite loudly by family, but no one has ever noted disruptions in breathing. I have also been having strange and vivid dreams at night. Nothing that wakes me up, but something I remember which could be attributed to my melatonin use as well. Last time I went to the doctor, I was pre hypertensive, but my doc decided not to do anything medication wise. I recently downloaded a sleep app and it recorded a 4 minute clip of my sleeping. I didn’t really hear any breath or snoring due to the noise of my fan, but I did hear myself make a sort of gasping noise 1-2 times during the clip. I also have very bad allergies and have trouble breathing clearly through my nose. My heart-rate according to my Apple Watch has been around 50 for me recently, which is somewhat low compared to my usual low to mid 60’s or even around 70bpm. I usually feel refreshed immediately after waking. I have also been feeling groggy early to mid afternoon, and I feel as if I get tired easily during physical exercise. This isn’t like an out of breath tired, but more like a sleepy tired. I don’t feel as if I have classic symptoms such as throat pain or headaches when waking up, but I do tend to have head pressure throughout the day. I also wear a mouthguard during sleep to prevent teeth grinding, which I do quite often. With all of this being said, I plan on seeing the doctor, but should I be very concerned given my age and plans to make changes to be much healthier? Any advice would be very helpful. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1578334039
giraffeking [info] Do you have anxiety? I ask because I felt the same things until I was diagnosed with anxiety issues, and while I never considered my self anxiety ridden, I found that doing many of the exercises for treating anxiety helped with my self conscious issues, and the other things you mentioned improved because of it.  [info] None [info] 1442430736
bootsstormy [info] I feel like I peaked when I was 9. Buckle up this is a long one.I used to be this happy, fun, and animated person but when my grandma's brother passed away both of my grandparents became a little less happy and their health began to decline. My granny was the first to go. She passed in her favorite chair in the living room after one of her organs busted (I don't really know how she died. That's what I have gathered from eavesdropping. My parents have not told me since her death almost 6 years ago.) The day after her death my mother forced me to go down to their house and spend time with grandpa and help her put a cover over her chair. I couldn't really go down to that house after her death, to many memories and sadness. After his wife's death my grandpa lost the will to live and keep fighting his many health problems. After 6 ish months he became ill with what we thought was tuberculosis. He was soon hospitalized and we couldn't be near him without a mask. I couldn't breathe with the mask on and would soon overheat and eventually pass out so my visits were short lived. I had to watch him wither away in hospital bed while he wanted to die in his home, but my parents thought they could keep him alive longer in the hospital. This was the start of a massive rift between me and mainly my mom, but my dad too. After his death the hospital ran more tests that they could have done while he was alive and found he didn't have TB at all, he had a CURABLE disease that is similar.A couple on months later my parents decided to take a break from each other. Instead of sitting me down and saying exactly that, my mother thought it would be a good idea to go to her parents house without allowing me to decide where and with whom I wanted to live. I love my mom, but she is a control freak, thinks that because I'm her carbon copy we are the same, and doesn't even try to communicate with me or anyone. I cried so much that night I got a day out of school and was taken back to my dad that night. When she went up to my maternal grandparents' house she took most of the belongings from my dad's parents' (talked about before) house with her. After a couple weeks of only seeing her is passing late at night she decided to move into my deceased grandparents' home. She would come up to our house late at night to visit and would always try to get me to spend the bight with me so she wouldn't have to pick me up for school. I did that maybe 3 times in over a year. Like I said before, after my grandma passed I hated being in that house and she knew it, but did she care? NOPE. She also liked to go to the gym instead of visit or help around the farm dad built for her. They got back together after a year,  but things got worse for me. To my dad and outsiders it seems like we're a happy family. After my mother moved back in she expected me to treat her the same. When I was distant with her she would always just try to annoy me to get a reaction and then punish me when I would snap. She still does this nearly 4 years later. She likes to make me her cleaning slave and will push me until I shut down emotionally or my body can't take anymore and I have to stop. She then gets angry at me for not doing what she asked. My mother also expects me to be her perfect angel and never backtalk, fight back at her, never make a scene anywhere, and NEVER let anyone see that I'm not mama's little angel by choice,  but by fear. She's never been violent towards me, but she likes to be emotionally abusive. When I started middle school I began having major panic attacks and would fight tooth and nail to keep from going to that place. I was diagnosed with anxiety. None of the meds worked, my doctor told me to my face I was faking for attention and to get out of school, and my mom didn't care. Dad was sympathetic, but gave me the classic southern grow up and get over it. My mother has been telling me to just deal with it since and has given me no support unless someone is watching. I had to force my doctor to send me to specialists to be diagnosed with several different conditions. My mother isn't sympathetic and doesn't seem to care about the diagnoses though. My mom and I fight a lot and my dad doesn't notice the abuse. He really is the light of my life as I don't have many friends. He thinks we fight because we're to much alike, but doesn't see we are polar opposites and that she is abusive. I'm constantly stressed and unmedicated (by choice). I really just hate my life at this point.I'm sorry this is so long, I had to get this off my chest and internet strangers seem the best way.TLDR: My grandparents died, mom and dad took a break and got together again, mom is emotionally abusive, and I have disabilities. [info] None [info] 1564736849
DatSteveGuy [info] From being crippled by anxiety to being in another country for a month! 4 years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and I was a mess. Basically housebound due to the constant worrying and panic attacks and now I'm in another country by myself for a month! Yes it's hard and I've had my worries about it but today I feel like I've come a long way and I know I've gotten better [info] None [info] 1559421309
Ethanyolo1999 [info] Lots of strange things I have been feeling for a while I have been diagnosed with anxiety and am unsure if this list of strange symptoms are related or something else. Something I have experienced for a long time is very strange, the first experience was when I was say 5, I feel extremely uncomfortable with the inferred transmitters on tv remotes pointing at my body and it is phisicaly uncomfortable to the point where I have to move it, I get funny about lots of these small things and it gets really bad if I can’t stop it. One that bothers me constantly is the fear of cutting of circulation, where I cannot wear tight clothing or even put my wrist over the edge of the table. Another strange thing recently is that my surroundings seem to change, such as distance changing and objects changing size and visual clarity seems to change too, none of these are really distorting or changing anything and don’t effect balance or depth perception. An example of this is is when using my phone it can seem to be closer to my face and and then seem to get further away with like tunnel vision and can appear allmost like HD sometimes (best way I can describe it). It makes it seem as if common things such as rooms I am familiar with seem to be bigger or smaller for no reason. Also maybe not mental health but I experience bad vertigo often, where I allmost lose vision at times just from standing up from the couch. I have spent lots of time in hospital and my blood pressure and heart is healthy and normal.Thankyou in advance for any insight! [info] None [info] 1556448169
Alyssa1206 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD due to abuse and neglect that occurred when I was a child.  I also have some symptoms of body dysmorphic disorder, like I think I'm ugly and can't look at myself in the mirror, but I have never been diagnosed with it. I think it's great that you're going to see a professional - I hope they are able to help you. [info] None [info] 1565556497
princessblueberry [info] Borderlands 2 is helping my anxiety! I’ve never really been one to get into games but when I got into a new relationship with yet another gamer, I knew I couldn’t go back to my old ways like I was with my ex. I took him away from his games and never attempted to try them myself, a massive mistake that I regret and I didn’t want to make again so, when my boyfriend asked if I wanted to try Borderlands 2 with him, I gave it a go. I should note that I’ve never really played Xbox before, so this was a first. I was diagnosed with anxiety 8 years ago and within the last 2 years I’ve been on a massive decline with it and the beginning to this game I was very rocky. Enemies jumping out and having no concept of how to work the controller or play in a first person shooter view shook me, sometimes even gave me small anxiety attacks, to which I had to stop playing to calm down, this went on for a while but 4 weeks later, I find that it’s helping me deal with last minute changes and just general small things in my life as well as helping me be less shit in the game! I got my tax return and the first thing I did was preorder Borderlands 3: Super Deluxe Edition for my boyfriend. Any other games, totally unrelated to Borderlands, that anyone thinks I should try? Again - I’ve never been big on games, but with Borderlands I still can’t play it alone. Looking for suggestions on games I can play some while my boyfriend is at work and I’m recovering a spinal injury! Thanks!** EDIT ** I just really really wanna thank everyone for being so nice! Not that I expected everyone to attack me, but the anxiety of being called names for knowing absolutely nothing about games did cross my mind but everyone’s comments so far have made me feel so welcomed into the world of gaming so thank you! [info] None [info] 1563141293
Scwarletto [info] Yes I was diagnosed with anxiety a while back. I do send a lot of time with them since they work at my school and it's a small school so I stay with them. And thank you for the reply x [info] None [info] 1572726706
lavender_photos [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder at 12. I had always been an anxious kid but I knew my brain wasn't working right when I, a very academically focused, somewhat popular kid, missed over 50 days of school in 7th grade from panic attacks. I would dread going to school and have such a severe panic attack that I made myself physically ill and had to stay home. Luckily I had amazing teachers, parents, and doctors and I was able to pass and get my shit somewhat together but it is still something that affects me. [info] None [info] 1572658804
kuhatelyn [info] Yes! I was able to get accommodations all through college. I did need documentation, but if you have a psychiatrist on campus (or through private health) they can do it for you easily. I went through it before I knew what misophonia was, so I was diagnosed with anxiety. It's not too difficult of a process. If you're just open about it and talk about the symptoms you experience during testing and elsewhere, they can document it and send it over to the disabilities office. Once it's sent over you just have to sign some papers and coordinate with them whenever your classes change. At least that's how it was for my university. Good luck!!  [info] None [info] 1474357578
meet_lgbt [info] Featured Member: jonez450 ###MeetLGBT Featured Member: April 14, 2011#[jonez450](/user/jonez450)&gt;##Stats &gt;&gt;* **Age:** 35 &gt;&gt;* **Gender:** Male&gt;&gt;* **Location:** Melbourne, Australia &gt;&gt;* **Pictures:** [http://i.imgur.com/53Jb0.jpg](http://i.imgur.com/53Jb0.jpg)&gt;##Life&gt;&gt;* **Job:**Internet Editor &amp; Publisher, Company Director&gt;&gt;* **Hobbies:** reading, golf (well once every 3 mths), Reddit&gt;&gt;* **Pets:** 1 spoodle and 2 goldfish&gt;&gt;* **Political views:** left wing socially, right wing economically &gt;&gt;* **Religious views:** avowed atheist &gt; ##What makes you ____ :&gt;&gt;* **Laugh**: Reddit WTF, being able to joke about myself (keeps me sane) &gt;&gt;* **Happy**: being able to help others, being true to myself &gt;&gt;* **Sad**: the state of Government, particularly when it comes to sexual discrimination &gt;&gt;* **Angry**: bad drivers &gt;##Favorite Things: &gt;&gt;I love reading, and learning new things, particularly coding. My business also, particularly when we achieve new highs and create new things&gt;##Sexuality&gt;&gt;* **Orientation:** Bisexual (pansexual really, but I accept bi as encompassing that) &gt;&gt;* **Coming out:** I've come out to some people (close friends), and my mother and partner, not my father, it's the one I fear the most. I'd like to come out more, particularly in public (Facebook and Twitter) but I'm not at that stage yet. Small steps I guess. &gt;&gt;* **Relationship status/background:** engaged. Was married for nearly 10 years until 2009, and have one son. I've had relationships with both men and women in the past.&gt;##Misc.&gt;&gt;- I'm currently working on some new websites to complement our main site, including one big project I'm particularly excited about. &gt;&gt;- I used to write for a very popular tech blog (hint: it was acquired by AOL last year), and have met the likes of Kevin Rose and Mark Zuckerberg, and a pile of other "famous" Silicon Valley types. That's all in the past, but it was an amazing experience &gt;&gt;- I've been diagnosed with anxiety this year, and am receiving treatment for it. Me coming out as being bisexual to those close to me is in part about me taking back my life and overcoming my issues. Being active and helping others is part of that as well; knowing how hard it has been to finally accept who I am means that I now hope I can help others with it &gt;&gt;- I've just joined up as a member of Australia's only GLBTI radio station (Joy 94.9), and I'm hoping to do some volunteer work there, maybe even some on air stuff.    ----You can be a featured member, too! **[Click here for details](/d880k)** [info] None [info] 1302777474
Fuckingplasticbag [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I really can't stand it when people say they have because it's so "cool and quirky", like, no sir it's a mental illness that can ruin your life. [info] None [info] 1574790468
ariesbabeye [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety also. So that might be the reason for my weird experiences just like your experiences.  [info] None [info] 1550686247
Vinstonchurchil [info] Why does marijuana keep away my evil thoughts? Should i/will I use forever? First I just want to clarify I have been on and off marijuana for long periods (both off and on saying this to avoid confusing anyone with the bad thoughts being caused by first time withdrawal symptoms) . I only vaporise it or dab so with no addictive tobacco (it has been over 3 years since I used with tobacco I would say I have been using on and off for 5 years now but within the last 3 years taken a more healthy sensible approach ) I only use at night before bed while watching an hour or so of tv and a very small dosage probably 0.2g max (if flower if I dab it's microscopic lol) I exercise/train early in the morning getting up from 5-6 am sticking to a strict routine, regularly I fast and eat clean/well I don't touch anything fizzy or e numbers I don't drink and infact despise alcohol pork and other drugs my blood sugar level is plumb line perfect and I am above average in most departments of my health at the age of 22 I am what some might call a 'health freak' and not in a arrogant way but friends family and other people at my gym say they want a body like mine(I am telling you this so you don't assume my evil thoughts stem from having too much energy or a poor diet and routine in life) and people who don't know me and see my body and the way I live/eat are completely shocked to learn I am a user of cannabis. now when I have a break I typically like to wait til i go on vacation as I feel a nicer environment than my own is a good way to start stopping then I do so come back home and don't use for months on end the thoughts won't come immediately after stopping they're almost random in timing and consist of things like severely hurting some one that has wronged me badly in a sophistacted well planned way and this could've been years ago and in reality over something not even that major, if I think about these people and situations NOT WHILE HIGH but let's say throughout the day (when I'm in a phase of using) I can almost laugh to myself like why am I even bothered don't be so silly and brush it off forget about it when I am in a non using phase as previously described the very much opposite applies and I don't have to be going through a down phase in my life I could be perfectly happy and fine. Another example is doing bad things for quick money(just want to say I am not poor or struggling and these thoughts are less deep and infatuating than the enemy ones) but for example beating some one unconcious and taking their jewlery for no reason other than I want it it's worth money and I don't beleive they're a good person and may for example assume they have bought it with dirty money anyway( not questioning my self for one second about proof just sticking with assumption) I almost feel how anakin skywalker felt when he started to turn to the dark side.. to myself and my love ones I know I'm a good person and almost convince myself that doing bad things won't make me a bad person. I have looked around all over online but I can't find a situation like mine they're all users that use alot throughout the day or smoke with tobacco or smoke a hell of a lot or just simply aren't anywhere near close to my situation. Some suggest if used correctly cannabis is a great medicine for keeping anxiety at bay (I am diagnosed with anxiety) but in my head I've been doing it for a few years now and I feel like I need to stop to have a clear head for the future or simply to grow up (but I wonder if I think this because it is so demonised and if medicating with it for the rest of my life wouldn't be so bad for my brain) . If it helps at all from a psychology perspective my upbringing I was around alot of violence/ aggressive environments in a poor estate where the only people not struggling  or broke were selling drugs I have had more than your average person would have fist fights coming up all through teenage years mainly just settling issues (I promise I wasn't the type looking for trouble but I wasn't the type to back down or take disrespect and liked to make that clear) I then went on to box and competed at amateur level and was well respected in the community (this tells me I should know better and be more displined when it comes to thoughts of hurting people but I simply can't control them) when I go through an 'off' phase I experience maybe a difficulty getting to sleep first few nights after a few it's fine back to normal good sleep and maybe some restlessness during the first 24 hours of stopping but they litterally stop and go away the only thing that stays when weed is gone  is the thoughts and like I say they don't come immediately and they don't make me feel like I need to use again but it does make me question why I get them when I am in a phase of not using. So I guess to summarise I want to know 1.why do I get these thoughts? 2. Is there a way to train my brain to stop thinking like that? 3. Is medicating with marijuana in small doses at night for the rest of my life okay or am I right to think I should stop forever for the good of my future brain function? . 4. Any other solutions? any other suggestions or explanations I am also greatful for. I appreciate this is very long but I am a socially isolated person and feel this is my best way of getting some answers to start with thank you for your time. For the record I am male 22 years old and live in England UK incase that matters.( also just want to say I have no issues against cannabis or concerning it at all other than its future effects on my brain. I use tiny amounts when I don't feel it enough I take a little break and go back I also take out seperate longer breaks for the concern of constant uses effect on my future brain function) [info] None [info] 1542315603
bellaacapella [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety just recentlythe upcoming school year just terrifies me'I'm going to be a Freshman in high school, the last school year I was being frequently bullied. i don't understand why,though. I never did anything to anybody. I am also afraid of authority figures. I get scared to ask questions or ask for anything, and i would often stress over it the whole class period. It really took a toll on me. People saw i lost weight because i wasn't eating. I was so scared to talk to the cafeteria ladies. Teachers were concerned. They contacted my parents because they thought i was undergoing some sort of abuse at home. erff! summer has been okay. Every time i would buy something at a store, i would have to ask somebody else to talk to the cashier for me. i would get so mad afterwords because of frustration that I can't do anything on my own. I'm taking Omega 3 Fish Oil pills to help with my anxiety. I've heard it helps. Hopes so..  [info] None [info] 1344212177
yumcrackers [info] Questions in regards to possible emotional abuse... Hello, All.I'm a lurker here, as I have long suspected that my father possesses many of the traits that I've read about here, and today he has gone too far for me to keep quiet about.I will preface this by saying that I am a 35 year old female, with a 5 year old son. We do live in the same abode as my father, where I also help to care for my disabled mother (who has her own problems, though likely medicinally induced). I have been diagnosed with anxiety issues (likely due to experiencing emotional abuse and mild physical/non-sexual abuse growing up, as well as PTSD from a very stressful pregnancy).Today, my mother and I were packaging items to sell at my son's holiday bazaar at school, when my father became frustrated that he could not properly view the television. Apparently, the mere fact that my son was moving his body while playing with toys, exacerbated him to the point of physically threatening to "do something to" my son's hand. I happened to be behind him, and informed him, very concisely yet in a calm fashion (dunno' how) that he would not be threatening my son physically again, or that I would be calling the authorities.He then went on a rant, which I was recording on my phone. He belittled my anxiety problem, threatened our shelter, and threatened to turn break my personal property (telephone). Now, I do not pay rent, as my job is to care for my disabled mother while he is at work (whom he has literally left for dead twice on the couch in the last two years when I was not present- once it was septicemia, and the other time it was a sarcoid in her lungs). I have him recorded flipping me off, purposely using infantilism and other verbal methodry to exacerbate my anxiety. Upon threatening my shelter and informing me that I don't pay him enough money (while caring for my mother, working from home, caring for my son, caring for his animals, the home, and purchasing groceries and such that he eats), I handed him my large wallet, which he threw at my back, thus striking my upper right flank.I then proceeded to write everything down as an incident.I apologize for my format and wording, but this just all happened and I'm unsure of what to do. I don't have the means currently to leave (having spent money on Christmas for my son), I can't leave my mother here, and I can't take her with AND support her expensive medical care. In the past he has broken her arm, and neither her nor my brother (no contact with them now) did anything about it at the time, and I was living out of state (I was no contact with them at that time).I'm shaken up, beside myself, and am trying to maintain the emotional strength to keep it together in front of my child.I'm not sure what I'm looking for with this post. Advice, encouragement....I just don't know. I do know that I'm at the end of my rope, have a stomach-ache, and my hands are very shaky. Now he is sitting there acting like nothing happened. My mother, I think, is unable to react at this point. Ugh, guys. [info] ACoN, SG, fleas for days [info] 1481495076
misspulkadot [info] You hit it right on the head: I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Unfortunately, I also have narcolepsy so anxiety meds make me sleepy, N meds make me anxious. I’m a mess! But I actually manage quite well if I do say so myself. I could use someone to talk to though, so a therapist may be in my future.  [info] None [info] 1515800509
BittersweetTea [info] Ugh. My MIL said something very similar when I was diagnosed with anxiety years ago (hadn't even started TTC back then). And she wonders why I stopped talking to her... [info] None [info] 1457405537
Farang16 [info] Anxiety/Masturbation I am 20 years old and I have been on and off Nofap. I have come to the conclusion that no masturbation includes many benefits and outweigh masturbation. The post effects of masturbation eat me inside for a day or two. I am a hell of a lot more anxious, less confident about myself and have no motivation to socialize or do anything. I don't know why I feel this way as I never use to when I was in my teens or maybe i did experience it and just not realize it. Now that I have realized it. It's on my mind and it has nothing to do with anxiety??I am unable to determine if these effects are my anxiety speaking and it's bothering me. The reason why I believe it to be my anxiety is because during high school I would masturbate every night and it would never bother me, I wouldn't even think about it. I can only imagine how much better highschool would have been now!Ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety I have really looked at myself and have since gone to stopping masturbation and I am a hell of a lot more confident. Give me your opinions Nofap. Quick question do many people on this sub reddit experience anxiety and can relate? [info] 26 days [info] 1430556693
Lil-Ackbar [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety yeah that wouldnt surprise me but I actually sort of enjoyed it this time other than the few moments of losing a grip. [info] None [info] 1569111697
meeseekstodie137 [info] I forgot to mention the abuse and I'm worried I got misdiagnosed I've slept maybe 4 hours in the last couple of days, I'm burned out on a full course load of schoolwork and I practically only function on caffeine (on top of anxiety) and I just kind of robotically answered all their questions without providing much information in return, talking about my current social situation instead of my past, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and am starting medication for it tomorrow (currently waiting to pick up the prescription) but I'm certain there's more going on that I just never mentioned to them and I feel like I massively fucked up by not doing that [info] None [info] 1579214840
anontomsly [info] Crush on an internet friend this is going to sound really stupid, and it’s probably going to be kind of long. But anyways, here I go. So I have this fairly new internet friend, we’ve only been talking since around the end of November (2019) and we actually met because of reddit. We’re both 16, he lives in Maine while I live in Kentucky. We’ve bonded through different things and our friendship is pretty solid. However, I’ve noticed that I’ve started to develop a crush on him within the past few weeks. I’ve gotten to where seeing his name pop up in my notifications brightens up my day, and I always want to be talking to him. I know this is bad for me, for two reasons. One, I’m trying to get into a really nice college, so I need to be focusing more on my school work and spend less time on my phone. And two, even if things were to work out with us, I know I couldn’t handle an online relationship. I need a physical connection with an s/o, it’s just how I am. An online relationship would possibly be the worst thing I could get myself into at the moment. (For some background context, I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and I tend to hyper-fixate on things, which can take a big toll on my mental health). I guess the advice that I’m asking for here, is how can I distract myself from this crush? I want to get back to being able to focus on my school work, while still being friends with him. Again, I don’t want to have to completely cut off our friendship, he means a lot to me. Tl;dr I’ve got a crush on my internet friend and I’m looking for advice to stop crushing. (For anyone wondering, I made this new account because I didn’t want him to see this post on my main lol) [info] None [info] 1580211082
lanasy [info] Funny, I mentioned I was diagnosed with anxiety to a nurse during her basic questioning and she said "Oh you just need to work our more". Uh... yeah right, let me remove my abdomen so I can move again, k thx. [info] None [info] 1562950716
Areloa_Grande [info] Anxiety &amp; Adderall I'm 19f and living with my boyfriend. I was diagnosed with anxiety but haven't taken the medicine in years because it didn't seem that severe. I learned to control my attacks and i thought that was the end of it. But ever since I've moved out I always feel like I have to be doing something. I can never relax, I'm always cleaning or studying or just doing mindless tasks to keep myself busy. I was diagnosed with idiopathic hypersomnia 3 years ago and I take 20mg of Adderall twice a day to stay awake, so that may contribute. But I never felt quite this way until I moved out. I am in college full time and working full time, so there is alot to do, but I could be 2 weeks ahead of class work and still have this gut feeling that something needs to be done. I really just need some way to help myself relax. I don't know if getting back on my anxiety medicine would help now because this feeling just seems so wired into my brain. [info] None [info] 1514615665
rgdenis [info] As expensive as a therapist is, go see one right now (assuming you have insurance at the moment) and get as much counseling as you can before you make the move.Talk to friends, and talk to people you trust. I have been diagnosed with anxiety almost two months ago and I'm finally doing A LOT better just by talking to my best friend for about an hour on the phone a day. It seems really tacky and obsessive but from my actions before the help, I don't know how far I could've made it before my thoughts made me lose all sanity. [info] None [info] 1437584825
magpieonfire6 [info] Anxiety - Still Fighting... Around March 2016 I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I went to see a psychiatrist after a period of experiencing weird physical phenomenons like hot flashes, trembling, trouble sleeping and general being on the edge.At my worst, I kept having these many times at work and was afraid to speak to people, attend meetings (part of my job) and deal with issues on production areas (I worked as a quality control office worker) - I just hid in the toilet and tried to remain calm or avoided any interaction with people whatsoever.I decided to seek help and after getting the diagnosis, my shrink put me on 10mg of Escitalopram daily - one pill each morning.I quickly got better, my mood improved, all the symptoms occured very rarely throughout the last year and a half, and even if - I was able to handle it. I didn't however go into any talk therapy, just the pills.Around June or July I stopped taking the pills, first I cut down to 10mg every two, three days, then 5mg every two, three days. Then stopped altogether.For around 2 months everything was fine. In September I experienced 2-3 anxiety attacks once again, mainly at work (new workplace atm, similar stuff, but I guess the new environment is a major stressor for me). I managed to feel better by taking some suplements with tryptophan in it, I didn't want to return to the SSRI.And then this week it all came back after a pretty rough weekend partying (yeah, stupid I know) - uneasiness, fear, the hot flashes, constant worrying thoughts, the tense head, feeling of derealization...I contacted my shrink and she advised me to get back on the Escitalopram 10mg daily and I began to take it yesterday again...I took yesterday off work and today was a national holiday, so I had two days to get my shit together, but at the moment my anxiety is really bad and my head feels completely tense and spaced.Do you guys have any experience of your own with anxiety? How do you cope? How long do I have to ride this out before the meds kick in again? Do you recommend talk therapy? [info] None [info] 1509556729
ChocolateFixesAll [info] \*hugs if you want them\* I can totally see how that image would set you off. A good mom wouldn't rely on a stupid meme to "apologize" for making mistakes. She'd be in front of you, doing it for real and trying to actively change to make things better. &amp;#x200B;Are moms going to make mistakes? Yup. Do real moms feel guilt for that and try to do better? AbsoFUCKinglutely. My kids are 8 and 12 and I apologize to them when I make mistakes or when I mess something up. I am diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks and it's been a rollercoaster. I hate that my kids are having to see me struggle with this and that my anxiety messes things up for them sometimes. Having your 12yr old daughter find you in the kitchen in the middle of a panic attack is probably the worst thing that has ever happened to me and yo know what she did? She put her arms around me and hugged me until the attack was over. That's not something I ever wanted my daughter to have to do,but she did and I apologized to her for it and I apologized for how messed up I've been and that I've been trying to do better. She told me she could tell.&amp;#x200B;If your mom had ever apologized and worked on fixing things, things would be different. But she didn't. So I am here to tell you that you are NOT worthless. You are a wonderful person who deserves to be happy. You are worthy of being cared and loved and I, an internet stranger, care about you. (not gonna say I love you cuz that would be creepy and weird. &gt;.&gt; ) [info] None [info] 1557724890
throwy09 [info] &gt; anxiety and adhd are often confused for one another, particularly in womenCan you give me more details about this? I've been diagnosed with anxiety and Xanax doesn't really work I think.  [info] None [info] 1546622989
Chimerasame [info] Oh yeah, I get you.I've been diagnosed with anxiety by a GP to the extent he felt comfortable prescribing me as-needed medication for it, but I don't know if it's "chronic". I get it sometimes when I go to grocery stores, and when i'm around a lot of unfamiliar or only-slightly-familiar people in a scenario where there isn't a really specific prescribed sort of action-we're-supposed-to-do (e.g. parties w/ like 20-30 people are often bad, but audiences with like 200-300 people are fine).I'm not real clear on where the neurotypicality line is, heh. [info] None [info] 1498591682
Trusty_Sidekick [info] Some people are born blind, or with heart defects, or with any other of the slew of biological short-comings out there. Do many of those people still survive? Absolutely. But do we at least recognize that their abnormal condition is exactly that? Yes. If you had to send two human beings to another ELP to propagate the human race, would you send two homosexual men, or one heterosexual woman and one heterosexual man? There's a biological reason for that. Do I have a problem with non-heterosexual people in society? Absolutely not! I have a handful of gay friends, my fiance is bi-sexual, and a cousin of mine is transgender. I am totally accepting of all of them. But to argue that heterosexuality should not be classified as "normal biological function" is stupid. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD and am on medication for those. Should I be offended if people tell me that those aren't "normal" functions of the brain? Nope, and I don't. I embrace it as a part of who I am. [info] None [info] 1424901227
daisiesandink [info] After nearly 2 years NC, a letter came in the mail... I've been NC with my parents since early 2017. After a lot of self-reflection and therapy, I've grown to now finally be able to call what they put me through abuse (in all senses of the word). I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD over everything, but despite this, have been functioning to the best of my ability to pick my life back up again and move forward. In my last conversation with them I told them the reasons for NC, and informed them to stop contacting my husband and I.Over the years my mother has sent cards filled with money. She used to do the same to me and my siblings with previous attempts at NC- it was her way of trying to bribe me back into her life. In these cards she never wrote anything malicious (she's too clever for that)- just a simple "miss you". It used to really bother me, but now not as much. Once I donated the cash to a child abuse charity. Another year I went on a Christmas shopping spree. But deep down I knew, I'd get ["the letter"](https://www.reddit.com/r/LifeAfterNarcissism/comments/3wlz3t/how_to_deal_with_the_dreaded_letter_what_it/?utm_content=title&amp;utm_medium=user&amp;utm_source=reddit&amp;utm_name=u_daisiesandink) one day. Today was that day.I more-so would like to just share it and get feedback on the ridiculousness of the letter. It's left me shaken, annoyed, angry, depressed, anxious, and somewhat questioning myself, even though I logically know I shouldn't. Here it is (shortened and names excluded for anonymity):&gt;I hope this letter finds you well. I really do hope so. It's been so long since I've spoken to you.  &gt;  &gt;I wanted to let you know the news before you hear it from anyone else. We've decided to move out of state. How can we do that while I'm still working? In June of last year I injured my shoulder and have been out of work since then. ***(I shortened this drastically! My mother spent 5 paragraphs explaining how this injury occurred.)***  &gt;  &gt;Dad and I have been traveling to the doctor and it seems his cancer has gotten worse. He's no longer eligible for the medical treatment he used to get, so we were hoping he'd be eligible for a new drug. Unfortunately, he wasn't, but he seems pretty optimistic about another new medication he's being put on. When we move, the doctors at this new medical treatment center will be taking on his treatment, so we're looking forward to that.  &gt;  &gt;As far as the move goes, we've found a piece of property in XYZ ***(omitted location for anonymity)*** and are having a house build. We'd found a house elsewhere, but it would have a lot of traffic. The contractor says the house will be complete in 2019, so we'll be putting our current house up for sale soon. We wanted to keep the house and let you guys live in it. Let us know if you'd like to do this. ***(WTF?)***  &gt;  &gt;Also, I just wanted to let you know that I put a stop on last year's Christmas check. ***(She sent check instead of cash- I shredded it)*** I was worried it would be stolen last year and didn't want to risk it, so that's why I chose not to send cash. Since it hasn't been cashed, I don't know if you received it or not. So I'm enclosing cash in this letter to replace it, and decided to send this with tracking so I'll know you've received it. ***(I may be reading into it too much, but this creeps me out)*** I'm also enclosing this year's Christmas card and money.  &gt;  &gt;Also, I have massages on my account at the spa. I'm not using them, so I had them transfer them over to your account. ***(I don't have an account anymore so I'm not sure how she did this, if she did it at all)*** If your husband would like some, I can transfer some to him too. Just let me know.  &gt;  &gt;I think about you and miss you. I respect your wishes to keep my distance, however, I hope someday you show up on my doorstep to give me a hug.The things I've taken away from this so-far:* No apologies, no acknowledgements of the abuse* She's putting the burden on me to make amends and rectify the situation (which I don't want- I just want her to stop contacting me)* She says she respects my wishes for her to keep her distance, but if she did then she wouldn't be sending me the letter in the first place&amp;#x200B; [info] ACoN | NC with both parents since 2017 [info] 1540500873
poor_icarus [info] I choose happiness. So I bought the game Fran Bow on steam last Halloween, but I have only finished playing it recently. For those of you who don't know, the plot of the game revolves around Fran, a child who is mentally ill. Her parents are murdered, and she is set on finding who did it. SPOILER ALERT: For almost the whole duration of the game, you can alternate between realities, which means there are several version of what really happened. It really is open to interpretation. It's a very trippy game,  playing it feels like you're taking LSD. Anyway, in the end, despite all the bad shit that happened to Fran, she says that she chooses to be happy, and she goes on to live with her friends that she acquired while on her adventure. It's just a game, but it made me realize that I have the gift of choice. Happiness is an option, not something elusive that is earned. Happiness is already here, I just need to accept it. I identify with Fran a lot, I feel like I can relate to her. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I was on meds for some time, although I keep it a secret. ~~Sometimes~~ Most of the times I see reality through a distorted lens. Through my eyes, everything is usually bigger and scarier than in reality. There are days when I feel the crushing weight of life on my shoulders. Days when it's just hard to even get out of bed and brush my teeth. But all in all, life is not bad. My life is far from perfect, but that is alright. It's fine with me. I can deal with this. I accept all the flaws in my story. I win some, lose some. That's just how it is. You can't have everything. The Buddhists say that happiness is a fleeting moment. And that is true to me. [info] None [info] 1486854620
bigcitylights1 [info] Thanks, I really appreciate that!How does GAD manifest itself for you with also having OCD? I've been diagnosed with anxiety as well (at the same time as ADHD) but I sometimes have trouble discerning what symptoms come from each and start to doubt the diagnosis.  [info] None [info] 1391410144
Che789 [info] This is really insightful, I think many people can relate. I've been diagnosed with anxiety since i was a kid, but I've never really understood how it manifests itself in my life. This might explain my issues with school too, with the fear of accountability for my failure. Thank you for commenting [info] 5'8'' | CW: 110 | GW: 105 | -6 | F [info] 1508314068
streamlinetacos [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 7, and I still haven't learned to effectively cope with it yet.I'm also depressed. I am not on medication, my mother won't allow me.There's a lot to talk about with all of this. My parents suspect I have ADD/ADHD.I'm can also suffer from disassociation at points, especially when I get very low. [info] 17; totally earned this [info] 1452254083
onawall [info] I do encourage him to stand up for himself, and he does tell them to stop, but they dont. And before Jake had said that to me, I thought of him very highly. We had gone to a fair and he had been teasing us because we were fresh in the relationship and were anxious. When we were going home, in the car, Jake had said something about us holding hands. And so we did. After that we stopped being anxious and that led to the next level of our relationship. I thought he was really cool until he said that about me. And I'm not insecure, I'm diagnosed with anxiety and when I hear people are saying things about me it triggers my anxiety. I just want to be on the down low. [info] None [info] 1555358973
SaucySpazz [info] Ah perhaps so! I have been diagnosed with anxiety so perhaps this is a by product of that. Ill work on that first and see where it goes then. Thanks for the response! [info] None [info] 1538685237
rilezzzx [info] Feeling hopeless, doctors don’t believe me I have very clearly been experiencing symptoms of a panic disorder for the past year since I’ve moved here, and have been struggling very badly. Before I moved to the south, I was diagnosed with anxiety and something else after something very severe had happened to me but I can’t seem to find a doctor who will believe me. I was told by my last psychiatrist that I have been making it up/am actually only depressed. Is there a single smart doctor in the state of Florida who will believe that I have these problems and am not just trying to get some type of drug? [info] None [info] 1575997501
mirimiranda [info] My boyfriend (22m) said that he wasn't sure that he loved me (22f) anymore, what should I do? Ok so here goes. I'm a 22 year old woman who is going out with a 22 year old guy. I've been going out with my boyfriend now for over 3 years - we met at uni and we've both now graduated. He's never been the most romantic guy and doesn't really do romantic gestures but I've learnt to live with that and accept that!I graduated a year ago and now have a job at the university whilst he has just graduated. In my final year of uni, I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on medication for this. I have now been off of the medication for about a year but I tend to be quite an anxious person still which can grate on him as he is a lot more laid back than me.We've been having a lot of arguments lately about silly little things (often related to my anxiety as he finds it hard to understand what it's like for me). Last night, we had a conversation and he mentioned that I can tend to snap at him and get quite angry when I'm anxious - I'm aware that I do this but I find it hard not to as my anxiety can sometimes reign over me. He now needs to find a job but is torn about where to get one - back home with his friends or near me. He said that I can take things a bit too seriously sometimes and his friends are more relaxed than I am. He's also just started to learn to drive in his home area and says that this is a priority rather than finding a job (which baffles me quite frankly!)Recently, I've been saying 'I love you' to him but had just received grunts back from him (he had been half asleep at the time so I had just brushed this off as him being sleepy). Now he's told me that he's not sure that he loves me which means that he's less sure about finding a job near me. I don't quite know how to process this information and it's really upset me. I have no idea what to do - I still love him very much despite his flaws and his family seems to love me too which kind of adds a bit of pressure. I really don't know what to do, any advice?Tldr: boyfriend recently said that he wasn't sure if he still loved me and is unsure where to job hunt after uni. [info] None [info] 1473395674
myothersecretreddit [info] My entire life, I’ve felt different than other kids my age. I don’t mean that I think I’m better, just that I don’t really understand why other people do what they do. I’ve always been a weird kid, I struggled to make friends at school, I have really intense interests, shitty concentration skills, and a lot of other stuff. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was really young, so most people around me just found a way to blame how I acted on that.One day when I was 15, I was browsing tumblr and came across a post describing some common traits that people with undiagnosed autism might have. I related to almost all of them. I ended up on a blog full of resources for autistic people, and went through the diagnostic criteria (I’ve always been a bit of a hypochondriac, so I tried to do my research before jumping to any conclusions). I fit the criteria. On top of that, I found out that when I was around 8 or 9, I was actually assessed to see if I was autistic, but we never got the results.I brought it up with my psychologist and she referred me for a neurodevelopment assessment, it took literal years but in August I was finally diagnosed with autism and adhd. I feel like I know myself a lot better now, and if I think something’s wrong, I listen to my worries instead of brushing it off. [info] None [info] 1570744060
KissMyAsthma321 [info] I am on 30mg of propranolol daily, I was diagnosed with anxiety as well. I might have helped a bit, I'd say about 20-30%. But I still sweat so I guess it's a lie of antiperspirant and iontophoresis for me. [info] None [info] 1392581791
mcdona9 [info] Is this an anxiety attack? New member here. I am diagnosed with anxiety. I have ups and downs but most days I can deal with it. However, I have days like today every few weeks where I wake up feeling awful and I can’t shake the feeling all day. My mind is racing and I can’t relax, I feel like everything is falling apart. My heart is beating quickly, my body is moving at 100mph, my chest hurts, I keep needing to cry. I feel completely dissociated from life and not like myself. It’s a horrible feeling that usually lasts all day.I’ve tried all sorts over the years - doing yoga and other exercise, distracting myself with shopping or going out, getting outside, doing hobbies, etc. Nothing seems to help apart from sleeping. Usually I sleep for around two hours and after waking up I feel an amazing sense of calm and like myself again. Obviously, though, depending on where you are and what you are doing, sleeping isn’t always an option :(Is this an anxiety attack? Does anyone else ever feel like this? How do you cope? Any other suggestions how to shake the feeling off apart from sleeping? [info] None [info] 1568648819
tapstar2012 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety before I was diagnosed with ADHD. Your doctor may try doing an anxiety med that’s everyday that helps with general anxiety and then maybe something for panic attacks, obviously everyone is different but I take Prozac (anti-anxiety/anti-depressant) and adderall daily in the morning and then if I have a panic attack or am doing something that I know will trigger one I’m prescribed Xanax as needed. The daily pill really helped with my overall day to day anxiety but I know people are different :) I hope your doctor can help you!!Edit: 1 25 mg adderall ER, 30mg Prozac, 10mg adderall IR if I have long days and then 0.25mg of Xanax for panic [info] None [info] 1572628102
mydogscollegefund [info] Kinda sounds like both to me. I was diagnosed with anxiety after crohns and when I flare my anxiety about how my body will react jumps up and I find myself over worrying about every sensation and feeling. Make sure the people in your life understand your medical condition and that sometimes it takes you longer to get out of the house. I have had to stop getting ready entirely, text my boss or a friend and say “hey I’m sorry my body isn’t cooperating I’m running a bit late!” And nobody seems to be upset. [info] None [info] 1555770067
HowdoIreddittellme [info] It depends on a number of factors: age, comprehension of what they are being told, belief that such abnormalities make someone "weak" or "broken". In my personal life, I was diagnosed with ADHD and Anxiety at 9 and 13 respectively. When I was diagnosed with ADHD at 9, it didn't mean much to me, I was nine, I wanted to watch TV and play. However at 13, when I was diagnosed with anxiety, it was somewhat crushing. I thought it meant I couldn't cope with life, and that I needed help that other kids didn't, that I couldn't keep up.If someone who received the news that they had some kind of mental condition or abnormality was raised in a family that taught that mental illness wasn't to a thing to be ashamed of, that it was ok, they might react like they would if they were told they had a physical disease. However, if you were raised to believe that mental illness meant you were weak, it might be a death blow to self esteem. [info] None [info] 1497444580
theoneeyedpete [info] After I was diagnosed with anxiety, I was very much like this.  I think that was the turning point of us going from constantly having sex to weekly-ish.  Now, I have the higher labido which is infuriating as I don’t feel we’d have lost that rhythm if it hadn’t been me ruining it in the first place!But, it’s good you’ve got others to satisfy you! [info] None [info] 1524179743
GhibliNut [info] Last summer me, my English teacher and a few girls from my class all flew to Europe to tour through Spain and Italy. The trip was fun, but the plane ride to and from was awful. It was my first time on a plane since I was 4. I barely remember my first time flying because I was asleep through most of it. Now, 15 years later, I was diagnosed with anxiety and flying did not help me in the least. I hated how loud the plane was, it made it seem like something was wrong. Then there was the fact that I felt sick to my stomach after ingesting a large mocha from Starbucks. Also, I could feel the plane turn and dip and it scared me. I had to close the shades on my window because it was too scary for me. I also didn't sleep, which I should have, but I was too scared. I was too scared to even eat. I think the only thing I had was that mocha, which I drank at about 7 in the morning, and a snack-sized pretzel bag for dinner. As soon as we got off the plane we had to start the tour, so it was a miserable first day. On the way back, I was sort of getting used to it. I sort of knew what to expect...until we flew through a thunderstorm on our way to a layover in Michigan. The plane would tip upwards, climbing for a bit, then just drop. Then it would climb again, then drop again. It was a violent drop, at least a hundred feet. I thought I was going to die. If it wasn't the plane crashing it would have been a panic attack. [info] None [info] 1393308625
AnArgumentativeBox [info] Nice choice!Out of curiosity is one of those meds clonidine? I was diagnosed with anxiety/high stress and high blood pressure this past year and now mine has me on a couple of things. Im 36 and feel the same way but on the other hand, I do prefer feeling calmer...  That being said, were you a pretty calm person prior to having the surgery and diagnosis? [info] Verified Cardboard Box® [info] 1569842097
throwaway99FW8TB7S [info] I[19M] haven't been able to make any friends since I was 12. I've been diagnosed with anxiety(mostly social) and Asperger's syndrome. I'm also introverted and avoid social situations that I haven't experienced before or that I'm anxious about. I tend to avoid people altogether if I'm particularly tired or in a particularly bad mood. I've never felt the need to go to someone for emotional support.I made quite a few friends in primary school. I had 5 close friends when I left.One guy asked me if I wanted to be his friend in secondary school and I made another friend through him. For various reasons, I decreased my contact with all of my friends and due to this lost all but two of them over the next few years.I went to college for two years and failed to make friends with anyone. Eventually I made about 10 close acquaintances with whom I'd talk and work in the library but they weren't anywhere near close enough to be friends. I was and am really fearful of asking someone out as friends. In my head it feels really creepy and awkward like I'm confessing to some deep secret affection for them and it seems easily misconstrued as asking them out. They all seemed to be well functioning socially so I can only assume they'd have asked me if they actually wanted to be friends with me. Anyway I never worked up the courage with any of them.I'm in my second year of university now and have struggled to form the type of relationship that I made in college. I made two close acquaintances in my first year but the relationships didn't survive the summer break. This year due to some minor differences in the course it's even harder than last year. I haven't made any close acquaintances this year, but due to joining clubs have been able to make more acquaintances. Last year I'd often go 5 days without a conversation whereas this year I rarely go more than 3 days without at least one superficial conversation.I dislike music, loud noises, drunk people, dancing, partying and crowded gatherings of people. I don't use any drugs. I'm not good at expressing emotion. I'm guessing these are major contributing factors with regards to difficulty of making friends.I'm not good at starting conversations, but am mostly alright when actually in a conversation.My friends are both quite far away and since we haven't spoken much in the last few years we've drifted apart a lot. One of the friendships has probably only survived this long because it's turned into a FWB relationship. In the other friendship we often have nothing to say to each other.I'm doing many of the kinds of things that are normally advised on these threads. I've joined some clubs and societies but I'm just meeting a load of acquaintances and I often can't even remember their names. I've changed my diet several times and have started exercising more and am slowly getting into shape. I'm experimenting with doing different stuff with my hair, facial hair and clothes. I'm learning a second language. I'm learning to drive. I looked at Meetup.com, but it doesn't have anything in my area that'd interest me. I've heard that being needy isn't good and it's easier to make friends if you stop caring about it, but I don't see how I can do that with great waves of loneliness coming every few weeks.I'm worried that if I don't do something drastic now then I'll get worse and worse at making friends. I sometimes feel extremely lonely and I long for the kind of connection that I used to have with my close friends. I miss the great times we've had together and would like to have more similar experiences. I'd love to explore sexual relationships more and having a social circle might help achieve this.How else can I change myself so that I can eventually make a friend or two? I don't have the time for a job or more clubs.  ---   TL;DR: Haven't been able to make new friends since well before I left school. Trying to self-improve so that I can make a friend at some point. Would like suggestions on how to do that. [info] None [info] 1484784221
JoyBreaker [info] I dont know what's real or true anymore I some times find my self believing things that aren't necessarily true. For instance, i sometimes feel like im half aware ( dream like ) and then suddenly im disorientated and then hyper aware that say.... im someone or something else, or that i am somewhere i am not, or that im about to be propelled across space. Sometimes i feel like i have just lost my mind, i cant fathom or remember who i am, i feel run down and terrified. I often feel like im going to have a stroke or seizure because im so easily disorientated and i often feel tired/dizzy/fatigued, other times im just very afraid at nothing for no reason for a moment. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and depersonalization but my worry is that i am often believing these things, like i am not me, this person is trying to kill me or that i am somewhere else or reality is not real. I also dont want to bother my doctor with this because i feel like im wasting his time with all my 'worries' i often go to the doctors and leave feeling like i have made a fus over nothing. Also on another note i find it very hard to sleep, i just stay awake keeping my mind occupied on the internet until i inevitably pass out. It has been this way for over 2 years now, im 21 years old and i just want to learn my lesson from this and live my life with the rest of my friends without lagging behind them, always in there shadow being pulled back by this! [info] None [info] 1442009433
douga_17 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety/ocd. My symptoms have dramatically improved since I stopped attending church! The shame from the church was truly hurting me mentally and emotionally. [info] None [info] 1542595285
lostineverythin [info] I literally came on here just now to make a similar post, you are not alone.I've never written the MCAT yet, but thought I could self study and work full time this summer and be ready for August 20th. Boy was I wrong. I felt burnt out and tired by July. I also have immense pressure from my parents, so I can relate to the circumstances. It sucks, but I think I have accepted that I probably won't be able to apply this year. It also didn't help that I was diagnosed with anxiety halfway through the summer and my doctor and I are still trying to figure out my doses. I sometimes just want to lay in bed all day and do nothing, I don't want to go out, or see people or have responsibilities. It all fucking sucks.But this is not the end for you or me. Many people apply in their 30's even. We will have long (hopefully) and healthy lives, and if we really want it, we will get there at some point. Focus on you and do what you need to do. And don't put too much pressure on yourself, it's not healthy, we are not perfect.Just want to tell you that you aren't alone and that everything will work out in the end.edit: I will probably have to take a gap year too, because I am going into fourth year. [info] None [info] 1471141571
WildlingAnathema [info] Mine is a little different from most of the contributions I’ve read so far, so please let me know if this doesn’t belong.I have ventricular tachycardia, which I’ve had for as long as I can remember. When I was little, I would describe my funny “heart stopping” moments, which my family wrote off and we never really told my pediatrician about. When I was in my early teens, I started getting severe chest pains (sometimes a stabbing feeling, but usually like someone was reaching into my chest and squeezing something - my heart, turns out - very tightly). I told my doctor and my parents, and I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder.I brought up my chest pain to three other primary care physicians and lived in a state of near-constant fatigue until about three years ago, when I was twenty-seven. When doctors did look into anything, they mostly provided suggestions. It may be chronic fatigue or MS, no one knew. Mostly, they said I was depressed and anxious and needed to take my meds and practice breathing exercises. During a routine visit, my blood pressure was measured as so low that the nurse was amazed I was conscious (I now know that I often drop under 80/40 when my heart, for lack of medical knowledge on my part, flips its shit and forgets how to function). I told her that, yes, I had chest pain, but not usually above the normal, near-constant level. I only have the stabbing or squeezing pain sometimes. That’s the day I learned there isn’t such a thing as normal chest pain. Finally, testing was ordered, though my primary doctor at the time insisted “it’s just the anxiety, but we’ll do this just to make sure.” Every test after that was “it’s still probably nothing, but your results were... strange.” until I got to the cardiologist. After a few months, I was diagnosed and told I’ll need an implanted defibrillator by the time I’m 35. In the super sensitive cardiologist’s words, since it’s not a structural heart problem, but an electrical one, there isn’t much else they can do and there’s a chance my heart could just stop or go into v fib at any time. It’s basically a bomb in my chest until they put in a device that will zap it back to normalcy when it fucks up.I’ve had a few episodes, mostly fainting, one time when I ended up at the ER because my blood pressure plummeted and my heart was racing and almost stopping sporadically. Basically every day, I might die. Or not. Who knows?TL;DR: my heart is stupid and soon I’ll either be a cyborg or dead. Chest pain is not normal, get it checked immediately. [info] None [info] 1521742863
teestira [info] Anxiety disorder affecting job acceptance? Hey guys just joined this sub as I have been diagnosed with anxiety and given some medication for this week. Side effects aren’t too bad. My question is will being diagnosed with this affect my ability to get a job? I am a park and rec major and am planning on going federal and working in a national park or wildlife refuge. [info] None [info] 1572029413
2SP00KY4ME [info] Having constant gut-drop pangs like if you got a phone call and heard "There's been an accident".. physically painful, like getting stabbed. I hate it. Anyone else have this? I'm sorry if this has been asked before, I searched around a while but couldn't find anything that fit what I was talking about specifically.I get these pains / pangs randomly sometimes that are like the feeling when you find out something terrible happened. Like I said, picking up the phone and hearing a police officer say "There's been an accident", or when your girlfriend of years says "I'm leaving you". It's that sort of gut-drop horrible stabbing anxiety-pain, but it never has a good reason. I can just be surfing the internet or reading or whatever and it happens.For reference, I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and it's been steadily getting worse the past few months / year. Does anyone else deal with this? Thanks.Edit: Also, does anyone know a good way to reduce the severity or frequency of them? [info] None [info] 1452200223
becausepuppies [info] When I was about 17 my anxiety got really bad seemingly out of nowhere and I struggled really bad, in pretty much the same type of way you described.  Here's the good piece of advice that my mom told me: if you have the capability to think that you're going crazy, you're not going crazy.  People who actually "go crazy" aren't mentally capable of differentiating the way they're acting and what's actually normal.   You thinking you're going crazy is scary, I know because I've thought the same thing many times, but rest assured that it's just anxiety, not something more severe. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I saw about a zillion different doctors because I just felt "weird" and I knew something was wrong but I couldn't describe it, that was the scariest part.  Once I was finally diagnosed with anxiety, I was able to educate myself and find ways to help myself.I won't lie, I struggled for years, some worse than others.  But my best advice is to educate yourself on anxiety, it's symptoms, and treatments as much as humanly possible and keep advocating yourself.  Don't let people tell you you're being dramatic or it's all in your head, and  most importantly DO NOT BE ASHAMED. You will get better, you will learn to manage the anxiety, and hopefully along the way you'll learn what I did - that more people than you realize struggle with anxiety in some form, and most people are willing to help you out if you just ask. You may have to go through a few therapists who you don't get any help from, but you will eventually find one that works for you.  Also, don't be afraid of medication--it's what really helped me out.   [info] None [info] 1471628038
Tigerbait2780 [info] Holy shit you're a sensitive little one aren't ya?  I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ADD, and I take stuff for the ADD.  I've almost certainly been depressed before but never talked to anyone about it.  Doesn't change anything about what I've said, and realizing that certainly hasn't "deepened my feelings of trauma and worthless uselessness".  Everytime this gets brought up someone says "well I think I'll trust the doctors over you", which is missing the argument entirely.And why would I ask about treatment before knowing what the issue is?  Seems like that's putting the cart before the horse. [info] None [info] 1520141630
fabulousvooixe [info] I don't know what's wrong with me. I think I'm going crazy. Hey. Female here, 19 years old, "healthy".This last month I've been feeling like I'm not myself. Like I'm me, but on a body I don't know, as if we were two different things. I see things differently, I see my family and know who they are and I know that I love them but somehow I feel like there's some type of "separation", a "wall" between them and me. This happens a few times in a day. The duration of this feeling can vary.It's like... I'm not completely there. Like I'm there, but not there. Like I'm not connected like I was before. And i know this because I get overwhelmed with the feeling of MISSING things like they were before. I feel this way for most part of my days. I feel like there's a difference. When it gets real bad I feel like I'm on a simulation. Like I'm functioning but on a automatic mode. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year and took Sertraline for 6 months and then my psychiatrist took me off of it. Haven't had a panic attack since then. I did some research and found that this could be some kind of dissociation or something like that. I had something like this happen to me before I was put on medication but only two times. It was worse though. I couldn't talk, I didn't feel like myself when I looked at me on the mirror, I would watch people laugh, my parents kissing and I.. could not understand those emotions? They would last for about 30 minutes.This feeling its exactly the same but not as severe. I did not experience any type of trauma. But I hate it. I walk through my home and I don't feel home. It feels like I'm an intruder, like I'm a stranger here. Nothing feels like before. And I cry and cry because I'm scared. I'm scared I won't be the same ever again. I'm scared I'll stay like this forever. I want to go back and I want everything to be like before. I can't concentrate on my studies and I'm on my first year of med school.I do plan on going to see a psychiatrist when this thing with the coronavirus stops. I don't know for how long I am going to be able to hold on. I need to talk to someone who can help me somehow. I feel like I want to die.Sorry for my English. [info] None [info] 1584845055
cola_pop [info] Thank you! I really want to try! I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was separated from my twin sister in school. It really affected me to the point where I developed OCD and kept on washing my hands over and over. I was always a shy quiet kid so I believe ive always had it. Another issue I have with it is kinda embarrassing but I also suffer from IBS which is triggered by my anxiety! Why must I be human :| lol [info] None [info] 1515780052
feathersandanchors [info] I’m sorry. I have been diagnosed with anxiety for a few years now and it’s awful but it CAN get better. I’ve managed really well with diet and exercise along with tools I learned in cognitive behavioral therapy. I have friends that have managed well with medication. There are a ton of options, and you deserve to explore them so you don’t live like this ❤️ sending you love  [info] 25 | WTT #1 | Fall 2020 [info] 1542462292
siggidima [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and before I began taking medication I had very disturbing and intrusive thoughts. Mine were more about me worrying about my family getting killed/hurt or killing myself (even though I didn't want to I still thought about it.)I do recommend speaking to someone. I doubt that you will actually hurt someone but I think it would help YOU and your peace of mind. I knew that I wasn't going to kill myself and I knew my family probably would not be murdered by meth dealers or an invading army but I was SO WORRIED AND TORN UP ABOUT IT! Medication has changed (and probably saved) my life.  [info] None [info] 1490721087
fingersmcgee420 [info] Paranoid Anxiety? First time posting here. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. (Which I already knew I've had for years.) I decided against meds. It's been mainly stuff like "the what ifs". It was always me worrying about my daughter, husband or Dad. Like something will happen to them and I'm not there to help, etc.  Then it turned to me the past few months. I've been getting these huge overwhelming fears about death. About me dying. If it's not that it's super paranoia. I'll come home and see something out of place or read too far into something that my husband says or doesn't say and my mind switches to he's cheating on me or someone is coming into my house when I'm gone. Or I flip out over the stupidest things. It's starting to become more than overwhelming... I need to start mediation or yoga or something. I'm not one for meds, but have been seriously considering them. [info] None [info] 1549577703
2deadhamsters [info] My brother is hateful So I've been diagnosed with anxiety  and have been to a therapist to treat my issues. I'm glad to say that I am getting better. My anxiety is very closely related to my family. I worry constantly about them and if they are ok or not. So I follow them alot and like to stay close/ in my comfort zone . My fucking brother on the other hand likes to make my anxiety worse when he is frustrated with me. Often he will walk off on purpose and push me away. When I become worried and follow him he mostly responds with " go and have a panic attack then" he also threatens to leave the house and go to a random place when we argue. He can never admit when he is wrong and constantly lies to everybody and  himself and blames me lets use a simple example if we are eating he will say I was greedy and ate more. He actually cannot compromise and has to have everything his way. If it's not he will walk away and scare me and also my family. (We are both 15). He's just absolutely hateful but my anxiety means I can not leave him otherwise i will become extremely anxious and have a panic attack. I want to make it clear that I am not a perfect person and I become to angry and aggressive because to be honest I'm absolutely sick of being terrified day and night that he's dead or missing Any time he is scolded he will disassociate and ignore. No emotional reaction no sign that he has changed or recognised where he has gone wrong nothing. It's also like every time I say something he will find a way to disagree with it if I want to go to a castle he will refuse but if I don't he will want to go. If I want to talk to him he refuses. If I don't he will follow me . He has this blunt and emotionless face and is incredibly stubborn. And he knows how to upset me and often insults me and my anxiety even though he has had anxiety an knows what it's like. I'm just done he's driven me absolutely crazy. [info] None [info] 1565899725
carrotocn [info] Unable to sleep again. Hey guys. First time in this sub. Thought i may try typing some of my thoughts as i lay here as a possible avenue of alleviating some of my stress.It is currently 2:18 AM. I begin my work week at 7:00 AM. This is a familiar situation for me, to be lying awake in bed, trying not to make noise or be too restless as to not wake my girlfriend next to me. The stress of work never allows me to relax. It makes me stay awake even when im tired, avoid eating when im hungry, and at least once a month ends with me having an awful breakdown.I was diagnosed with anxiety in November of last year, though it has been an issue dating back to my childhood. Since that time i have been taking medication, now at my maximum allowed dosage. When i started, the medication felt like it was having a positive effect. I could go out in large crowds and not feel as if everyone was staring daggers at me, i could relax on days off. Now, i dont have a moment to breathe. I constantly feel as if im about to burst.My employer is aware of my issues, but obviously missing frequent time for my severe anxiety isnt something they can just deal with. The possibility of losing my job or upsetting my employers only puts more weight on my shoulders. I dont know how in the hell im going to pull myself out of bed and get dressed for work in a few short hours.Any advice reddit? Anything you do to relax when things get this bad? What do I do when im at work and start to get crushed by anxiety?I apologize for being so all over the place. Posting while having a minor panic attack is never a good idea. [info] None [info] 1433143668
bombsuit_cat [info] Finding help post-military Hey everyone,I recently came off active duty in November. During my TIS, I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD as a result of sexual assault.Before my ETS, I was given a 3 month supply of medication but no clue as to find care in the civilian world. I've since come off my medication (Celexa/Klonopin/Prazosin/Ambien/Trazodone) and have nothing. I have a VA disability rating, but I've been offered no help.  Every day gets worse.I'm in the reserves, so I have Tricare Reserve Select. I can't find any answers on whether or not I can just seek care, if I need a referral, or what.  I sought out group therapy on my own which lasted me until March, but I didn't see a doctor to help me with any medications.Along with that, the Celexa simply did not work, so I don't know if anyone has any suggestions. Prior to that I tried Zoloft and Effexor with no luck.  Prazosin was for nightmares, and although it worked it made my already low blood pressure so low that I was having trouble doing basic tasks.Thanks for reading, and all the best. [info] None [info] 1499262167
Macca_321 [info] I'm on the very first day of giving up alcohol for good I've always had a bit of a tough relationship with alcohol. I would drink habitually and often, because I convinced myself it was my only way to relax. When I was with my ex boyfriend, we would often drink a bottle of wine each on a week night, and continue drinking when we got to the weekend. It wasn't healthy or right, but it was our way to 'relax'. But now, some years later, this has been wearing very thin for me. I was diagnosed with anxiety when my ex and I split, and since then, alcohol has only made me feel stressed, down and ill. So now, with a wonderfully positive boyfriend, I have decided to quit drinking. Last night was, frankly, the straw that broke the camels back, when I sat in a toilet cubicle silently crying to myself, after a boozy brunch with the girls. It doesn't make me feel like me. And I want to be properly happy again. Support would be appreciated, as I know it'll be a bumpy ride! [info] None [info] 1554633741
ikerevobsession [info] I have a weird bump on my eyelid and I'm not sure what it is First of all:Age: 19Sex: technically female but I identify as male Race: White (British)Height: around 160cm (5'3-ish) Weight: I haven't checked it in a long timeExisting medical issues: none, but I was diagnosed with anxiety recently Medication: Propranolol (40mg, for said anxiety) Drug use: noneSmoking status: never have smoked never will smokeSo, this bump on my eyelid. I was doing a test in my French class yesterday (29th November) when suddenly, my left eye started to hurt when I blinked. I kept it closed for the remainder of the test so I could concentrate on it. Before, it was just painful on the outer corner of my eyelid and it wasn't swollen. My test started at 12pm, by about 7pm, there was a small, pimple-like bump on the area that was painful, so I thought it was just acne on my eyelid which I didn't rule out bc I have really oily eyelids despite the skin on my face being dryer than the Sahara Desert. Anyway, fastforward to this morning and it's way more swollen that it was the night before. It was literally like I got filler in that one area of my eyelid. It's now almost 4pm and it's less swollen but it still hurts to blink. It doesn't look like a stye or anything similar so I'm very confused as to what it is. Anyone have any ideas? And how would I treat it? Should I just let it do its thing? Pictures can be provided if needed. [info] User Not Verified [info] 1575129816
LorAu [info] It doesn't automatically mean you've a illness at all however it is an indicator that you might have one.  I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder and a form of PTSD. It has to do with the impact on your life but also on how often and how strong/ in what way the symptoms accrue. Self diagnosis is generally not very accurate and I advise against it. [info] None [info] 1573558900
whoninj4 [info] I know this is 16 hours old, but here's my 2cents if you'd like it.It's been about 8 years since I've been diagnosed with anxiety and all 2,920 days of it I have had anxiety on my mind.  Some days are great, some days are the lowest of low.  Sometimes I wonder why all of my days can't be this good.  Other times I'm nauseated, sweating, everything on (and inside) my body hurts and I can't even see straight; and I wonder to God why the hell this happens to me.  Sometimes you're positive that in the next few minutes, you're going to die.For me, it's all about perspective.  Once I got all medically checked out and my doctor(s) were *sure* there was nothing wrong with me, I tried to change my outlook because anxiety is 100% mental.  Why am I doing this to myself? Why do I let myself succumb to this disorder?  I have a blessed life, I need to overcome this.  I've been to therapy every week for 3 years now and I can't even begin to tell you what a positive influence it has had in my life.  There are still good days and bad days, but I'm much more in control over my own thoughts.  It takes practice, and (for me) meditation, exercise and lots of herbal tea helps.Good luck in your life's journey and be happy! [info] None [info] 1357915260
BabyGotBantz [info] Honestly, it probably is. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but crouching down in the bathroom as an elementary schooler, and hearing the roar overhead of the tornado as it passed while hiding under my desk has fucked me up forever. I remember there was a small window in the gymnasium and I saw the sky turn a greenish color before we had to go hide. Terrifying. [info] None [info] 1556660785
esmejones [info] A lot of college makes more sense now. I'd have episodes of that frequently, but couldn't really describe it without sounding like I was losing my mind- which I thought I was. Later on as an adult, I'm diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks (plus some other stuff), and since I've been medicated, that derealization sense has not happened. It's nice to know all that ties together. I'd wondered why that had stopped (didn't mind, just noticed it had stopped). [info] None [info] 1545358309
pobalita [info] Was this a panic attack or did someone drug me? TLDR:  Ended up in the ER last weekend.  Not sure if it was a panic attack or something put something in my drink.&amp;#x200B;Background:I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder about 30 years ago following the death of a parent.  I have minor and manageble panic attacks which happen maybe once or twice a month.  Most of them are caused by something obvious; however, sometimes they come out of nowhere.   I take a few xanax per month as needed.  I've been on longer-term meds a few times in the past 30 years when anxiety is super high (divorce, family death, job changes...big stuff) and causes 4 or 5 panic attacks per day.  I'm not on meds now and have not had any panic attack other than the one discussed below in around a month.  My panic attacks are always pretty much the same - a blast of adrenaline and then crying for a few minutes as the feeling subsides.&amp;#x200B;The story:Last week SO and I went to a bar.  I ordered 2 martinis over the course of about 4 hours.  After about half of the second drink, I went to use the restroom and on the way back everything around me started spinning.  I became very disoriented and had a hard time making it back to the bar.  When I got there, I put my head on SO's shoulder and I noticed that I was mildly hyperventilating.  SO asked me what was wrong and I couldn't answer.  I threw up in an ice bucket and when I tried to sit up, I passed out.&amp;#x200B;SO took me to the lobby where I kept blacking out over and over and had a very hard time breathing.  I felt like I didn't want to breathe and every inhalation was an effort.  I remember thinking that I was most definitely dying.  When emergency help came, I could hear them ask the bartender if anyone had tampered with my drink and asking SO if I'd taken any drugs before taking me to the ER.  All vitals good, blood sugar fine. I threw up again in the ER.  They didn't do much after they found out that I have anxiety disorder other than let me rest.  I fell asleep for a little bit and when I woke up, I had what I would consider a very typical and recognizable panic attack.  I was given a valium for it and discharged shortly after.  My release papers said that I'd been brought in for a panic attack.&amp;#x200B;Does what happened to me in the bar sound like a panic attack??  I had only 1.5 drinks which should not cause me to throw up or pass out from drunkeness.  In fact, I felt fine until I tried to return from the restroom and became disoriented.   I am wondering if it's more likely that someone put something in my second drink?  Something wierd did happen: when I started feeling disoriented, the stranger sitting next to me (we'd been talking him for a while) asked for the rest of my drink and took it.  I don't know if he drank it.  Who asks for the rest of a strangers' drink at a bar?&amp;#x200B;While I don't want to believe that I was drugged, I'm even more afraid to believe that was a panic attack because it was really scary and I don't ever want it to happen again.  No panic attack has ever left me disoriented or vomiting or passing out.  Not ever.  Also, this was absolutely out of the blue - nothing had upset me or scared me.  In fact, we had been having a really fun evening.  Nothing about it was familiar: no adrenaline, no shaking, no crying.  Just fading to black and back.  No panic attacks since the ER visit either.&amp;#x200B;Has anyone else had a panic attack remotely like this before or does it sound like something else?  I'm not sure how to cope with the feeling that this could randomly happen to me again.  Any advice appreciated.&amp;#x200B;edited to add:  the period of time that I was blacking out and vomiting was about 3 hours. [info] None [info] 1550105174
godofwine2016 [info] Is it normal to puke when anxious? I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago. I've always gotten bellyaches &amp; headaches, but now I actually start vomiting. I take 20 mg of Prozac daily. Does anyone else have this or should I ask my med doctor? [info] None [info] 1501902279
name_schmame [info] Hello everyone :) I'm new to reddit and this sub seems like a welcoming place. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year but still feel kind of embarrassed about it.My favourite way to relax is to play the Sims or clean the house. It's very clean right now! [info] None [info] 1462261594
anxiousthrowaway839 [info] Anxious compulsion to eat own skin. I've been diagnosed with anxiety for years, but when I am under severe stress I feel the absolute need to eat the skin around my fingernails and the bottoms of my feet. I'll just rip skin off with my teeth and chew on it. I looked it up once and there are people with conditions that will eat the skin off their fingers, but the photos and stuff were seriously gruesome compared to what mine look like. [info] None [info] 1525801208
throwaway1j5vd9g7 [info] Please help me analyze some of these symptoms. I don't know what my next step should be. Over the past year or so I have begun to struggle with the need to do something repeatedly, or for an exact amount of time. These urges present themselves without warning, and can be extremely overwhelming. It started with the need to smile in the mirror in my bathroom at night before I shut the lights off. If I broke the smile before the switch went out, I had to do it again. This eventually evolved into needing to smile in any mirror or reflective surface I passed, no matter where I was or who I was with. The phrase "bad luck" often ran through my mind, even though I have never been superstitious. As the months went by, I found myself feeling the need to run my fingers through my hair, or pump the soap bottle exactly seven times. If I missed the mark I had to go up to the next multiple of seven. Once, I pulled all the hairs out of my arms with a pair of tweezers simply because I started and couldn't stop. It took me over three hours. Then I started having horrible mental images that wouldn't go away. Specifically, the feeling of getting a paper cut on my face or neck. This sensation would be at the back of my mind for days, and then it would simply go away for a few weeks. When it was the worst, I couldn't function at all without constantly flinching and covering my face and neck with my hands. I have been diagnosed with anxiety problems and subclinical ADHD. I have hinted to my parents that there may be a different diagnosis there but I never talk to them about any of this because I never thought I needed help until now. Please tell me if any of you have had similar symptoms. I need to know if I'm overreacting. (Unsurprisingly, I am also a bit of a hypochondriac.)Edit: I have read that OCD often starts during adolescence. Is this true? [info] None [info] 1348527295
Potaterkiller [info] It is embarrassing but I had to sleep in my parents room until I was around 13 as well. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 17. My thought processes were all screwed up, I was having trouble interacting with my friends, I generally hid out and felt awful most of the time (the anxious adrenaline feeling). I would really suggest reading some Buddhist texts and some Dao books (preferably by chuangtsu) to help you calm down a bit. With me, I just one day clicked with my parents and was done with all of that. However recovering from my anxiety attacks and learning to control my heart rate took many years and I had to accidentally discover college courses of religion through core requirements. I hope you can find reassurance in  your life and begin to look up from here on out! [info] None [info] 1360228393
captaincharcoal [info] Panic attack or stroke?... Need serious help 3 months ago I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Ever since the diagnosis I've had 2 panic attacks, all which happened during school. My most recent panic attack occurred last week during school. I was in school and the aroma of weed really got to me. I threw up (I have emetophobia, so you could imagine how much of a wreck I was.) Here's the thing, I've always had this fear of vomitting. My stomach lacked all the necessary vitamins I needed so I ended up missing school the next two days. On Thursday I stayed home and felt relatively normal. That was until my tongue randomly went numb. I ignored this for awhile and continued on with my day. That was until it grew even more numb, so I ended up taking a Tylenol. Later on, the entire right side of my body went numb(including leg, arm, and face.) I could no longer stand the lack of feeling so I thought taking a warm shower would revive some feeling. Boy, was I wrong. Here's what happened: The shower was relatively hot. I entered in the shower and out of nowhere I got this bulging pain at the very back of my head. I could NOT breathe. I tried gasping for oxygen, but I just could not breathe. I collapsed to the ground, grasping onto my chest all whilst the right side of my body was numb(note:my hands were purple.) All of a sudden, my face did this unusual stretching(not sure how to explain it, really.) Basically, the pain literally felt like somebody cut off my oxygen supply. My mom bolted into the bathroom and considered taking me to the hospital. We ended up not going and instead saw my doctor the next day. I told my doctor all that happened, but she went on about me experiencing a panic attack. here's the thing, I know what a panic attack feels like. What happened on Thursday night did NOT feel like a panic attack. My doctor then told me it was in my head and that I need psychological help. Honestly, I feel like I had a stroke but no one else believes me... Reddit, I seek your help. [info] None [info] 1363489348
RyanJKaz [info] I’ll start by saying that I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder/panic disorder about 4 1/2 years ago. I also was found to have a vitamin D deficiency about three years ago and my question is this: [info] None [info] 1576678024
xBordlampe [info] Emotional Support Animal for anxiety? Hey, I hope you're all having a good day!I've been looking into getting an emotional support animal, but the problem is that it's not really a thing where I live. I was diagnosed with anxiety in october, but had it like this for years, just didn't know.   I just wanted to hear your experiences with emotional support animals, or any info that could be useful. &amp;#x200B;Thank you &lt;3 [info] None [info] 1547580570
Your_God_Chewy [info] I was single all my life until a few months ago. I was diagnosed with anxiety about 2 years ago, which explained why high school was so brutal mentally. I met my girl at school, got her number by making some elaborate study group for anatomy/physiology for the sake of getting her number, and asked her to join, and stayed persistent and she said yes to a going out with me. It turned out my girlfriend has anxiety far worse than mine , even though she's chill as fuck, funny as hell, and drop dead gorgeous. Some girls out there who you would think would totally be out of your league are just as nervous as you are. Tl;dr, accept your nervous as hell, but she might as well, and know that every time you choke and don't go for it , there's one more possibility of missing out on the love of your life. Getting shot down is better than never knowing what she would have said if you tried.  [info] None [info] 1397236863
abisue1994 [info] [Help] I was recently diagnosed with an anxiety disorder and I'm having troubles quieting my mind at night especially.  I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD inattentive type this summer. I haven't had the chance to start on any medications or therapy since I've been visiting my dad in another part of the country all summer. I'm heading off to my freshman year of college in a matter of weeks and as the semester creeps closer, it's becoming increasingly harder for me to avoid worrying about it. Reddit usually offers a perfect distraction, but the worrying won't subside tonight. I'm just wondering if there are any tips you guys could offer me to just get me to sleep tonight. Thank you! [info] None [info] 1343629280
helpthrowaway158 [info] I [26F] no longer want a relationship with my Brother in Law's [25M] Girlfriend [25F] after revealing to him that she cheated, but she wants to be friends again I posted once before about a separate issue regarding these two which didn't get a lot of response. When I posted last I withheld the information about cheating because it wasn't relevant to that question. Now it is.Earlier this year my Brother in Law's (BIL) [25M] Girlfriend [25F] of nine years revealed to me in confidence that she had exchanged nudes to a coworker of hers. I was a little tipsy at the time and played it off like it wasn't a big deal as she has told me pretty personal things before, but when I sobered up I freaked out, as this is a male coworker she had previously gushed highly about, saying she was "really in sync" with him. In contrast, she talked and treated BIL really poorly.I told my partner (who is BIL's twin) and he said to wait and see if she would tell BIL herself. When I asked her about it she would say she had no intention of telling him ever (*"It would just make him needlessly paranoid"*) and would often then talk about her coworkers again.Knowing the secret made me feel awful. Every time she mistreated him at a family function (belittling, hitting, etc) I would feel sick to my stomach and I'd go home and get frustrated that no one had told him. My mental health took a serious downturn. I hated being near these people.My partner finally told his brother in August, and he was understandably upset. BIL talked about breaking up and selling their house. A few days later he sends a message to my partner saying that he and his girlfriend are "working on their relationship" and that "this is what [he] wants." My partner said he respected that, even though we were both hoping it would be over. We also both received a message from BIL's girlfriend apologizing for any stress she may have caused us, but that they are going to move forward in their relationship and wants our friendship/relationship to go forward as well.--but I can't go back to the relationship I had with either BIL or his girlfriend. I can't forget all the cruel things she said about him (being boring, not wanting to spend time with him, preferring her coworkers to him), and even *outside* of those comments I didn't really have fun with her as a person. She's very passive-aggressive and has different values (she's big on buying things, while I was raised poor so I can't really relate to her constant conversations of "--so I'm buying ___ and ____ next week!"), and I have been diagnosed with anxiety, which doesn't go great.So I talked to my partner. It was a long discussion, but he agreed that while he wants to have a relationship with his family, I'm not obligated to. So I've stopped going to the family functions, which has raised eyebrows because they were kind of considered compulsory. I've since received a second message from BIL's girlfriend, requesting that we meet up so she can apologise in person and we can "talk this out." She added she "understands if I'm not comfortable" but insisted that she really wants to see me and resume our friendship.All I sent back was, "I am not comfortable with that at this moment. Thank you for your understanding."There's a friend's wedding coming up which all four of us are going to. The friend called my partner today and said that BIL had contacted him and asked if my partner or I had requested I change seats so I wouldn't be seated next to the girlfriend. When the friend said that we hadn't made any requests he asked BIL why (as he did not know about my no longer being friends with her) and BIL said, "I'll tell you later. I'm just a little annoyed with [partner] and [helpthrowaway158] right now."My partner is continuing being supportive and says that I don't have to explain myself to BIL or his girlfriend, but I'm now nervous about this wedding we're all going to be at, as well as the future in general. It's fine if BIL wants to pretend that nothing happened, it's his life and relationship, but I feel like he wants me to pretend too so that life is 100% back to normal, and I honestly can't stomach that.I'm honestly just after any advice. If BIL comes knocking demanding why I won't be friends with his girlfriend anymore, what do I say?TL;DR: BIL's girlfriend cheated and I was involved in telling him. They're still together but I no longer want to be friends with her, and BIL is getting irritated after she reached out to me and I declined. [info] None [info] 1538891585
hpVoodoo [info] My shelf had been broken for 10 years before I realized it. I grew up in a Utah Mormon family, where the only thing that mattered was the church (seriously. Direct quote from my father when I asked if we could talk about anything else at the dinner table. I was 9). My father was elder's quorum president or Sunday school president for most of my childhood and he loved church history and trivia (we took many church history "vacations" growing up. I lost my last baby tooth at Carthage jail shortly after he had scraped some blood off the floor and put it in a ziplock bag as a souvenir). I learned so much about the church, I often stumped bishops and seminary teachers at church and scripture trivia games. Still, some things never felt right to me. I questioned everything as a child and my father hated it.When I was 15, my father went to prison for sex crimes relating to minors (to this day I can't bring myself to look into the actual charges). Our next door neighbor and family best friend was on the council for his excommunication. Everyone in the ward gossiped about it. My mom continued to participate in the ward and told us to ignore the gossip. The summer after my sophomore year of high school will leave me forever changed. my father had converted to the church at 14 (the rest of his family is catholic, I always tried to do child missionary work on them) and I discovered he was excommunicated at 21 for similar crimes while on his mission. The day my father baptized me he had been released from county jail after being arrested for voyeurism (he also didn't actually confirm me a member of the church in my confirmation). I learned my father wasn't present for my birth and did not bless me as a baby, also because he was in jail. I learned he had been excommunicated a total of 4 times, all relating to sex crimes. We later in life found out he had molested my younger sister. I broke down deeper than I have in my whole life. My heart continues to break for her. ( I still wonder if I experienced it as well. I have repressed much of my childhood do to my father's anger problems and physical and emotional abuse. I'm not quite ready for hypnosis therapy- I'm not sure I want to know.) I felt my whole life was an awful lie and was so ashamed for so long. How could he be so hypocritical? How could he tell me nothing else in the world matters outside the church? He lied and destroyed my family my entire life without me knowing it. I became angry with my mom, with the church, with the prophet himself. How could my mom stand by and let this happen? (she struggled every day of her marriage, but was told by bishops and stake presidents to stay with him for the children and it was her job to hold the family together. She protected us. She kept his secrets for 15 years. Someday I'll tell her story. She's my hero.)  How could God and the church forgive him after being excommunicated 3 times before? How did the bishop/ stake president/ prophet allow this man to be sealed to his family, attend the temple, baptize his children, give father's blessings, and hold callings knowing he wasn't worthy of his priesthood? Was I really given the blessings of baptism if my father didn't have the authority to give them? It made me question my own worthiness now that all my blessings had been falsified. My bishop reassured me that Heavenly Father will still bless worthy receivers despite the worthiness of the giver (how convenient). I clung to the hope and scripture that God knows the hearts of man and will judge in the next life according to their actions in this life, and also the formula for forgiveness- but I can't forgive my father 490 times. I just can't. And neither should the church.He wrote me weekly from prison for 3 years, apparently having some kind of mental breakdown. He was often visited by the Holy Ghost, Joseph Smith, and Moroni and receiving revelation (but wait, don't you lose the Holy Ghost when you're excommunicated? I can't even comment on the others). I struggled with these letters for years and stopped responding when I went to college. After he was released he found me at school and broke every boundary I tried to set for him. He was on the news for a week after one of his voyeur stunts was caught by a security camera. He made me crazy. I lost control of my emotions and relationships. I was diagnosed with anxiety, PTSD, and early childhood trauma (secretly telling me sexual abuse is probably down in there somewhere).  I am still constantly looking over my shoulder for him. My family members who are still in contact with him are forbidden (yes, forbidden) from discussing me with him.The day my mother received a letter from the first presidency for my father's petition to get his temple rights reinstated was the day I realized that I couldn't do it anymore. I couldn't be a part of a church that put so much emphasis on the family and then allow families to be destroyed- not only mine, but his victims' as well. I couldn't be a part of a church where these kind of crimes (I'm past saying "sins" at this point) are committed and then forgiven over and over.  How are child molesters allowed in the temple and not partial tithe payers? I realized that for the last 10 years I had known the church couldn't possibly be true for these reasons alone. I started doing more research on church history my father taught me as a child. Lies. All of it. It was no wonder my father identified with Joseph Smith so much- the similarities outweigh the differences. I feel so much freedom in knowing that I don't have to live in anger and resentment anymore. I see my 3 other siblings on their way out too. My mother is still very much a believer, but I won't try to take any of it away from her (I majored in anthropology- I'll let people believe what they want to believe. Some may consider this enabling, but I consider it respect for my mother. It's her way of coping with her own trauma). Many conversations with my boyfriend; who grew up Mormon, served a mission, and also questioned; revolve around church lies and growing up with them. He introduced me to the CES letter and to this subreddit, and I have "feasted upon your knowledge".  I think the thing I miss the most about the church is being a part of a community. I have found a resemblance of that with all of you. I've been lurking for long time, so I feel like I need to get my story out there. It's very cathartic. Thank you. [info] None [info] 1483813641
stillhavehope99 [info] I still have love for my abusive father (Trigger Warning: abuse, violence, suicide threat)&amp;#x200B;I'm a 20-year-old woman who grew up in an abusive household. My father was physically and emotionally abusive, mostly to my mother but sometimes to me and my sister too. He put his hands around my mother's neck, threatened her with all manner of horrible things (including a knife, which my mother no longer remembers), threw her to the ground and repeatedly kicked her in the back, punched her hard enough to give her a concussion, would threaten to kill himself as a way of controlling her, threatened to crash the car with all of us in and would drive dangerously...Once he held me at the top of a very tall ladder leading into the attic and threatened to drop me. I was six.&amp;#x200B;I would list all the bad things my father did, but it could fill a book. Suffice to say it, he was not the best father. My mother and father are now in the process of getting divorced, and they live on opposite ends of the country. My dad doesn't take responsibility for anything he did - he believes that mum "made him that way" and would "turn him into a monster", and whenever I see him he badmouths my mother and tries to turn me against her. Sometimes he gaslights me and tries to convince me that things I remember happening didn't happen, or happened very differently. &amp;#x200B;My mother, my sister, and me have been deeply effected by it. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, CPTSD, and OCD (the OCD being a coping mechanism I developed to deal with growing up in that house). My sister also struggles with mental health issues and has been vulnerable to similar relationships with similar men. My mother's self esteem was completely broken down by the violence, and she believed for a long time that she was worthless, because my father treated her like she was. &amp;#x200B;I still love my father.&amp;#x200B;For a long time I did not. From the age of 12 to about 18 I hated him with the passion of a thousand suns, and planned to never speak to him again after I left home. But hating him took so much energy, and I was too tired to be mad at the way he treated me or my family anymore. I broke. Now we're in contact and sometimes we have a good time together, though it's usually tempered by his outbursts or gaslighting. I know he isn't a good person. I know he's done irreparable damage to me and the people I love. I know he'll never accept responsibility for it, or apologise, or change. I know it hurts my mother that I'm still in contact with him and she feels personally betrayed. And yet, I still have love for my father. Sometimes I feel sorry for him because he was himself abused as a child, even though I know that is never an excuse. &amp;#x200B;Is being in contact with him enabling him? Betraying my mother and sister? Should I cut him off? [info] None [info] 1563709099
appa4494 [info] Getting anxious when weekends are almost over. But then I’m fine when they are. Hey all, first time posting, I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago, I declined any medication bc I’m in the National Guard. I wouldn’t say my anxiety is severe but it’s bad enough to where I cannot do any kind of public speaking.When my weekends are close to ending I can’t seem to do anything I enjoy, I constantly freak out that “I don’t have time for that”, “I can’t do that” I don’t really know how to explain it but it’s just a constant feeling of uncomfortableness and I feel bad. When I go back to work though I’m fine. Just curious if anyone else has this problem?It’s even worse when I have to go to drill, omg I have this constant feeling of dread like “goddammit, this and this is gonna happen” but when I get there I’m fine. [info] None [info] 1572457668
bitchnumber24 [info] I didn't think disliking small talk was indicative of introversion. I was under the impression introversion was more like disliking meaningless smalltalk with no lead into more meaningful conversation. and needing to recharge with alone time after interactions with others. I used to think I was just shy and introverted because I abhorred small talk and the prospect of chatting with strangers. I couldn't even order a fucking happy meal on my own when I was a kid. Im pretty sure it was anxiety that kind of leeched to be some kind of social anxiety. I've been diagnosed with anxiety so that's just what I think. I also believe that I *am* an introvert but not because I hate small talk - more because after mingling with people, I need a quiet space to just "be" and collect myself before facing people again. let me assuage you thought, being an introvert is NOT WRONG. you are not a worse or wrong person for being an introvert. disliking small talk is understandable. I hated it because it felt so unpredictable. (maybe you've heard this before but) it gets better with practice. I started by observing my friends and other random take part in small talk. Walked around my town to buy things and listened to what people talk about. I practiced with my friends (they didn't know, I was just trying out some small talk lines lol) and it got easier. Don't let what that guy said get to you. those words he used are offensive, but I bet he just didn't know how to understand so he got scared. People tend to be silly like that and reject what they can't understand. you're okay. Okay? :) [info] None [info] 1401033699
AnonNeedsDocHelp [info] NAD, but had personal experience with the same muscle tick when I was going through a stressful time. I was diagnosed with anxiety and prescribed clonazepam.  It helped me out. Good luck with finding out what works for you. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1564105773
ninadiloreto [info] bad flu after flu shot i’m 16, female, 5’6”, and about 135 lbs. Last Friday (currently Monday morning), I got the flu shot. I have had reactions to the flu shot before, but this is horrible. I feel cold when I’m hot, all my body muscles ache and I don’t want to get up or move because of it. I’m also having horrible headaches and nausea, but no throwing up. The fact that I’m not sure why this is happening is giving me constant panic attacks (I am diagnosed with anxiety). I know some people have reactions to the flu and it’s kind of common, but those reactions are supposed to last 1-2 days and it’s currently been three for me. My parents are calling the doctor today. Can anyone help me understand whats going on? I need to ease my mind. Thanks. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1569831456
that1girl01 [info] Also, goes without saying that I have been diagnosed with anxiety and obsessive thinking. [info] None [info] 1536613997
sterling2424 [info] 16 [M] looking for a friend Let me just start out and say my name is Sterling Hurst. I live in South Carolina us. I'm looking for a female or male just to talk to. I have anxiety I have ADHD. I like to fly fish and I am a mechanic so do you want to be my friend DM me. I really don't have very many friends in South Carolina because I'm the weird kid I used to play American football I miss that so much but right is the football season started I was diagnosed with anxiety and that didn't help any and I spent most of my days over the summer fly fishing doing carpentry working on my car. [info] None [info] 1573450589
SBNP95 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety an panic disorder, I know literally all about it. These are not anxiety attacks. These episodes are literally caused by Joy an excitement, I'm not saying that maybe I am wrong, an you're actually right. I just know that even with a family history of anxiety an panic disorder, the early onset of it was brought on by me overdosing at age 16, before that I had never felt anxiety or any of the sorts, but these episodes I'm describing have been happening since I can remember. [info] None [info] 1556240416
-Perchta- [info] Ok thank you. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so you are probably correct. I was only able to eat a small amount last night so I’m going to try again right now. [info] None [info] 1569324234
SeanBoykins [info] Tips for Iona? I’m trying to get into Iona to see a doctor for a medical card. I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past and currently have a regular prescription that I was planning on bringing in to prove my condition.Is this enough to bring to get approved for a card? Any other tips for Iona? [info] None [info] 1579527784
Texan1786 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and am medicated for it.  I haven't taken my medication in several days tho.  Could that be it? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1478653823
kristystianwin [info] whether you need therapy or not depends on the therapy.I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder with autistic features and for me therapy is about learning how to deal with situationsit's more like a dry run of social situations, like learning when I get too deep into a topic that nobody is interested in or doing small talk with colleaguesmy doctor also said that pills were only the last measure, if therapy really didn't help me. [info] None [info] 1305302165
atruehomie [info] I am a freshman in college. I was diagnosed with anxiety and potentially mild paranoia a few years ago. The paranoia was mostly as a child throughout grade school. [info] None [info] 1400275801
Blue-Lynn [info] Started caring about my mental health. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 13 and had frequent panic attacks into adulthood. After really paying attention to my thought patterns I slowly learned to first accept my anxiety for what it was and how to be patient with coping and learning healthier patterns. I'm 23 now, don't have any attacks and know how to better deal with life. Trust me when I say you are worth taking care of  [info] None [info] 1495413499
itstheamandashow [info] First I wanna say thank you for sharing. It’s okay to admit you have Aspergers. It’s okay to feel like a fraud at first. When I was diagnosed with anxiety I was like “oh great another college girl with anxiety I’m such a cliche” but after a while I came to terms with it and advocate for anyone who suffers like we do. It’ll take time, but you were strong enough to seek help, so you’re definitely strong enough to continue on with your new outlook. Remember= mental illness doesn’t define us, it refines us.  [info] None [info] 1552036486
hashtaggaysfortrump [info] How is that “transphobic” exactly? He removed an executive order made by Obama that let people who never were mentally fit to serve into our millitary. I’m gay and support trans people but if I got denied because I was diagnosed with anxiety why should they qualify when they have a mental disorder and a 40% attempted suicide rate?  [info] None [info] 1511161313
nanaberries [info] I (F23) fell for my therapist (26M) it’s our last session soon Since I broke up with my long term boyfriend a bit over a year ago, all has gone downhill. I was fucked over by a few guys I met on dating apps, and generally mind-fucked by the easily disposable nature of *being* on dating apps. I was diagnosed with anxiety and disassociation recently, then got help with counselling. The counsellor got me to open up, made me feel things, made me want to cry. Our most recent session we were talking about sex, how I’d felt about it. Masturbating - if I had felt sexy. I wasn’t really sure why he was asking me this, but I assume he was seeing how I felt about my sexuality as I’d been raped and sexually assaulted before. I told him it was purely mechanical, simply a distraction.  He’d been accepting my baked goods every week, but asked me why I baked him things this time, to which I said because I liked him - and when probed further, because I felt guilty. He didn’t accept the bake this time and said he didn’t want to enable the behaviour anymore, to which he placed his hand on my hand (with the baked good) for a significant amount of time. I got brave. I asked him if anyone had ever professed to him, and he said no. So I told him I had developed feelings for him. He told me it was transference. He walked me out the door. He said because it would be our last session next time, he would accept anything I gave him. How do I act on these feelings? [info] None [info] 1548969703
Lost_in_redditland [info] Thank you for commenting. I have been having sleep issues for sometime but it hasn't been this bad since when I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2013. I just was super scared with the suicide ideation because that hasn't happened in such a long time and now that these intrusive thoughts are popping up, I thought I need to write it out somewhere. Reddit has been a lot of help, I made this account in 2012 when I had my breakdown and although I used to post a lot more on my throwaway, the main account reminded me that I was lost and it was okay to be lost. Anyways, I just need to make sure that the part of my brain that is trying to cope is just a little stronger than the part that is trying to drown out any feelings. It feels good to be able to completely honest about what is going on with me. Since I could not sleep last night, I tried listening to a sleep podcast/story on youtube and it did work! Maybe that could help you too. [info] None [info] 1499169637
MrSwanson2UMN [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and apparently I've had it for a very long time. I go to therapy and have both a psychologist and a psychiatrist working for me to dose medications and work on long lasting methods. Honestly, the second I started taking Zoloft in combination with therapy and meditation I just don't care about what people think as long as I think I am doing the right thing and being a decent person.   [info] None [info] 1431504343
MeganIsACat [info] I agree... kinda. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so I know what it is like. I think people without a diagnosis should not be using it as an excuse at all, therefore I agree with you about that. I do not however agree with your opinion if a person is diagnosed. If they are, I think the person has a right to be able to say that they can't get something done because of it. [info] None [info] 1538264502
Pinklotus22 [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety and a panic disorder. I pass out when in extreme emotional/physical pain. I thought this as well. I really related to Kendra in this episode.  [info] None [info] 1531093973
Treeseconds [info] That description seems like me but I have been diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety?  [info] None [info] 1531321324
mappy700 [info] What can I do to get help for my anxiety, medically &amp; financially? I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2011. Since then I've seen many councilors and doctors but not many seemed to help. My anxiety has gotten a bit better, but its still debilitating. Because of my symptoms, and general inability to function well in public, or socially, outside of a few situations I'm ok with- many of my doctors and councilors have told me that I am generally unfit to work until I've gotten more help, and that doing so would be counter productive to my health &amp; progress. I agree with this after seeing how school went for me, attending daily made my anxiety go out the roof, I was constantly sick, tired, I stopped eating &amp; drinking, started sleeping 20 hours a day and became heavily depressed.  Because of this and my school refusing to make accommodations I was forced to drop out of high school. I am now working on getting a GED. I'm currently seeing someone who's going through Cognitive Behavioral Therapy with me, but there's a lot of pressure from family and "friends" that this process is not going fast enough. I am currently going through a rough patch where I'm unable to get into cars, buses, and a general fear of going outside, on top of all my normal anxiety I have daily. This happens sometimes and my family always views it as proof i'm "getting worse", even though generally, things have been getting better. I paid for food with a debit card in front of a cashier for my first time in years recently, so that was a positive. (I usually have friends pay and then pay them back, or I use self-checkouts, because I'm afraid of interacting with cashier workers). So that's where I am right now with my anxiety.  I am also very healthy, I eat well and I work out daily, I maintain a healthy weight, I have a sleep schedule I stick to. I do all these things people say will "help" but I am still stuck in the same place, mentally and physically, as my symptoms are often painful and debilitating (cramps, vomiting, diarrhea, migraines, hot flashes, chest pain, ect). My current doctor (doctors keep leaving my town, so I've had 3 in the past few years) is quite ignorant so just getting her to refer me to the person I'm seeing now is tough. She told me I just needed to "work doing something I like" and my anxiety would go away. That's obviously unrealistic as we all have to do things we don't like everyday, and we can't all work the job we want. I have tried to get her to help me by referring me to people who might be more helpful or aiding me in getting financial aid but she refuses. I live in a small town and have no way of seeing any other doctor. I've been denied now twice in my attempts to get financial aid. I live with my mom and we're struggling to pay our bills. My dad still helps support me a bit despite the fact I'm an adult now, but is threatening to stop because he believes anxiety isn't real and that his "tough love" will force me to work and make my anxiety get "fixed". He is a very negative influence and makes my anxiety worse but right now I have to stay in contact with him because without his support my mother and I would likely be homeless. Does anyone have any suggestions of what I can do in my situation? A person I could call or talk to, or something to demand from my doctor to get more help? Or a route I could try to go for financial aid? (I live in Canada) Are there any programs out there that help people like me &amp; recognize that we're just as sick as anyone else? I want to add as well that I am adamantly against the use of drugs- so I am not taking medication, and am not interested, ever, in doing so. I am only interested in counseling and therapy, and finding a way to support myself in the meantime while I get help with how to live with anxiety. So please to not suggest to me I ask my doctor about x or y medication. [info] None [info] 1531259050
aquaboyh20 [info] [this is Gus](https://i.imgur.com/vn6SkRI.jpg). He is a plott hound and was a rescue from a pit bull breading and fighting house. They pulled a few of his front teeth. So eating is a challenge and messy. He is the sweetest boy though. My kids climb all over him. Me 1 year old pulls all over his ears and lips. All he does is lick her face and walk away. He typically chooses which one of the older girls he wants to cuddle with at night.He became my ESA dog back in December when we rescued him, as I was diagnosed with anxiety and a few other things. He is about to go to training to be a service dog. He loves all people and he'd rather be with me than be home by himself. He loves to run in the open field behind our home and be a turd and jump the fence and run off for a few minutes, then come back proud of himself.Upon request I can upload more pictures. He's a very serious dog. Rarely smiles lol. Except when he's running off in a field or riding in the van [info] http://www.amazon.com/registry/wishlist/2B4KFFIWZZWC [info] 1550984241
9797298 [info] Constantly doubting myself - self appearance I was diagnosed with anxiety last year at the beginning of summer and have been on citalopram for it. I no longer take it and recently over the past couple of weeks I've started to feel really anxious again. My anxiety is focused around my self esteem and I constantly hate the way I look and who I am. I feel guilty about the smallest of things and people don't seem to understand me at all. I've found that its making me snap at people and have constant mood swings which I can't control. I am constantly looking at other girls who are attractive and it makes me feel like im worth nothing, its as if I am comparing myself to everyone else. Does anyone know how I can change this mindset? I am so fed up of feeling like this because I just want to not care but I cant [info] None [info] 1511460605
Sillyskinvessel [info] Those who have experience with psychiatrists I am well aware that no one here will truly have an answer for me, but I seek opinions anyhow. The 31st I will be going to a psychiatrist. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 11, but only went to counseling and have coped over the years without meds. I'm a female, 23. My mom passed three months ago and my anxiety has increased tenfold. I have panic attacks and cannot sleep. I cannot shut off my brain or control my thoughts and worry about everything. I have slight muscle spasms in my neck too. Is anyone aware of what the doctor might prescribe me? I have recently in my life tried benzos and find that they really help when taken responsibly (I am aware of the addiction possibility with benzos). I am wondering if anyone knows what I might be prescribed with these symptoms?Unfortunately, my mom was an addict, she used meth and crack. My brother is an alcoholic and so was my grandpa. I'm afraid with this info, the psychiatrist will avoid giving me benzos. My primary had prescribed me Buspar (and klonopin) and I hated the buspar. Made everything way worse. Klonopin was great.I am sure it's cliche to say I don't have an addictive personality like my family, but I don't. I have used drugs and for periods of time and never had any issue stopping taking anything. Even benzos. To be honest, I was a wreck when my mom passed. Regularly took a lot benzos for almost 2 months and cold turkey stopped. (Not smart, I know) But I didn't have any issues with withdrawing nor have I been feining. But I am aware of what they can do for me when I do take them as prescribed. Anyways I'm done trying to explain myself. Thanks y'all. [info] None [info] 1500978006
positivityonlyplz [info] Feel like I can’t make it through this Edit: the title was supposed to say we talking about my boyfriend and I oopsHello everyone this is a throwaway. Two years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and ocd bc I would knock on wood, wash my hands, do stuff hundreds of times etc. the worst part though was constantly worrying that I had cancer. It lasted about 6 months until finally one day, dying wasn’t on my mind anymore. I really don’t know what I did to stop it but it happened. The next year my mental health was amazing. I was consistently happy and I got into my first relationship with someone I love so much. I had a job I loved and I was on track to finish my degree. Then the trouble started. I graduated in May and I had to quit my job because I was going to be starting at another school that didn’t work with my schedule. I don’t have a job at the moment but I am looking for one because I only have class twice a week and sitting in my house makes my ocd so much worse. About a month ago I remembered that my boyfriend told me that he lost his virginity to a girl I can not stand. It never bothered me in the past, mostly because I just never thought of it. But now I’ve become obsessed. It’s the only thing I can think about. It makes me not want to touch him or kiss him.  We’ve talked and he tells me he never thinks about it and if he does it’s just regret. It’s hard because I know that it doesn’t matter what he did before he met me but now I feel like it’s the only thing I can ever focus on. Then I start freaking out that I’m never going to feel the same way about him again. I love him more than anything and I don’t want our relationship to be ruined by this :( The worst part is I feel like it doesn’t even bother me it’s just my ocd making a mountain out of a molehill. Can anyone relate? [info] None [info] 1536867214
anxietycheesecake [info] Going on Disability/SSI? I'll try and make this short. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 7, it got to it's boiling point at 15 when I transferred to an online high school, I never went to college because my anxiety developed into agoraphobia, I can't even leave the house sometimes for days on end. Currently, i'm diagnosed with generalized anxiety disorder, agoraphobia, panic disorder, and OCD.I'm 21, live with my parents, and I need money to live, i'm not sure what to do at this point. My question is, to anyone familiar with being on disability, do I have enough medical records/evidence to get approved? I'm scared of putting effort into this and failing at yet another thing in my life.In the past year alone, i've seen 6 therapists. Probably 10+ in my life. Most of them, i've only seen for one or two visits, with the longest being 5 visits. They just never seem to help, but, does me only going for a short amount of time contribute to the notion that i'm not 'trying' to get better?I've been to the ER at least 5 times in the past couple of years, due to panic attacks. I've been to the doctor more times than I can count, due to thinking i'm always sick. I haven't tried daily medication because that's part of my anxiety, i'm afraid of almost all medications, even advil.I just don't know what to do at this point, there's seemingly no jobs out there for me. I can't talk on the phone, I have no experience in anything. Does anyone have advice for me? [info] None [info] 1470388075
Miyenne [info] I [33F] have been working for my boss [65M] for over a year. I want to leave, but am afraid to. I've been working for my boss for over a year now as an office manager for his family owned and run company.He hired me based on knowing me from a previous job and because of my attitude and personality, knowing I didn't have office experience. Well, it's been a huge struggle. He just stopped doing his paperwork for years because he didn't know how. I came in and had to figure it all out on my own, he didn't know how to train me. I've got everything running quite smoothly now, if I do say so myself.But he's an evil, cruel man. Now, my mother was rendered disabled 12 years ago. It's a horrible thing and it changes a person. Makes them angry. Depressed. They lash out. It's terrible and it tears people apart. But we got through it. My mom's still disabled, but okay now mentally. I love her again. For a while, I didn't.Now, this is another reason my boss hired me. 5 years ago a drunk driver hit him. He's disabled now too. And he's still in the angry hateful phase. He treats his customers and suppliers horribly. He treats his employees so badly (and illegally, as in if you work overtime you don't get paid for it because he didn't say you could or he lowers people's pay when he gets angry at them), that no one but his sons have lasted more than 3 months for him. I get verbally abused every day. Sworn at. Berated. Insulted. He has to find something wrong with what I do every day. The other day he couldn't find anything wrong with what I was doing, so he focused on how I wrote the labels on the files. I didn't write high enough on the label tabs for him. He lectured me for literally 5 minutes about how I have to write as high as possible so he can pull the drawer out and see every individual file name without having to reach for it. He will straight up contradict something he told me to do a week ago too, if there's no other easy target for him. One week it's file everything alphabetically. The next it's put files together that would logically be together. I've spent days reorganizing bankers boxes of files from 2008 because they're not sorted right, nevermind I had nothing to do with these boxes before. Never even seen them before. But I should have *known* to go through them all and sort them. Yesterday he was questioning a charge on his credit card, so I looked into it. he ordered adobe to be renewed annually last year. He's like "I wouldn't have bought this, are you sure you didn't? You must have." Except the date on the receipt is from before I worked here. Even after showing him that, he said "Are you sure you didn't do it? I wouldn't have. Why did you order this?" And got upset with me again. I couldn't even argue.I suck it up because when he's not here it's a good, easy job with a completely flexible schedule and it pays very well. And I like his sons, the ones in the process of taking over the company. I work really well with them. But they all admit he'll never let go and know it's not worth fighting.The man is never wrong. No matter what you can prove otherwise, he's the type that is never wrong. You simply can't argue with him, he'll just talk over you louder and louder and with more obscenities until you give up. This is how he conducts business too. It's shameful.He texts me all hours of the day and night and on my days off to berate me too, or make me work from home. Every time my phone beeps or rings I cringe and a wave of dread sweeps over me. Sometimes I even have someone else read the text first because I can't handle it. So my friends and family have a good idea of how he treats me because they've all done this for me.I have enough money to leave and get by for a little while. I share an apartment with my sister and she's urged me to quit saying if she has to, she'll support us both just so I get away from him. Everyone around me urges me to leave. They say I'm a different person now. Bitter, sad, edgy. I know since I started working here I've been diagnosed with anxiety. It does interfere with my life now. My back and neck muscles are always so tense I'm always in pain. I've been having stomach issues too because of the stress. I've had a period for three months long now due to the stress.But if I leave, I don't want to give notice. I don't want to face him that angry. If I leave, I will say goodbye, pack up my stuff and never talk to him again. He could withhold my pay, but our accountants do direct deposit and I get on well with them. So I could just send them my hours as they stand (I do all the payroll otherwise and tally and send in the hours) and be done with it.I know I should leave. Money isn't worth this degradation of my mental health and my self. But I will be letting down his sons, who I do like. I won't get paid this well elsewhere with my lack of experience (though I do have a job interview this afternoon).He's also paying for a college level accounting course for me. I've only just started it last week. It would look great on my resume. But I'd have to stay for 4 more months to finish.I guess my question is, should I give him notice, or just walk out one day? Walking out on him could bring down legal repercussions, but I doubt he'd go to that effort. But with the illegal things he does I'm not so sure.Or do I suck it up and stay?I know I'll never get a reference, but that's fine with me.  ---     **tl;dr**: My boss is a cruel man, I want to leave but am afraid of giving notice and spending two weeks with his fury. What dhould I do? [info] None [info] 1481220210
berttney [info] Just an anecdone, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD, and there's a tendency for adhd stimulant meds to increase my anxiety, so the best treatment for me has been finding the right strain/dose of kratom, which also happened to help with pain. I used a green strain at lower doses (3g for me). Keep an eye on the ban, and what we can do for kratom to help others. [info] None [info] 1475278180
DerpyTheWhale [info] I feel like I've been taken advantage of Disclaimer, I'm a high schooler. I'd like to think I'm mature for my age, but I know that's what most high schoolers think.I'd been dating a girl for about six months. She, unfortunately, lives a few states away from me, about seven hours away. Still, we loved each other.I thought we were gonna spend our lives together. We'd go to the same college and move in together afterwards and get married. Everything would be great. We clicked on everything.Then, on July 7th, everything changed.It was seven days after our six month anniversary. I was preparing a gift for her- late, but it was a big gift. A collection of inside jokes and things she liked. It was going to be great.It was a day like any other. I woke up, wished her good morning via text, played Speedrunners with her for a few minutes, then went and saw a movie with my family.Once I turned on my phone after the movie, I saw a text. A long text. A text telling me we were breaking up.It was kind of a shock to me. She's a pretty shy person and it didn't seem like distance had bothered her during our time period. We were happy together. The last month has been the worst month of my life. So far, anyway.She was my first girlfriend. I'm 16, she's 15. I wasn't prepared. It feels like my life's been yanked out from under me, the girl I thought I'd be spending my life with now probably interested in another guy.We've remained friends. She'll still flirt with me every couple of hours, I'll follow suit. Hoping she'll someday be willing to commit again like I am. I've been diagnosed with anxiety. Not the kind that kids my age claim to have all the time, but actual anxiety. It's plagued me for a few years now, but I've been able to cope with it. It's been at its worse this last month.At night, I have the same nightmare over and over again. About losing her to someone else. In the daytime, I watch her drift further and further away from me. I can't blame her. It just makes my life hell.Recently, she's been going through a lot. A death in the family. It's tough for her, but I've been trying to help her through it. This is the part that pisses me off the most.I've been helping her cope with shit for the past month like I always have. I'm just trying to be nice. I don't want a trophy, or a shiny little certificate. I just want to be treated like I treat her.She's been ignoring me for four days.We've talked every day since December 31st. I don't know why she's ignoring me now, but I think she's met another guy. There's a lot of evidence towards her meeting another guy and a lot of evidence showing she's choosing to ignore me.I'm a little mad. Just the idea of her pushing me away because she met someone else. Sharing our inside jokes with him (which, if she exists, she has). Playing the games we used to play with him. Being physically there with him.I feel taken advantage of, to be honest. That might seem neckbeardy, but I just want an explanation, you know? I just want her to tell me why she's ignoring me or the real reason why she broke up with me.I'm not like this usually. I don't know why she wouldn't want to talk to me, but I'm glad I've gotten this out.Thanks for reading. Sorry for rambling. Good night. [info] None [info] 1470701950
nsq88 [info] Top secret clearance in army? Hey guys I have a question regarding disqualification from top secret clearance in the army. I want to enlist with 35M or 35L MOS but it requires TS clearance and I have a couple questions about that. I have read that if you had a history of anxiety but it was related to a specific event and that issue is currently resolved, you can still get clearance but I’m hoping for advice from someone who has actually been through it. I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2015 when my SO of 6 years left me for another gender, killed my dog, and then I found out I had a breast tumor all in the same month. It was a lot to go through as I lost my person, my home, my dog, and honestly thought I was going to die of cancer at 21 years old. Tumor turned out to be nothing, eventually I just realized that my ex was a piece of crap and I’d be fine and I moved on with my life. Found a new partner that isn’t a jerk, started going back to school, and I’m now healthy. My only issue is that my anxiety was formally diagnosed. It’s not an issue anymore but it is on my medical record as an ongoing health condition so I’m not sure if that’s going to disqualify me. I have heard if I don’t say anything to a recruiter or at MEPS I would be fine but there aren’t many answers regarding Top Secret clearance specifically. I just want to do this the right way and not get screwed. Any advice would be appreciated. [info] None [info] 1556862963
cookiesk [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and my therapist thought me how to meditate. It has changed my life. Now, I very rarely get anxiety attacks. So, yes I would say that it can help you. :) [info] None [info] 1374939095
oddestowl [info] Yes!I have been diagnosed with anxiety because I actually was anxious. I felt wrong and I knew it was stemming from my mind. It was absolutely a mental issue because I was worrying about things for no reason and I couldn’t stop it. I have also been to the doctors and said “I feel anxious, I am not anxious, but these sensations are anxiety. I am a fairly self aware person and I do not feel anxious in my head, these feelings are stemming from my body it is happening symptom first what is going on?” and I was told I was just suffering from anxiety and was not actually self aware enough to be making that call, my head and body were tricking me. I didn’t really think it was true but I am really used to being brushed off by doctors so I sort of went with it. But those sensations make me anxious through association with anxiety and make me feel like maybe something is horribly wrong with me and doctors are ignoring it because anxiety is such an easy diagnosis (especially once it’s already in your records). Since being diagnosed with hEDS this yearI suspect it is POTS or something because I have a lot of symptoms and I am currently awaiting referrals so we shall see! [info] hEDS [info] 1571647708
crookgang40oz [info] Stomach issues (Again) I’ve posted in the sub before trying to find out if anxiety can cause stomach issues and I got some good answers, but it seems to be getting worse. I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2014 and for the most part I’ve been able to keep it under control for years up until all this crazy COVID stuff started happening. At the beginning of the lock down, I’d say about a month or so ago I started to get really anxious and stressed out due to the fact that I lost my job and I have a baby on the way during a pandemic. I noticed that it was effecting my stomach, I was losing my appetite, my stomach was constantly growling and I was altering between constipation and diarrhea. It all seemed to get better after I got my anxiety under control. For about a week I was fine, I was able to eat, my stool was normal, and I started to gain weight due to being home all the time so I thought all was good. Then about 2 weeks ago I woke up in the middle of the night and my belly button felt like it was being ripped out of my body, it was sensitive to the touch but it went away after I got up, stretched and used the washroom. Now ever since then, I’ve been dealing with constipation, diarrhea, stomach cramps, and undigested food in my stool. I went to see my dr and he said there isn’t much he can do since most testing for diseases and viruses has stopped due to COVID. He thought maybe I have IBS because of my anxiety so he told me to pick up some meta mucil and probiotics but none of it has been helping. I’ve basically gone vegan because I thought maybe it was all the take out I was eating but nothings changed. I took some pepto to help with the stomach aches and diarrhea but all that did was turn my stool a really dark green color. I’m very stressed out and I don’t seem to be getting any better, I’ve looked up a lot of home remedies for IBS and other stomach issues but nothing seems to be working. I’m pretty scared and upset at this point, I have a baby on the way and I can’t get sick before she comes. I have an appointment with my dr tomorrow morning but like I said there’s not much testing he can do at this time. I’m posting this because I want to figure out wth is wrong with me. Diabetes runs in my family so maybe it’s that? Maybe I have an ulcer? Crohns? I honestly don’t know. [info] None [info] 1588282320
My_Beloved_Ice_Cream [info] In my opinion, you should just go talk to a psychiatrist and find out what it is and try to fix it without pills. Sometimes just talking is all you need. I have the same kind of word confusion as you do, and it is frustrating. I do feel like I must be rain damaged sometimes.. But I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD, that's all, and I made it better through a little meditation. Pot desensitizes you, so after you get clean and give your brain a chance to recover, it might start to get overactive. Think of it like a search engine running full speed. As you type in a phrase, the engine suggests all kinds of words for you. I don't believe in ADHD, and a lot of people disagree with me on that.. (Soap box) somehow i think it would be very difficult to keep some types of very smart people in a standard classroom. In kindergarten, all the kids are hard to handle, curious, noisy etc... they tried to diagnose me with ADHD and the doctor really swore to my mom that I needed to be on pills. They did that with a lot of kids, put them on meds that made them feel like zombies. when all they needed was more stimulating information. In my opinion, your brain is so hungry for information and emotion, that it is acting like a little kids sponge like brain, and it's just soaking everything up, trying to take in everything that you've been missing in the high school years. When I get stressed, I get like this, but I use it to my advantage. It allows me to cover a lot more information when I study, and I focus more when i want to. It sounds like you're really smart, you just need to focus your mental energy towards something useful. But again, talk to a psychiatrist.. (sometimes you can get a "Free trial" from the state but im not sure how to do that without acting out and getting in trouble)Try to stay off the meds though, unless you really really can't focus. There's nothing wrong with thinking a lot.. you just have to be functional [info] None [info] 1389932908
Psychedelic-wizard69 [info] Thanks man I have been diagnosed with anxiety so I like to think the worst sometimes and I can tell you lsd can be a very intense thing! The trip really scared me. My doctor thinks I might have PTSD so I’m going to try EMDR therapy to help put my mind at ease. I just over think a lot [info] None [info] 1565116892
Introvertpotato [info] Need help I was diagnosed with anxiety weeks ago and I recently started taking medication. I am very confused because I feel like crap since last night. Ive been feeling nauseous since last night and last night my mind feels noisy even though I am sure my mind was clear. Is that normal?? [info] None [info] 1540217740
hopeless_artist [info] Never written anything on reddit before, but your post made me want to reply. I am working on the self love thing right now. I am a 22 f starting my senior year of college. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 12 and oh my gosh the places I have barfed over the years. Not to mention the situations I have gotten myself into because I can’t say no. I am a people pleaser to the extreme, basing the entirety of my self worth not only on how other people view me, but on how I think they view me. I like to mind f myself like that. Anyways, I could relate to a lot of what you said. Wishing us both happy futures. ✌️ [info] None [info] 1567445935
waffleshuffler [info] Yea, I'm going through the same thing. Shortly after college, I started getting anxious in situations that wouldn't even bother me at all before. It was so strange and confusing at first and I was worried that I had contracted an illness. Turns out I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Its very common apparently when you face the real world after you leave your parents home or graduate college. I just can't believe I can't get my confidence back at all. It's incredible how hard it can get back to the way I used to be. [info] None [info] 1524244429
YourMiserableLife [info] This reply might be a bit late for this post, but hey. I'm an ENFJ. I'm extremely social- served as public relations head for a youth organization; had a background in theatre; and briefly worked as a personal secretary to a business dude, who's life is literally "work hard, play hard." Two years ago I went into isolation, was always just in my apartment with my boyfriend. All I needed was inside those four corners- my boyfriend, my dogs, and my computer. I didn't need to go out- both work and school were now done online. Those two years have completely changed me- slowly I became uncomfortable outside. I started hating being in a crowd- the pandemonium of noise stresses me. I also began to feel left out when I was with my friends- the only thing in my head was a countdown till I'm home again. Things turned for the worse- I had an attack in a public place,and was rushed to the hospital. They checked me for everything but they didn't find anything, so I was advised to go to a psychologist. A panic attack they said. So yeah, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Have been taking meds since the panic attacks are extreme and unprovoked. I lost a lot of friends because I didn't wanna meet up and bond. I kept the diagnosis a secret, because I was ashamed... how can an ENFJ, a social butterfly, ever end up in this state? I was ashamed to tell my friends and family of what I become, it's too far away from who I was just a couple of years ago. Just this year I am trying to embrace it. I want to accept that I'm a socially awkward ENFJ who has an anxiety disorder. I just want to accept me, and have friends who will accept the new me. The point of this long reply is that YOU SHOULD ACCEPT WHO YOU ARE. ENFJ'S can have anxiety, and most of the times is because we are afraid to disappoint others of who we become. We are anxious because we know we are uncomfortable, but we don't want that friend or stranger to feel awkward too.The social charm of an ENFJ will always stay there, so don't worry. However, if you really want to turn your social life around, you have to first accept who you are. Then take little steps outside your comfort zone. Don't aim for your past social life, that isn't you anymore, it will just stress you out. Pick one or two friends and tell them the truth about what you feel. Promise you, it will feel so much better getting this out. Then ask that friend to hang out with you every now and then. Pick a place where you will feel comfortable- a movie night at home, drinking some lattes in a quiet coffee shop. Then once you feel comfortable enough, increase the difficulty. Try going to somewhere new and a bit less comfy. Don't push yourself, you have limits and should embrace that, so take this slowly. Make a schedule for this little "trips" and stick to it! Aim to do this at least once a week.Finally, keep a journal! Write how you feel. This will totally help you, I promise. The format that I use is this:Date:Location:Degree of Anxiety: (Rate it: 1 is lowest, 10 is highest)What are you doing?Are you alone? If not, with whom?Thoughts before this situation:During situation:After situation: (usually I cheer myself up that Ive survived the situation)What would you suggest to yourself for improvement?Every time you are feeling uncomfortable again, just read this journal. Reminding yourself that you have accomplished similar social situations will make you feel more confident that you can and you will. :)Super sorry for this long reply but I hope I have helped you! Please tell me your progress if you can! :) I'm also just training myself to go out and be with other people, so I know your pain. Hehe, and I promise it gets better!  [info] None [info] 1498715233
Cainmak [info] Dreams make me feel weird Have you ever had a dream that made you feel weird and uncomfortable whenever you thought about it afterwards?It happens to me from time to time. I have really vivid dreams, the most recent ones being about some kind of big family gathering at the countryside (which is uncommon for my family since right one there are only 7 of us and we kinda lost contact with other relatives). After waking up, whenever I think about those dreams I feel sick, anxious, like I'm in danger. It got to the point that going to bed in the evening has become a source of anxiety rather than relaxation.I guess I feel weird after leaving my family home. Right know I'm renting an appartment with my boyfriend. I still cannot comprehend that this is my "home" right now, I still use my parent's address in resumes, correspondence, etc... It feels like college when I'm waiting for the finals to end to come back home for the summer. This 'leaving the nest' feeling has triggerred my dreams. I did some research and found out people with anxiety tend to have feelings like this (the dream part, I mean). I was diagnosed with anxiety and will probably talk with my doctor about it. But right now I just wanted to talk about this unsettling feeling. After that I'll probably talk to my boyfriend and maybe watch something funny to feel better. [info] None [info] 1516568304
Hartextra [info] Landlord called two abusive family members I never wanted to think about again I’m 22 and left my abusive household when I turned 18. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 11 and PTSD when I was 14, but the abuse continued for years. I have been struggling to survive poverty on my own. My rent is late this month because, poverty. When I signed my lease, I had forgotten that my landlord required me to put family contact info. I gave him my “grandma’s” name. I was escaping a living situation where I was unsafe (boyfriend was a meth addict at the time) and put down real info. I can’t believe I did that. It was the only landlord that would sign me that day so I could escape when things got violent. I resigned my lease with him because I was too poor to move.Turns out he called my “dad” and my “grandma” looking for money. I DID NOT PUT DOWN MY DAD’S NAME. I remember this clearly now. I NEVER put my father’s name. I only put my grandma’s. I hate her too and she shouldn’t have my address, but it’s not as scary as my dad having my address. However, she gave him my dad’s work number (it’s a local hospital).I got a strange text from my landlord that said they love me and to forgive them. I called immediately and said he had endangered me and that I didn’t remember even giving him the info. I signed that lease almost two years ago. I feel like such an idiot. He told me “I don’t believe for a second that you’re in danger.”I’ve been so depressed lately and barely able to function. Now my alcoholic father knows where I live. He who, among other things, asked multiple different men throughout the years to live with us. His friends. His pedophile friends. When I was 16, one of them attempted to groom me (I’d already been assaulted and raped before, so there wasn’t too much work to be done).  He said he wanted to be with me and would take me out for coffee (how does a 30 something date a 16 year old?) Then one night he gave me lots of wine, put on Lovelace, and removed my clothes. He tried to rape me, but I’d managed to text my friend, saying he needed to come to my house. He scared that man and I ran out of my house not even fully clothed. I was too ashamed that I had been drinking and wasn’t dressed or had shoes, so I didn’t tell my grandparents or go to the police. I don’t remember where I stayed, but the next day I told my dad that “the one rule you gave him, he broke.” That man was kicked out.Yes, the one rule my dad gave that man was to not sleep with his daughter. He’d had a conversation with his friend about sleeping with me. That alone sickens me. He would talk about me sexually to his friends all of the time. He set the stage for them thinking it was o.k.A few months later I turned 17, and another of his life-long friends moved in. This one opened my door, came into my bedroom and announced that he would be living with me. My dad refused to put locks on any of my doors the entire time I lived there, and I didn’t do it because I was scared of the retaliation. This friend of his asked me to watch penny dreadful with him. As soon as I sat next to him, he put his hand down my pants. I felt like I was watching a horror movie where it had left off last time. He went through with it though. He raped me.He lived with me for many months and talked about sleeping with me like it was some thrilling game. “Don’t tell anyone.” He also asked to be in a relationship with teenage me. When he moved out, he said he wouldn’t go back to his ex wife if I begged him to stay.My dad knew that I had been assaulted as a child. He knew I’d been raped at 15, before these other pieces of shit moved in. These were my dad’s friends. His best friends. They both recited “I’ve known you since you were born. I’ve known you your whole life.” And then they hurt me.That’s not the only thing that my “dad” did that contributed to my worsening PTSD. He got off on my pain. He made my life a living hell. He did not take care of me or feed me most of the time. I have nightmares where I’m trapped in that house or he’s chasing after me.He never hit me, because he knew that my step dad had beaten both me and my half brother so severely that we were in and out of the hospital. But he would threaten me. He would threaten me all the time.My landlord also contacted my alcoholic “grandma.” My mom’s mom. The last time I saw her, I tried to talk to her about my uncle who is in jail currently. He tried to kill his wife and his baby, something I had been a partial witness to when I was 16. His wife begged me to leave her when he began rampaging, high on meth. I came back when the police had arrived. He did not go to jail for that. He went to jail only for assaulting a police officer as he was attempting to break into his ex wife’s mother’s house years later. He was high on meth and thought she was there. I remember her texting me, horrified that this was happening. She’d been trying to escape for years.That seems like a tangent, but all to say that my “grandma” denies anything happened. He is a golden child. She screamed at me that I was a liar and chased me out of her house while piss drunk, still screaming at the top of her lungs. All because I told her that I understood his addiction in a way because I was recovering from drug addiction as well. The issue with that was that I confirmed aloud that he was on meth. Oops.Later she left me a voicemail (also screaming) “You’re only 21. You don’t know anything”I hate them both and I wish they didn’t exist. The fact that my landlord called these people and talked to them about me makes me sick. I feel like a child again. I feel like a dumb fuck idiot for making this clusterfuck possible. Now they know where I live. I don’t know if they’ll come for me, but I wasn’t able to afford to move that far away. I’m so horrified that I want to take a bus with what little money I have, not pay my landlord, and just dip. I’ve been staying with my boyfriend that I can’t believe I have, so I’m not at that address right now. I am however only a short walk away.I feel like I’m making it all up that I’m in danger after what my landlord said, but I feel like I’m in danger. Has he ever been fucking raped? It makes you paranoid. I know so much about these people and what they’ve covered up. I am traumatized from it. They’ve only ever hurt me. I really don’t know what to do. How to feel. How to handle this. I don’t want to hurt myself because I’m so close to “home” that those people would be at my funeral. I wanted to disappear at 18 and never be seen from or heard of again. It makes me feel so powerless. They know I can’t pay my rent now. They know I’m vulnerable.I have had flashbacks where I see my “dad” raping me too. I can feel his bed and his overly cold AC blaring and see him on top of me and feel it. I don’t know if it’s real, though. I don’t know if I’m projecting because his friends hurt me. It’s not as clear and the other memories. I see it, but I can remember so much more from other times. Those are 100% crystal clear.I found out about this a few minutes before I was supposed to go to work. My boyfriend covered my shift because I had a mental breakdown. I’m now sitting here at his apartment. I’m scared to go to my apartment and clear out my belongings. I know for a fact I’ll never sleep there ever again.TL;DR: I feel so stupid. I didn’t know how quickly my landlord could find my estranged father and trigger a panic so deep I feel like I’m dying. [info] None [info] 1581099249
LolaFedExGirl [info] I used to suffer from panic attacks almost every day. They would come suddenly. I would feel like my heart was going to beat out of my chest. I would sweat like crazy(in the middle of winter). I couldn't eat out at restaurants for fear of getting sick, even though it never happened. Sometimes i would be at the grocery store when i would get an attack and i would have to leave right away. Just abandoning my groceries in an aisle. It got to a point where i had enough of it and went to see a doctor. I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on medication. I take Fluoxetine (Prozac) every day. I feel 100% better. Haven't had an attack since. It helped mellow me out too. So, that's my experience with it. I know others have had it far worse but i felt like sharing with Redditland :) [info] None [info] 1377402808
Reddgsx [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well and went through the same cycle you have described. It stopped once I started to keep track of things and manage my existence. Writing things down, organizing things accordingly, planning appropriately, setting goals, tracking progress, reviewing or re-assessing "things" and reflecting weekly have really improved my quality of life and decreased anxiety.   [info] None [info] 1484700449
aspie65 [info] So have you ever talked to anyone about your anxiety?  I know its hard but it can really help and there are some good meds out there too.   I was diagnosed with anxiety and got treatment and it helped me loads.  Hope things get better soon. [info] None [info] 1436690434
alphagogo_52 [info] I'm the opposite of this...I used to overthink all the time too, day and night. Then I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and I had to stop most of these thoughts coming through, as the negativity was triggering my anxiety. I think I kinda shifted my overthinking process into the cigar session. [info] None [info] 1569171867
camaro91087 [info] Chiari malformation or pinched nerve ?? So I’m a 29m and I have been diagnosed with anxiety last year. I started having headaches and I thought I had a brain tumor. So Last year I went to ER and had a ct scan on my head. The ER doctor said I might possibly have a Chiari malformation and to see a neurologist. So I seen a neurologist and he basically dismissed the whole thing with out doing a mri. He said I have a pinched nerve, just from looking at the ct scan. I constantly have headaches, stiff neck, and brain zaps( a random shooting pain) always on the right side of my head. The pain in my head is always on the back right side right above my neck. What do y’all think this could be? Should I have another ct scan? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1510675961
Possant [info] My Grandparents Have Been Frustrating Me A Little Too Much Disclaimer: My English is kinda bad, so sorry for any mistakes.So, I didn't know if I should post this here, because I'm very anxious and I was afraid of the answers, but here goes nothing.I've been living with my grandparents for more than a year, my mother lives in another city and I decided to live with them, because I love the city that they live.So the first thing is that my grandmother doesn't quite understand the problems that I have, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and Panic Syndrome, I have been going to a psychologist and lately I was getting some good results. But my grandmother is always asking about my problems, and I know she really wants to help, but her answers are always like “This is only happening in your head” or “People won't bite you”, whenever I'm discussing this with her is always a headache and I always get kind of frustrated, but I really don't want to give a rude answer, because I don't want to make her sad and my conscience gets really heavy.Another thing that bothers me a little too much is my grandfather, his always entering my room, and trying to be funny in a forced way and trying to make me laugh, sometimes I do laugh, but recently it has been frustrating me more and more. And sometimes I only want to be alone with my thoughts or read a book and I have to pass the stress of asking him politely to give me some space, but he is really persistent on doing it and sometimes he can't see that I want a time with only myself. I've been trying to be nicest person ever lately, and this kind of things have been making me really stressed, I don't want to discount on my parents or friends, I really want it to go away but I don't know how, and I’ve been really getting frustrated with this. I'm kinda young, I'm only 14 years old and I have to confess that I was a little spoiled. I really want to make things easy for me and for them. [info] None [info] 1539461551
drugsareformugs69 [info] Pre holiday anxiety - help I've been taking drugs recreationally for another 4 years now and lately I am getting terrible chest pains the morning after and sometimes even for days. I would usually take around a gram of MD every few months. I went to a doctor and got checked up and I am seemingly physically healthy but I was diagnosed with anxiety. Has anyone else experienced this and how do you work with it? [info] None [info] 1563799613
staringspace [info] Ultrarunning tips and tricks for long run anxiety Hi all,My background: Been running road for 5 years (half marathons, etc.), until I moved back home to the countryside. Ever since, I've been slowly building up my distances on trail and about 3 weeks ago I took part in my first trail race over half marathon distance (17 miles). It was hard (hilly and boggy, took longer than I wanted!) but I'm incredibly glad I did it, and it's opened me up to a lot of ideas regarding some ultras/multi-day adventures. I really want to do some crazy adventures like running Hadrian's Wall/running the length of some national parks in the UK.However, the one thing that's always held me back is the anxiety I get on long runs. No matter how much I prepare the night before, my GI system hates me the morning of a long run. As soon as I start, I normally feel okay, but then towards the end (normally when running distances that are unknown territory), my brain takes over and I keep worrying about if I'll faint/throw up/pass out and no one will find me. During the trail race, I started feeling pretty sick in the last 10km and even though I pulled through it without any consequences, the anxiety of keeling over in the middle of nowhere definitely slowed me down and made me lose time.For those who are seasoned at longer distances - what tricks do you use to try and keep your brain in the best shape possible on long runs (training or races)? How often do you rely on others to pull you out of any slumps you get?***TL;DR: Get anxious on long runs. What advice do you have for getting through those thoughts that you're going to pass out and die with no one to find you?*****Edit: Thank you so much for everyone’s responses so far, some stellar advice! Just so people know and something I didn’t disclose originally - I have been diagnosed with anxiety and running really helps with managing this. I also have no underlying conditions bar IBS, which has also been diagnosed and I’m under the impression this is also stress/anxiety related!** [info] None [info] 1572358003
Snake010 [info] I used to be just like this guy I didn't understand then I was diagnosed with anxiety now I understand and I wish more people could just understand [info] None [info] 1560396581
concernedaf [info] Panic Attack? I was diagnosed with anxiety... yesterday. I have since started my meds (buspiron) and while they do make me super chill and a little sleepy, I am not sure if they are working? I had a severe panic attack Saturday night (which led me to the therapist for my diagnoses and subsequent meds) and right before the attack I woke up with the thought “you only have eight days left.” It was like four in the morning and I sweat through my pillow and my heart felt like it was going to explode. I’m not sure if it was a nightmare gone wrong or what, but since then I have been convinced that I am dying on Monday, and there is nothing that anyone can do to stop it. I’m sure that this is just a symptom of my anxiety, and that probably my meds have not had enough time to really soak into my brain. Has anyone else on here experienced this? Made it through alive? I’m doing my breathing exercises and trying to talk myself through it, but it isn’t working as much as I would like it to. Help? [info] None [info] 1513355218
cant-fall-asleep-247 [info] Finally cried to my mom, felt nice I've been having a rough week. Ever since I stopped drinking, I've been feeling incredibly intense emotions, mainly sadness. I'm diagnosed with anxiety (both social and general) and I realized that my drinking was actually used as a crutch. I ended up having an anxiety attack during class this week, left early and cried in my car. I felt so overwhelmed. I have not had an anxiety attack for a while. I felt that I couldn't handle anything. Coming home didn't make me feel better. I woke up this morning feeling so dejected. When my mom started to talk to me about my moving day (I'm moving to my college campus in a couple weeks), I rudely snapped at her. I then started to cry because I just felt so alone and helpless. I finally told her about my struggles and how I stopped drinking (which she was surprisingly proud of). The thing is that my mom and I were never that close. We always have had our differences. I never thought that I would be divulging things about myself to her nor cry to her. It felt really nice to be comforted. [info] 161 days [info] 1576136678
last-but-not-least [info] I've always thought I had GAD, but I came across info today that makes me think I have OCD. As someone new to the idea of OCD, where is a good place to start? For the past two years, I have been dealing with anxiety, obsessive thinking, and panic attacks. I've been diagnosed with anxiety by a GP, but today I was researching how to deal with intrusive thoughts and came across many articles on OCD, which really opened my eyes to a lot of things I've noticed about myself over the years.The thing is, I've known the phrase "intrusive thought" for a long time because I heard someone use it in reference to wanting to drive off a bridge, and I was like hey! I think about those sorts of things all the time! But it was not in reference to OCD, so I never connected the two things. To me, I always thought OCD was about physical obsessions, like placing things "right" and washing hands, not mental obsessions such as hurting people or yourself. And of course, everyone knows someone that says they're OCD for liking things neat and organized.I am having very bad anxiety today about this but I am determined to not let it beat me down anymore than it already has. So, I have some questions for you guys because from reading a few posts, it sounds like a lot of people here have had some kind of success with dealing with their anxiety/OCD.1. What are some examples of reassurance-seeking? As in, could I be reassurance-seeking right now by asking for help with this post?2. Is seeing a therapist about this a good idea? Does it make the obsessions seem more real? What are some tips for finding the right therapist?3. How do you separate normal behavior from OCD behavior? When is it compulsion or not? For example, when I am anxious about something I tend to browse the internet or take a shower to try to distract myself. Sometimes I take more than one shower in a day. But obviously these are two things that must be done normally as well.4. Can OCD come and go?5. Can obsessions change? I noticed that once one problem kind of "solves" itself (health anxiety) I do end up feeling good for a while, but then another problem comes up to replace it. 6. Lastly, how did you learn that you have OCD? Is it normal to doubt that thoughts and behaviors come from anxiety/OCD and attribute them to something else?Any advice or resources would be greatly appreciated as I begin thinking about my next steps to take. [info] None [info] 1511573261
ibrasamovic [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders aswell. Just realise that each day is a new chance to kick its ass. Keep at it, the day where you do will eventually happen. Best of luck brothers  [info] None [info] 1500677195
paralogisme [info] Anxiety from wearing my spiffy new back brace So today I finally received [my back brace](https://www.orliman.com/en/product/semi-rigid-lumbar-back-support-2/) for 2 disc hernias and peraminal stenosis. I of course expected to be uncomfortable for a second, I wore corsets in my uni days. But what I got was unexpected. I put on the brace (well, the medical professional did, but I also did it myself few times) and half an hour in, terrible anxiety kicks in. Now I am diagnosed with anxiety and all that jazz, but this was horrible. I started shaking, nausea, extreme discomfort in limbs, a full size anxiety attack. I've tried it 2 today for half an hour and basically rage quit at some point on the verge of tears and even took a Valium to calm the heck down. I just took it down 10 minutes ago and I am still dizzy. I'm so unwell that I am actually worried that it's not just anxiety but a consequence of a tight brace pressing on lungs or something.Does this routinely happen with new brace wearers, something that I have to slowly get used to or could this be a case of a brace that doesn't fit and I should ask for a refitting?I was very excited about getting this brace because I am in a lot of pain and want to get off painkillers, so I'm really sad that this is my reaction to it. [info] None [info] 1586283283
AlienLoser [info] Yea, that could definitely be how it helps you! Anxiety for sure can cause migraines, at least for me anyways. I've come to my own little diagnosis that my stomach problems root from stress and things of that nature, because I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a few years ago. So, marijuana could possibly be helping my stomach because I feel no stress or anxiety whatsoever when I smoke. All I know is shit would suck for me and my overall health without my lovely, lovely bud. Haha. [info]  [info] 1418951290
thirtytwoeleven [info] I have I have been diagnosed with anxiety and gagging is one of my symptoms. It’s real fun  /s [info] None [info] 1563617075
thatwaffleskid [info] I'm exactly the same. I'm 27 as well, diagnosed in the 6th grade, which is also when I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Even though I have a job and a family I still feel as though im being dragged slowly by a rope through life instead of using that rope to lead my life where I want it to go. I'm also in a constant state of panic that I'm not doing well at my job even though I haven't had many issues there.It's a good thing the stakes are high though. That's what keeps me going and gets me through it. Use that to your advantage. It's ok to be freaked out when things change, but don't let it take over.  [info] None [info] 1467697119
mink2018 [info] ECG normal, shortness of breath when relaxed, clear breathing when heart is working hard. So basically yeah,  i cant breathe through my nose when i am relaxed, but nose breathing just fine after moving around(like climbing a short stair) I have tried saline and nothing comes out. After trying to sneeze hard,  my heart goes a bit fast and i can breathe easier for a short whileI was diagnosed with anxiety. Fuckin hell i thought i was dying, my body and mind acting like shit for 5 days. [info] Patient [info] 1579530780
avocadotoast297 [info] Thank you so much for replying! I'm not currently seeing anyone, the therapists I've seen are only familiar with anorexia and bulimia, it's not a widely discussed topic in my country and there aren't many specialists in the subject. I have been diagnosed with anxiety 6 years ago and I do still struggle with it from time to time, recently a lot due to overworking and everything. I haven't considered them being related tho, I have told this to my therapist and they just told me I need something to focus on. And I have been very busy as opposed to how I was when I had my darkest moment but the thoughts and all the habits didn't go away despite being busy. [info] None [info] 1555186808
seductionbluepiller [info] I started reading about seduction 3 years ago and feel like I haven't made much improvement at all. Looks and money doesn't matter fellas. /rant I learned about Seduction/Game over 3 years ago. Admittedly, I have sat on the sidelines to a degree. I have read quite a lot, as I have somewhat of a desk-job and I work 12 hour shifts during prime time. Unfortunately, this results in having plenty of hours to read online about seduction, but I never have any time to actually go out and practice. To put into perspective how long ago I found out about seduction- I read Mystery Method. I also read Models and a tremendous amount of information on these forums. Despite being very good-looking in person, I suffer from a tremendous amount of anxiety. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder and a couple other mental health disorders. This is due to experiencing an incredibly rough upbringing as a child/infant. My family was very poor and I grew up in the back of a car for most of my childhood. I really don't want to explain the rest.I spent a vast majority of my free time working my ass off. I am in my late-20s, yet I have overcome poverty and purchased my own home. I also supported both of my siblings through college and I now am a landlord and seeking to purchase another property. Does being good looking, self-made, healthy, fit, and employed in a stable career help? Unfortunately, it doesn't help as much as many of you guys think. Why am I writing this? I am writing this partly to explain to those that are busting their asses off thinking, "once I get money, I'll get all the girls.." As a person on the other side, I can honestly tell you that isn't the case. Overcoming anxiety and being confident are most certainly the primary attributes to attracting women. I have seen plenty of material where PUA guys get into the proper "mindstate" through approaching everyone. They get rejected tons of times, but just keep going. Although I have tried this, my mind essentially shuts down and I don't feel like talking to anyone. My brain shuts down so hard that I feel like just going home and sleeping. The amount of anxiety I face has tremendously hindered my progress and I am beginning to wonder if this is seriously something that I really can overcome on my own. I am even considering a coach at this point. 3 years of reading and yet I still haven't done a SINGLE day approach. I have done well at nights, but I don't feel I've made much improvement for the time-invested. In fact, it seems as though I used to get laid much more often before I even heard of seduction/game/PUA material.  Recently, I have finally reduced my work hours. I don't feel like giving up- and I am going to give it all another shot. However, I most certainly feel that the mental blocks that I experience are TREMENDOUSLY more difficult to handle than what I see described here as simply "overcoming AA". To put things in perspective, when I am thinking of approaching, my mind essentially crashes down to how you would feel if you hadn't slept in 3 days and someone told you to go be talkative to a group of girls.IN SUMMARY: I suppose what I am looking for is words of advice on how I should approach seduction. I face psychological mental blocks due to my past. Despite my effort, these issues have held me back for years. [info] None [info] 1415669849
mind_fcked [info] Check out r/rOCD. I'm sure you'll find useful information there. I can relate to what you're going through. My boyfriend and I have been together for 7.5 years and last year I was diagnosed with anxiety. Four months ago, my boyfriend and I both were changing jobs and I felt myself becoming anxious over several days and then, out of nowhere, I began overanalyzing our relationship. So many questions would go through my head like, "are we meant to be together", "is he 'the one'", "am I supposed to be with someone else", "do I like someone else". It jumps to our compatibility, to his "flaws", and whatever else my brain can come up with. I was so happy before this started and we we're even starting to plan our wedding. I had no idea why I was questioning these things and honestly, I still don't know. I'm going to therapy weekly and we've changed my medication around to see if that helps. Some days are better than others but I won't give up on my relationship.I hope you find your way through this. [info] None [info] 1517806057
thatsnuckinfutz [info] Any advice on trying to gain a lil bit of weight? Ok so let me start by saying I have not officially been diagnosed with ARFID reasoning is because my therapist is trying to give me a chance to get my eating (or lack thereof in my case) under control before sending me to an ED therapist. She agrees I definitely have it but that's not her specialty. I'm in therapy as part of a rehab program due to an injury unrelated to my eating habits however it came up as a concern since I've lost weight due to me restricting my food. I'm already slim so dropping more than 10lbs is very noticeable on me.Here's the issue, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and the more anxious I am the less likely I am to eat anything. For ex: I was stressed about my day so all I had was iced tea and 2 cookies for the day. I'm a vegetarian and also very picky, it's getting worse oddly enough. Is there any suggestions that those of you who are managing this better might have for me? I know it's not an easy fix but idk I don't really know where to start and I don't know anyone who struggles with these type of things. I'm trying to plan my meals but it's not going well lol [info] None [info] 1564006534
Mac987654 [info] The Chimp Paradox by Prof. Steve Peters I'd highly recommend this book for anyone struggling with anxiety or who needs a better understanding of their mind.The cover does look like your usual self-help, but it gives a lot of very practical advice on dealing with your emotions and feelings, or what he refers to as the 'chimp'.In the 8 or so years I've been diagnosed with anxiety, this is the first book I turn back to when I need a reminder on what's going on in my brain.'Why do I sometimes become so irrational in my thinking? It is not you thinking at all, but your chimp taking over and thinking for you. The solution therefore is to understand how your chimp thinks, recognise when it is taking over, and intervene.'Hope it helps! [info] None [info] 1549232403
Zale2160 [info] Just some of my concerns about switching to console from PC I’m switching from console to PC (obviously) I’ve made many post before asking if builds are good, and other questions I have about building, these are some concerns I still have, take note, most of these are very stupid and just me being anxious, I have been diagnosed with anxiety, i know they sound dumb1. How do I overclock my RAM to the 300mhz that is adveratised? 2. Wiring parts seems kinda confusing3. What drivers to i need to install4. Afraid I’ll somehow bend the pins on my Ryzen 26005. How will I know if temps of any of my parts are high, how do i know if they’re about to burnout, break the PC, catch of fire, and burn down my house (by far my dumbest concern on this list, yet the one im most concerned about)6. Last but not least. DOA parts, I know they aren’t common. But i have terrible luck. I bet there isn’t a worse feeling than putting your PC together, and the damn thing doesn’t even turn on. This kind of relates to the wiring, how will i know if a part is DOA, or I wired wrong, how will i know which wire i did wrong, or which part is DOA?Thanks for reading this, and thanks for anything you could say to maybe make me feel better [info] None [info] 1531716557
eulogyjones [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety for quite awhile (I suspect as a result from taking Ritalin as a kid for ADD) and it comes and goes but man there's nothing worse than just being anxious for no reason and then trying to justify in your head why you shouldn't be having anxiety only to compound that anxiety further until you're just a stressed out anxious mess by the end of the day. [info] None [info] 1411575281
Jessicash [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past so maybe it is something I need to revisit. Thanks!!Also that it one of my favorite quotes. [info] None [info] 1510100906
Lesbian-Wayne [info] I don't know what's wrong with me Delete if not relevant. Hey everyone. My name is Erin, I'm a teen and I think I was diagnosed with anxiety. The doctor never explicitly said it and neither did my Councillor but they have said phrases about how I have the symptoms of it and my frequent anxiety attacks kinda clue me in on this. This is going to be a wild ride of a post. I get a message from a friend. I read it but I'm just bored. I get another text and I get bored with them too and think of an excuse so I don't have to text back all the time. Some friends I love texting but others I just can't. I can't be bothered to be Frank. I like them but I just can't do it. I've researched online and I have no clue what's wrong with me.Then we have the main issue. I'm lesbian and I know it. I have have so many issues with it. All my friends coming out stories they say they knew at 12 or even 10. I came out as bisexual at 12/13 and I then came out as lesbian at 15. I feel as though I was a late bloomer and why did others know before me. Was I too late? Did I know but not really?One friend was so cruel. He knew the struggle it took me to try and work through my issues with my sexuality and I knew I was lesbian. He then tried convincing me that I was bisexual. I sobbed on the bus that night because of what he said. I know I'm lesbian but he has sowed seeds of doubt in me that tell me I'm not. I'm trying so hard but he has taken me back to my place of uncertainty.Mum thinks my anxiety has gotten better after Jason {name changed} ( Jason is my friend who killed himself) because she thinks I don't have attacks. I have them upstairs in my room or out and I don't tell her. I can't do it. She doesn't believe me. She didn't want me talking to anyone cause I can just talk to her. I know I need help but I cant get it. I'm going to college in a few months so I'm going to ask for help there becuase they can't tell mum I asked.My life seems to be breaking down bit by bit and I didn't even notice. Its so sudden to me but I have realised how slow it has really been. I thought I was okay. I convinced myself I was. But I haven't been for a while. Im not okay.Thanks for reading. I know it's long but I needed to get that off my chest [info] None [info] 1561932152
Yuio6789 [info] I never even told my parents about my BPD diagnosis. They're pretty hardcore narcissists and even when I was diagnosed with anxiety they told me it wasn't a real disorder. That everyone gets anxiety. They thought my panic attacks were episodes from drug use. Then when I actually did turn to drugs years later because I couldn't cope - they caught me and they never even asked if I was okay. All they could do was tell me how embarrassing it was to be the parent of a drug addict and how I should have considered how it made them feel and look to other people when I decided to do drugs specifically to hurt their feelings. They basically turn any conversation about my problems into their problems. I only talk to them about really basic things now. Like clothes or the weather or something. I've given up trying to be close to them. [info] None [info] 1518653642
gurenkagurenda [info] Considering HRT at age 30. What can I expect? I've been struggling with my gender (bio-male) for a long time off and on, and in the last two years the dysphoria has started to get unbearable. For a while, I started just quietly identifying as gender fluid, but at the same time I started regularly trying to take stock of how I felt, usually while looking in the mirror.The result was that about a third of the time I've felt pretty neutral, two thirds of the time I've felt female with mild-to-severe dysphoria, and a handful of times I've felt slightly male. At the same time, the dysphoria has been getting worse and more frequent.With all that in mind, I'm beginning to come to the conclusion that I'm just a girl, and that fighting that is just causing me a tremendous amount of anxiety and unhappiness (I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder since I was quite young, and I'm beginning to wonder how much of that comes from living, looking and being treated like a man).Anyway, enough background - get to the questions! I have two:1. At age 30, how well can I expect HRT to "work" physically? I know that there's a lot of variance from person to person, but I also have heard that as you get older, your body responds less to hormone therapy.2. I feel like the clock is ticking here. If I go this route, how long can I expect to wait from the time that I begin talking to doctors, to the time that I actually get to start treatment? (I live in the US and have sort-of-OK insurance, but haven't figured out what it would cover)Finally, I want to thank everyone with the courage to ask and answer questions on this sub. Reading about your experiences, your uncertainty, and your successes has been a huge help to me in feeling like there's some hope for me to be happy with who I am. [info] Transgender-Bisexual MtF [info] 1451262745
gemgembott [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety very recently, (presumably) as well as a whole bunch of other mental health issues that are yet to be exposed. Struggling to even understand anxiety or what it is, I'm in a state of fear for my future. Can someone clarify please, I am struggling immensely. [info] None [info] 1500806246
Giddyin [info] How do you feel about anxiety medication? I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder for many years along with 9 other things. I'm a 20f and I've only ever taken medicine for asthma and ADHD. I only take my asthma meds now. I have never had anxiety medication but it was suggested I could try it this year by my caseworker. For a few years now I've managed to push myself out of my comfort zone and get things done that needed to be done. But now I think that's gotten me as far as it can go alone. For example, I'll go to appointments alone, pick up food my boyfriend and I ordered, make appointments, pick up medication, call in medication, ect. Basically I can do things that need to be done by myself now without some unnecessary sense of dread. But if I'm alone and hungry I won't go out, I won't shop alone, I don't do anything I don't need to alone. I've lived my life of numerous disabilitys for so long I can't remember what it feels like to not feel how I feel. I don't know what's me or what's my disabilitys anymore. I think I should try anxiety medication if it takes away the negative feeling about going out alone. Does anyone have sorta this same situation? What are your thoughts on anxiety medication for every day use? I'm tierd of feeling sick of just thinking about going out alone for food. I don't even make posts on here much because I think I'm doing it wrong or what I have to say or ask is stupid. Probably a confidence issue too but I don't know where one thing ends and the other begins. I'm in therapy and my therapist thinks I should take the meds. I do too. But I know nothing about it. [info] None [info] 1532908076
bluerbythesecond [info] You are right, but I don't think I can. My parents don't really believe in mental illnesses of any sort, or even talking to counselors or psychologists. Like they'd just force me to eat if I did tell them about this. I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on medication, a month later they decided theres no such thing as needing medication for anxiety and I just need to grow out of it  [info] None [info] 1522430484
aeroluv327 [info] That's exactly how I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder!  I took myself to urgent care because I thought I was having a heart attack.  Those poor nurses were so nice.  [info] None [info] 1499680727
thhhhrooowwwwaway [info] I (21/f) have crippling anxiety, and don't know how to convey this to my new boyfriend (22/m) I was diagnosed with anxiety, and I am currently on medication for it. I have recently started dating a new guy within the past month, and he's awesome. My only issue is that my anxiety has sky rocketed recently and I'm afraid I'll lose him. For example: He just drove up to his brother's house 4 hours away. He didn't text me once he arrived and I was really worried something happened to him (like car accident, death, i dont even know). I know this is minuscule on the grand scheme of things, but how can I make him understand that I do have anxiety when it comes to him, and I need him to give me that reassurance when it's needed. I don't want to come across as clingy or desperate. Any advice?   **tl;dr**: Need help asking my boyfriend to tell me he's safe and okay and help him understand my anxiety [info] None [info] 1432160745
jacckka [info] has anyone else actually been diagnosed with anxiety or do they just self diagnose I've been diagnosed with anxiety but I experience it differently to the people who say they have anxiety so I'm just curious [info] None [info] 1571819924
AndyDoopz [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders so I've definitely been struggling with that.  [info] None [info] 1497413873
handlename2 [info] Panic attack or something else? I went to bed around midnight last night feeling exhausted, but otherwise fine. Very suddenly, at 2am, my stomach started burning, and I had bad nausea, shakes, sweaty hands, and felt like I urgently needed the bathroom. I ended up being fine (no d* or anything), and everything mostly subsided on its own a few minutes later, but it was terrifying while it lasted. This is the third or fourth time this has happened to me, and it's very unsettling to not know what's going on. :(Has anyone else had that happen? Feeling totally fine one moment and then BOOM NAUSEA out of nowhere? I wasn't worrying about anything beforehand, I hadn't eaten anything suspicious, heavy, or acidic (between IBS and my phobia, my diet's really bland), and I haven't had contact with any sick people, so I doubt it's a virus or food poisoning. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, OCD, and a locked-up diaphragm, so maybe it could've been a panic attack and/or a muscle spasm? Can trapped gas or a lack of sleep cause sudden nausea? I was definitely tired when it happened, and did have a bit of stomach gas. I feel... okay-ish now (1:45pm), but still a bit rattled and woozy from the incident overnight. Still no d* or fever or anything, at least. I haven't had a SV since I was 12 (22 now), but I'm a bit scared that I'm coming down with one. [info] None [info] 1498841050
DiscombobulatedDesk7 [info] My mother was horrible My mother was a horrible human. She would beat me constantly while I was younger, not just a slap across the face like normal parents but with belts, bats and even slam my head into walls. I fucking hated her and always wondered how life would be if I could leave, I was under 10 when this happened. I remember this story vividly and it’s the earliest memory I have. One time when I was three or four I was playing with blocks and they fell and made a loud sound as they crashed on the floor my mom came and beat the living shit out of me I remember this vividly. I honestly thought beating was very normal until I went to school and my best mate who is still my best mate told me that his parents hardly beat him and if they did it was just a slap to keep him in line. Never did they use belts extension cords or just slam their heads.As I got older the abuse turned from physical to emotional.For example:I had gotten a girlfriend I was 15 years old and when she found out she was pissed. She took away my phone laptop and cut off the internet. She then continued to FUCKING GO OFF AT ME. I was told ill never get anywhere in life and she continued to torture me emotionally all night. I cried that night and was not able to conduct my exam. She embarrassed me at school by searching for her hunting the girl down following her through school. WHY couldn't she have just let this go. She continued to berate me over this relationship. You will never marry her, you won't be good enough for her. I never understood why as it was just a high school fling. I knew this was not going to lead anywhere I was just a curious young kid. She somehow never let this go.I was always a failure in her eyes. She convinced my dad to send me to therapy to see what was wrong with me. Once we went and my mother was there thinking the Dr was going to tell my father how messed up I was. The dr, however, had a chat with her for a while and then called us all in and explained that I did indeed needed therapy but not because I was a bad kid but because of how I was treated. He called my mum out.I cried then and there, this whole time I really thought there was something wrong with me. However, on the way back home, my STUPID FUCKING MOTHER said that the doctor knew nothing and should not be trusted basically saying she was not to blame for my behaviour.My mum told me that people would end up hating me my whole life because of my personality and till today there's a part of me that believes so. I am not good with women I have been diagnosed with anxiety and before I went to therapy I woke up in the middle of the night heart racing, I do believe she has fucked me up for good and I wonder if it's too late to become normal again.***I never understood why my father stayed with her, he always supported me and was a lot more understanding than I am. I guess he stayed because of my younger brother. I hated that he stayed with her.***But what I think what the most fucked up thing about this was how she would be in front of other people she would hug me and tell everyone we were close. In reality, though this was false it pained me to participate in this charade of hers. Despite her doing this she would always talk down about me to her friends and always tell them what a fuck-up I was. She destroyed friendships I had on purpose by calling out my friend's parents and telling them not to hang out with "HER SON" she always wanted me to be something I was not. Nothing was ever good enough for her and I was always constantly reminded of this. I used to hear her telling my dad I would never go anywhere in life.When I was 17 I made the decision to cut her out of my life. The last time we ever spoke, was when she was shouting at me and I just let all hell loose. I am scared to admit this but if my dad was not there I would've hurt her real bad. I wanted to as well I said everything I wanted to say for the last 17 years and HONESTLY WANTED TO PAY HER BACK. Thank god I didn't, I don't want to be her. I want to be good to people and be kind. But I will say ever since that day I've never been happier.In conclusion, today I am 20 years old and just finishing my first year of uni at one of the best universities in my country. I did this mostly on my own with help from my father and some friends who I now consider family. I know I have started university late but this is my path now. All I am looking forward to in life right now is to find a girl and have my own family, giving my children the childhood, I only saw others have. [info] None [info] 1566387768
logictoinsanity [info] Not really, I mean I have been diagnosed with anxiety so it's probably just a part of that. I probably should mention it to my therapist though [info] None [info] 1489204081
larafrompinkpony [info] &gt;You must not be in the US. They give adderall out like candy. I've been to 3 psychiatrists, none of them will give me adderall  :( instead I've been diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1400589696
kawaiisailorbabe [info] Thank for your advice, the problem is that I know I’m safe and that nothing can go wrong if I don’t let it, it’s just when that time comes my brain just automatically goes in to panic mode and I can’t get out of it. Maybe it’s because I have been diagnosed with anxiety and adhd so makes it harder for me to focus positively? Just a hard thing for me to get there I guess, pretty frustrating  [info] None [info] 1523213061
skimask7 [info] I first did acid when I was 15, and I will tell you that although for the first 2 years I had no regrets, once I actually grew up I regretted everything.  Not so much actual regret, but I just know that my mind was not ready to make proper sense out of all of my experiences.Just like I did, she's probably doing it because it's hype.  I honestly would have shamed her and the people giving it to her, because we all know "hey drugs are bad" doesn't work.  The ONLY thing that has worked for me to stay out of certain drugs as a teenager was being socially shamed for it, then again, idk what works for other people.  And by shame, I don't mean talk to them like a coach, I mean going "lol that's gay asf bro".  Once you grow up, you don't care what people think.  When you're a teenager however, 75% of your motives are to impress other people.  I wouldn't be surprised if she took it because everyone hyped her up.  "AYY THE LIL 14 YEAR OLD WANTS A TAB HOW COOL IS THAT SHE CRAZYYY".Now I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I know that tripping played a part in the equation bc the root of all of my anxiety is my impending death, something I didn't care about before tripping.14 year olds should NOT be trippingEdit:  also, no diss towards you, but your friends are weird for hanging around teenagers when they're 23, let alone a 14 year old girl.  Not jumping to conclusions but are you sure they're not one of those people that hangs out with highschool girls when they're in their 20's?  Weird, possibly rapey.  I'd re-evaluate who your friends are, and who you take drugs around.  Again, I'm probably jumping to major conclusions here based off of the people I've met, but be careful regardless. [info] None [info] 1543537679
gxm95 [info] My arms feel heavy and "burning". Both my index fingers are stiff. Hello people, I'm new to this sub.I'm 21M and I've had psychological problems since I was a child. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD and I've had all kinds of weird symptoms, such as depersonalization, brain fog, random pains/needles in my body, sleepiness, dizziness, short breathe, bad short term memory, lack of concentration, etc. But lately I started to feel something I never had before, it started about six months ago with a weird feeling in my hands, like if they don't belong to my body and I had to be constantly checking if I was still able to move them, they always moved, but I kept feeling like they would stop moving at any moment. A couple months ago the same feeling extended to my arms, now they feel heavy, and my muscles and skin seem to burn, and a couple weeks ago both my index fingers became stiff, they kinda snap when I move them.The thing is, according to these links: http://www.anxietycentre.com/anxiety/symptoms/muscle-weakness-anxiety.shtml http://www.anxietycentre.com/anxiety-symptoms/burning_skin_sensation.shtml http://www.calmclinic.com/anxiety/symptoms/finger they can all be caused by anxiety...but I'm really afraid I have some degenerative disease, I'm even planning a way to quickly kill myself if I find out I have it...have any of you had this symptoms? I want to go see a doctor but I've already gone to so many doctors, did so many exams fearing other things, I'm also not working right now,  so my parents have to pay for my appointments... it's terrible to feel all these things but having all exams come out fine. I just did a blood/urine/feces test and it was all normal...I don't even know what I expect from this post, I think just want to talk to people I can relate to... [info] None [info] 1479500026
zangerberg [info] Rolling after being diagnosed with anxiety? hey everyone!Dumb post probably, but I maybe want some input or advice! :)So I've rolled plenty of times, the last time being end of September. Shortly after that, and after a bunch of panic attacks that I thought at the time were heart attacks, I was diagnosed with anxiety (yay). I was offered meds by my doctor but declined because I have a phobia of getting addicted, but that's another story, so i'm not taking anything for it. At the end of this month i'll be going to an nye function where i plan to roll, but ever since my diagnosis(lol) i'm terrified that when I take some, I'm going to flip out and send myself into a panic attack, which i fear will only be exacerbated by the mdma, which is obviously not wanted at all. I guess my question is are there any tips you guys have that could possibly help if this does happen, or should I just not roll at all? I've never had any problems with anxiety while rolling before, but I guess now knowing i have it, and how horrible of a feeling it is, it's gonna be on my mind after taking and on the come up.Thanks :))) [info] None [info] 1576236526
SquidYurt [info] Hi everyone,So a back story: for the last 6 years I have had a strong feeling of brain fog and fatigue and I am now trying to put things right. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and was on Citalopram for around 5 years, but during this time the brain fog still persisted, despite the anxiety symptoms lessening somewhat. I have now been off of any medication for 2 months but still feel exhausted and apathetic from the moment I wake up to when I sleep at night. I went for a blood test last week but it came back fine. Is there anything on this test that I should be looking into, or anything else that could help?For the last few days I've also been supplementing Vitamin B Complex, Vitamin D3 &amp; Magnesium. I'm only 26 years old and have no real cause of stress in my life to make me feel exhausted. Any advice or suggestions of what to say to my doctor or any other routes to go down would be greatly appreciated, as this is affecting my ability to work and my relationship. Edit: Just to add, I have tried CBT three times, which made no difference to my fatigue or brain fog, so I am leaning towards it being a physical issue. [info] None [info] 1499019687
AshPaws [info] This type of behaviour during me growing up is what made me spite my mother. Nothing was enough, and enough was nothing to her. No wonder I was diagnosed with anxiety after my teen years shortly before moving out. Took me a while to realise that caring about petty things only gave a more negative impact than a positive one in regards of trying to be better (e.g "Oh finally you come out of your cave! HAHAHA") [info] None [info] 1561022552
nja1998 [info] Holy shit I thought I was the only one who thought like that ! I always think my sickness is a punishment or repercussion of something wrong. I did I've always thought that my sickness was a way of God controlling me.  my IBS came about right around 8th grade but got real bad around 12th grade graduation. So by me missing so much school around 8th grade because of ibs . I couldn't join jrotc which I was fine with I guess. But then right around graduation it got real bad and my plan was to join the marines after graduation. But I was diagnosed with IBS and found out that it is a medically disqualifying illness and you can join any branch of the military with it as far as I know. So I chalked it up as god didn't want me to go and that was the way of him telling me .I have sense pretty much over came my IBS and I started to think about joining the military again . and now I've been diagnosed with anxiety so I'm taking it as a defiant no to a military career.  Now I'm trying to get into being a park ranger or wildlife conservation  [info] None [info] 1531448449
Fawun92 [info] Anxiety really kicking my butt, not sure what to do I was diagnosed with anxiety five years ago and I was given medication at the time but I didn't agree much with it and it didn't much agree with me, my anxiety wasn't specifically about "any one thing" but more focuses generally and I was weaned off my medication by another doctor when I was in hospital for an unrelated issue.I had a tough year or two with it and it seemed to fade off.Over the last 8 months I feel like my anxiety has gotten steadily worse, I'm struggling to control it.I feel as though I've moved past worrying about my general life and have developed phobias that I never had before or phobias I did have developed into others/worse things.Eg. I have been fearful of the dark for the last 5 years but now I'm starting to feel very frightened of dark Windows and the possibility that the lights could suddenly go out (like a power cut)I'm VERY frightened of loud unexpected noises and I'm almost constantly fearful that one will occur, I struggle sometimes to not feel scared when using a microwave because I feel it will explode or make a loud noise. I have started to hate the sound of clapping or cupboard doors closing suddenly and I honestly feel really aware of those around me who have opened a cupboard (I know how odd this sounds trust me)These are just two of the "new" worries I have, and I feel like every few weeks I take on a new fear and do everything I can to avoid them again.My sleeping habits have been downright awful and I feel very stressed out and worried.I'm not sure I can go to my doctor, I have a new one and I recently saw him for something unrelated and that was fine and now I feel like I can't go back because I've seen him too "recently" and he will think I'm a health nut. [info] None [info] 1452898613
radioactive_kitten4 [info] Worried about qualifying for an Emotional Support Animal Hi, I'm fairly new to this subreddit, and I'll try to keep this short. I was just diagnosed with anxiety by my doctor about two weeks ago. She suggested a therapist I should go to, who I have yet to see. I want to talk to them about getting and Emotional Support Animal letter. I'm concerned that they won't thing my anxiety is bad enough, or that by asking too early they'll think I'm faking it or something. My dog really truly helps with my anxiety no matter what the cause is, especially when doing homework for my college classes. Basically I have two questions:1. Does anyone else have experience/tips in this matter?2. How early should I ask the therapist? Bring it up right away or wait? [info] None [info] 1549778504
LilPad93 [info] Thank you very much.  Although I fear that I am BPD a lot, I know that being aware and actively fighting my issues is something to be relieved about in that aspect.  I don't deny nor hide the fact that I  have issues. When I can afford therapy, I most certainly am going. I want to try it, and I want to try to get this burden off of me.   I read articles, I and I buy self help books, I've read a few, and I tend to get too analytical of myself, so maybe my husband needs to read them with me.  I know some people in our situations tend to be a little off in relationships.  My relationship with my husband comforts me in that I am normal with him, and he tells me that I overthink how I act too much.  (I have been diagnosed with anxiety.) Thank you again.   [info] None [info] 1480523970
mythrowaway23231 [info] Before final grades are posted, my professor wants to talk to me about my lack of participation in class. I was diagnosed with anxiety, looking for advice whether I should mention this tomorrow. [info] None [info] 1450323758
seven_swell [info] EM. I originally signed on to be Nuke but they DQ'd me after bootcamp because they found out I was diagnosed with anxiety. I'm not too torn up about that though. [info] None [info] 1442180713
psychonaut1220 [info] Should I try LSD again? I’ve tried mushrooms countless times in the past, MDMA recently, I smoke weed quite frequently, and LSD once. I am diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. The last time I tripped on LSD I took an extremely massive bong rip during the comeup, and that lead to the peak coming on like a bus which lead to a panic attack. Once the panic attack subsided I still had a great time, and woke up with an afterglow. That was the first panic attack I’ve ever had, and then I had a second one which happened pretty recently from smoking a lot of a very suspicious thc cartridge. I am not prone to panic attacks sober and never have had them from weed or shrooms or mdma except that one cartridge incident. Would it be safe for me to try LSD again? I have been really wanting to drop one tab of 105ug, the same dose I took last time. I don’t plan on smoking this time. [info] None [info] 1584661714
AnnehBananeh [info] Dating advise? Since my boyfriend broke up with me (because of my anxiety), I have felt pretty unloveable, especially because I still get regular panic attacks. But a couple of weeks ago I started chatting with a guy. We go to the same school, even had classes besides each other all year, but never talked. And I guess I have to admit, I think he is a pretty cute guy. I was diagnosed with anxiety back in February after a pretty big trauma, so it hit me pretty hard and it's still a whole new world (disney jokes aside) and I litteraly have no idea how to overcome the fear of asking him out on a date. Just the thought of it makes me shake and feel like my head is gonna explode, but he is a good guy and I want to try something that hasn't been in my life recently. So dear fellow redditors - what is your best advice to someone with anxiety who wants to date? [info] None [info] 1503153427
exceptionallybland [info] [NSFW] I was diagnosed with anxiety earlier on this year and I’ve lost my sex drive [info] None [info] 1572559957
mikachuu [info] This all sounds like really wonderful advice.  I just don't know if I'm able to do it.  I'm in my (technically) last year of college, and I'm the biggest procrastinator.  I've not been diagnosed with ADHD, but I do feel like so many of my thoughts/actions are out of control, even though I seem very calm on the outside.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety big time, but basically my GPA is a 2.3 and I don't think I have enough time to even raise it up over a 3.0.  I feel like I'm too far gone, and it's definitely the electronics.  I'm surrounded by them.  Like you said, they can eat up hours at a time and you don't even notice until it's too late.  With me, I do notice and I mess around on my laptop or phone anyway.  So it all comes down to willpower, which I don't have any left.  The only way I've made it this far is by forcing myself to wait until the last minute and then cramming everything in while I'm at school.  That needs to stop ASAP, but I just can't break the cycle.  Sorry for rambling, but your post just really made me think about where I am in actuality, not where everyone thinks I am.  I tell people all the time that I'm just a fraud, but they laugh it off.  They don't know how difficult it is... or maybe they do and don't believe me.  Either way, I know I need help and there's too much standing in my way to even start.   [info] None [info] 1396268185
IPickedTheWrongMajor [info] Love your observation.  I just often wish I had picked a totally different path in life. I have had a successful career, but I find my work often very stressful, and I found something else I love to do later in life. But I was quite successful after freshman year, and I was actually quite passionate about my chosen field.  Without that, I don't know how I would have succeeded. I was diagnosed at age 50, and I wonder how my life would have been different if I had been diagnosed with ADHD as a young person and prescribed the appropriate treatment.  Instead, when I was an emotional wreck, and thinking I had to drop out of college, I was diagnosed with anxiety and prescribed anti-anxiety meds.  That helped me calm down enough to get my act together. Then, I was fortunate enough to have a short, helpful course of psychotherapy.  That treatment helped me with my lack of confidence.  For the problems with focus, concentration and concentration?  I am pretty sure that's why I used tobacco. I found places to study with no distractions. My friends were good students, so we probably supported each other in doing well. I was physically very active. I guess I was just smart enough to figure out strategies that worked.   [info] None [info] 1452439972
Gymlover2002 [info] I was 'diagnosed' with POTS and hyperventilation at the same time. The doctors there said that that combo indicated anxiety, so I was diagnosed with anxiety as well. One visit to a psychologist later and it was very clear I did not have anxiety disorder.Maybe try keeping a packet of info about POTS with you so first responders can know what they are talking about? [info] None [info] 1573224388
EziosBlades [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety earlier this year, but much before that at night I would hear footsteps around the hardwood floor downstairs in my house, especially late at night. One time I thought I heard someone knock on my door, would you say these hallucinations were caused by anxiety or the other way around?  [info] None [info] 1418154923
Giga-X [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety the moment I finished reading this. [info] ID: 68887019 [info] 1460815358
anon3333444 [info] Is misdiagnosis still a big issue?  I tried to get diagnosed a couple of years ago, but they said I just have social anxiety after a 45 minutes interview.  I still believe very strongly I am on the autism spectrum, and I believe I was very much so when I was younger.  I'm not just shy, but I'm really slow in understanding what's going with other people and myself, despite having some serious IQ.  When I was a child (30 years ago) I was diagnosed with anxiety and bad parenting.  I understand they were misdiagnosing back then since there was no autism spectrum, but I was quite flustered with the latest diagnosis. [info] None [info] 1460139299
wtlaw [info] Diagnosis - the identification of the nature of an illness...  I was diagnosed with anxiety. Does that mean it's not a mental illness? How is it wrong? There is nothing wrong with mental illness. You're mentally ill in how you don't agree with your prescribed birth sex.I was commenting on the post-op because you were saying that it can cure them of their gender dysphoria.  [info]  [info] 1501090124
omfgwat [info] Thank you for replying. When I was 19 I was diagnosed with anxiety, agoraphobia, and panic disorder. After finally knowing what was wrong with me my anxiety kinda went away and decided not to go any further with therapy. My family doctor wouldn't give me medication but gave me information about counselling. I never followed through though. When I was in college I talked to a few counsellors and found them to be helpful but I find it extremely hard to open up about my feelings. I am tempted to seek help again but am afraid I won't be able to afford it since I don't have health benefits anymore. I live in Canada by the way. Edit- The therapist who did my assessment also recommend I try the book "Mind over Mood" it did help a lot but I only use it when I feel like I'm losing my mind again. [info] None [info] 1448247104
latteloveranonymous [info] Hi, I'm new. Just waiting for AF to arrive so we can TTC#1. I'm mid 30s, and have been off bc since mid February. I'm on my second cycle since and it is literally and metaphorically the longest cycle of my life. We've been married 10 months. We were going to start TTC sooner but I was diagnosed with anxiety last year so we focused on dealing with that first. Looking forward to being a part of this community.  [info] TTC#1, cycle1 [info] 1494415122
jcruz512 [info] Well the dog lives with me and is registered to me. I also have medical records where I was diagnosed with anxiety, which was very severe. I'm not someone who just claims I have anxiety because I get nervous sometimes. I throw up, can't breath, overall I get really ill. I went to a mental hospital a few times, was seen by multiple psychiatrist and therapist, and was on medication from ages 16 to 19 before insurance ran out so I stopped, but I still have bad anxiety. So how is that fraudulent? Because my wife filled those forms out and I considered my dog just a dog instead of something that helps me calm down? Seriously asking [info] None [info] 1551355060
FrankieJoe15 [info] Experiences with psychological assessment? Hi everyone! First time posting so a little bit nervous. I’m based in the UK so I’m aware some information may be a little bit different from other places.Basically, I have struggled with my mental health for a long time, some pretty traumatic things have happened to me and I’m basically fighting everyday to keep strong for my daughter. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 12 and PTSD after my daughters birth in 2014, I wasn’t actually offered any help for these things other than pills that I never really took. I referred myself to the NHS Well-being service where you can refer yourself for psychological help. I have my first appointment in the morning and the letter states it will be a psychological assessment. I’m a little bit unsure of what to expect and would like some advice/experiences of what other people have had! I’m also very proud of myself for finally speaking out and admitting I might need a little bit of help, I want to be the very best version of myself for my little girl, I don’t want her to grow up like I did. Thank you for reading and any advice you may be able to offer. Best wishes guys! [info] None [info] 1537723926
Tictacjo [info] I hope your dog helps you! I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was younger, and it's actually grown to be getting a bit worse as I've gotten older. (I almost had a panic attack in the movie theater the other day.) But I recently adopted a cat, and she's been perfect. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1447095852
Jokerlolcat [info] Say, I'm not 100% sure but I do have ADHD but I was diagnosed with anxiety before. My anxiety can get pretty bad and even kept me put of work for a bit. Is there any way that could help? I need to find out who would help diagnose me lol [info] None [info] 1562915035
HollowTpzXtendedClpz [info] Not really.  I can go days without it just fine. Amd I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders amd had many rx benzos in the past [info] None [info] 1552026324
Mugglemarin [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety days before I started this round of keto (after being way off the wagon for 3 years). I was told I could take two adavan' a day (low dossge). Month later, I've taken 4. This is not a scientific answer of course, I'm not a doc, and your mileage may vary. I'm a little curious, what is your total daily caloric goal? If I did 1200 calls of fat, I wouldn't have much left, but I'm at a large (yet comfortable) deficit. [info] [GM/39/6'4] [NSD:2/22/16 | SW:358 | CW:306 | FGW: 250 | NGW:200] [info] 1459122778
VirtuaIIyHuman [info] I think I was almost abducted today a few hours ago I left my house to go and collect a package that I’d missed and had been left at a “convenient collection point”, aka a dodgy corner shop on the worst side of town. It’s about 20 minutes walk away from my house and I don’t drive so I set off using google maps on my phone because I’m not familiar *exactly* with the area where the store is. In the end the store had actually shut an hour earlier than i’d expected so I had to just turn around and head straight back home ffs. It is mostly old and boarded up houses with overgrown gardens for about 10 minutes until i reached familiar grounds again and it was REALLY empty in this area except for the occasional dog walker and groups of teenagers that yell stuff at you but otherwise mind their business. When I started heading back, a white van drove past me. The back of the van was boarded up and the old guy inside had his window cracked open and he drove past me very slowly and peered out at me. I’d noticed him driving past me like that once already so alarm bells began to ring and I sped up my walking. I looked behind me and saw him turning the van around and he drove past me for a third time, very slowly and peering out at me yet again. He then disappeared around the corner. I had to walk down that way and when I turned the corner I saw he’d parked up his van ahead of me and got out and began to walk towards me. He was probably in his 60s, about 5’10 and had a pretty big build. I am 18 and short and less than 100lbs, I had nothing on him and I also have pink hair so am probably really easy to follow. I crossed the road and he crossed too, when I sidestepped he did too, basically zigzagging towards me. It was an extremely empty area behind an abandoned looking building with just a couple of houses across the road. JUST then old lady came out of her house and into her garden. We both noticed her and the guy walked straight past me. I looked over my shoulder and saw him turn around, staring at me the entire time, walk behind me for a minute, get in his van again and drive off. At this point I called my mother and I told her I thought a man was following me. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and this situation was a horrible one to be in, I could barely read the sign of the street I was on to her over the phone because my eyes were watering so much. She said she’d try to find me and I continued walking.The guy in the van circled me four more times and I felt like i was going to throw up. The 7th time he was driving past me I lifted my phone up and pretended to take a photo. I didn’t actually take one which was really stupid but I was on the verge of an anxiety attack and my hands were shaking too much to actually press anything, he saw me aiming my ‘camera’ at him and then I didn’t see him drive past again. I found my way back to a main road and sat on the pavement trying to breathe in until my mother came to pick me up. And I was checking who was driving behind us all the way home. I wish I’d been able to get a photo of the van but im just glad i’m home safe now. It was only 10-15 minutes of being followed but felt like hours. I have been harassed on the street plenty of times but never followed like that and I’m pretty sure when he was walking towards me that he was going to try and grab me if the old lady didn’t come out into her garden. I’ve never been in a situation that close with a complete stranger and i still feel like i’m going to be sick [info] None [info] 1565535312
Kmaun_Lee [info] Everything was insanely different. A minute felt like an hour. I was watching the clock and just waiting for the second hand to turn. My friend was cooking. One second he'd be in slow motion and the next he'd be going really fast. I was running around screaming. I could feel the sensation of the wind blowing and my feet touching the floor, but the room didn't even move. When it did, everything got big and I got small, and then vice versa. I could see the chair towering over me. I was looking for the potion that would bring me back to normal size like Alice in Wonderland. Time and space were far from me. I was in a different realm, but it was as if they were trying to take me by the feet and drag me down back to earth. I could hear voices whispering. I hit my head and noticed I was unable to feel pain. After that realization, I tried killing myself by hitting my head over and over. Thank god my boyfriend was there. He grabbed me and just held me, telling me everything would be okay. He layed me down and I just cried for hours. The trip lasted all day. For months after I had terrible paranoia (I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder as it is.)  [info] None [info] 1342977645
iinfante14 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety by three different mental health professionals and i still don't believe them because just like you. I experience no physical symptoms  [info] None [info] 1496432242
amzbeeee44 [info] Yep .. I had many games like this .. I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD and am now medicated so don’t play them anymore thank god  [info] None [info] 1550331142
lampion [info] Hi, I'm also 31 and for the past 9 years I've been with this wonderful girl... She also suffered from anxiety. Living with her was a bittersweet experience. Most of the times she was fine, we were laughing together and do stuff, but sometimes she would get depressed and she would cry. And boy... she could really cry. Oceans of tears :( The reasons were always the same: her family, my family, school, work, our relationship. I have to admit I was not happy with it. Years went by us and I didn't want to marry her. We were not right together but neither of us wanted to end it. We were both afraid.About 3 years ago, I convinced her to get her driving licence and that's when her anxiety got worse. She would come home from driving lessons and cry. And I was blind to her needs and I've kept pushing her to finish. In the end she quit and started going to therapy. And there was progress... But that was too late I think... In the end we split up (about 4 moths ago) :(I think I got here too deep into my own problems :) The thing that I want to say is that I understand your bf a bit. I did the same mistakes he is doing to you. The reasons that I've made them was because I was completely unaware of her condition. I simply could not understand her. In my mind she was irrational. I've tried to listen her, but I was not able to help her in the way she needed. Providing material support for her was good, but it was nothing compared with the moral support that I should have given (but for me was impossible to give).In the end, I ended up also in therapy :) I've been diagnosed with anxiety and fear of abandonment (surprise surprise). And that's why I couldn't leave her earlier. I was afraid for myself.So... because someone should support the "wolf" as well I say to you this: if you like him and he's a good person than maybe you should invest some time in helping him feel and see differently (not too much though. Life is preciously short) [info] None [info] 1419965521
happyflowers26 [info] Yeah I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year ago but never experienced such uncomfortableness while trying to talk to someone [info] None [info] 1567273575
OwlCupWithTea [info] I'm not sure i belong here I'm only 16, so some may say i still have a chance and things could improve. I understand that. I feel so alone. I been depressed all my life and had to start therapy at a young age because of an abusive brother. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 4/5. I'm  the result of two people who don't understand what being civil and not talking shit means. I've grown up around smokers including my parents, my uncle, my aunt and my two oldest brothers( i have three), at this point i have such a hatred for not only the smell but the act yet i probably have the lungs of a smoker of at least 5 years. I started homeschooling this year because i got extremely anxious at school and couldn't get out of my own head and was so depressed that staying in bed and watching videos to ignore the stress was so much better. In fact someone at the school actually recommended homeschooling because the school average was in jeopardy. I'm intrested in art and im not bad by any means but thinking of doodling makes me feel like I'll fail and not improve or ever be successful. I've had friends back at school but only one has continued talking to me, probably once a month. I have an online friend who talks to me more but also has a job and other friends. My mother is always concerned with my sister or my youngest brother(the abusive one as mentioned before). My father is working in a physically demanding job and has a girlfriend who constantly complains of being ignored by him. I'm overweight and exercising doesn't faze (i believe is the correct word?) me but sweating and being judged weighs heavily on my mind. I am terrified of dying i just simply wish my parents stopped after my brothers. Im sure they wouldve been happier as well.Im unsure of what i except of this but here it is. [info] None [info] 1579927732
Elenorelore [info] I don't know if this helps any, but I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder every three years since the fourth grade (I'm a junior in college now). I've frequently had moments where I've heard phone rings, wake-up alarms, etcetera when nothing was going on. Heck, I used to always have my phone on vibrate and started getting phantom phone vibrations  that I could've sworn were real. When I got my first apartment, there was a couple of times throughout my lease that I felt as if someone was in my apartment. I'd get out of bed just to check everywhere. I'd even slept with all of the lights on so that I could see anyone if they were coming (not every time, but a few times). Schizophrenia is a common illness in my family so I've also became immensly worried that I was in the early stages-- but I think that's just what anxiety does to you. Sometimes I'd think that I was seeing things outta the corner of my eye, then I'd just psych myself out for the rest of the day because of it.Now that I'm on medication for anxiety, all of those feelings have gone away. [info] None [info] 1565492707
RobMasterFletch [info] Panic attacks caused by too much magnesium? I am a 22 year old male, about 5' 7", 165 lbs. So some background. I've been dealing with chronic constipation for about a year now. Well a couple of months ago, I was taking milk of magnesia every night for about a month to deal with it. Not until recently did I realize that could cause a magnesium imbalance. Also, within the past month, I've had a couple panic attacks that consist of chest soreness, high heart rate, heart palpitations, numbness in left arm, stuff like that. I was diagnosed with anxiety. Now, last night, I took milk of magnesia for the first time in a couple of weeks to help with some constipation. I pretty much immediately began having panic attack symptoms again. My question: could my panic attacks and anxiety be due to a magnesium/electrolyte imbalance, or was my panic attack just purely a panic attack? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1438792879
Azcardsfan26 [info] Me!I was diagnosed with anxiety at least five years ago, and fibro a couple of years maybe? I definitely understand where you are coming from about doctors not believing you and blaming in on something else. I begged my doctor for help and she flat out told she wouldn’t do anything for me cause there was no physical proof of my pain. It’s rough, but know that you aren’t alone. There are so many others like this as well. [info] None [info] 1517787654
persimmonpink [info] My Zoloft story so far I started Zoloft about a month ago. I have been diagnosed with anxiety/panic attacks. About two years ago, I was on Lexapro and didn’t care for it too much. I also took it with .5mg of Klonopin. I didn’t take the Lexapro for too long as it contributed to weight gain. Fast forward about a year and I’m back trying a new medication. Reason being- as I get to know my anxiety better, I realize I have it pretty moderately throughout the month but severely about a week and a half before my female friend arrives. Usually, when it arrives, the anxiety subsides back to its normal amount. Or what I consider normal.To explain my anxiety...I feel like I’ve had it always. As I kid I got nervous really easily. But then in my mid twenties, I think it shows differently and cake full force with my stressful job. At work, my anxiety comes as feeling dizzy, lightheaded, and panicky. At home, it comes as obsessing over things.For about three days, I took 25mg and then on the fourth day, I started on 50mg per instructions of my doctor. I started off by taking it at night and then eventually switched to the morning, again per my doctor.For the first two weeks I had no appetite, was constantly nauseas, and extremely tired but couldn’t sleep. On top of that, my anxiety was through the roof. I started Zoloft when I was PMSing but now with the medication, the anxiety didn’t go away when my period came.The third week I had a few good days. I thought it was the light at the end of the tunnel. My obsessive ruminating thoughts didn’t stick around as much and I felt somewhat at ease. The nausea was gone, I could eat again, and I was able to sleep.Week four took a turn and I was back to feeling down and having those anxious thoughts again. But with that being said, i was back to PMSing. I tried to calm myself down with that thought, remembering it won’t last and will go away.Week five, where I am now, my female friend arrives and that day I feel an ease come. I feel more calm, not many negative thoughts and if they come, I can easily push them away. The next day (today), I feel like I can’t even think straight. My anxiety is making me want to bang my head against a wall until I can stop obsessing over things.I’m hoping it only goes up from here but at this point, I feel like I’ve had more anxiety ridden, low days than good ones. I want to wait it out before I increase the dose. This has been one of the longest months of my life. I do have to say that the panicky feeling at work does still come, but I’m able to control it better and almost manage better than I have been able to do without Zoloft. But the obsessive thoughts are worse than before I started the medication. [info] None [info] 1534026447
iluvnuggets69 [info] Morning anxiety I wake up every morning in a panic mode kinda, and I always get sick as soon as a wake up. I always feel shaky for about 2 - 3 hours after waking up and it forces me to wake up kind of early and pace and get ready for the day when I usually roll over and go back to sleep for a couple more hours. After those 2 - 3 hours are done im already exhausted and ready to sleep but I can't because my brain is racing.Does this happen to anyone else? If so does anyone know how to maybe control it a little? This has been going on for about 2 months now. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but it usually isn't so intense when im alone. [info] None [info] 1534084921
extraspicyyy [info] My(19M) boyfriend(18M) is ignoring me on purpose when it gives me PTSD. Hey, Reddit. I need advice. Just some background info, I suffer from a generalized anxiety disorder. Growing up, my father was absent and my mother was severely neglectful to me as a child. I was ignored constantly and reminded how much of a burden I was every day. My mouth used to be duct-taped whenever I attempted to catch my mother’s attention. I recognize this as abusive and I acknowledge that this has given me some kind of PTSD. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 13, un-medicated and denied therapy via my parents, who then forced me into doing the things that gave me anxiety to "cope" with them. This unfortunately made me completely unable to feel emotions when I’m faced with something that could potentially trigger my anxiety.Because of that abuse, I can’t stand being ignored by people who care about me/love me, and doing so sends me into a manic state where I overthink and send myself into a panic attack immediately. (Being ignored on purpose with the INTENT to ignore me triggers me, not people who are too busy to reply to a text, for example.) I shut my emotions off subconsciously when making friends, so dating is obviously very hard for me. I first started dating this boy a year and a half ago, and so far he’s made me very happy. But on few occasions (such as fights), he attempts to ignore me on purpose. In the past, I explained to him why this triggers me to have panic attacks/irrational thinking, and he seemed to understand. But now it seems that he’s using these tactics of ignoring me on purpose to hurt me intentionally.We got into a small fight tonight over something stupid. He didn’t respond to my texts for a long time, I began to get anxious. When he got back I asked why he was ignoring me, and he didn’t deny that he was, but continued the argument. This obviously hurt me, and I haven’t spoken to him for the rest of the night. I know my emotions shut down completely again, I don’t want to talk to him at all. He’s very upset with me because I’m ignoring HIM now, but obviously I don’t want to talk to him, he’s purposefully triggering me when he KNOWS why that would hurt me. I’m just lost... advice?TL;DR: boyfriend knows ignoring me gives me PTSD and is now using that against me when we’re fighting. [info] None [info] 1585116020
sadlilzombie [info] Thanks for the response, I am diagnosed with anxiety so makes sense. I just hate to be something negative in anybody’s eyes, but it is sort of inevitable so I’ll just try my best to keep a positive image of myself. [info] None [info] 1564709714
tragicinsecurities [info] Geppetto is out of state for work and I made JYDad cry Anytime Geppetto goes out of state or town for work, I call my JYDad a few times during the leave so he’s less lonely and we can talk one on one since Geppetto never shares my news with him. This won’t be a long post as I haven’t had any new drama with her and I’ve been feeling too raw to do more background posts while I’m already stressing over work and personal issues every day. After reading some of my old posts, j started feeling guilty about writing about my mother’s abuse towards me for some reason? Like I know I’m just chronicling the abuse I endured but I also feel bad telling a bunch of strangers on the internet about it bc despite the abuse, I had a relatively good(?) childhood despite the abuse and enmeshment.Anyways. So I was talking to dad about everything in my life, the good and bad, when I told him I’m getting a medical cannabis card. Cue jealousy and a short story of how my mom wouldn’t let him buy an edible when they were on vacation in Europe and also how the hell do I qualify for my medical card but he with arthritis can’t. So I told him I was diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd. Cue confusion. Where did I get my ptsd? Well from mom of course.My poor dad had to relive all the abuse he had no idea about bc after the first incident when she slammed my head on the glass dining room table over spilled spaghetti, he told her if she ever touched me again, she was out of his house(not that he would do that bc that meant she’d take me with me; at this point of the glass table story, I was 5 and a fresh immigrant and my dad was not married to my mom and had no legal claim to me bc he wasn’t my birth father although he is the only father figure I recognize and acknowledge). So my mother, not one to bow down to anyone telling her what to do, started her abuse behind his back.I didn’t tell him every time she hit me or even the gravity of the things she said to me, bc I’m pretty sure if I told him about the abortion comment now, he’d die of a stroke. So he got very upset and telling me he was sorry for not stepping up and doing better. I told him I did not blame him for any of it and that he was doing the best he could under the shrouded circumstances. Then he told me something that shocked me - ever since the children left the nest, their relationship has gotten better. My mom still has her anger issues but he doesn’t give a shit and ignores her so it doesn’t impact him as much whereas when we lived with our parents, her anger and frustrations she would take out on us. So I asked my dad, well what changed? His answer deadass was: we no longer have to fight over parenting styles.Glad my brother and I were literal punching bags bc mom couldn’t figure out how to parent without abusing us. I suspect her own childhood trauma and undiagnosed PPDs played a much larger role in how she raised us but quite frankly I’m not in a position to ask her because I haven’t forgiven her yet for what she put us through. [info] None [info] 1582727351
rcbarr94 [info] It’s possible that you have anxiety. I’m constantly obsessing over whether people actually like me or if they just pretend and then say rude/mean things behind my back. I was diagnosed with anxiety and started seeing a therapist and I’ve been working on it. It’s hard to let it go but you have to learn to let yourself be okay with people not liking you because not every person in the world is going to get along and that’s okay. There are people that I don’t like but that doesn’t necessarily mean that they’re bad people. So I try to think of the reverse. There are people who won’t like me but that doesn’t mean that I’m a bad person or that there’s anything wrong with me. Also some people ARE just mean spirited and it says more about them than it does about the people they’re being mean to/about.  [info] None [info] 1527474147
Qi_ra [info] I HAVE THIS TOO. I swear, my mother, can talk for HOURS about stories of her childhood, but when I think back on my own life, it almost seems fuzzy. People can remind me, and pictures can help bring back memories a bit, but I can hardly remember anything before middle school. I don’t really think it’s normal. I always thought it was because I started taking medicine when I was like 14 and maybe it messed with my memory, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder too. Or maybe it’s both?? [info] None [info] 1558839458
RazorXXtreme [info] What do I do if I want to see a therapist but cant afford it? Also, what do I do if I "know" I have certain things based off the symptoms but havent gotten diagnosed? As of right now, I was diagnosed with anxiety and stress from my doctor, but I've realized that I've had all the symptoms of really bad OCD my whole life and I just brushed it off as anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1511135781
rooroo999 [info] I feel like I've finally moved on from a girl that I tried and failed to start a relationship with. So I started talking to an old classmate that I had a minor crush on in high school. We made plans to go see a movie one night last week. I stayed up till eleven and never heard from her, and now she's avoiding me. On top of that, I'm getting tired of my current job in retail, but I can't find anything in my town that would be any better. I can't really afford to make a big move to another town though or to go to college without going into debt. On top of that, I think I have the onset of either thyroid problems or anemia, and I've been diagnosed with anxiety problems in the past.  My current insurance is crap, and l can't afford to pay out of pocket to see a doctor about it. I just kinda feel like I'm stuck. Like I graduated high school and am ready to move on in life, but I can't really get out of my current situation. My health is going downhill. My job is going nowhere. I'm 20, and I've never had a serious relationship. I just feel worthless right now... I don't feel like I'm living my life; I feel like I'm just waiting for it to end.  [info] None [info] 1537475852
awesome8blocks [info] Depressed and anxious after coming out. Yesterday I came out to my mother and she took it well but after I told her I've had an extremely uncomfortable feeling in my gut. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I think this might be the problem. I absolutely hate this feeling and I can't stop thinking about grabbing a knife and ending it all. Is this normal after coming out? could the reason be I came out too young? (I'm 13) I'm also terrified of coming out to anyone else, I kind of hope that my mother just decides to tell people, I'm not strong enough to do it myself maybe that's the reason for this feeling. I need help... [info] None [info] 1526441693
ghoulkiddd [info] This fear of fire alarms carried through high school for me, and it got to a point in grade school that I'd ask every. single. Day. Then in middle school I figured out the schedule because nobody fucking else did, and I'd very conveniently bounce that day.Nobody was surprised when I told them I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1544958719
partymammal666 [info] Just letting y’all know the deal and maybe I could get some help I’m writing this possibly as an attempt to analyze myself and maybe the simple act of writing this will help me, but regardless, I may as well immortalize my bitch ass on the internet.Basic information:I am a 15 year old boy, turning 16 in a month. Please don’t tell me that puberty is the cause of everything, but I am definitely aware that it is a factor. I go to public high school and am at the top of my class. I have a 32 on my ACT as a sophomore. I smoke weed almost daily, and have been vaping for about a year which has resulted in mild nicotine addiction. I drink and take acid occasionally, and have done shrooms. I took a bar of Xanax when I was 13. But mostly I just like to smoke. I have a fucking amazing family, middle class, living in awesome Lexington KY, my parents are respectful of my privacy and let me live, but do step in as parents should. This includes complete intolerance of any drugs or alcohol. I have a massive amount of friends and also have very awesome close friends. I love music, games, I rock climb, exercise regularly, play guitar, eat at least semi-well; I like to think that I take care of myself. However I am constantly facing mental health issues. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 13, but after a while I stopped going to therapy. I was not prescribed any meds except for propranerol, which slows my heart in case of panic attacks or whatever. I stopped going because I either felt better or just got used to my anxiety, not sure which. But just recently I’ve begun to feel as if I’m losing control. I’m just gonna list some shit real quick.-overthinking everything all the time (this has been present for years now)-thinking about how I act in social situations-I’m convinced that I’m an asshole. Everyone tells me that I’m not but I definitely get overly aggressive at times and, to be honest, I’m low key full of myself. You might have got that from above, but I am narcissistic. Mainly I think that I’m smarter than everyone else and have a “cooler aesthetic” with my fashion and social media. Some bullshit, I know. -ironically, self hate. I hate myself because I’m aggressive. I hate myself because I’m not beautiful. I hate myself because I lie a lot. I shoplift. I do drugs. I make horrible decisions. I say things that tear at peoples emotions without even realizing it. I am concerned with personal gain. Most of all, it’s because I’m a piece of shit but nobody knows it because Im smart enough to hide it from everyone.-im scared of fucking over the people I love, and I have done it before. -I’m impatient. Waiting for anything is difficult, and then once it happens I get depressed because it happened and somehow didn’t meet the expectations I set for that thing in my mind.-I’m tired, muscles ache, my hands are CONSTANTLY sweaty, my heart rate is all over the place.-I get angry. I push everything down inside me and probably about every month I just lose control. But when I’m alone. Frequently when thus happens I basically punch shit until my knuckles bleed or I chill out, and I think that may be a form of self harm. -I never talk to anyone about my feelings really because I think that I’m just being a pussy since my life is so perfect. -I feel like I’m losing control of my responsibilities and when I think about all the things I have/want to do I end up sitting on my phone for hours doing nothing.-I can’t keep a serious romantic relationship without desiring someone else. Also, the only 3 high school relationships I have had began with sex. It sucks.-I constantly feel like I’m holding on to something. Like, I’m holding on to life and the slightest mistake or movement will throw me off the edge. It’s more or less a physical feeling of tenseness.-I can’t fall asleep. It takes at least an hour unless I pop a Benadryl which are terrible for my liver.-and to top it off, I am aware. I know all these things are going on and a lot of times I can pinpoint exactly why they exist. But it doesn’t make them go away. It just makes me feel helpless and as if this is just how it is. I feel like all of my social overthinking is the reason so many people like me, since everything that is at is meticulously crafted and then checked over (until I try to stop inhibiting my words/thoughts and boom instantly I cross the line or am just straight up rude or an asshole). Drugs are probably (who am I kidding, definitely) a factor in the way I feel. But I’ve been in that scene my entire pubescent life and my social web is practically built around weed. TL;DR: my life is perfect on the outside and utter fear and chaos on the inside. I have everything going for me but feel like I’m holding on desperately to a normal life. I just want to be normal. I don’t want to freak out all day because I called a girl friend a bitch even when they are calling me a bitch and we’re joking around. I don’t want to be constantly worrying about getting caught smoking by my parents. I don’t want to punch bricks until my knuckles bleed because I cant grasp a math concept. I don’t want a small mistake to replace every single good thing that has happened to me all day. I don’t want to be constantly doubting myself and my actions. I don’t want to have this raging, fearful turmoil inside me. But: I am ok. I thrive in my life. It’s all just on the inside. So it’s like, should I even worry? Will it go away? I just. don’t. know. I wrote this down mainly for myself, but let me know your thoughts please. I’ll listen to whatever you have to say, as long as you mean it, good or bad, nice or mean. Thanks y’all. [info] None [info] 1526342649
DanceOfTheSiren [info] Alright, there are a few!1. I'm a Masochist2. I like getting my hair brushed because it excites me when other people do it.3. I have always wanted to have sex in the shower.4. I am ALL about dirty talk.5. I want to have my partner tease me in public even though I have been diagnosed with anxiety.And that's about it...probably.Edit: Nope that's not it! I forgot that I want to have a threesome with two guys. [info] None [info] 1564028828
_smosbol_ [info] I have have severe health anxiety, and although declared healthy, I can't keep from checking my pulse all the time. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and chronic hyperventilation. I suffered from it a couple of years now, with ups and downs. Last summer I had an ongoing up, which was great. I felt stress free, I could do any kind of exercise i wanted, I ate and drank what wanted, etc.Since a couple of months I've hit rock bottom again. I don't sleep wel, I undereat, I lost a great deal of the stamina and energy I built up last summer. And above all, I'm afraid of my own pulse.I can't stop checking it often. I did notice that when I get anxious or when I'm breathing weird again, when I check my pulse in my neck it feels like my veins contract very hard and my heart also, which makes me really anxious.It's like my veins and heart are really squeezing together sometimes, and it really winds me up. It disables me from working out and getting into a better condition, although when I'm working out and breathing steadily it's not really contracting that hard but just going fast. An elevated heart rate also makes me anxious because I'm afraid it's going to stop at any given moment.I'm a total mess. It really prevents me from going full on during physical activities. Even drinking a beer can put me into a panic and give me palpitations and chest pain. I'm in my mid-twenties, I used to do loads of sports until 8 months ago, and doctors and cardiologists told me I'm fine, yet I continue to live this mentally destructive lifestyle.I just don't know what to do anymore. I tried counseling, but it's really, really hard to convince myself there is nothing wrong with me when I'm having this heavy contracting pulse, chest pain, arm pains etc. [info] None [info] 1436018959
ako19 [info] I was talking to a friend. He mentioned that he was really nervous a lot of the time, and might have an anxiety disorder. Later I thought to myself, man, it'd be tough to deal with that. I'm glad I don't.A month later, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder [info] None [info] 1534608606
SicarioNox [info] Uh, hello! I'm nineteen and I was diagnosed with anxiety more than two years ago. It's not very bad, but surely is causing some problems and discomfort. I think my main problems are constant overthinking and some sort of mild social anxiety, seeing as I tend to overthink most situations making them like a hundred times worse in my head and then putting myself into other people's boots in that situation and I'm kind of awkward with people (mostly constant fear of them judging me and such). I don't really take any kind of serious medication because I don't think I need it, seeing as my problems don't cause huge interference in my life. I basically only take vitamin B supplements that my psychologist suggested me to take when I feel it's starting to make me feel worse than usual. So that's it I guess. :D As for the question of the week, I'm recently been hooked up on Superhot and been replaying Mirror's Edge. :D [info] None [info] 1464522184
weetabixgirl [info] Needing to vent I think maybe I just need to vent. I got married Dec 2015. My husband has changed with marriage (he has become even more loving and supporting than he was before). But I feel like a burden to him, I got here on a non immigrant visa and I was kind of forced to change my immigration status. He submitted my paperwork on april 10th.I recently lost my job and I've had quite a few job offers ever since (I got a BAchelor's degree in Computer Systems Engineering with an Android app development certification). I was also diagnosed with anxiety and I am unable to continue my treatment due to lack of insurance.Today not only I got into an accident and destroyed my beautiful mustang, I also realized that I only got 3 weeks left until my driver's license expires and I won't be able to renew it until my EAD comes in and most importantly, I cannot get a new job without my EAD.I already lost 2 good job opportunities, one of them as a Security Analyst and the other one as an entry level Network Engineer. This whole situation is also affecting my health, like I said I was diagnosed with anxiety and suffered from PTSD in the past (for those who think that you need to be a war veteran in order to be diagnosed with PTSD, you are wrong).I have no car, no drivers license, no job and I am in a foreign country. My husband tries his best to cheer me up (I love him and I feel like I hit the husband jackpot) he brings me flowers and texts me jokes while he is at work and cooks my favorite food for me (cream cheese jalapenos wrapped in bacon) but at the same time I don't want to feel like I am a burden to him, both financially and emotionally (he has a blue collar job, if the tables were turned it would have been a little bit easier for me because most IT jobs are better paid). When I called USCIS to get an update about my EAD status (it's only been 50 days since it was submitted) he guy I spoke to was really rude and told me that "I chose a bad moment to be an immigrant".Has anyone been through a similar situation? How long did it tale for your EAD to come in the mail? My grammar is crappy but that's becuse English isn't my first language. [info] None [info] 1464760794
katelynnxoxo44 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as a separate event. So the therapist’s visits were for valid reasoning. And after telling the therapist about our lives recently, she did recommend that having the dog would help. [info] None [info] 1558063198
hdaigre47 [info] Thanks for the suggestion, but I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was 6 and have seen a psychiatrist and therapists ever since. Received a few other diagnoses along the way as well. It’s been fun. [info] LSU Tigers / Team Chaos [info] 1515607218
rough_lovely [info] I have been using CBD for about a year. I was diagnosed with anxiety, panic attacks and major depressive disorder after my husband passed from brain cancer at a very young age. It has worked better for me than all of the prescribed pills combined. It gives me an overall sence of calm and I sleep immensely better, which allows my body to recover.  I am not longer taking my prescriptions and let me say..the fog has lifted and I am overall feeling like I can tackle (most) everyday. The only downfall seems to be the high price of the oil. It runs me about $80/month (1 750mg bottle). It's definitely worth a shot if you can afford it. [info] None [info] 1548279310
MilkMyHonkey [info] Thank you so much for sharing your story!I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ocd prior to children, so like you, I expected it to heighten as well. I think you’re absolutely right about the circumstances surrounding our births. Every story is different. My first, was traumatic and I had no help. My mother left for a different province 16 hours away, 4 hours after I gave birth. My in laws created an embarrassing scene, just impacting my trauma even more. My sister had just had her second child 2 months prior, so she did her best to help, but I was in no position to ask much more of her. I feel like this time, I can prepare better.  [info] None [info] 1546467993
LupeTheKiller [info] [HELP] Understanding purpose of medicine: Geodon and Lamictal I went to the doctor today and I've been diagnosed with anxiety and obsessive and delusional thoughts. I was on Seroquel but I asked to switch cause of the weight gain. He told me that seroquel is the only medicine certified to treat the ups and downs, so I need to take two medicines. He said to think of it like an Oreo. I need medicine controlling my highs and lows in order to meet in the perfect middle. He prescribed me geodon, which I've read is the best for weight gain, and lamictal. He was kinda frustrated about my request and didn't believe seroquel effects metabolism. Anyways, can anyone explain the time of the two medicines in simple terms. Does one help lift my mood, while another control my mood/thoughts from spiraling out of control? Any advice would be greatly appreciated! [info] None [info] 1405632249
starshine33 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety pre-trauma, but I definitely agree that my anxiety has gotten a lot worse since the event. I'll ask my therapist about it, thanks so much :)  [info]  [info] 1552927046
justademonindisguise [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety (specified, unspecified) because of the fact that a lot of it stems from my schizophrenia. I was told it's very common in people on the schizo spectrum. I was prescribed anti-anxiety meds for it but I try to do other stuff to ease my anxiety before I take them. I find that the more anxious I am the more psychotic I am which leads to more anxiety and it's a never ending cycle so it's good to get it treated if you can.  [info] None [info] 1502762800
Grounded323 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety two months the ago, the first 6 weeks of adjusting to my meds I was good but the last 2 weeks I've been sleeping all day unless I'm going to get food or have to be somewhere.I don't know if it will get better on it's own or my meds needs to be adjusted. But I'm hanging in there because I feel hopeful before I got diagnosed I was miserable wondering why I'm such a fuck up not knowing I have anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1525948266
cripple2493 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and agoraphobia and I find myself unable to leave the house due to anxiety and asking myself if I'm faking it - so yeah [info] Agoraphobia/panic disorder/emetophobia [info] 1539366138
gdubbaya [info] Well.. Now I feel even worse. I'm still doing them even as we speak, but to answer your question, it's because I'm so worried. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so situations like these really put me on edge. I hope my response doesn't spark a negative reply though, as I just genuinely want to know. [info] None [info] 1562008438
SakuraGirl88 [info] Cruise in a month and I'm terrified! Hello. I think this is my first time posting, but here goes. I'm going on a cruise in December. A three-week cruise at that. This is not the first cruise I've been on and this is not the first overseas cruise I've been on either. But this is the first cruise I've been on with anxiety and emetophobia. The last time a v* was in 2013. It was on Thanksgiving of all holidays. I had eaten some popcorn from Target that Monday. My mom had eaten more of it than I did and was v* that Tuesday and Wednesday. It didn't hit me until Thanksgiving day. I woke up at about 5 AM and my stomach was burning and gurgling. I actually was thinking that it was just my acid reflux acting up not FP.So, I got up and ate some oatmeal. I was ok. I rode to my aunt's house with my mom. It was the longest hour drive ever. When we got to my aunt's house, the floodgates opened. After that, I was laying in front of the bathroom for hours until we went home. When we got home, I V* again and was ok. But having that experience terrified me. Before the Thanksgiving incident, I hadn't v* since 2004. For almost 10 years, I ate whatever I wanted. I know I ate some questionable food and being in college, I know I was around people with noro. So when it happened in 2013, when I graduated, I went into a fearful spiral.But I was doing ok until September 2015. I had a panic attack in the mall, which began as me feeling like I had to v*. I was diagnosed with anxiety and the anxiety messed up my acid reflux. I've been on medication for the anxiety, but I do still have episodes. And it got worse when I turned 26 and had to get my own health insurance. In December of 2016, I was diagnosed with IBS, but I was still having stomach problems. In the beginning of this year, I was going through a very stressful time, and my stomach was bothering me so bad to the point where I couldn't eat from January to April. In April, I was diagnosed with gastritis. And I often get nauseated from that too. I have medicine for nausea, but I still have episodesI just wish my stomach would be normal. Now, I'm going on this cruise in December. I'm so worried about my stomach and anxiety. I know worry will only make it worse, but I can't help it. And if being on a ship for 3 weeks was bad enough. I'm worried about the 11-hour flight to South America that we have to take. I'm so worried about catching noro or fp and being so far away from home. TL;DR: Going on a 3-week South American cruise and scared of catching noro or having fp [info] None [info] 1509682179
alt_7665533 [info] I don't know. I've been diagnosed with anxiety as of about two and a half years agofrom about a year and a half ago ive been having horrible days for certain periods of time ranging from three days to three weeks, or even monthsi thought it was just normal, but ive stumbled across this sub and a couple others and i have related way too much.ive taken tests, and ive read symptoms, its all lined up and my issue is i don't know who to talk withand im just afraid someone's gonna just play it off like im faking and idk where to go theni just don't know [info] None [info] 1554944215
BayTeeaLien [info] What state are you in? I am with you as well on all these. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, PTSD, Depression, ADHD and HBP. I used to take 8 different meds a day but as of 3 years ago stopped. I started using marijuana. The results have been amazing. The thing about those meds are the side effects... I hated them.  [info] None [info] 1475553860
castiels-left-ankle [info] what if she's dead? TW: SUICIDE ATTEMPTi haven't heard from my best friend all day.we go to the same school. none of our friends know where she is. i sent her 6 texts and 2 snaps, plus i called her 5 times. she always responds. last night, i got a single text from her: just "ily" with no context whatsoever. i know this sounds stupid and paranoid, but i know she's suicidal and has attempted suicide at least 2-3 times. when i get out of school i could walk to her house (too young to drive) but it takes upwards of an hour and my mom will be home before i'm back. i don't know what to do. her mom is also physically and emotionally abusive and could've done something to her. i should probably mention i'm diagnosed with anxiety. still. something feels off. [info] None [info] 1584035980
Clob [info] Well. Just remember your doc works for you. If you have symptoms then you should be treated if it makes sense. Find a doc that can work with you, understand your symptoms, and not just treat a number. Always go for injections. Don't do gel or implants. Injections should be done weekly or twice a week. Every 2 or 4 weeks and the doc is clueless.  If you're in Dallas , Texas I can recommend to you a good clinic that keeps up on the latest data on this stuff. Basically, gains were slow or none. Issues with keeping it up sometimes, though I could have sex. I was diagnosed with anxiety, and my TRT has helped with that tremendously. Sice I've been on it, Iv'e been happier, stronger, confident, and generally feeling and performing better in every aspect of life.I would average low 3's.  My low was in the mid 2's on a 250 to 1100 scale. My low is now a 750 on my worst test and about 1000 on my best. Free test is above 25. I feel like a beast. No other side efects.  [info] None [info] 1447384938
td_bot2 [info] Is it just me, or does Sean Spicer strike you as an empathetic being with a big heart? I hope this is the right place for this post. I apologize in advance for the length of this, and also for the possible grammatical errors.The following is my own opinion:It seems as if Sean Spicer's position does not suite him well (his suits don't fit him well either lol (pun intended)). Anyway, when I watch him speak, I can easily see that he is tense and also speaks with a defensive tone. However, watching him speak for the past few months has made me wonder a few things, and I would like to know your personal opinions about Sean.I believe that in real life, he is a person with a very big heart, and has the ability to feel empathy. Which is very different from the rest of Trump's cabinet, and others close to Trump (as far as I can tell, but I could be very wrong). Right off the bat, I noticed he was very different.In my own life, I was diagnosed with anxiety (Generalized Anxiety Disorder) at age 8, and have been living with it, embracing it, and have helped others with it. Due to this, I am usually very good at sensing when people are experiencing even the slightest of anxiety. To me, Sean Spicer gives off this vibe, yet at the same time I feel that he really tries to do his best. Although, more recently I feel he is becoming fed up with his job. Trump has been in office for over 50 days so far, and it sure has been a hell of a roller coaster ride, so I could understand if Sean is fed up with it all.I see the bracelet he wears (the rainbow colored one) which says "DAD" in the middle of it. According to what I have read online, his children made this bracelet for him. The fact that he wears this everywhere (especially the fact that he is not afraid of being seen with rainbow colors, which for some I assume could be misleading if they didn't notice the "DAD" on the bracelet) is extremely heartwarming and comforting. He is genuine in this way. He also may not spending nearly as much time with his children as he did before the Trump era. He probably misses them very much, and the bracelet is a piece of their heart he wears. In regards to what he has said during press conferences, do you believe his statements to be his true opinions and feelings? Or do you feel that he is only protecting the presidents credibility because he fears losing his job? I can't help but think of the saying "don't kill the messenger", for he gives off the vibe that he would love to say that to the press. I have this funny feeling there is a whole other side to Sean that we do not see. For my last comment, the fact that he was once the "White House Easter Bunny" is pretty awesome, and I'm hoping he does it again this year (99% sure it won't happen though lol).I know that the above may not be entirely true, for most of what I wrote is my own opinion. Please correct me with sources, if necessary. Again, I apologize for the length of this and thank you for reading :)TL;DR: Sean Spicer may actually be a kind-hearted individual who may have had no idea what he was walking into when accepting his position as the White House press secretary and communications director. [info] BAN ME BITCHES [info] 1490127933
ShearlyDisappointed [info] Whoops. Posted this in the wrong spot the first time.  appreciate you taking the time to answer. I've never thought about it in this way. Every time I have asked in the past, he says he wouldn't be here if he didn't want to be. But his actions tell me otherwise. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and sometimes I start to feel like I'm just being crazy and that I'm not doing something for him. But I'm honestly at the end of my rope. [info] None [info] 1497378439
ironworker88 [info] Quick questions about the Palace Chase program Active duty member here with a year and some months left on my FTA contract. I am considering the palace chase program but just have a couple questions:1) A while back I was diagnosed with anxiety not otherwise specified (NOS) and was taking SSRI medication for a few months while also receiving cognitive therapy. I had self-referred to mental health and had nothing but a positive experience in my treatment. Is this something that will disqualify me from palace chasing? My prescription expired a while ago and the psychiatrist recommended not renewing it after I tapered it off.2) Are most ANG units willing to invest/pay for retraining? I personally like my career field (contracting) a lot but I am open to retraining if it means a better chance of palace chasing. [info] None [info] 1411339674
remorse2 [info] You have quoted the verse.   That is good advice.  I was constantly anxious until I was diagnosed with anxiety by my doctor.   I am now taking antianxiety medications.  I expect to be off the medication in a year.   So go see your doctor is my advice. [info] None [info] 1572831818
foxpunch [info] Was just about to comment about this. I have what feels like an existential crisis multiple times a day and I can't look in the mirror without freaking out a little because, like. I'm alive? Everyone else is also alive with their own thoughts and experiences? It blows my mind, lol. It started around the time I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1564659899
sipasoup85 [info] Didn't see this coming I am a 34f who has just realized my drinking was much more of a problem than I thought. Most weeks I have around 1-2 drinks three nights a week and then usually a binge on Friday or Saturday 2-3 times a month. It used to be that these binges would be around 5 drinks over 5-6 hours. Because of my size that would bring me to around .8-.9 BAC.Lately though (the last few months) my binges have increased to being around a BAC of .15 which is really scary and not that hard when you only weigh 115 pounds. It all started when I tried to cut back. I would take a month or a week off and then have a scary binge a few weeks after it was over. The really scary part, after a party I went to last Saturday where I had a particularly "good time" I am now having what I think are withdrawal symptoms.Something similar happened around a month ago but I chalked it up to a seasonal cold but now I'm pretty sure it's caused by detoxing after a binge. I've never had anything like it before. Mostly night sweats and clammy hands. High anxiety but I have been diagnosed with anxiety for the last 10 years so that's not super telling. I had a dizzy / hot flash spell at work yesterday while I was SITTING DOWN. It might have been low blood sugar, too much coffee and no water intake or it could have been something way worse than that.I went from admittedly someone who needed to cut back to someone who is now alcohol dependent??? How did this happen so quickly? As a note I would have Sundays, Mondays and Tuesdays without drinking in the past and not see these symptoms.   I spoke with my husband about it and he agrees that if I just stuck to the 1-2 drinks at home a few nights a week and cut out the binges  I would be fine but with the kindling effect I'm worried I'll start to detox every time I drink. [info] None [info] 1575985294
kyaanureeves [info] I didn’t crack under pressure and cry today! It was my first day of high school EVER and I’m a very nervous person. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back and that hasn’t helped when it comes to meeting new people and trying to make it to class on time, speak in front of everyone, etc.I was SO prepared to cry that I packed tissues in my bag. But all of my worries were irrational. “What if I don’t make it to class on time?” I got to all of my classes with no issue. “What if I forget my locker combo?” I got in all four times with NO ISSUE!I was super glad to find that I could get through something really stressful without my natural response-fetal position, crying. I’m really proud of myself, which is rare for me. But hey, I could do it and that got me a lot more self-confidence. [info] None [info] 1567564139
unique_name000 [info] &gt;But I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD because of my abusive childhood, and Facebook can be a major trigger.Ok, so I have CPTSD myself, also from childhood trauma and Facebook is absolutely a trigger UNLESS you learn to filter what you see.  Block every news source.  Don't follow people who post about stuff you don't want to see (I unfollowed EVERYONE that talked about politics in any way during elections, I unfollow everyone that posts sad animals or crazy news stories).  It CAN be done, it just takes filtering through the stuff you don't want to see.  Right now, I'm down to bird pages, Harry Potter and a few friends.  That's it.Good luck!!!! [info] None [info] 1500990928
boop_attack [info] How do I keep myself from getting really anxious during a nosebleed? I feel really, really silly asking this. Backstory: Every winter, due to a combination of dry air, allergies, blowing my nose, medication, and sometimes the flu or a cold, I tend to get nosebleeds. Most of the time they're no big deal and stop after a few minutes. Sometimes they're bad and don't stop for 10-20 minutes. I know how to handle them, but I can't help becoming extremely anxious - heart pounding, shortness of breath, dry mouth, shaking, stomach and bowels twisting up and feeling like they're about to evacuate their contents - almost building up to a panic attack. I try to tell myself it will be ok, I've handled nosebleeds before, I can deal with this too and it'll all be fine. But just when I start to calm down something will trigger the anxiety again - the blood, fear that it won't stop bleeding, etc. An explanation of that latter fear: A few years ago I became really sick. I was prescribed Advil, a blood thinner, and because of the dry air and illness and bad luck, ended up having nose hemorrhages several times and had to go to the hospital to get my nose packed. So when I see blood gushing out, I'm terrified that my nose is hemorrhaging again and won't stop, though it hasn't happened since and I'm careful that none of the meds I take are blood thinners or have that side effect.Also, I'm not digging for gold in my nose, I promise haha! The nosebleeds can start if I sniff or blow my nose or get very hot or get out of bed in the morning If I can't seem to calm down after a nosebleed, I'll take an anti-anxiety medication (I have been diagnosed with anxiety but have gotten better at managing it without medication, which I now use if other techniques aren't working.)Please be gentle... I feel massively pathetic asking this question. But I just want to know if I'm not alone or if anyone has helpful advice. Thank you a bunch :)PS: before anyone asks, yes I do get my flu vaccination every year :) but still may catch it once a year.EDIT: forgot to mention that I do use a humidifier and lubricating nose sprays and petroleum jelly. Also, sorry for this being so long. [info] None [info] 1547443821
dogfins25 [info] I had this problem for many years.  This was actually a symptom I had before I was diagnosed with anxiety.  I went thru a bunch of tests to see if it was a physical issue and it wasn't until I started high school and my anxiety got worse that I got help. First I wouldn't recommend wearing a maxi pad. If you do it once it may become a habit. I did this for years and I had to "wean" myself off them, I would wear the thick heavy flow ones daily because I was afraid of having an accident. I would also tie a sweater around my waist. I would go to the bathroom, clean up and then sit down again because "Oh! I still have to go a little bit" so that became a nasty cycle and I would spend a long time in the bathroom. I always had to know where the toilet was and if I didn't have access to one... I hated school assemblys because I felt trapped.  I was terrified of school trips because the bus didn't have a bathroom. You know what though, I NEVER HAD AN ACCIDENT. Ever. If you can distract yourself on the bus that may help, read a book, listen to music, talk to someone on the phone. You can PM me if you want. It will be OK.  [info] None [info] 1461821469
Bad_Wulph [info] TL;DR I have the symptoms, I'm your age, and I've had an extensive cardiac workup. Every test came back well and I'm healthy. My symptoms are caused by a combination of scoliosis and anxiety. You're probably okay, but if you have any doubt, see a general practitioner.Hey man, I'm 22, male, 5'5", 120 lbs, white, with no known medical conditions. I have chest pains and dizziness very often. As I'm typing this, I feel discomfort in my chest and I'm a little dizzy. Take this with a grain of salt, as we may not be quite the same, but I was diagnosed with anxiety, and I've had an extensive cardiac workup. I've have bloodwork, xrays, multiple EKGs, two ultrasounds, a stress test, a 24 hour monitor, and a 30 day monitor. This has spanned across two different cardiologists, my family doctor, and a couple of ER visits. Everything came back perfect. They even went as far to say that my heart seems relatively fit, the complete opposite of unhealthy. The diagnosis I got was sinus tachycardia, which is not a problem with the heart itself, but my brain is telling my heart to speed up and act funny. They attributed that to me being a hypochondriac, which is indicative of anxiety. And they were right, I'm fine, but suffer from panic attacks frequently. If your cardiologists say your heart is healthy, they are probably right. Heart disease is usually decades in the making, and without a preexisting heart condition, it's almost impossible for you to have enough arterial plaque to cause a heart attack at your age, even if you did abuse your body as a teen. And as someone else said, if this has been going on a while and you aren't dead, it's probably not heart related.One reason for my chest pain is I have scoliosis (which was shown during one of my xrays), and it causes tension in my ribs, which pushes and pulls against the connective tissues holding my ribs to my sternum. That's why I have left-side chest pain, and it often causes me severe anxiety. Scoliosis and anxiety work in tandem to keep me worried about my health. I think you should see a general practitioner at this point, as they can likely determine if your pain is cardiac or musculoskeletal, and refer you to any needed specialists from there.  [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1544915129
Ptolemy222 [info] Hi, I have felt this way (Although I was diagnosed with anxiety at 16). I have struggled with it for years. But from my perspective what’s happening here is that you have personal insecurities in yourself. You feel although if you were to start talking to someone you would be judged, ridiculed, labelled. THIS is a natural thing that some guys go through. (I have some evolutionary theories that back this up a bit).But this may come from different things. Like times where you feel like you shouldn’t step up. or you think that someone has an advantage over you and you are comparing yourself. Or what I personally went through was fear of talking to people. It’s really “The Ego” which you never want to threaten. Eckhart Tolle - The power of now, IS A GREAT BOOK FOR THIS. But I think overcoming things like this comes with that internal belief that who you are is valuable. What you believe is valuable. You can have confidence in almost any situation. You think what other people say is valuable, but interpret what people say to be truthful to yourself before accepting it as a fact. You need to think less that people are “Higher” or “Lower” than you, and start thinking that we’re all human on the same level, some people make really stupid mistakes, we get over it, and we’re all trying our best. This will come with time naturally because we grow into stronger people everyday if we move in that direction.Some stuff I did to get over my anxiety (Not necessarily what you have), was by taking weird challenges. Like Saying something stupid to see how someone will react. Start making conversations with strangers. Literally going out everyday through my anxiety and socially experimenting to figure out what are good things  and what are not good things to do. Socially experiment, have confidence in yourself.I’m not sure if this helped. But I am trying.  [info] None [info] 1510969498
Rose-Bubble [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 4, and my brother at the same time when he was 5. We've been given a LOT of coping tools. My mom knows how to deal with people who have anxiety, but my mom cannot be her therapist. She needs to go to a real therapist. And also possibly a psychologist. Unfortunately she has shown no interest in actually helping herself when we've talked to her about this. I also want to say that I think it's wonderful that you're managing your anxiety so well, and are so willing to talk about it. Thank you. [info] None [info] 1476761162
redrebellion [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety by a psychiatrist and told my mom (who does not work in the medical industry at all). "No, you don't have anxiety!" Oh, what a relief! /s [info] None [info] 1469549616
orangemoon93 [info] i have before,i'm diagnosed with anxiety and i was prescribed even stronger anxiety pills but i don't want to take them, i've been doing fine just dealing with anxiety on my own, i'm just going through rough times now, a really painful break up.this pill i took is not risky it's very mild and it can be given to anyone suffering with panic. [info] 220 days [info] 1471245204
Sherlockiana [info] I have tons of loving family members and I struggle with anxiety every day. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder. Therapy helped a lot. So did medication. Anxiety is a treatable disease that can be helped through therapy. I encourage you to talk to a counselor and deal with it directly. Don't let it eat your life. [info] None [info] 1413488732
bellamarieswan [info] COVID19 anxiety I am so scared. I am just now in my third trimester and my hospital made a rule you can only have SO there (and I’m thankful at least he can be there!) I was looking forward to having my mom there and it’s her a first grandchild. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 17 but I always controlled it cause I didn’t have anything to actually worry about. Now I’m stressed constantly about what will happen if I can’t go to work anymore. On top of that I have asthma and being pregnant I’m already short of breath... so I’m scared of the actual illness even though I’m young (20) I am so stressed that I’m scared it could effect my baby :( but I can’t stop stressing [info] None [info] 1584412691
poptarttss [info] Experiencing panic 'fits' at night I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder 2 years ago, I was having some panic attacks throughout the day that included palpitations and extreme flight or fight response that lasted from maybe 10 to 60 seconds. Prozac helped and those episodes subsided. I haven't had one of these for some time (no longer take prosaic either) but I do have what can be best described as panic micro 'fits' in bed at night. They last maybe a second or two, I have no warning they're coming and I usually respond quite physically, they make me violently jump, shake my legs etc. and generally they feel very very intense, but are gone almost instantly. It's like being hit with a panic hammer.Does anyone know what they are and if there's anything I can do about it? [info] None [info] 1490256145
outofthismoon [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder last year. Should I be eating shrooms? [info] None [info] 1458608748
Leopandas [info] As an adult, I've been diagnosed with ASD. Very mild. As a child I was diagnosed with anxiety disorders. Not to dismiss people on the ASD spectrum but having been in classes with children on the severe side of the spectrum.. as we were all grouped in the same class... what used to be called classic autism is nothing like the disabilities I had/have and they dealt with a lot more severe issues. That said, mild autism isn't a joy ride either as I still have meltdowns but sometimes I think classifying both as the same makes people not understand 'autism' has always been around and aspergers or mild autism isn't the worst thing that can happen to your child.  Know what is?  Death from measles, polio, the flu... [info] None [info] 1540233184
Mushubeans [info] I just had my first full-blown breakdown I've been diagnosed with anxiety for a while but I've never had what I would call an "attack". I get sick to my stomach and nauseous a lot but I've never hyperventilated. Earlier tonight I was laying in bed watching Netflix and I thought about going to class in the morning. I have absolutely nothing to worry about, no assignments due, nothing. But yet I broke down completely for no reason. My heart was racing and I was pouring actually beads of sweat. I ran to the kitchen to look in the med cabinet for anything and that's when I started throwing up. I then collapsed crying and stayed there crying and hyperventilating for another hour or so before regaining some control. I'm lying here typing this now because I'm still shaking in fear from what just happened. I don't see myself getting any sleep tonight and I really need some advice on how to cope with this.. I'm going to my therapist tomorrow but as for now, how can I calm myself? [info] None [info] 1367389211
trippingtoadfunk420 [info] Hi all. Don't really know the rules for here but just thought I would check it out. I am starting on Day 1 today. Last used 21 hours ago. I quit last year on 04/09/2016 but unfortunately relapsed in October. Things were going good too just a dumb mistake that led further and further down the road of using again and I got back where I started. MY DOC was prescription painkillers never used H although was around it never wanted to try it because I knew I would like it too much. So I've since came to the conclusion once AGAIN to quit these things. The worse thing for me was that they weren't necessarily affecting my life in the typical sense. Never had money problems because of them, have a nice job, was present at all social events so I more or less used to compensated for something else medically wrong. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, ADHD, IBS and Gastritis. With painkillers they helped all of my issues in one pill verses taking something for each of one of those conditions. Most of which had side effects I couldn't handle and didn't take the medication.  Painkillers offered me everything I needed. I know this is impart a delusion of an addicts mind but on the other hand it truly helped me in ways I hope to find in other medications for my diagnosis'. I would binge very occasional but would 9/10 times conserve what I bought and use what I needed to get through the day and not be totally blasted from them. I plan to use the supplements and various withdrawal remedies that I used last time in order to kick this away from my life. If anyone has any tips on what has worked for them that isn't found on your normal everyday "withdrawal recipe" feel free to share with me.  [info] 05/08/2017 [info] 1494267492
studentonpills [info] Me [20 F] having issues finding relationships TLDR: Hormones/anxiety/fear of intimacyI was diagnosed with anxiety about 5 years ago and the relationship me and my mum have has always been rocky. I also have PCOS (means I have higher testosterone levels than average). I have been finding it extremely difficult to find a guy which I think may be linked to these issues. I don't know whether I experience romantic feelings or not (the whole thing panics me like what if I never find someone) I love the idea of a guy taking me out for meals etc but can't see it happening anytime soon.Whilst at uni, I have had many instances where I've taken guys home from nights out and we've done everything bar sex because I always panic and just want him to get out. I feel really vulnerable even though they have done nothing wrong. Idk what it is I want to have intimacy with a guy, I think my body is just trying to tell me I'm not ready which is frustrating. I would really appreciate talking to someone who has experienced similar issues/knows anything about this [info] None [info] 1523393928
StaleRomantic [info] It's improved my issues with anxiety a lot. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder for which I used to take medication, and it hasn't cured me by any stretch but it's forced me outside of my comfort zone a lot. Just being in medic school has raised my anxiety so much that things that used to make me anxious and miserable seem meaningless now  [info] None [info] 1512878445
elijah_bird [info] 37/m Metoprolol tartrate questions I was prescribed metoprolol tartrate(MT) 25mg once a day for anxiety after going to the ER for palpitations. I've been experiencing dizziness off and on since I've started taking it in the past couple of days. The ER gave me and EKG and took blood. Everything came back fine and I was diagnosed with anxiety. I was worried about my heart, but I'm trying to trust in the doctor and tests.How safe is MT?Can it cause heart problems where there was none before?How common is it for EKG and blood tests to be wrong(I hope not that often)?I have an appointment at the VA for a physical in two months and am hoping to get the all clear then. The MT has definitely helped with my rising pulse.Male, 37 years old, 175 pounds. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1500852828
sunday_smile_ [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and it's in my direct family to have similar conditions as well as OCD. I can't afford to go to a psychiatrist right now (I know that sounds like a lame excuse but my college one is completely booked up with a waiting list and I love pay cheque to pay cheque just to get my degree)  [info] None [info] 1434014158
haxelle [info] Work induced anxiety - advice please :( Hey guys, This is my first time posting on this forum, but my anxiety has been getting worse and worse. Mainly induced by my job. Apologies in advance for the long, rambling post. :/For a little context, last August, I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on Buspirone. It made me extremely nauseous and didn't help with my constant panic attacks. Due to shitty university health care, I couldn't really afford to try anything else so I just sort of lived with it the best I could. Anyway, I decided to take some time off from school and my anxiety subsided a little bit. Now, I've started this new job where I'm in charge of managing volunteers, acting as an assistant to my supervisor, doing a fuck ton of community outreach, etc. Basically just a bunch of shit. It's a lot of work and I'm a staff of one, lol. I feel extremely overwhelmed and like a failure. Like if I can't do this job, what the hell can I do? I was so excited to start this new position, but now I'm a month into it and I feel like I'm in over my head. The tightness in my chest and feeling of hopelessness is creeping back up. I'm starting to feel like I'm back at school again, which was the worst I've ever felt, mentally and physically.I don't know if I should try going on medication again, or possibly see a therapist? Has anyone else experienced anything similar? Any advice for coping with it? I just feel useless. Thanks. xx [info] None [info] 1502675540
sparklingdragon [info] Doesn't understand what I am going through I have been diagnosed with anxiety for a little over a year now. It has been rough getting used to the idea that I have something wrong that I can't fully control. It is even rougher having no one around me that understands what I am going through. Especially now that I am living with my SO. He constantly doesn't understand it. We have been together for a little more than 6 years. He doesn't understand what causes my anxiety nor does he try to understand it which then causes me more anxiety. I guess I just kinda want a way to be able to explain it to him, any advice? Sorry for the novel that I have written. [info] None [info] 1506289437
vandalizmmm [info] Suffering from scruples again. I've suffered from scrupulosity for the past 11 or so years. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. I have sought treatment and thought I was doing better, as I was able to space out my confessions and be more confident in deciding whether or not I should go to confession. However, today I panicked a little over something. I watched a YouTube video that critiqued a certain YouTuber for faking the use of an ouija board for clickbait. The video then showed clips of the aforementioned youtuber's clickbait video. It seemed like the whole thing was faked so I thought there wouldn't be any harm in me watching a silly YouTube critique, but now I'm questioning that. I stopped watching the video and didn't finish it.If I'm questioning whether or not I've sinned, it's a venial sin, right? Should I be super concerned about this? Or should I just try to stay calm and avoid these types of videos in the future? Most importantly, how can a scrupulous person like me overcome these types of "relapses"? I'm tired of being so stressed out over these types of things and would appreciate any help and advice. [info] None [info] 1557855952
gunkdad [info] I’d say more or less the worst feeling in this world for me is paranoia, which sadly is a reality for me every day. I was diagnosed with anxiety about 7 years ago, and lately it seems to be getting worse. I have trouble being in houses or rooms alone due to the constant feeling of what seems to be a dangerous energy that follows me around wherever I go. [info] None [info] 1566552226
Violettemei [info] I've been on two different antidepressants (Prozac and Zoloft) as well as Abilify. I was going through a lot of shit during middle school - high school and I was sent to a therapist that had no idea how to identify and diagnose any sort of mental illness (she said I was developing schizophrenia, I've been diagnosed with anxiety from a better therapist) I was put on Zoloft first, and it didn't help at all, so I was taken off that and put on Prozac. Same thing. The only thing that ever came of the time on those medications was that I started having nosebleeds almost daily. I was a regular in the school nurse's office, all of my teachers learned to just let me leave if I got up and went to the door during class. It's a pretty rare side effect, I think, but somehow I was one of the few that gets it. [info] None [info] 1393373021
ThrowRA232323 [info] help! I (16f) consider myself to be Bisexual. A couple months ago I dated a boy. I was pretty sure I loved him, but when he held my hand or hugged me or touched me I would feel like throwing up or actually throw up. He wanted to kiss me one day and I said I had to go, because to be honest, I didn’t want to kiss him. Maybe because it was my first “real/serious” relationship? Maybe because I have been diagnosed with anxiety and the anxiety was causing the nausea? Eventually we broke up, leading me to now. This other boy I thought I liked hugs me and holds my hand and gets close to me and I still feel like throwing up. I know in the past, when I have dated girls, I had never felt like throwing up. Maybe it’s because the girls I had dated were already close friends before turning into something more? I’m still not sure. I can’t tell if the reason I throw up is due to my anxiety or the possibility of me being gay. I have no clue what to do and if any of you could try to help me figure this out, that would be wonderful, thank you. [info] None [info] 1580158410
jamagut [info] I used to smoke a shit ton of medicinal weed (20-24% THC), like full joints to myself with no tobacco in them, definitely too much looking at it now lolI figured I might not be able to enjoy weed the way I used to, but I was diagnosed with anxiety as I became a hypochondriac at the peak of my anxiety, I’m back to the way I was now but it was briefly pretty bad. I think I may have given myself a form of PTSD with that experience, is that a possibility?  [info] None [info] 1532158317
sample_post [info] Hello,I'm extremely interested in joining the RCMP and meet the requirements. However, I have a mental health record from when I was a teenager.I grew up in a bad home and my Mom put me in therapy in highschool, and I was diagnosed with anxiety. After trying trial periods of SSRI's and SNRI's until about the age of 20 and not finding them helpful, I now no longer take medications and function completely fine. I don't experience anxiety attacks (I don't even think I was experiencing actual anxiety attacks previously either).A lot of my issues stemmed from family issues and were entirely situational.I haven't been on any of these medications or accessing anything mental health related for nearly four years.Will the RCMP or even municipal police forces take note of these records and dismiss me as a candidate? I know that RCMP is reconsidering their standards due to low staffing and are looking for women (I'm a woman) to join for diversity hiring.I'm confident I would pass their psychological test during the application process.Please let me know your thoughts. Thanks for your time. [info] Not a(n) LEO / Unverified User [info] 1557018220
prettycasualiama [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety several years ago and put on a lot of different types of medication (none helped).One time I had a major episode of anxiety lasting days. It became so bad that I had to see a doctor in the middle of the night; he prescribed me 4mg of diazepam and told me to see my doctor the next morning. I found the diazepam to be amazing. I felt the calmest I could ever remember feeling. There was nothing to worry about and everything was going to be okay. A bit over a year ago I found myself in a situation where I was able to acquire diazepam regularly, and so I started self-medicating with benzodiazepines for my social anxiety. I was once taking upwards of 50mg of diazepam a day. I also had alprazolam and clonazepam.It's been a year and a half now and I'm down to just 5-10mg of diazepam per day. It greatly affected my short term memory, I'd forget nights out, etc. I also ended up in the hospital from mixing alprazolam with alcohol (don't underestimate how easily this can happen), and I'm afraid that I'm a different person than I used to be. Not to mention it broke apart a relationship which had lasted several years.I can't wait to stop taking diazepam, I'm relatively quickly tapering my daily dosage down and hope to be off of it in six weeks or so. I would see a doctor about this but don't want to be labelled as an addict or drug-seeker for many reasons.Anyway, I just wanted to tell this story and make sure you guys know that you should never self-medicate. As well as this, a lot of doctors simply throw pills at people with our problems because it makes it easier for them. For a lot of people, medication is unnecessary and they may be able to overcome their issues with other methods besides changing their brain chemistry with drugs. [info] None [info] 1374349415
theredditorswife [info] I have had the same exact thing happen to me. I just came clean and told everyone that I was diagnosed with anxiety and surprisingly, they were  nice about it. Kids generally pretend stuff like that never happened. I would tell my teachers about it so they'll let you leave class before you get a panic attack. [info] None [info] 1328331392
eonblue7 [info] [help] Heart flutters are terrifying me and I don't know what to do. Some background... I've been diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago, but I've been stressed my whole life as it's been a rough go. Only in the past few years have I gotten panic attacks/physical symptoms. Used to be on Lexapro and I stopped a few months ago because it was making everything worse.Last night around 6 (eastern, US) I started getting what felt like flutters, but my heart rate was steady and normal. I had chest pains and these flutters but no elevated heart rate. I feel like adrenaline is pumping like I've been scared and ran several miles but my heart rate is staying steady. It's been like this since last night and it's coming and going still.I've been through this before when I first got the anxiety diagnosis, after a day in the hospital getting all sorts of tests. I'm terrified it's something bad this time (because of the anxiety making me paranoid) and I don't know what to do. I'm seeing a doctor later so I'm going to ask, but I'm just so terrified it's not just anxiety this time. I need some help. [info] None [info] 1415625988
annie_M4E [info] It's stupid but here it is:1. I've been diagnosed with anxiety about 6 years ago and it costed me a friendship (long story but it still hurts)2. I have lost 3 people I loved and admired and my dog who was my baby boy in less than 3 years3. Me and my ex broke up about a month ago but remained friends. He texted me one day and the convo went like this (I copy/pasted)Him "I think we would be better off as friends for now"Me: "Why?"Him: "Bc it's for the best"Me: "Okay we'll talk about it tonight Okay?"Him: "I'd rather not"Me: "Maybe it is for the best"Him: "Okay we can still be friends"Me: "Yes id like that. Can you make an effort for me and communicate a bit Please?"Him: "Sure"Now to be clear I only agreed bc I thought it was what he wanted and because I want him to do what makes him happy but for the past month hes been putting the blame for the breakup on me because I agreed with him and then when we explained to each other our sides of the story I asked him if he ever wanted to get back with me he said 'never" and it hurts. He always acts as if it was my decision when it was his and keeps doing and saying stuff as if he wants me back and then he just breaks my heart again and I am sick of it. [info]  [info] 1551586678
tuxedolux [info] If it’s not absolutely something you have to take then you can ask them for other alternatives. I did this when I was diagnosed with anxiety and was immediately prescribed Xanax. However, In my opinion, therapy should be done in place of medication. Therapy gives you the tools to handle what’s causing the problems in your mental state. It can be scary to go that deep into yourself but once you learn to deal with things it gets better. If it’s too scary though there is also group therapy.  [info] 28 F 5’4” SW: 161 CW: 152 GW1: 150 [info] 1552508832
PowerOfYouth [info] Great guide. I didn't have this issue until I was diagnosed with anxiety recently and have been looking for fighting game tips specifically to no end [info] None [info] 1546469541
calamitynacho [info] If OP had come out and said something like "I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder but my parents are forcing me to stay at a strict monastery to 'cure' me, please help" in the original post instead of withholding that detail and sounding like a stereotypical whiny teenager, I imagine the response here may have been a little more sympathetic ... [info] [東京都] [info] 1467014565
nikki109 [info] Lost 50lbs on Keto, But Paxil is Ruining My Progress I began keto last May and had lost 50lbs as of March, but in the beginning of March, I was diagnosed with anxiety and mild OCD. My PCP prescribed me 10mg of Paxil. It does help "take the edge off" so to speak, but I've noticed I've been gaining weight. I now weight 10lbs more than I did in March. I've been doing the same thing food wise and exercise wise. Nothing has changed. I've been googling Paxil and it looks like a common side effect is weight gain.  I've contacted my doctor about going on something else. Any other meds that may not have weight gain as a side effect? If I can't find something, I'll just wean myself off the meds completely. I will not go back to being heavy. I'll deal with my anxiety in other ways if I have to. [info] None [info] 1495478455
MainStreetGal [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety 10 years ago (whew it feels weird to say that was so long ago lol), and I was having attacks like you were - therapy was a lifesaver for me. As someone who was in your shoes, it sounds like you would benefit from it. It was so helpful to vent about feelings which helped decrease episodes. Plus they taught me breathing techniques which still help to this day - I am in much healthier place at the moment, thanks to them.For the past year I've been experiencing anticipatory grief myself, and I plan to return to therapy once I get health insurance again. [info] None [info] 1557110746
musilane [info] How to deal with the fear of losing LO? TW: death, death of an infant A little background first. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 8yo. I have been dealing with the fear of death and panic attacks my whole life. Before I was 2yo, I dealt with the death of my newborn sister and a situation that I nearly drowned myself. Death is a very big trauma for me. The therapy helped a little. Especially about my fear of being a mother and how impossible it is to have control of everything bad that can happen to your child. Now I am FTM, my DD is 10mo. When she was 7mo, she suffered a severe choking. The image of her little face fainting still haunts me. This week one person sent in the day care group a video of a drowning child and I saw it inadvertently. Now I just can't get rid of this image in my head. I am haunted by fear all the time. I know the answer would be back to therapy, which I stopped for some other unrelated questions. I think I just wanted to let it all out. Sorry for the long text. [info] None [info] 1571490657
jepppej [info] Does this sound like anxiety?? I was diagnosed with anxiety a long time ago and used to have panic attacks, but I haven’t had one in years. All day today I’ve felt like I can’t take a deep breath. I need to yawn to feel like I’m getting enough oxygen. My chest feels right. I’m extremely nervous that it’s covid-19 or something of the sorts. I’ve had this happen before, but I don’t think it’s lasted all day like this. Has anyone experienced anything similar? [info] None [info] 1586491904
pluffyklouds [info] Social anxiety = narcissism?? Hey! so I am diagnosed with anxiety I have been since I was 14 and I’m in my early 20s (almost) and I struggle with being around social events/large crowds people in general because of past traumas and I’m not exactly the fan favorite of being around people. I’ve been struggling with social anxiety since I was a freshman in high school now a graduated high school student an adult with anxiety as well, My family is well known about my anxiety and have been supportive about it everyone except my father, my father doesn’t believe I have social anxiety or anxiety at all and claims “I’m full of myself” but the thought of people staring at me makes me anxious and upset. He also claims That my anxiety is just me being “nervous” as well and I’m making excuses for myself which isn’t the case. I tell him when he makes these false claims that I have triggers, that things cause me to panic and I have no control over my panic attacks. My father is known to be manipulative and very narcissistic so, I’m not sure how to handle the situation because every time I explain my anxiety he shoots me down and says I’m a narcissist but I’m not?? [info] None [info] 1582525074
snek_parental [info] Everything is insane now. So I started a new part time job that I have to do bc my family needs money (especially RN bc of the virus, dad just got a pay cut but since I work at a pet store I'm still getting money) and I need to provide for my ball python as he is my pet not the family's. I am always feeling something like alert or anxous or always in my toes or something idk but it's really aweful. I think when I'm at work I'll feel like I can't breathe and I'll shake a little I always have to lean on stuff and I guess I'm just constantly anxous. I have already been written up for something that arguably became a write up bc my manager made some shit up about the situation and now I don't really like her. That's a while other thing, I feel super conflicted about all my managers (there's 4 of them). I believe that they are what causes me this constant anxiety, I'm so scared I'm going to do something wrong and get fired. Anyways I'm also a college student and I have been taking mostly online classes but now with the virus everything is online which really messed up my system. I would go into the tutoring lab to do my math homework and call for help when needed or I would go to get coached through a writing assignment. I'm now super behind on 2 writing assignments and a bunch of math and it's all thanks to this stupid virus. Anyways lately I've been sleeping in until 12pm. It is so scary because I never do this and I'm so anxious my parents are going to get mad at me for it. I think it is because my system is gone and work has stressed me out way too much (recently they have been giving me only closing or afternoon shifts and it seems it's because they don't want me touching the animals. I got this freaking job because I love animals and want to work with them.)Idk what to do I need to catch up on school but I just can't anymore idk what this is and what's wrong with me but it's like all I can do is sleep and go to work and this constant feeling of stress is aweful.Ok so reading the message I got after I posted this I'm going to add:I'm 19 and I'm non binary (like anyone at work respects that.)I have been diagnosed with anxiety I guess because my psychiatrist gave me some meds for it. Also I'm probably on the autistic spectrum but haven't been diagnosed. [info] None [info] 1585762195
mad_zamboni [info] I'm curious, do you take medication to help? An ex-GF was agoraphobic and it took therapy to help her come out of it. I was diagnosed with anxiety late in life and managed it for a while with counseling, but ended up going on a low dose of medicine that helps dramatically.Mad props for coming here to socialize, it's a step in the right direction. Isolation can be bad if done too much.  [info] http://a.co/csI3Ii3 [info] 1489154414
LGflower [info] I’ve tried. When I was diagnosed with anxiety and low mood I reached out and spoke to them individually. spoke about wanting to be close visiting often. I would text and try and call but no one would confirm a day or time to meet even for a cup of tea. I am always the first to text any of them and my self esteem is being affected. I feel like I’m trying to be in a clique I don’t fit in with. I’m not surprised mum is being defensive, when I’ve brought up how I have felt in the past I get told I’m being silly, it’s all in my head. I just don’t feel welcome there.  [info] None [info] 1526321337
youtbuddcody [info] I actually did have my head examined a month ago. I was diagnosed with anxiety and somitazitaion disorder... [info] Oh my God... You can talk! [info] 1398866118
itsnotgayonmars [info] Someone has been writing in my dream journal (part 2) Hey guys, It's Brian again. It has been about two days since my first post and I thought I'd update you all on what happened. I posted the first post at about 3 am, and went to bed like normal. I had the whole day to think about what it could possibly be, how someone would know about the red binder, and I finally got fed up when I couldn't sleep and posted it to Reddit. When I woke up almost immediately thought about the journal and wrote my dream in it. I couldn't find anything else in the whole book that was out of ordinary, other than the first two writings.So, I've been memeing this a little bit, posting spooky shit on my twitter about being haunted, but I also posted on my Facebook about if ghosts could write in books and whatnot. A lot of you guys seem to think that I'm haunted or something, and now half of my friends do too. One of my irl friends offered to come over and smudge my whole place with some spirit-banishing stuff. I'm considering it.[They are taking it very seriously.](https://i.imgur.com/HKPhBGJ.png)But I'm still having a hard time believing it to be supernatural? I've always believed, sort of... But this just doesn't have that ghost vibe to me at all.Then. This morning. Holy Hell guys, It's back.I had a dream that some hot guy and I merged souls then he tried to sell me a snake. It was kinda fucked up ngl. When I opened my dream journal to write about it I saw the black ink again. This is what it said.&gt; September 18, 2017 Last night I dreamt that I was at a music festival, but they were only playing bagpipes for some reason. As I weaved through the crowd of high/drunk 18-year-olds, the smoke got thicker and thicker, collecting in my lungs, choking me. I finally found a small tent, and I quickly climbed into it. I closed the flap behind me and sat down. All around this huge tent were 6 people. 5 standing around talking or moping and one who was lying on the ground. I saw, well, people who seemed so familiar to me... some that I knew and talked to on a regular basis. Then I saw you, Brian. Staring through the clear plastic of the tent to the smokey outside. You didn't see him bleeding out on the floor. Everyone did but you.&gt; &gt; (Some fucked up dream, eh Brian? I'm sure it has some symbolism to our current situation. Ever wonder where your leather jacket went? -D) Well. That's a lot to unpack. I'm not sure what “D” means by symbolism but maybe you guys can help me out. And the leather jacket. Holy hell. I do remember that jacket. I had it about 6 months ago. It was great for winter because it was lined and it makes me look totally badass. I have no idea where it went to, it's been 6 months and I still haven't found it. I don't know what to think.So. Still tired, (exhausted from my insomnia) I decided to write back, forgetting all about my dream. Here's what I wrote back.&gt; Hello? I don't know who you are or how you're writing in my journal but if this is some sort of joke I really want you to stop. Same if you're a ghost that's haunting me. I'm serious. You're really freaking me out and I'm having a hard time sleeping enough as it is. I don't know who you are, “D”, so I would appreciate if you told me. And gave me my leather jacket back if you took it. That was my favorite. What do you want from me? -Brian&gt; And I promptly went back to sleep and slept until 2 pm. (Sleeping for like 12-14 hours a day has been more and more common lately for me) Maybe I shouldn't respond, but I figure that it can't hurt? What's gonna happen, I get haunted more? This “D” person doesn't seem all that bad, even if their dreams are pretty fucked up. But hey, we all have fucked up dreams. I'm almost excited to see if they write back tomorrow morning.Now, to answer some of your questions. I'm getting a camera. That's an absolute. If the video is at all interesting I'll be posting it here to show you guys (maybe if its ghosts I can make some money off it) The only issue is that I cant get a camera right away. I just got my job and I owe like 3 months worth of rent that I have to pay back. Hell, I don't even have internet or tv at my house because I can't afford the extra $50 a month (I'm at the library right now) I should definitely have the camera in a few weeks.For the person who sent me a PM concerned about my mental health: Thank you for your concern. I was supposed to see my therapist today but I completely forgot (something I do often) but I'm trying to make another appointment with him ASAP. Don't worry about that. I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder and ADHD but never anything more serious than that. I don't really have any traumatizing experiences that I can think about. Hell, my worst drug use is pot, LSD and some booze once in a while. (Hey, I'm an adult)So, what do you guys think? Haunted, crazy or something else? Please post your suggestions and advice in the comments, and in retutrn I'll keep you all updated, Ok?I'm still really freaked out about all of this. Can a ghost steal things from me and hide them? How could a ghost know about the red binder when I was only talking about it at work? Can a ghost follow me to work? Is there a ghost beside me right now? (I'm mostly joking. Mostly)[-Brian](https://twitter.com/deaddog1848/status/909332007859007489)[Last part](https://www.reddit.com/r/nosleep/comments/70mevp/someone_has_been_writing_in_my_dream_journal_any/)/[Next part](https://www.reddit.com/r/nosleep/comments/71dz4d/someone_has_been_writing_in_my_dream_journal_part/) [info] None [info] 1505775844
luckymama1990 [info] I get a little jittery after doing a inhaler, but I am not currently doing one. I have an emergency relief inhaler right now, but I don't really use it. I guess I should have also mentioned I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 16. I'll be 27 next month. Sometimes I can blame it on the anxiety, but other times, it truly comes out of nowhere.. Thank you for your input. [info] None [info] 1486758101
Redlovefire22 [info] Fro those dealing with anxiety I live next door to my ngrandmother.  Thankfully the lady is dead and buried now but her effects live with me.  I was diagnosed in my twenties with anxiety. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I found out I had a learning disability, and that taught me one very important thing that help whenI got my anxiety diagnosis.  Speak up, self advocate, and don't be ashamed.   Talk with you dr, go to therapy.   If things are overwhelming go to ER and be frank.  These thing are not easy because anxiety often make me afraid to take these steps.  The damaged our n's did and do to us can run very deep. [info] None [info] 1503639669
GunstarGreen [info] I agree. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but I show up to work on time every day and do it to the best of my ability. Its a high-pressure job too, although not as high as WWE talent, of course. Lars has been on PPVs in feobt of millions, and in live shows in front of tens of thousands. If NXT id supposed to ease tge transition from developmental to the main roster, then Lars is in an unfortumate position.  [info] I got all the numbers [info] 1547253393
PandoraCdn [info] There actually are varying levels of OCD.  You can also be either more obsessive or more compulsive.  And.  In fact.  It can get better in some cases.  I was diagnosed with anxiety, mild OCD (compulsive side), and trichotillimania (can't remember spelling).  My compulsive habits have faded over the years, aside from the eyelash pulling, and I haven't taken regular meds for any in years.   Still trying to figure out dealing with anxiety and the trichotillimania.   [info] None [info] 1404401035
Jokker_is_the_name [info] Ooh I feel like I can actually answer this one!I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and have had daily panic attacks for about a year (luckily they are less rare now)As far as I know, and please correct me if im wrong, it has to do with your primitive brain. There are people whos brain isnt always too sure whether they are in a real danger or not. The panic attack is often set off by an event or thought. For example someone says someting offensive, or maybe even a little weird. Then the brain gets confused, it thinks whatever a person said is dangerous for you.Most peoples brains know what is in fact actually dangerous, but some people dont. These people get panic attacks.After your brain starts to think you are in danger, you get the classic "fight-or-flight" situation. Adrenaline will be released. And your heart starts pumping faster.So, in short, you primitive brain thinks a tiger is going to attack you, while in actuality someone just said something about your shoes. You think you are in danger and either start to flight, or fight. [info] None [info] 1543140858
SpecificDuck6 [info] Getting a prescription for the anxiety medication, ativan?? How do i go about asking my PC dr to write me a prescription for Ativan?  I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well as a few other things.  I've also been prescribed before but it's been a few years.  And in this day in age and the area i live,  it's not easy to get.  It helps me.  I want to ask him without seeming like a drug seeker [info] None [info] 1586118479
JW-1998 [info] No help, I have had medical help and I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I refuse to touch medication due to negative experiences in the past. Indeed, it is indescribably distressing, I believe I have health anxiety. Constantly beleaguered by crippling migraines, panic attacks, feelings of trepidation and impending doom, awful head sensations, and thinking I am on the verge of death. I have had this since the turn of the year with no respite. I won’t be surprised if I end my life, it is certainly heading in that direction. Thanks for your support. I miss having people that give a damn about me. [info] None [info] 1564106280
CrazyCoww [info] Hello everyone I recently discovered that I suffer from anxiety and I want to know if someone could give me some advices on how to deal with it Hi everyone , my name is Miguel , I have discovered , about , 2 hours ago that I suffer from anxiety and social fobia, and to be honest , I'm scared about it. Since i was litlle I've always been a shy type of guy , but i thought that it never passed from that. I don't know if this is related with this problem , but when I was little , in party's I was always scared of going to play with the other kids. Everyone ,including my parents found that strange and tried to make me interact with their friends children but it seemed that I didn't click with them and I just ran over to my parents who used to tell me "why u don't play with the other kids ?" and kinda maked me go play with others. In school I was alone most of the time I was alone in the recress cuz I was afraid of meeting ppl (I eventually got to know some people that today are still among my best friends ) (this was on 1st grade btw). Later on , when I was on the 5TH grade I had to meet new people and there was the inferno started. I didn't knew anyone and on the recress I was called big head and sometimes ppl would do dead passages and would slap my head.On the 7th grade I reencontred some of my primary school friends and the things became easier except that there was a guy that was bullying me , giving me slap's , but he apologised himself and we became friends (best friends actually). But then even with my bfriends I was bullied , and they used to say it was to get me stronger , and I believed cuz it was better that than being alone ( in my 12/13/14 years old prospective), and to be honest , I think that this is were the anxiety started to appear.In 10th grade I had to meet new ppl again ,which was hard , so I just stayed with an old friend frim other class for half a year.Now in the present , I talk with 1 person on my class (real talk not that casual conversation) ,I'm afraid to go to the board cuz I've fear of being observed and I get nervous as fuck when I know I have to salute some1 that I don't know at parties.  Now the part where the signals start to appear in concrete. I play league of legends , and I used to find this game my "safe deck" , until I start rejecting invitations from my friends to go take a drink or simply take a walk. In last Tuesday 1 of my best friends maked birthday and we all i've gone out and I smoked a cigarette and when I got home told me that that I smelled like tobbaco but nothing happened. In the next morning I waked up with a strange pain in my chest and feeling of stroke , things that already had happened  but this time they stayed and here I'm diagnosed with anxiety asking for help and I can't play Lol cuz makes me nervous and anxious.TL;DR: Please read it [info] None [info] 1436063943
LadyMorte [info] I'm tempted to check myself in somewhere... [Help] I have a lot going on.... not even sure where to start.  I don't even know if I can go into detail because I'm worried about all the judgment and everyone telling me how I should have done everything differently.Things have come to a head a couple of times recently and I'm scared I'm going to shut down.  I missed work once last week because I couldn't pull it together in time to go in.I am not sure what to do with myself anymore.*****************Background:I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year and a half ago.  Been on Zoloft ever since and sometimes it helps and sometimes it doesn't.I got (unlawfully) fired from my main job and lost my home (my apartment was part of the job payment).  I had two weeks to move out over Christmas break.  I tried to appeal this to the board and they upheld the director's decision.  My boyfriend was fired at the same time and we both ended up homeless.There are several lawsuits pending over the firing - both on their end (for rent) and ours (unlawful discrimination, illegal payment practice, etc).I lost my lawsuit over the rent when my lawyer was suspended from the bar and didn't inform me... I had to attempt to defend myself and now the court has ruled I owe almost $2000.I was being paid $500/month for the job (yeah, it's becoming a real issue since I worked full time hours and was on call) and had no savings... I'm several thousand dollars in debt now from the unexpected move to a new apartment.  I've lived out of my car before and that terrified me worse than the debt.My boyfriend and I aren't getting along well... we are both under a lot of stress and I'm frustrated with the relationship.We both have new full time gigs but money is tight and he isn't as good at keeping up with spending as I am.We both got puppies to train as therapy dogs... I was careful to pick out the temperament I needed and I love her but I feel like I never have any time with her because of work. I'm afraid I'm not working with her enough and she won't be able to pass the Caning Good Citizen test.After a mishap where my boyfriend forgot to show me a bill for a deposit and we almost had the water cut off and I had to pull almost $200 out of thin air, I feel like I'm losing it completely.  I almost didn't make it into work tonight.  I can't keep functioning as an adult.  I'm 25 and in a worse position than I was 3 years ago.  I feel like any hope of a future is gone.  I'm not suicidal, but I'm not functional anymore either.  My plans to have a house and a real career are all so far out of reach again that I have no idea how to get them back.  I was doing something I loved and now I'm black listed from that profession... I'm afraid I'm going to lose my lawsuits and not be able to get back on my feet and back into that field.I'm drowning in the doubt and self hatred and I don't know how to get out of it.EDIT: My neighbor also called the cops yesterday morning because our dogs supposedly have barked the last three nights in a row from 10 pm-4 am... I am not handling this stress well either.  We both work nights and the last two nights we had been at work... the night before I was home all night and they NEVER made a peep.  We are recording them tonight to see if there is any barking... I'm terrified to go home in an hour because I am scared there will be another note on our door. [info] None [info] 1399863685
InTinaWeTrust [info] I (21f) was asked to be a personal attendant in my friend's (21f) wedding. After getting over the initial excitement, I realized I do not want to have this stress in my life. My friend, Alyssa (not her real name), and I became friends 2 and a half years ago. We were once super close and declared we'd be each other's bridesmaids. We spent so much time together and were just such great friends. Then life happened and we drifted apart: we had opposite schedules, and we began to make new friends. This past school year (we're both in college at the same school) we just have not had time to see each other and didn't hang out very much.She got engaged earlier this month. Alyssa is a great person with a lot of friends, and she said she had a really hard time picking her bridal party. I knew I probably wasn't going to be a bridesmaid like we had talked about, so I wasn't surprised or disappointed when she asked me to be her personal attendant. I happily accepted, but now, I'm not so sure.Reddit I'm a really responsible person. I get shit done, and I often have a hard time saying no when someone wants my help. I feel that if I stay on as her personal attendant that I'm not going to enjoy her wedding or my day. I have a bit of anxiety (I was diagnosed with anxiety in August) thinking about all I have to do already, and the wedding isn't until next August.I think it's really sweet of her that even though we're not as close she wants me to be in her wedding. However, we're not really friends at all right now, so I don't want to be stressed out for someone's wedding who I'm not good friends with. She made a comment that really put it into perspective for me: "InTinaWeTrust I know everyone in my party will just get drunk and that I can count on you." That text made me realize that I won't get to have any fun on this day and that I'm just going to be a stressed-out bitch the whole day. Am I being selfish? Is there a way to back out of her wedding in a way that isn't totally awful? Tl;dr I'm super responsible so a once-close friend asked me to be her personal attendant. I realized I don't want to have to deal with all the stress of a wedding, and I want to back out but don't know how. [info] None [info] 1477663765
OkSundae5 [info] Does your anxiety ever get so bad that you feel like you're going insane? I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I honestly feel like I'm going insane. I feel like I'm losing touch with reality and that I'm trapped in a small prison cell. I feel suicidal and I want to start self-harming for the first time. It's been 16 months since this started. Medication doesn't work and I'm starting therapy at the end of next month. I am in hell. This is hell. There can be nothing worse than this. I must be in hell otherwise this doesn't make any sense. I just can't take this anymore. This isn't a life worth living. [info] None [info] 1577230344
Paisley_hippo [info] My anxiety does this too. In fact, that is what I told the Dr I was concerned was going on (early onset alzheimers) before I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1455684527
ChiknNuget [info] Can ARFID be triggered by a some-what traumatic childhood event? Howdy! Firstly, I think it’s important to let you guys know I haven’t been professionally diagnosed yet. I feel I match up perfectly well and really hope to get a formal diagnosis in the future! I was wondering if ARFID can be triggered by some type of semi-traumatic event in childhood? Long story short; when I was about two I ended up in hospital for a week or two with salmonella and a few other nasty digestive/stomach bugs. I threw up basically anything I ate and cried a whole lot. Before that, I was the least fussiest kid a kid could be. I would try anything. However, when I was in hospital I stopped eating anything except for chicken nuggets and chips (fries). I’m not sure if that was the only food I could keep down or not. But after I was released from the hospital, I stayed extremely restrictive on my chicken nugget and chips. I would completely freak out and hyperventilate over any other food going near me. This lasted around 8 more years until I slowly added a few more things into my diet. I expanded to other chicken (tenders, burgers with just the meat and bun) etc, beef (sausages, sausage rolls) etc and stuck with potato. Everything else was filled in with cereal and other sugary stuff. For a really long time growing up, I was underweight and short. Now I’m turning 18 this year and have added a few more things to my diet including shrimp, nachos (just the beef and cheese of course 😛) and a few other close “branches” of those foods. I’m now on the ender side of the “ideal weight” chart but I’m still really short. Which isn’t fun since now I’m in uni, I’m still misunderstood as a kid who’s lost haha (but on the plus side, no one questions me if I order off the kids menu). I have been diagnosed with anxiety and that plays a huge role in trying new food. I am absolutely petrified of trying anything new. It mostly has to do with me being afraid of texture than taste, but taste has a huge role in any food being considered to be “tried”. I am honestly tired of living like this and would give up and arm or a leg to have a normal diet. I’m lacking in so many vitamins like B12 and I’m constantly tired. I want to get help but the thought of having someone push me to try new foods makes me avoid it even more. I was wondering if being sick as a kid caused this? As some type of traumatic (defiantly not as traumatic as most things) event? I’m not so much scared of throwing up the food now, but I know deep down, the fear of trying new food is because of early childhood troubles with it (the salmonella and the other virus). I’d love your guys thoughts. I’m so thankful to have found this sub. Although not diagnosed, I do consider myself to have ARFID and will try my best to get a proper diagnosis. I’m just so glad to know I’m not the only one :) [info] None [info] 1523455073
jamwiches_jamwiches [info] I’m so sorry for what you’ve gone through. I was diagnosed with anxiety and dissociative identity when I was 17 but I just want you to know that you are not defined by that and are not defined by your past. You sound like a very sweet thoughtful person you will find other people like yourself and they will become your new family. I’m sure that must have distorted your idea of love but please know that there are lots of people in the world capable of loving you like you deserve.Edit: thank you for the silver, that’s the first reddit award I’ve ever gotten! [info] None [info] 1573361197
liftingthings7 [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety. I'm on prozac right now. Small dosage to see what the effects are. I was also told to focus on the things that I love and to workout. Honestly though... it is still really hard to focus. I don't want to wake up anymore. I don't want to do anything. I'm forcing myself. I don't know which direction I'm heading. Sometimes I'm just on autopilot and try to find distractions. I consider work a distraction and I put all of the frustration, disappointment and anger that I have with myself into working out but it only helps for that period of time. So far, only working out helps but only for a short time. The medication makes me a little loopy and I can't control how I feel. I try to pretend that everything is ok, but it only fools some people. Sorry for the rant... I guess my answer is working out at this time.  [info] None [info] 1483496105
lemaxx [info] Hi there. It's my first time posting in this subreddit. I was diagnosed with anxiety about 5 years ago (when I was 21). I was relatively high-functioning for the past 5 years, up until about 6 months ago. I'm finally addressing and acknowledging the severity of my issue. I'm going to my first psyche assessment tomorrow. I'm excited, and nervous, because this really "makes it real". I haven't played video games in quite a while. But I used to love The Sims!  [info] None [info] 1464119519
sheriff1980 [info] Hey bud, I was diagnosed with anxiety a little over a year ago. I started having the same symptoms you are describing about 2 weeks ago. Through CBT training, I kinda told myself that it was all in my head, I started drinking GALLONS of water a day, peeing every 45 minutes or so. I went to the doc today and got tested, and sure enough I am diabetic. Don't let your anxiety diagnose you (or not diagnose you) go get checked. I am 37 years old and scared about what is happening to me. But at least I know it isn't all in my head.  [info] T2 / 2017 / PILLS  [info] 1496191296
SilverMonkey96 [info] Need concerns eased, Chest pain, anxiety, etc. I'm 19. Male. About 175 pounds. About 5:10/5:11. Don't smoke. Not on any medications. I've been diagnosed with anxiety. Lately I've been getting a lot of palpitations, flutters, sharp pains, etc. a lot more than usual, especially at night. Of course I'm sure it's anxiety but I'm still worried. About two years ago I had two EKG's (and another one about two years prior to that), an echocardiogram, wore a holter moniter for two days, and had 3-4 blood tests. All came back perfect. I tried to have a few more blood tests and basic heart monitoring done more often but they were hesitant to since I'm young with no health problems and had already had tests. All they would really do after those tests was listen with stethoscopes and said it sounded fine.  What do you guys think, these symptoms get really bad and scary at night when in trying to go to sleep. [info] None [info] 1532587608
HyphMngo [info] Holy shit, this sounds like me. I find it incredibly difficult to focus for more than short bursts and must start assignments incredibly early or I'll never complete anything on time. I can literally start something and never actually get around to doing anything for 4-5 hours. I'm terrible at focusing for exam study. I'm not exactly hyperactive but I'm constantly fidgeting. I've been diagnosed with anxiety before, I wonder if its all related? [info] None [info] 1441886811
cigboy1 [info] How can I get back into college given my situation? I became addicted to serious drugs and after a few months it got to a point where the police found out (after performing a wellness check) and charged me with several counts of drug possession. I was also sent to the hospital because of drug abuse and so the school charged me with violating the code of conduct, although they later found me not responsible for violating it. I have not been expelled, suspended, or even on school probation, however I was told to go on a medical leave by the dean of students office.As for the law they diverted the case and as long as I pass  periodical drug tests, as well as attend therapy they will drop the charges. Also since I never entered a plea at arraignment, I do not have a record. In order to re-enroll after taking a medical withdrawal I have to get a letter saying the issue is taken care of. This I can get from my therapist. I do however need to interview with the schools counseling center. My question is should I mention anything about the police to the school counseling center? Or should I just lie and say I got help on my own?Because I am diagnosed with anxiety, the obvious cover story is that I was self medicating in order to deal with my out of control anxiety, and now that I am on new (prescribed) medication I no longer need to do drugs. They'll definitely ask me if I can complete school work, which I can easily point to my 3.5 GPA that I earned from the years prior. The only issue is that I don't know for sure what they know (in regards to the police). [info] None [info] 1576108762
bathtubenvy [info] Hey, I've had this type of thinking a lot (my whole life!) until earlier this year when I was diagnosed with anxiety. I had a few short sessions with a counsellor and now, if I start having those thoughts, I just have to remind myself that it's the anxiety talking... It makes life a lot easier! [info] None [info] 1472045833
Jynxbunni [info] I need some help So, I was diagnosed with anxiety over a decade ago. I've never read my own records, but if memory serves me correctly, it was social anxiety. I believe this has definitely morphed into a more general issue, especially over the last few years. It's only occasionally been an issue, until more recently.I started nursing school about two weeks ago. It's been, okay really, so far. I've already been a CNA at a hospital for a few years, so I definitely have a step up on my peers. I keep organized well enough, but I always feel like I am forgetting something that is due. If I don't write something in my calendar right away, it will definitely be forgotten about. The homework load is okay, I actually got all of this week's work done by Tuesday.But..something has changed. I can feel it, and I know my fiancee has noticed it as well. I can't pay attention in class. I have to be doing something else at the same time. I can't just be listening and taking notes, I have to also be playing a game or surfing reddit. This is what I did for all of my pre-reqs, and I passed with A's, so I am not too worried quite yet, however this continues at home as well. I feel like I can't relax, no matter where I am. For the last few days, I have had this constant pit in my stomach, that never seems to go away, no matter what. I feel so unfocused and out of control. I've been more easily irritated with my fiance (who's major show of affection is annoyance), and I know he knows it. I can't sit still, when I do I feel like there are so many other things I can be doing, but when I actually have time to do them, I don't. We're also getting married in October, but something needs to change before then.I'm not on any meds right now, though I'm not terribly opposed. I try to relieve stress through games and riding my bike. I don't know what to do, and this isn't working, and I feel like I'm losing it. What do? [info] None [info] 1441380766
redditor-for-2-hours [info] Army or navy or whatever recruiter called me right after graduation, too.  Me: Hello  Recruiter: Hi blah bla from blah *insert military branch here* blah  Me: ...Hello.  Recruiter: Do you know what you're going to do after high school?    Me: College.  Recruiter: Do you have plans for college already?  Me: Already accepted to the community college. They accept everybody.  Recruiter: What about after that?  Me: Transfer to a university.  Recruiter: After that?  Me: Get a good career.  Recruiter: Well, have you ever considered joining the *insert US military service here*?  Me: No, I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorders, and if you're diagnosed with anxiety disorders you can't join the military.  Recruiter: ...Well...uh...um...well...I...um...it sounds like you've done your research. *click*  No other recruiters ever called. My brother had recruiters calling for him for about a year after he graduated before they finally gave up on him, I only had that one call. [info] None [info] 1329273905
matilsal [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety long before it was cool. Come at me. [info] None [info] 1551897485
mr279 [info] Sharing some stuff after years of struggling with anxiety disorder Hello r/Anxiety,TL/DR - tips for getting through a panic attack are after lines like this:________________________________________________________If you need help calming down, or any questions, message meI know there are a lot of people there who do not know what to do, are scared to make any actions to get help, or even tell anybody about how they feel. I have been there, and I would like to share my story, so you can see that it is not scarry at all - fear is very strong enemy, loosing a couple of battles doesn’t mean that we are weak - it just mean, that the war is not over yet. English is my second language, I will try to be as grammaticly correct as I can, but sorry for mistakes in advance.I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder five years ago, after having a „heart attack” while sitting on a lecture as a freshman in college. Suddenly I experienced a warm feeling in chest, not a pleasant kind, pulsating from what I thought was heart, down my spine, then up again. My muscles forced me to straight my back, I felt like I was going to puke, cold sweat appeared on my palms and forhead. It forced me to leave the building, everyone was starring at me, I thought I will fall, lose consciousness, die, everything. I called my father as quickly as I could find a place where I can sit alone and calm down, thanks God for that bench and park. He answered, luckily he was in a car, then after 30 minutes he picked me up. Worst 30 minutes of my life, was starring at a green grass, trying not to puke or die, but slowly I was calming down and feeling better. Boy, I wished I know what a panic attack was back then.After checkout with my regular doctor, monitoring my heart and a long talk, he recommended going to a psychologist. So I did. Couple sessions, couple hundred zlotys later (our currency), havent experienced it ever since, plus those sessions felt like a waste of time and money. But she told me one important thing - that might have been a panic attack - so of course I googled the hell out of it and suddenly it started to make sense. I decided to go to a psychiatrist, because I did not really take the psychologist seriously. Then I was diagnosed, he prescribed me sertralin, afobam and something to help me sleep - I cant really remember what, I wasnt using that because it made me feel drowsy almost whole next day. First week was awful, was feeling nausious all the time, tired and sleepy. Of course the only person who knew about my anxiety was my dad, but we did not really talked much, so I was alone with that. My friends started asking if everything was ok, and I lied to them, but I am sure they know something is up. That was my first big mistake. I am not telling you that you should tell everybody - pick one, maybe two people that you trust, you will be surprised. They will not laugh, they will ask questions. And if you answer those questions, I promise you will feel better. What is most important - they will try to stop triggering your anxiety attacks by avoiding certain topics, and when you will experience another attack, and you will, they will know what to do to help and you will calm down quicker. After couple of months with sertraline they switched me to pregabaline, lorazepam and another funny medicine that worked like xanax - beware, they are addictive, and will do more damage than help if not used properly. Be honest with your doctor, tell him if you fell you are getting addicted.After years, I am not afraid of attacks anymore. I can recognize them, I know the pattern, know my triggers, somehow I can get through. ________________________________________________________There are some tips for all of you struggling just like me:________________________________________________________- know your triggers -   Do not be afraid to think about your last panic attack. Analyze it, write down where it happened, what happened before that, write down what have you done that day, how did those actions made you feel, morning till falling asleep - the devil is in the details, you will not see it just by thinking about the day, but when you write things down, it will become obvious.- recognise the pattern - How panic attacks makes you feel? For some people it is nausea, you have to sit next to the door at public places because you are worried you might puke - and that is okay. Sit next to the door. Look at the door, remember you CAN ALWAYS LEAVE, WHENEVER YOU WANT. Nobody can force you to stay. If you need, leave, calm down, come back. Get some plastic bag and keep it with you - you will be calmer. Tips - look at the celing, count breaths (in - one, out - two, in - Three, out - four, to ten, then repeat) Ginger is your best friend, ginger tea always with you when you go out, little sips, even the smell helps.Sometimes it feels like you are about to lose concioussness, fall on the floor - think about that - your heart is pounding, like 200 bpm right? You can’t pass out when you are in high alert mode, you got plenty of oxygen, adrenaline pumping through your veins. Tips - sit down, with legs spreaded and hands freely on boths sides. Look at something a little bit above you, focus hard. What shape it is? What color? How old is it, start naming the things you see - like looking at bird - „I can see feathers, dark brown, little bit of white at the belly. It is small, two bright colour legs, little black eyes.” - name as many things you can, you quickly will be better. Other tips that worked for me:- pray. I am not a religious person, but repeating mantras is proved to help you calm down, the best for me is praying for someone - I focus on people I love, then pray thinking about them. It reminds you that you are not alone.- count breaths, from one to ten (not really working for me, but I know that it works miracles for some people)- meditate. Lay down on your bed, hands on both sides, get your phone and search youtube for „guided meditation”, choose one that you like and just listen, I promise you will be surprised and quickly hook up. I use phone app „headspace” and it is good for starting- try to put yourself in happy places, funny situations. Watch a comedy. Read a light book, watch videos with funny animals, sports bloopers, stay positive.- when feeling uneasy, worried, call someone. You will experience a panic attack, but if you are not alone, you can talk or just listen, you will recover faster - smells are your best friends. Buy a cologne you only use while at home, (best for me are wood, oud fragrances - nice pick is „by the fireplace” Mason Margela) when you feel calm and safe. After a week/two, start to carry around small bottle of that scent and whenever you start to feel worried - spray a little bit on you wrist and smell it - you will pavlov yourself to feeling safe.- avoid alcohol. It makes you feel better. It calms you down, you are finally relaxed, god bless. But every beer, shot, glass will make your next attack stronger and worse. It makes you depressed in a long run, plus, when you have anxiety, hungover is literally hell for you. Have a glass of wine, beer with friends, but watch yourself. - drugs can be your worst nightmare, especially shrooms, LSD and marihuana. Not telling you how to live, but think what bad trip is when you add a panic attack to it. Try to use CBD instead of THC, it helps with nausea and may fix your sleeping problems.- sleep a lot, wake up early and avoid sitting at night. - do your chores, whatever is going on with you, wake up, take a shower, clean a little bit, dress up niecely, put on cologne and deodorant, eat small breakfast, even a piece of bread - then you can go back to bed if you need. But do it, trust me. - talk with me. If you have any questions, need someone who will help you calm down, send a message. I am not always here, but will answer as soon as I can [info] None [info] 1587400653
cloutangelkay [info] horrible adderall experience (ER visit) in november i was prescribed adderall xr to help me focus on my school work, i couldn’t ever focus and would always have time taking information in and remembering it, so my doctor prescribed me the 10mg capsules without looking into it too much. for the first 4-6 hours of ingesting it, i felt on top of the world, super talkative, euphoric nothing to complain about at all, as i started to come down slowly. i had these super painful chest pains, feeling like i was gonna faint. i felt so shitty, even after the feeling of euphoria died down. it ended up keeping me awake for THREE days straight, i tried to sleep, to finally have this feeling be over, the anxiety and paranoia. on the second and third day of being awake i started to hallucinate and i was convinced that i was actually going crazy, and losing touch with reality and my body. i tried taking my prescribed xanax to help me sleep but it did absolutely nothing i started to become even more paranoid, thinking i was being watched or that my food was poisoned by the government. after the third day of being awake i had finally crashed, and the next few days were filled with chest tightness, pains, dizziness, anxiety suicidal though etc. i ended up going to the ER for an EKG, they did the EKG and did a x ray, they told me that everything looked fine but gave me a iv of tramadol for the chest pains i was having. i am still curious to why i had this reaction, i am diagnosed with anxiety so maybe it had gotten the best of me? [info] None [info] 1549565426
autisticparsnip [info] Well Mum brought it to my attention a few years back that she thought I could have aspergers, just from reading the symptoms and such online. I was taken aback by this and took it the wrong way. But then when I met the guy I'm dating, I asked him a few questions about my friend, but he thought I was talking about myself and said "Yeah, I have actually been thinking that you have aspergers."So I went to a psychiatrist and a psychologist and am now working with a specialist. It has been the most amazing journey, and I have realised that for most of my life I've let people walk all over me hahaBut yeah, before that I was diagnosed with anxiety, which is still there obviously, OCD, and one particular psychologist thought I could have BPD - which is far faaarr from the truth.  [info] Asperger's Female [info] 1511859448
goldfishpoops [info] Hey absolutely! I have really strong opinions about the religion having being raised in it and leaving it. But trust me I don't think it is this sinister, I remember what I was wearing and that I wasn't touched. My theories are more in the realm of some weird pseudo science, I was diagnosed with anxiety pretty young and a big indicator was sleep walking and paralysis night terrors. My theory is my parents reached out to someone to try to aid in helping me but can't imagine what taking a picture of me sleeping accomplished. [info] None [info] 1570309816
Nevermore--- [info] I managed to stop a panic attack over the fact that I don't have consistent work hours at 16 For a bit of a background I've been diagnosed with anxiety, last checked it was pretty bad even if my family doesn't see the full strength of it cause I hide.I work a casual job as an events caterer. Meaning I only work when people want to go out and spend a tonne of money. There has been one event this year and it was making my budget plan go a little bad. But then I thought 'I am sixteen goddammit. I do not need to worry about my university fund so much when I don't even know if I'll do law.' Then I calmed down. No panic attack or freaking out. [info] None [info] 1516017967
TheRunningMango [info] You sound exactly like me. For years I ignored it and thought it was normal, and that I was just 'type A' personality, and that was that and I didn't need any sort of special help. But, I started seeing someone when I had so much anxiety that I couldn't perform on exams (the LSAT, specifically) without having major panic attacks, and I simultaneously developed severe insomnia. I was diagnosed with anxiety as well as OCD in the form of perfectionism. I started taking zoloft and was prescribed klonopin (a take-as-needed) and it's helped quite a bit (though tbh only on week 6 of that, so take this w a grain of salt). So tl;dr: no, you're not making this up, and I would definitely recommend seeing someone and inquiring about SSRIs and maybe even a take-as-needed if you ever have panic attacks or insomnia. And feel free to reach out anytime if you need help or have questions &lt;3 we gotta stick together us high-functioning-high-anxiety-ers  [info] None [info] 1543779252
Chucky1433 [info] What the fuck do I do here So very recently I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and have been smoking for a little while now. However, more recently it has exhaserbsted my anxiety, and my doctor has told me to stay away but I really want to smoke. What do I do? [info] None [info] 1523759684
gabez814 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, I'm hoping to find a physician who agrees its "similar" to PTSD because like you said based on the wording it definitely sounds like its up to the physicians. [info] None [info] 1478738886
8thful [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and have gone through an intensive outpatient program where I learned about an amazing philosophy called ACT (Acceptance and Commitment Therapy). Might be something worth looking into if your worried are getting in the way of enjoying life. [info] None [info] 1477406095
hiwaomiyazaki [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ADD, but I never talked to my psychiatrist about these episodes because I honestly thought they were normal. Growing up, my mom would have days where she seemed like she was disconnected and on another planet that had delayed reception. I just assumed it was a personality thing. I recently have read some descriptions of people's experiences with depersonalization/dissociating and suddenly, I realized that it's npt a eun of the mill thing!Thank you for responding, I'm definitely going to find out what's going on with my ole noggin. Maybe this is it? If you don't mind my asking, how do you deal with it? [info] None [info] 1480405755
MCV_ [info] Anxiety and ADD I was just diagnosed with anxiety and ADD. I have a prescription for prozac to help the anxiety but my psychiatrist said that the medication for ADD makes people anxious so he can't start me on that until he sees how I do with the prozac long term. Does anyone else have anxiety and ADD, how did the ADD medication effect your anxiety or vice versa? [info] None [info] 1386819961
PatronymicPenguin [info] It's too easy to give up after the first medication or two doesn't work well. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder as a child and it took several months to find a medication which worked and didn't have unbearable side effects, but it was worth it. My life improved greatly and has continued to get better into adulthood. It can take time, but never give up. The right medicine, combined with therapy, can change your life. [info] None [info] 1485530761
ranspazzo [info] Great question!  I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was in college so this played a HUGE role in my mental state when dealing with the leukemia.  I was having panic attacks pretty often when I was in the hospital which was frustrating.  I found walking the hallways helped.  I got much worse when I went through the isolation after the transplant.  I don't like being cooped up especially in a small hospital room.  I started getting serious panic attacks and anxiety near the end because I really wanted to go home.  Strange thing was that when I got home, the anxiety continued because now I had my daughter to take care of while I was recuperating.  I got a lot of help so I made it through it.  I do suffer from post traumatic stress disorder which is weird.  Certain sounds and smells trigger anxiety.  Other than that I am mentally back to normal.  I do look at everyday life differently after this experience.   [info] None [info] 1386805635
focusrite24 [info] Can A Fast Heart Rate Cause Heart Failure? I am a 34 year old female. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Some days, my heart rate is high for hours (around 100 - 110 bpm) but usually settles down to 70 - 80 bpm at night when I go to sleep. When I get panic attacks, my heart rate goes to 140 - 150 bpm for 5 to 10 minutes or so.I understand that a fast heart rate above 100 bpm is one of the symptoms of heart failure. But my question is does a fast heart rate for an extended time cause heart failure? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1467570577
chelseacd7 [info] Yea I'm like this too. I'm 23 and hadn't gone to the doc since my parents made me when I was in highschool. Until last year. About last August I freaked out and I could feel pressure in my chest and could tell my heart was racing and I thought I was having a freaking heart attack. I was so torn because the idea of going to the doctor made me sick and I thought I might be overreacting  but I kept worrying something might really be wrong. After a night of laying awake thinking I might die I forced myself to go and after an ekg, chest x-rays, &amp; lab work I was diagnosed with anxiety. Go figure. I do think it has improved a small amount though because I've had a few follow up appointments since all that happened and I feel like they were a little easier to handle. That could just be because of the doctor though, she's great and I feel more comfortable with her. I would suggest maybe asking around to people you know to get suggestions for a good doc. I think finding someone that makes you feel more comfortable, even if it's just slightly, could help. [info] None [info] 1519795012
dreyhannah [info] I’m on Ocella right now, I’m only on my second month, they switched me from my other Yazmin Generic, and I’ve noticed some moodiness, but since switching to Ocella I have had THE WORST moods, like from happy to absolutely angry and stressed, and the bloating is pretty bad right now...but!!! There is a catch, I am diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder SO I’m sure that having this diagnosis affects how I react emotionally to the pill...usually the side effects calm down after a while, I’m hoping I get used to this new generic soon! [info] None [info] 1560130766
mentilnutz [info] I was called lazy as a kid and teen even though I was a competitive martial artists and softball player. It was very confusing for me bc I tried really hard in school but my grades were abysmal. About 3 years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and a hidden learning disability and since going to therapy, I’ve been doing much better. I learned a lot of coping techniques and got accommodations at school. I’m not saying your kid has a learning disability or mental illness but it would be worth talking to a counselor about. In fact, for all you know, Your kid might even be very gifted and bored with current activities.  [info] None [info] 1533682292
texasagrg [info] I'm not condoning drugs... but have you considered going to a psychiatrist for anxiety. I was much the same as you - very shy, blushing, perpetually nervous, yet loved my content area and students - and I was diagnosed with anxiety. I started taking very small doses of anxiety meds and they have worked WONDERS for me. Another good idea for you is to apply as a sub &amp; cross your fingers for a long term position once the school year begins. If you are looking in the Houston area, I know Galena Park ISD as well as Cy Fair and Katy all have Social Studies positions listed. Best of luck :) [info] None [info] 1501177821
fl33twoodmacs3xpants [info] I've had many if these tendencies my entire life and never even thought about it. Then I was diagnosed with anxiety at 28 and realized how weird it was. [info] None [info] 1570112834
randomuserIam [info] I always had troubles orgasming during sex unless I had toys or put a lot of attention to me, with my previous (vanilla) partner. I never had issues alone, though. But I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on medication, one of which is ssri and interferes with orgasm. I have a decent libido (or so I found out) and I have a lot of pleasure, but I can't for the life of me climax. My Dom fully understands, he still tries but after it's been hours of play it gets exhausting. I still manage to cum alone, with a lot of effort though, but much faster. So I think there's a part of me that's also stopping me because of the pressure to cum. I do know, however, that I can be forced to orgasm... Provided certain criteria is met. So, my next investment will actually be a wand, instead of what I currently own that is worse than a bullet...  [info] None [info] 1553533076
CuteThingsAndLove [info] Is it really bad to be addicted to xanax? My doctor and family were all very concerned about me when I was diagnosed with anxiety many years ago, and my doctor did give me a prescription of xanax, but made sure my dad didnt give me any unless I absolutely needed it (in full panic attack mode, basically).Now that I'm older, I'm just thinking about it more. When I take the xanax, I feel a type of calmness I never have had in my normal life, its very peaceful. So I always said, I can see why people would become addicted to this, I would take it every day if that wasn't an issue. The bottle of 60 pills he prescribed me at 16/17 is still on my desk at age 22.My question is, how bad is it to become addicted to xanax? What are the side effects of it, is it dangerous, and what are the withdrawal symptoms? Do you become immune to the effects after a while and need to make the dosage larger, or do the effects stay the same?Hopefully someone with first hand experience on it sees this question. I would post this in a medical sub but I much prefer this sub as I feel less embarrassed asking on here.Edit: Thank you everyone for the answers. I wasn't planning on getting addicted to xanax, I was just wondering about the side effects as the people in my life were always very nervous about it without ever really explaining it to me, so I was simply curious. There is addiction in my family so they were incredibly cautious with me. But again, I only very rarely take it.Thank you again! [info] None [info] 1506090986
pressfastf0rward [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety along with other psych disorders when I was 16, but never believed that diagnosis. I smoke weed everyday typically which helps keep me even kilter but haven't been able to this week. Do you think this could've contributed? [info] None [info] 1411176475
alexthegeologist [info] Help? Anxiety vs Dysautonomia I just got out of seeing a cardiologist who told me all or most of my symptoms are anxiety related. I've been diagnosed with anxiety for years, but I am realizing that some of the symptoms I attributed to my anxiety might not have been anxiety. Like when I feel chest pains and heart beating too quickly but I'm not anxious about anything mentally. There have definitely been times when I was anxious mentally and physically or just mentally. I was also recently diagnosed with EDS. The cardiologist said she thinks it's all adrenaline/anxiety. But she completely disregarded all the other symptoms I've been having, like temperature disregulation, frequent near syncope, exhaustion, GI problems, sleep problems, tremors, dizziness, Raynaud's.  I just don't know where to go with this, because my heart rate is too low for any sort of beta blocker and her only recommendation was anti anxiety medication, which I've been on for years (various ones). I can't take my ADHD medication because it feels like my heart beats too quickly. And I can't be medicated with Xanax all the time because I'd become a bezo dependent zombie. I just don't know what to do now. When I brought up how I was still having problems despite her saying it was just anxiety, she said it wasn't her area (aka psychiatry). [info] None [info] 1571151199
stanstanstanLM [info] So, I'm not sure I understand all the details (or if I really want to) of your situation, what I can say is that it sounds like you're unhappy the way things are. If you're at a point where you're considering ending friendships over this, then that's all you really need. You don't need to justify yourself or your actions to anyone. It may annoy them, or confuse people, but you don't owe them closure or justification. If ending the friendships results in a better, less stressful, and far healthier, situation for yourself, you should. You are responsible for yourself, your health, and your feelings and to uphold those responsibilities to yourself social obligations are less relevant. If, however, there are those who you want to remain friends with, you need to talk to them. Friendships are a lot of work, and properly telling someone your feelings is the only way they can continue. If that means over text, or a letter, or face to face, then so be it. Many people don't see text as seriously as face to face, since you can't hear tone or see body language, so it is difficult to discern feelings, so that is something you should keep in mind as well. In these kind of situations though... I would say have as open and as blunt of a conversation as you can. Try to put aside being hurt at what you hear, until digesting everything that's been said. People can be emotional, and say things that hurt or things they don't really mean, especially when confronted with the faults you see in them. If you have the patience to do that with any of these girls, then that says you care about your friendship with them and perhaps they're worth a shot. All in all, what I'm saying is, think carefully about each and every one of them before making your choice. If you feel like 3 of them are worth trying for, then do it. If none of them are then don't. If you want to explain to them, than do. If you don't want to explain anything, then don't. Something you should consider though, is some of the things you've mentioned they've said about you seem... well extremely valid for them to be upset about. Being jealous about 3 friends hanging out, constantly doubting their feelings, and never trusting them, while leaning on them emotionally, are just some I'm picking out from your text. See, the problem is, it really seems like these feelings are a constant for you. Pulling from my own life, I have been diagnosed with anxiety, it's to the point where I believe that strangers harbor malicious and evil intentions for me. Lady walking in the park? My brain tells me that she's there to murder me, obviously. Guy walking past my house everyday? Well he must want to break in and steal all my things, right? But you see, that lady likely just wants to walk on her lunch break. And that guy? Probably is going to school or work. You see, what I have learned is that the narrative my sick brain writes for others is not the truth, and moreover this is a 'me' responsibility. It is your responsibility to deal with your emotions, and I would strongly suggest seeking therapy. It is not your friends or peers responsibility to be your therapist. It is not a responsibility of a friend to constantly have to reassure their friend over everything. And frankly it is exhausting. It's not healthy to not be able to trust people, or feel jealous that friends hang out with each other without you, or feeling overly controlling or possessive. The more out of control feelings become the more you rely on others and at some point that is also not healthy, especially if that means that they're being backed into a place where your emotions are forcing them to go on a rant. Honestly, G here sounds like someone who cares about you a lot, and certainly sticks out from the others that you mentioned. If I was in your position, (and as a fellow over thinking who can be a debbie downer) I'd fight tooth and nail for someone who had the balls to call me out on my shit right to my face. Respect. And another personal feel too, is these friends who are 'talking behind your back' or 'snitching' could be doing so with the best of intentions. Perhaps someone told F things but intended to try to fix the relationship and it blew up in their face? And talking with each other about you doesn't mean it's full of malice, they could be concerned and as far ad they see it, you're all friends and these friends may be concerned about you too.Tl;drYou're not nessicarily wrong, do as you please, though regardless of ehat you do think about therapy for yourself because some of the things you are expressing here is not indicative of, (or an environment that would lead to,) good mental health.Also r/relationship_advice would be a good place to post if you want a more empathetic(?) Normal(?) approach to dealing with these friends, I'd suggest asking there as well. [info] None [info] 1572163846
kuronsven [info] Fear of Anger and Getting Yelled At? I was diagnosed with anxiety my sophomore year of high school, but it's been something I've dealt with since at least 7th or 8th grade. There's a lot of things that bother me when it comes to my anxiety, but nothing sets me off quite like the thought of someone being angry with me, especially authority figures. Currently, I'm a sophomore in college and this semester has been extremely rough because I'm constantly paranoid and sick to my stomach thinking my professors are going to find I messed up somewhere or that I forgot to turn homework in and then they'll yell at me and scream at me. Rationally, I know this would never be the case, but I can't help it. And it's especially hard when it comes to male authority figures (which I kind of assumed happens because I grew up with only a mother and sister and so men make me a bit timid). For example, my Japanese professor read over a bit of my homework, and corrected the way I wrote a certain word and though I know he was just being considerate and helpful, I found myself later that day writing that word over and over and over until my pages were covered because I kept thinking, "If he sees I wrote it wrong again, he's going to get mad at me, and make me come to his office, and yell at me." It's getting so bad to the point where I have to keep myself from crying at the thought of even having to meet with my professors for help because I'm afraid of seeing them mad at me, even though they never have been.Has anyone else had this problem and found some way to get through it? I don't think any part of my past has influenced me this way, but it's hard to say, really. [info] None [info] 1574217778
Empress618 [info] Freaking out, possibly pregnant I wanted to post somewhere. I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on 20mg fluoxetine in September.  Since January i have felt pregnant. But every test has been negetive. [info] None [info] 1519866266
TheySayImZack [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, correct.  Yeah it did take some time for me.  I started to feel, well, different about 5 or 6 days in, but I couldn't put a finger on it.  I just rolled with it, kept going with the daily doses, and where I am at now definitely feels like a ramp upwards toward something so much better than where I was at a month ago.I'm glad to hear it's helped you.  It gave me a clarity that I didn't know I was struggling to achieve. [info] None [info] 1537136455
Fiyet [info] I would recommend it. I originally started stitching when I was 9 years old because my aunt would babysit me and she taught me how. I stopped stitching when I got a job when I was 16 and didn't take it back up until 2 years ago, when I was 30. I started stitching again after my brother-in-law died. He fell and it took 11 days for search and rescue to find his body. I was going crazy and my aunt, who I'm still very close to, overnighted me a kit. While I was still in a lot of pain keeping my hands and mind busy was very helpful. Cross stitching still helps me. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and PTSD. So having something to focus on that keeps me busy but not too busy has been amazing for me. And when I'm done with a project I have a sense of accomplishment that makes me feel better about my life and my situation. Also they make great gifts and seeing someone get one of my cross stitches as a gift feels amazing because I'm lucky and my family appreciates the work behind the craft. What has also helped me was discovering the cross stitch community online. It is amazing! I've made some great friends through Facebook groups and Instagram. In fact one of my friends that I met through cross stitch literally lives down the street from me. it's fun to have in jokes with people about cross stitch and have people understand how it can get frustrating sometimes. There are a lot of great fun people and it elevated my craft from being fun to being part of my life. [info] None [info] 1540927510
Tazbio [info] Thank you for the kind words! I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I've started medication, I'm curious to see the difference. I will keep in mind the name of your medication, it sounds very relieving! Thanks again! [info] 7 Days [info] 1505751478
Admiralfrewt [info] Hey y'all! New user here with a BUNCH of questions Background: I have been diagnosed with anxiety and perscribed 5mg Valium as needed. I have not been taking it because I hate feeling "couch-locked" for hours (same reason I don't enjoy smoking marijuana). I have pretty constant anxiety all day, but manageable with few and far between actual panic attacks. I used to smoke cigarettes/ vape nicotine but have quit for almost a year.I went to a vape shop two weeks ago and had a new rig set up (I use an RDA instead of a tank) to just vape 0mg nicotine for the mechanical satisfaction of smoking something. But I also bought a little CBD vape pen. The brand of CBD liquid is "The Clear" with 500mg of 220 mg CBD The guy at the store told me it would last me a while but I went through it in a week to which the guy said that it was unheard of that I would go through one so fast. I felt like I wasn't getting much effect unless I had 2-3 puffs every few hours. Now these disposable pens are very expensive ($40!). I think my alternative is buying the flowers. But I want opinions from experts/ experienced users. Should I try the flowers as a cheaper alternative? Should I be regular dosing with oil? Please give me all advice and insights! I want to be educated! [info] None [info] 1555431897
Penholder111 [info] I'm scared of my own brain and feel incredibly discouraged. I'll try to keep this short. I'm exhausted, can't sleep, and just need to write my feelings down. I was referred to a psychiatrist in September and have an appointment set up for the beginning of March (yaay mental health coverage..). I'm having to wait so long because it's free care, so it's understandable. I'm kind of scared of what I might discover. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was young (maybe 8...) and also medicated at the time. My parents are loving and thoughtful people so I know medicating me would have been a huge decision. So I know that when I go back my anxiety will be brought up and I will probably be re-medicated (haven't been since I was a kid.) I'm scared that there's something...more though. I've recently been through hell in my relationship. We got a dog together and it caused so many problems I wont even begin to explain. In a nutshell, the dog caused my anxiety to worsen severely. I quickly realized that after I got the dog, that I shouldn't have. I knew that in order to look after my own health that the dog needed to go. But my partner wouldn't entertain the idea of giving the dog away. Through this whole ordeal...if been very scared of how I've been feeling. I think horrible things about the dog, and feel completely apathetic towards its well being. I just want it gone and I don't care how. I'm so scared that I have some type of mild psychopathy...like sociopath or something because I cannot find any love or care for this animal. I think that I hate it. And I've never hated anything in my life. It's really scaring me. As to why I'm discouraged, it's typical stuff. I feel called to be a writer. It's all I think about - these stories and creations I get in my head and then write. But, I just don't know how to do it. I work as a waiter and I certainly don't want to do that forever. If I do though, would god be angry at me for not fulfilling my calling? Is a career ever a calling, or is that my own human desire talking? I think that I can really affect and help people through my writing, and relation (I think) is a huge part of what God wants to see in us. It's at the point where I'm rambling. Thanks to any and all who read this. I'm going to try for some sleep. [info] None [info] 1486282544
luke4545 [info] Speaking from personal experience, weed both ruined and fixed my life. After having my first panic attack while smoking, I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder. That stuck around for about 7 months. Every day I'd have few panic attacks, and felt like dying. In those 7 months I accomplished more than I ever imagined. Started college, got my license and lost over 60 lbs. Basically distracted all the negative thoughts by being productive. I still toke from time to time, but the heavy chested, racing heart and paranoia feeling tends to come back. I really miss being able to enjoy the high without all these side effects.Anyway, sorry for the bad grammar it's late and I'm tired. Just felt like I had to share this. [info] None [info] 1345439090
lima_247 [info] I've had shower anxiety since I was a small child. I had very bad eyesight from a young age, and because i had to take off my glasses to shower, I would get anxious and think I saw things that weren't there. The loud noise also makes me feel vulnerable, because it's another sense of mine compromised. Washing my face is the worst, because it's when I'm the most vulnerable.Showering during the day, keeping showers short, and keeping to a routine in the shower all help. I also like music while I shower, and plenty of light. What you have 100% sounds like anxiety, though. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I thought I might be schizophrenic, but I looked into it and the symptoms are really very different. I often thought about people sneaking up on me in my empty house, and dwelled on these thoughts and scenarios, which sounds like what you're doing. [info] None [info] 1421013965
colonialnerd [info] I don't even know what to call this, shit just sucks. I'm a transgender teenager, I have to go into the doctor's office every week to get shots, I am diagnosed with anxiety and I haven't been able to get proper therapy in months. The best I can do is the school therapist right now and for that, I have to leave my classes. I'm a full-time student, I can't drive, and most places won't hire me because I'm too young. This is all regular stuff for me, but things get worse.My mom is having a hip replacement next week and my grandma has to stay with us, she is "a product of her time" to put things lightly. We have two other people staying with us who are the literal definition of that saying "were you born in a barn?" seriously, they got kicked out of their old house for messing the place up and not paying rent. I have to share a room with one when my grandmother comes to stay for over a week while I still have school. My dad is the only one working now and is never home. I have been the only one delegated new chores in my family (well at least more than two) My dad got floors and trash, and one of the people staying with us got guinea pig cages (they are her guinea pigs and we have to tell her to take care of them and she lets them run wild and I'm going to have to share a room with that), the bathroom, and her own laundry. I got feed cats twice a day, feed fish twice a day, make lunches, cook dinner, dishes, laundry, litterboxes, water bowls, room cleaning, and tea service for my mom. The only alone time I've gotten in the months they've been here have been me locked in my room and I've been continuously shamed for it by my parents and now they're making me share a room to top it all off. I've been falling behind in my classes because I'm falling asleep in them since I haven't been able to sleep and because I keep getting taken out for therapy. And finally, my mom has been in such great pain in these days leading up to her surgery all she does is yell at me and tell me I don't do enough for this house. Shit sucks for everyone involved, any advice is okay if you have some to offer. [info] None [info] 1581038011
laurandisorder [info] I used to get this so badly as a child - starting very young and it lasted well into adulthood. As an adult I was diagnosed with anxiety, but this was a different sensation. An overwhelming urge to be with my cat (sorry parents), my things (books)’and in my room. It was a physical, gut wrenching pull for the familiar. I could only overcome it through distraction. Boy, did my folks get sick of picking me up early from sleepovers and camps! [info] None [info] 1514373802
SubjectShape [info] So I started realizing there were issues and got diagnosed with IBS. I started by keeping a food journal to see if I could figure out what was setting it off, but there wasn't anything linking the IBS. Not to say it was useless coz I found out some other stuff, but it seemed like my IBS hit no matter what I was eating.I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but when I moved I left my therapist and lost my insurance so I can't afford to see a therapist anymore. But while reading about IBS I saw someone suggesting it might be an anxiety response, so I started keeping an anxiety journal instead. Basically whenever I recognized I was super anxious about something I'd write down when that happened and what I was anxious about. Sure enough my IBS symptoms were almost always right behind anything that majorly set off my anxiety.Since then I've had to be better about my anxiety and find ways to manage it without a therapist and meds. Edibles help since they're legal here, but they are also semi-expensive so not always accessible. Meditation has been a huge help, just spending a few minutes in the morning when I get up to sit and be mindful of my body and how I'm feeling that morning. I still get stressed, of course, but knowing that it's coming because I can feel that stress building up is also very helpful. Plus I just like....don't leave the house except once a week to do groceries and I always make sure to go early in the morning so I haven't eaten breakfast yet. I work from home, I have a dog to help with my anxiety, I keep on a pretty tight schedule in terms of waking up, going to bed, working, ect.The thing is like....everyone's anxiety is different, so how I control mine may not be what works for someone else. I control my environment to control my anxiety and do the best I can to cope when that's not possible, both with the anxiety and with the IBS. [info] None [info] 1567109327
Plagman39339 [info] Grandma's old and not dying perse but everyone in the family has heart disease. My uncle's ex-wife got diagnosed with terminal breast cancer.I'm diagnosed with anxiety and took my medication but I haven't been doing the breathing techniques. [info] None [info] 1545779422
prider90 [info] I' m in the same boat mate. :( I've been diagnosed with anxiety.  Tried lots of supplements/meditation and no improvement.  Somehow I always remember music lyrics or gaming competition tasks/challenges but I forget simple things and having a hard time to remember things people told me.&amp;#x200B; [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1538668641
jhennesy [info] I don't know how much it relates to your story, but about four years ago I lost 30 pounds, and had an oddly negative reaction to the compliments I was getting. I didn't feel that comfortable on my body, so the encouragement didn't feel like it was really about me feeling good, but rather just society's mess about weight. I didn't have issues eating (except one week when I was in a really bad mental state), but I was having panic attacks that moved to the point of my throwing up about once a week. At some point, I realized that's what they were, and got in to see a doctor about it. In my case, I was diagnosed with anxiety and given some medication to help. Once I understood the anxiety, I was able to deal with the panic attacks better. I'd definitely recommend getting in to a doctor or a therapist. I've now been off the medication for about two and a half years, and from better understanding I haven't thrown up from a panic attack in over two. I'm unfortunately almost back up to the weight I was before, but I hadn't originally tried to lose weight (turns out, having your digestive system shut down will do that to you). I also haven't tried to maintain that weight loss. But my mental health is so much better now.  [info] None [info] 1371300784
applepiecheetah [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety (generalized anxiety disorder) for a lot longer than I've been smoking. I'm not sure about certain strains or anything specific like that but overall I don't feel more, or less, anxious. Personally my anxiety doesn't get better or worse when I smoke. [info] None [info] 1500455975
oodles420 [info] Is it just me, or does Sean Spicer strike you as an empathetic being with a big heart? I hope this is the right place for this post. I apologize in advance for the length of this, and also for the possible grammatical errors.The following is my own opinion:It seems as if Sean Spicer's position does not suite him well (his suits don't fit him well either lol (pun intended)). Anyway, when I watch him speak, I can easily see that he is tense and also speaks with a defensive tone. However, watching him speak for the past few months has made me wonder a few things, and I would like to know your personal opinions about Sean.I believe that in real life, he is a person with a very big heart, and has the ability to feel empathy. Which is very different from the rest of Trump's cabinet, and others close to Trump (as far as I can tell, but I could be very wrong). Right off the bat, I noticed he was very different.In my own life, I was diagnosed with anxiety (Generalized Anxiety Disorder) at age 8, and have been living with it, embracing it, and have helped others with it. Due to this, I am usually very good at sensing when people are experiencing even the slightest of anxiety. To me, Sean Spicer gives off this vibe, yet at the same time I feel that he really tries to do his best. Although, more recently I feel he is becoming fed up with his job. Trump has been in office for over 50 days so far, and it sure has been a hell of a roller coaster ride, so I could understand if Sean is fed up with it all.I see the bracelet he wears (the rainbow colored one) which says "DAD" in the middle of it. According to what I have read online, his children made this bracelet for him. The fact that he wears this everywhere (especially the fact that he is not afraid of being seen with rainbow colors, which for some I assume could be misleading if they didn't notice the "DAD" on the bracelet) is extremely heartwarming and comforting. He is genuine in this way. He also may not spending nearly as much time with his children as he did before the Trump era. He probably misses them very much, and the bracelet is a piece of their heart he wears. In regards to what he has said during press conferences, do you believe his statements to be his true opinions and feelings? Or do you feel that he is only protecting the presidents credibility because he fears losing his job? I can't help but think of the saying "don't kill the messenger", for he gives off the vibe that he would love to say that to the press. I have this funny feeling there is a whole other side to Sean that we do not see. For my last comment, the fact that he was once the "White House Easter Bunny" is pretty awesome, and I'm hoping he does it again this year (99% sure it won't happen though lol).I know that the above may not be entirely true, for most of what I wrote is my own opinion. Please correct me with sources, if necessary. Again, I apologize for the length of this and thank you for reading :)TL;DR: Sean Spicer may actually be a kind-hearted individual who may have had no idea what he was walking into when accepting his position as the White House press secretary and communications director. Edit: I posted this with absolutely no incentive to bash the Trump presidency. This post is meant to be ONLY in regards to Sean Spicer. [info] None [info] 1490127930
TheFlood58 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and put on Seroquel. I felt like a zombie all the time. I was never worried about anything but I also wasn't happy, sad, angry, etc... just numb. Started smoking weed now it's not an issue. [info] None [info] 1504393380
JohnLockeN7 [info] If I could just EFing sleep... I just spent ANOTHER 9 hours laying in bed, not sleeping for a single SECOND. No half sleeping or finally falling asleep for a measly 3 hours of sleep. NOT ONE DAMN SECOND.For whatever reason, all I can do is worry before work. The job isn't even really stressful. But for some ungodly reason, simply needing to be at work on time with all my equipment just makes me worry endlessly.I've been diagnosed with anxiety for the abuse I suffered as a kid. I've been through the Army and all that. Been in burning buildings. All that shit. None of what should ACTUALLY be stressful is stressful. Just stupid ass shit like what people think of me or something. It's MADDENING. WHY CAN'T I JUST SLEEP. Being fucking ultra sleep deprived makes everything so much WORSE. [info] None [info] 1548677716
SoftBluePetal [info] Rash on had for weeks 21, female, 168cm and 61kg. Only take contraceptive pills, smoke occasionally, no drug use, have been diagnosed by a psychiatrist with anxiety I have a rash on my palm. that seems like it could be ring worm. It started as one dot and slowly got bigger. Now it's dry and redish on the inside with little spots in a C shape around it. But it doesn't look like the Google pictures, it's not really super red or anything.My scalp has also been quite itchy lately, and apparently that's a sign too. (it itched before I googled it so it's not made up) sometimes I can see some blood if I scratch my head a bit too much I tried putting clotrimazole 1% on it twice a day, morning and evening but it doesn't seem to help. As you can see, I am diagnosed with anxiety soo I'm scared I have some type of skin cancer. But I know some kind of infection is more likely. Thanks for the help [info] User Not Verified [info] 1575155699
shfiven [info] Hey, you, drink as much ginger tea as you can stomach for the next week! It did wonders for my chronically inflamed lungs. I was diagnosed with anxiety when it turns out the anxiety was a byproduct of the athsma. Ginger cleared up my lungs better than steroids and Albuterol combined. I read somewhere that it's being studied for use in inhalers because it has fewer side effects.  [info] None [info] 1526699062
Mispict [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1524468204
mrsmarycrawley13 [info] Hugs, mama. I was diagnosed with anxiety years before becoming pregnant, but it was mild and I hated the meds so I got a pet instead which helped. I had my baby last August and literally just last night admitted to myself and my husband that I've got PPD/PPA. I think if you're already predisposed to these types of conditions, the hormones can make them so so so much worse postpartum. You're definitely not alone. Like others have said, seek out counseling and please talk to your OB so they can prescribe/adjust your meds. PPD isn't just not connecting with your baby. It's different for everyone. Good luck, mama. You've got this. [info] None [info] 1497996900
PM_ME_FOLIAGE [info] I spent three years hiding in my apartment and then moved to Manhattan. I spent three years in an apartment only going outside for food and other necessities. I played video games all day and watched youtube videos and made art. Minimal social interaction. I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 13. This past December, I got an email from a creative director at a NYC advertising agency out of the blue and he offered me an internship based on some of the art I posted online.I flew out there and finished the internship. I was scared shitless on the plane and leading up to the whole thing. But I did it. I fucking did it. I was in the busiest, loudest, most faced pased city in America. I had to ride the subway packed full of hundreds of people. I had to interact with producers and directors. I had deadlines.Somehow, somewhere the courage to accomplish this task was deep inside of me. And I just want to say if I can do it, you can do it. It's possible. Things do change. You are not forever trapped in your anxiety. My challenge for you today is to get out of your comfort zone. Try something new. Try something different. Even if it's the smallest thing you can think of. Try it. You will be suprised what the human brain is capable of.I hope I inspired at least one of you today. If it did, posting my story has been a success. Good luck to you. You can do it.edit: Thank you for all the kind words. Was not expecting this response. It makes me want to continue doing what I'm doing. :) Thank you! [info] None [info] 1527271146
Jake257 [info] Mate this is pretty much how i feel. I've been diagnosed with anxiety but think it's something more than that. [info] None [info] 1403433225
Gartles-eth [info] I was making good progress and then I fell apart. Hey there, me and my ex broke up about 1 month ago today. It was a very close relationship, we spent almost all our time together and we shared a flat together. She herself wanted the constant contact, she would complain if I had a bath for too long and she never gave me time to do what I liked.She wanted to text all the time, when we were not in university. I love her and I love her family and it's so hard to deal with.It perplexes me how she wanted to go from this to wanting to leave. This is what happened though, it took me by shock because I was saving up for an engagement ring and she told me she wanted that. She'd always talk about our future.I constantly contacted her just after the break up, I missed the constant contact and assurance, I missed her telling me she loved me or the nickname's we called each other.I was diagnosed with anxiety problems and was given medication and have tried meditation. I've been working out too, which helps.I went about a week of no contact and I probably felt much better. On sunday she gave a game of mine back, I didn't see her face though and it was probably her dad that put it through the letterbox. I saw a picture of her on Facebook too, she looked beautiful and was happy and since then I've constantly contacted her, I've begged for her to come back it's complete desperation and pathetic. My anxiety is completely off the charts at the moment. Hopefully with a number that showed how well I was doing it would help me.P.S. I just need to be helped out of the rut i'm in now. She clearly wasn't the right person for me, I just need to see it. [info] 107 days [info] 1431021209
purple_turtle16 [info] Always On The Edge I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder back when I was a sophomore in high school (about 8 years ago). I remember it was July and I was in my room and all of a sudden I was hyperventilating and I started to get all dizzy. At that moment I thought I was going to die. My parents quickly drove me to the emergency room, and waited for about an hour or two before I was seen. After talking to the doctor about what I was experiencing,  she concluded that I was having a panic attack and I should seek a therapist to talk about how to cope with it. Since then I went to the normal meetings with my therapist, but eventually stopped because my mom couldn't afford it anymore. I was doing okay my junior year of high school, didn't have any trouble at all. Then Senior year came, and since then my anxiety has been through the roof. I would get panic attacks at work, going out with friends, even at home just hanging out. I've gone in and out of therapy since I moved out about 5 years ago. Nothing seems to help. I refuse to take medication. I constantly think to my self "Why can't I be normal" Why was I made this way" "I hate myself for being like this" and so on. This past year I started to realize that I've had panic attacks before that incident my sophomore year, I just didn't know what it was at the time. Farthest back I remember having one was probably when I was about 7 or 8. I was sleeping over at my cousins house and I stared to feel chest pains, and shortness of breath, my parents had to come pick me up, I felt better after seeing them pull up in the driveway. (separation anxiety maybe?) Also, I was probably about 9 or 10 and I recall crying because I was having trouble breathing, and everything just felt so heavy, not sure how to explain it, but everything I felt back then I feel almost everyday now. I remember not being able to focus in middle school because I was always on the edge. Especially during tests. I would always have a panic attack during a test, which ended up with me guessing on all the answers just so I can turn it in and get it over with. Sorry this is all over the place. Living with this disorder sucks. Sometimes I think about taking medications hoping it will make things all better, but i'm also afraid that it will make things worse than it is now. [info] None [info] 1541710899
09cjones1 [info] Sometimes it can be situational - I've been diagnosed with anxiety when a lot of it was my situation.  Is there anything you can do about the working situation?  And while meds aren't for everybody, I still think anybody can benefit from therapy. [info] None [info] 1454450191
Jacobmarksman275 [info] Please tell me it gets better: Existential Crisis OCD/Derealization Hey guys. I am 24 years old, have an amazing 7 month old daughter and a beautiful fiancé. I was diagnosed with anxiety, panic disorder, and OCD when I was 9. I have had various themes over the years but for the past 6 months I had a clean slate! I was working so much and living a great life! I even was able to drink almost every night without getting anxiety the next day (Not binge drinking and the fact I was ABLE to drink almost every night was a huge accomplishment). Then quarantine happened. It was alright, then my OCD got mild, and now it’s full blown. My theme now is the question: “Where did we come from? What is the point of life?” Even if you’re an atheist please understand (almost in tears) Christianity has been a huge part of my life and my cornerstone when all these questions happened. Also I am having derealization where I feel like I am losing control and I am about to go insane. Has anyone who has gone through this theme help me? I am about to cry my eyes out to think my daughter may never know her father because he lost his mind. [info] None [info] 1587945556
RenderingTheVoid [info] How would you convince someone with hypochondriasis that Keto is safe? Ever since I've been diagnosed with anxiety I worry about everything health related. I really want to lose weight but I have read there might be some health effects associated with this diet. Could anyone reassure me that there are no detrimental health effects? [info] None [info] 1428715684
ScarletSweater8 [info] How to heal after emotional abuse from a stepparent. I need advice about moving on with my life 6 months after my stepdad left. This is a huge ramble, so please forgive the incoherency. My mom's boyfriend moved in with us when I was in the fourth grade and was in a relationship with my mom until the end of last year, when I was 17. My He was nice at first, but soon there would be moments where malice would creep in. During the occasional fight, he would jump to calling my mom the c word and my dad a f****t. My mom had anxiety, and he would crack jokes at her expense, calling her neurotic and crazy, leaving me to reflect on whether or not I was crazy too, because I was diagnosed with anxiety. Once when I texted him about when he was coming home from a night at work, he texted me saying that he didn't give a damn about any of our problems before later picking up dinner for us. My mom took the brunt of it, and he actually convinced her that he could do everything for her, and controlled paying the bills (with her money of course) and even convinced her that he had to be the person to correct her work (she's a medical professional and he's nothing of the sort). My mom finally kicked him out 6 months ago after she read on Christmas his text messages with another woman, and also saw that in a message to his son he'd called her a c*nt.Anyways, after the split, i realized that it was emotional abuse. For the next week I stayed up at night, to make sure he wouldn't come back. I kept replaying in my head crucial moments. I sought counselling and realized that it was truly abused. I helped my mom put her life back together and she's even starting to date again, casually, after believing before that she wasn't desirable.However, I still have some stuff I need to deal with. Im still uncomfortable with most men, and can't fathom dating one, lest they turn out like him. I had a dream about my stepdad yesterday that brought me back to the walking on eggshells and feeling helpless. I still have a lot of anger too, like when I reflect on newly learned info like how he would take money out of my sister and I's account, without telling my mom, even if it was for stuff for us. And how he never said he was sorry. What I'm trying to say is, will I ever get over this? Will I turn out to be abusive? I just wanted to get this out of my system. [info] None [info] 1501186887
thumpitythump [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety after a 12+ hrs panic attack with those same waves you describe, she said panic attacks are similar to a jack-in-the-box.  They're harder to recover from once one has popped out.  Medication made all the difference for me.  Be kind to yourself.  Adrenaline and cortisol are very hard on you. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1537483785
julcarls [info] I'm so so sorry you went through that. I can relate slightly, though my illness truly is "in my head." I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder 2 years ago. Basically my body goes into fight or flight mode for no reason at all or if I get too excited watching a movie or something normal. It's very, very irritating and it caused me to be suicidal. Six months after my diagnosis, my husband and I had a mild argument and I started to panic hard. He proceeded to tell me how "convenient" it was that I was having a massive panic attack following an argument and that I was probably faking for his affections. That hurt so badly. I will never forget it. He has since apologized and always comforts me when I have attacks. I understand his point of view because he literally can't see my heart rate ascend 100 more bpm or my vision going haywire or my lungs taking in less air. He can't see that I feel like I'm having a heart attack. He knows it's not convenient in the least for me. I was able to forgive him because of his continued support. [info] None [info] 1568984538
silver_soul [info] That is almost exactly how my trochotillomania started when I was around 5 or 6. I had no eyelashes until I was about 9. Vanity is the only thing that made me stop. It was very soothing, but I wish my parents had chosen therapy for me in retrospect. (I was diagnosed with anxiety as a teenager, and I think the trich was a symptom.) If he doesn't let them grow back (it feels so good to pull stubby lashes out!), please mention trich to his doctor and get him in some kind of behavioral treatment. I was made fun of a lot and I cringe at photos of me as a kid because of my lack of eyelashes. [info] None [info] 1423457059
nyx1047 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I have quit my job due to it. I have tried to change careers by trying to study further but whenever I try I always end up in a constant anciety and panic state. After a few years of that I am trying to start a business. My question is, does my aversion to employment (extreme aversion to the accountant work as i graduated accountancy), and my reactìons to further studies, caused by my anxiety (which I think is the possible future stress that I think I cant handle) or is it because I don't like them at all the anxiety is just the way my body and mind reacts to remind me of it?How will I determine my own thoughts from thoughts generated because of anxiety? Thank you. [info] None [info] 1515726731
Mysticwolf1999 [info] Once when I was a kid, I was diagnosed with anxiety (I still have it today) and I was sleeping alone for once. My biggest fear would be death, I can't stand to go to see people lifeless bodies in caskets, it scares me. Anyway I had finally passed out until my dream was about me and my dad driving down a highway, I turned and said "dad the guys are-" right as I said that, I heard a gun shot. We panicked and went back to our old appointment and we stayed there, until we decided to try to escape. What ended up happening was I got shot in the back and fell, my dad left me and I was left there to die, I woke up screaming. Let's just say I didn't have proper sleep and nor did I go to school that week heh :) [info] None [info] 1481385038
SecretBlogon [info] I have had some sleep disrupted before. But It's pretty rare. And I have been diagnosed with anxiety. My body just happens to love sleep way more than my brain loves panicking over shit. [info] None [info] 1444100273
CyberCrap [info] I'm so tired. I cant with my anxiety anymore.Ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago I feel like it's been getting worse, I swear sometimes I feel as if I cant even breath right, I'm so scared to just even go to sleep cause I fear not waking up, I have to wait till I'm so tired that I can't even think to go to sleep. Recently just even throwing up from eating something that was bad makes me scared for my life even though I accept that it's nothing. Being alone scares the shit out me, at school my anxiety attacks would be cured by my friends but since moving that hasn't been an option and I'm not the best at making friends. Sometimes I think things are happening that really aren't. I try to distract my self but it only works for a bit, I just want to be able to live and fall asleep without worrying excessively, and be able to watch or read the news without having a panic attack because I think the world is ending. I just wanna be able to do things. And focus on school and my dreams. I haven't been to a therapist since I got diagnosed but I plan to see one as soon as school starts. tl:dr, my anxiety is really bad recently and I just wanna cry. [info] None [info] 1566792686
antiqueguy19001 [info] Thanks for the very helpful post! It helped a lot reading this, thanks for typing it all out. Anxiety has plagued me my whole life, even at age 5 I didn't leave my house for weeks, scared that the planets would fall! I don't get as many all-out panic attacks anymore (though still some small ones more often), but the constant anxiety that I get about most things is very bad. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was younger, and want to see a therapist for it, but am scared that they will find a whole new problem with me. My parents told me that I should definitely see one anyway though, because it will make me feel a lot better to deal with my anxiety.As for my lymphoma worry, in the year that I didn't pay any attention to any larger nodes, I didn't worry once, or even feel any swollen nodes. It seems like my anxiety seems to get worse towards the end of the year anyway though, as the days get shorter and colder. I was a little relieved today when I read in many places that follicular lymphoma (the type I have been the most scared about), doesn't occur in it's normal form in people under 20 or 30, only a pediatric version (which is highly curable in almost all cases, unlike the normal follicular lymphoma, which occurs almost only in age 50 or older and is tougher to treat), and even then is only diagnosed around 25 times a year (which I said before). When my anxiety really gets bad though, I will be completely convinced I am one of those people. Luckily my dad made me feel better by showing my a rather large neck node he has had for decades that has been fine, and before he gained a lot of weight, says that he also could feel plenty of groin nodes too. My mom also has some rather large lymph nodes on her armpit which aren't cancer either.I am generally always at my happiest when I don't think about all the things I can't control that could go wrong, such as getting randomly killed by a murderer or drunk driver while walking on the street, or in this case cancer. Most of the time though I am forgetting about all the things that could go wrong, and enjoying myself biking, hiking and overall doing fun activities. It seems like it is late a night when I have most of my worst anxiety. I have never smoked or drank alcohol (or any other drug for that matter), not wanting to risk my health in a preventable way, a more positive side effect of anxiety I guess.Thanks again for the great reply!&amp;#x200B; [info] None [info] 1542253010
shayna19 [info] New to r/narcolepsy So, I'm new to reddit, and even newer to r/narcolepsy.  I have been officially diagnosed with narcolepsy without cataplexy since Fall 2009, and discharged from the Marine Corps because of it.  I used to be a very energetic and happy person, then while in boot camp, I just started getting tired.  I even fell asleep on 2+ marches...  while marching.  Since then, I've had my ups and downs.  I never knew what was wrong with me, and everybody just figured I was "another broke-ass/faking/lazy female Marine."  I worked my ass off and got pretty good at faking awake and pushing through tired.  I was diagnosed with anxiety around 2007/2008 while in military language training, and they tried telling me I was depressed, too.  But I wasn't sad, just stressed out of my mind so much that I couldn't do anything but stress more and cry...  And cry I did, mostly after drinking myself silly because I didn't want to be stressed anymore.  My weight went up and down as I downed sugar and caffeine to try and stay awake and keep up with all the "normal" people.  Then, while training in Germany for deployment, I fell asleep for a split second while driving on the autoban with a car full of people with me.  I handed over my keys and went to medical (again) to figure out what the hell was wrong with me before I got deployed and hurt myself or others.  They put me through all the tests: poking, prodding, speculating, making me feel like a was faking it, etc...  Finally, a doctor ordered a sleep study for narcolepsy.  I finished it two days before I came back to the states and had to wait for the results while on a different training mission in the field.  During all this time, I was a monster.  I hated everything and everyone.  Then I got the results of my overnight + MSLT: Narcolepsy.  I got kicked off my deployment and sent to the shame-box of military, which is basically receptionist, while the military figured out what to do with me.  In the mean-time, 1/2 the doctors I see tell me I have narcolepsy, 1/2 say there's SOMETHING wrong, but they don't know what.  But they just keep treating me for narcolepsy...  or like a liar.A year later, they discharge me at 10% disabled.  I'm not good enough for the military, but I'm not "really" broken?  Thank you for the kick in the face.  I get out, find out I'm also pregnant with my recently-deployed boyfriend's kid, and move myself back to NM.  I am then diagnosed with Hypothyroidism.  (Surprisingly, this is the short, edited version!)Fast-forward (TLDR:), Anxiety, Narcolepsy, Hypothyroidism, full-time student with a full-time student fiance/husband, and a toddler daughter.  I'm tired.  I'm stressed. I'm BROKEN.  I'm tired of drugs.  What do I do?  And if anyone has questions, feel free to ask.P.S.  I love that r/narcolepsy exists!  I'm not alone! [info] None [info] 1359269854
TrashItAndGo [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety repeatedly from the fourth grade onward. Growing up, I was put into an extra-help/resource class so that I could focus on schoolwork and not be stressed out. I didn't know this, of course, because my parents didn't want me using my emotional disorder as a crutch later in life. SO being a student in a class for learning disabilities while simultaneously not knowing what disability I had really hurt my confidence. Mind you, I never assumed my classmates in the class lacked intelligence. Their disabilities were usually minor and only affected them in very specific ways (EX: dyslexia or a speech impediment). Now, I'm a very socially and emotionally damaged adult. I struggle talking to people because I assume that they'll think I'm stupid. I even started school at a prestigious university just to convince myself that I am, at the very least, bare-bones average in terms of my intelligence. It never helped. [info] None [info] 1551067127
bllooi [info] M17, Diagnosed with anxiety, parents wont let me go on meds or go back to the doctor. Hey, I'm M17 and as of late I was diagnosed with anxiety after I had a panic attack and fainted. As I fainted I fell and broke the balusters of a staircase and fell about 2 meters to the ground below me, I fractured my sternum and had to be transported to the hospital. With my injuries and the circumstances of the incident itself, I was put on an ECG for about 48 hours and when they found no problems with my heart,  they decided to transfer me to become an out patient. As an out patient I went through a series of tests that led me to understand that I had experienced vasovagal syncope. The doctors that monitored me going into a panic attack as they strapped me into the turn table test. This then led to me being diagnosed as having anxiety. The most likely cause, as explained by the doctor was that I was stressing too much over my school work and examinations. I told him the night before that I slept at about 3 am after studying for my programming finals. Long story short, after this my parents oddly didn't want me to continue seeing these doctors or continuing my time as an out patient so I stopped. I came back home from England after my exams (the place where I study) and they pulled me out of the university, and instead is making me go to another country, Australia or America. And now with the moving and all, with my recent breakup and getting back together with a significant other, and having to be so far away from her I broke down and I had another panic attack in front of my mother. She thought I had a heart attack and I'm so scared of it happening again. I find it really hard to not stop studying and I'm just so constantly worried about my grades and just when I don't have a grip on something I get so so aggravated and I don't know what to do. I need help, due to my circumstances and my age, my parents really don't want me to go to a doctor as our culture just makes mental issues seem stupid. They believe it'll bring great shame and that I'll just be bullied more than I already have been. (I've had a history of it). I need help in just recommendations on what to do when I do get a panic attack as I really find it scary. I really don't know what to do and a reply or suggestion on how to calm myself down or anything would be appreciated. Thanks. TL:DR: my parents won't allow me to go to a doctor to help with my issues and I need recommendations on how to cope. [info] None [info] 1474742110
lolafh [info] Haha. What is happening to me. Hey OCD sub, I’m a first time poster here because what’s happened to me is... strange. Warning: I do not know shit about brains or how they work so... bare with me? A few years ago I was diagnosed with OCD (early teens), but I found a remedy and it sort of... went away. For years. By remedy I just mean completely ignoring everything (to be fair, I was 11 or 12). Then at 13 I was diagnosed with anxiety and honestly now looking back on it (it being my “anxious thoughts” up until about a week or so ago) that might have been just very lowkey obsessions. Now, as I said earlier, about a week ago the hardcore obsessions have come back and in a big way. I had to miss school because it was so bad the other day. I’m attempting to get it under control and it’s only sort of working. I keep myself occupied during the day but when I get into bed at night they come flooding in and I’m paralyzed by my own mind. I’m willing to go back to therapy but I have a super packed schedule as an overloaded high schooler with too many extra curriculars I tried to ask my parents about online therapy but it’s too pricey. (Side note: did you know Talkspace is 35 dollars A WEEK???? Who can afford that??) I’m sorry this is rambley, I just wanted to get the story of my situation out. Any comments are accepted, just please don’t be mean. [info] None [info] 1541303575
Swaggy_splashy [info] Hi I am new here. This sub is awesome. I am on day 10 I’ve been struggling for the last 5 years. I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder then. Also was diagnosed with benign twitching syndrome at age 14. I tried an early recovery group aa, naltrexone. Couldn’t stay sober more than five days. Now thanks to my family and another dose of pancreatitis. Yes another. I am at day 10 and am finally feeling normal again. Still some night sweats but the anxiety and twitching I masked with alcohol, the rebound was always worst making me drink again soon after work. It feels good, and you are all an inspiration. Thank you all and good luck. [info] 22 days [info] 1542171387
Tmh1988 [info] OCD has all but ruined my life and my relationship I've been with my partner almost 10 years. For those years my OCD was in remission. Late last year I had a mental breakdown. Ended up in hospital voluntairily because I believed I was going psychotic or schizophrenic and would in turn harm someone I love, like my 2 children. I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. My partner didn't cope well. Said I needed to pull my shit together, get over it or I'd end up a dribling mess in an institution.Intrusive thoughts and the fear of going crazy had me on the brink of suicide. Benzos 3 times a day is the only thing keeping me functioning at the moment. I'm pregnant but wish for a termination. I'm not mentally well enough to go through with this pregnancy so soon after my relapse. I still struggle daily. Add on top of that my fear of post natal psychosis.My partner is calling me a murderer and said he will never forgive me. 3 months ago I was mentally well, if it were 3 months ago I would be so happy to be pregnant. But I'm not well, and I can't do it. My relationship is ruined, as is my prospect of being a mother again.I hate OCD [info] None [info] 1549267534
Servalpur [info] You're right, I didn't word that correctly at all. Where I said "sane", I should have said "capable". Generally when people hear the phrase mental illness, they automatically link to the capability of the person. I'm guilty of it too, even though I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders, a form of mental illness.That said, my point was that if this witch was capable of producing a potion or spell which could bend the will of someone to fit her wishes, she was also capable of creating some kind of life for herself and her son. [info] None [info] 1478126828
SociopathTendencies [info] Throwaway. I was diagnosed as a sociopath at the age of 12... two years before that, I was diagnosed with anxiety-induced Obsessive Compulsive Disorder at the age of 10.When I was little my parents told me that I would always obsess over small things; things ranging from dead animals to how clean my room was. At 6 I had a massive meltdown because my mother re-arranged my room while I was at school. I would also have little complsions that I had to preform before I left the house each day. I also had a very sick facination with death. When I was 7 I remember watching a bird that was hit by a truck die in the street. When I became a little older, my parents noticed that I started showing more positive signs of being a Sociopath. I had excellent lying skills- so good that I was beginning to believe that my lies were real. I didn't grasp the concept of human relationships- I hated being held or hugged. However, family members disregarded this because of my "charm", which was really superficial. By the time I was 12 I was fully engrossed into my disorder, and that's when my parents noticed. I was sent to therapy to help calm my urges to manipulate people, and it helped somewhat, but I still don't fully grasp the function of human connection. I have friends that know of my disorder... to my knowledge, it doesn't bother them. They call me out when I'm trying to spit out false claims or notice when I'm being manipulative. It's hard sometimes because all I can feel about is plunging a knife into their throat when they call me out, but its for the best. I know that killing them would be wrong, so I don't preform the action.  [info] None [info] 1379888068
fsuchin [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety earlier this year which is a big no no if i wanted to pursue a career in actuarial science. I have IBS too so that makes things even worse. The thing that’s helping me right now is trying out a whole practice exam in 3-hours and getting a good score. That usually boosts my self-esteem. I realize that I get more anxious when I know that I’m not making progress so I try to make “small victories”. I would take custom quizzes on ADAPT when I find myself in a rut before taking another practice exam. I suggest finding your “trigger”. I know now that when I see that the numbers on the screen are not what i want, I try to not let it get to me otherwise I get into a depressed state, and once I’m out of it, I realize I just wasted a bunch of time being sad, and anxiety comes bustin’ at my door. So instead of whining, I put the difficulty slightly lower and work my way up. I know this requires you having ADAPT but maybe try doing this for the SOA test bank. Set a goal like finish 10 questions in 50 minutes or less. If you don’t do it, don’t let it bum you out. Lighten the load and don’t forget to take a breather!  [info] None [info] 1533542998
sigbox [info] You're acting as though all anxiety is the same.I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and yet, I'm capable of interacting with people normally on a day to day basis and it's quite manageable. Every single person is different. [info] Toronto Blue Jays [info] 1498325518
TheLadyOfLiteracy [info] I have the same fear of throwing up in public, it's a serious phobia and I often feel paralyzed by it.  But is it actual nausea, or is it just anxiety?  I remember having to sit in class before I was diagnosed with anxiety, and when I got waves of nausea and dizzyness I thought I was physically ill with a virus or something, I didn't realize anxiety could manifest itself so strongly in physical ways. [info] None [info] 1397702968
MoistTowlette19 [info] Looking for a sample of Jack Herer in San Diego/SoCal I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD. I have exhausted all my options. Various forms of therapy, drugs, hypnosis, exercise and diet, vitamins. I don't smoke weed and haven't in about 10 years, but I would like to try it. I hear the Jack Herer strain is amazing for PTSD and anxiety. I just want to try it and see if it works for me. Thanks. [info] None [info] 1435527046
MemeGoddessAsteria [info] Oef 2 is the lie I have two cats ones named Apollo ones named Salem for 1 I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder at age 10 and for 3 once a astrology hoe always a astrology hoe [info] :S3Hange: [info] 1564958750
olioster [info] Thank you for the reply. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so this makes sense. Research time! [info] None [info] 1528914014
jamiewoodson [info] My dad keeps bringing up my weight and I'm starting to hate myself So pretty much everything my dad says my brain believes for some stupid reason, if he says I'm good at something I think in good at it. If he says I'm going to gain weight and become unhealthy, I will believe it. I have an extremely high metabolism, I have to eat a lot or I get really hungry and angry. But he always brings up weight. And that annoys me so much because it really shows he doesnt care about my mental health. For 2 years I've been diagnosed with anxiety, he just thinks it's my phone and non existent bullies. My wide face from my bone structure is already my biggest insecurity and now you're telling me I'm going to get fatter and unhealthier. He also hates being told he's wrong and loves to push me around. I cant keep dealing with a dad that tells me I'm fat all the time, I'm even starting to believe it when I'm pretty much completely bone already [info] None [info] 1583086703
mhmmmm431 [info] Advice on overcoming sinful habits? I'm not yet a Catholic but I am firmly committed to joining the church and will hopefully start RCIA classes this fall if everything goes according to plan. Before the shutdown I was able to attend mass once a week. I pray everyday and pray at least one decade of the rosary every night before bed. I feel very happy embracing the faith, reading, and learning more about it in order to become closer to Him and the church in which He established. This quarantine has not been terrible for my spiritual life in that I have much more time to read and grow a deeper understanding of the faith.I do have a problem though that has followed me since I was in my early teens. I'm in university and planning on becoming a teacher. I'm 21 now and growing up as an agnostic, unbaptized, and in an irreligious environment, I was told that porn and masturbation was comepletely normal and natural and that is actually GOOD for your mental and physical health in various ways. I know now that this is far from the truth. I have been trying to kick this habit and have been aware of its sinfulness for the last 9 months or so. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder. I admit my anxiety has become much more managable since coming to Christ and I have become better at resisting the temptation as it seems it only happens once every other week after I become anxious or panicked. I do repent and try and offer a fast as repentance. Has anyone experienced anything similar and have any advice? [info] None [info] 1588096081
AbrahamLure [info] Okay, this makes so much sense. I've been diagnosed with anxiety every doc I've been to, with off the chart scores of anxiety and have never understood why, I never "feel" anxiety and I have an unusually low BPM (45-55)One of my doctors theorised it's because I've spent so long in a highly volatile environment growing up that having constant anxiety in the background has been essential for survival, but boyyyy is it useless when working in an office. [info] None [info] 1565207623
walee1 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, and still haven't started therapy. Spent one of the most memorable birthdays of my life by spending it with an insanely smart person I highly respect in a gorgeous place. Had a lot of screw ups, followed by failed attempts to put myself out there in terms of dating. So, all in all, considering how the last year went, I would say it's going like normal? The bad sprinkled with the good. [info] None [info] 1564929815
Jack-da-crack [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 12 and now just recently developed panic attacks in my early 20s. Panic attacks are so awful, it's the feeling of impending doom and the sudden need to vomit.  I end up getting hives on my face and do end up vomiting if the panic attack is bad enough. I dread the next time I have another one. They can have my anxiety/ panic attacks, I hate people who proclaim it like its a badge of honor to show how your life sucks ass.  [info] None [info] 1553500328
sushi-suspect [info] I'm obviously no expert, but I agree, reading this did not give me an ADHD vibe. Though, I coped pretty well with mine for most of my life and did okay. OP, SHS psych diagnosed me with ADHD (inattentive type) last year and the med I was put on changed my life. I was diagnosed with anxiety as a teen, but it's not so bad that I medicate for it - though my anxiety spikes when my ADHD symptoms are heightened, they're intertwined for me. Controlling my ADHD controls my anxiety, but medicating for anxiety never controlled my ADHD.I was seeing my SHS GP who tried to manage my symptoms (treated me mostly for anxiety) for a few months, but he put in a psych referral for me the first time I saw him. My psychiatrist diagnosed me quickly, but said it was obvious. The wait list is pretty awful for psych so if you're looking into it I'd start ASAP, get on the list before the next school year starts. [info] None [info] 1565416643
Christ_on_a_Crakker [info] I have only taken it before I go to sleep so I wouldn’t know. I should try it for anxiety because I have been diagnosed with anxiety for a long time.  I have just learned to cope with it.   [info] None [info] 1545598109
HamHamPatchi [info] Is my mom an nmom/abusive? Okay, so I've grappled with this question a lot as of late and I'm honestly not sure how to answer it. I do love my mom; she's really been the only parental figure in my life because my dad is often out of the picture. I appreciate what she does for care with me.Background of me, I'm a straight-A student in highschool. I'm on the spectrum and I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and major depressive disorder since I was 9 years old. I don't have any drug habits but I have an eating disorder and have struggled with it since I was in 6th grade. This in particular has caused a lot of tension with my mom.My mom was always a bit overbearing and kinda like a helicopter parent. Even to this day when I ask politely for independence in completing a task, she won't let me do a lot of things on my own. When I was little and even to this day, I refused to let her know about what homework I had because I just wanted to get it done on my own. If she knew about it, she would be jumping all over me and criticizing me for my work. She has control of both my work/professional email and my school email, where I get sent assignments. She also has control of my debit card and my medical stuff. She brazenly takes out money from my debit just as well, even though I'm legally an adult and that's not fair.I think I can say I've been abused as a child. It was infrequent, but I would be hit and pushed. I believe the most recent time was about a year ago; when we were having a fight and I asked her to leave my room, she pushed me and I hit the floor and slammed my back against my dresser. But it happens so rarely that I feel like it's invalid to even call it abuse. I guess there's emotional abuse though. To give an example, I had a panic attack that I couldn't really get a handle on after she accused me of being bullimic. So she made me get in the car, although my grandma was fighting but her to stop being awful to me. She drove me around and stopped at a police station and almost dragged me out to bring me there. Nearby there was a hospital and she sat in the front saying to me, "you wanna go there huh? Be locked up in the ward to get pity?". It's a lot of stuff like that and just the usual screaming and name-calling. I get thrown the "ingrate" card a lot even though I don't really do anything to warrant it. I try to be unmoving and callous towards a lot of the things she says to make me upset, because she gets satisfaction from breaking people down it seems and will only stop when she gets that. That's when the "ungrateful bitch" card gets thrown mostly.As I said before, my mom has a lot of problems with my weight. I'm not morbidly obese and I'm in no way an invalid who does nothing. However she constantly shames my body and starts arguments with me over it. One of these scenes she causes actually happened last week, and I have an almost-full recording of the incident. She said things like "it's not like I'm calling you names" and "I just look at you and think 'what the fuck'?" and "god you look so awful and I can't do anything about it". Over the past few years I've implored her to stop having these roundabout conversations with me but she refuses to see it in that it's wrong. Having my own mom be disgusted with me really upsets me, because she's literally the only person who is or makes mean statements about my body, and she just shouldn't be that one person.Also, I caught her in a lie the other day. I recently lost my virginity with my long-time partner and I am of legal age of have those relations. So that was a huge incident when she found out. But the lie was that she promised she wouldn't tell her friends at work about it and me. But of course she did, and told them how she was threatening to throw me in a convent. While simultaneously telling me not to tell anyone about things that happen in our house or even talk to my therapist about her or things that happen. She actually wants to tell the therapist what she needs to talk about with me ugh. And I wanted to go on my own accord and I can't even have that People have commented to me that my house sounds scary to live in, but I thought this behavior was normal. What really got me thinking about all of this was that my partner told me very recently that when he looked at my body, he noticed I got really scared and defensive, like I was going to be scolded at. He said he could see how it all was affecting the way I think and act. I think that got to me. Sorry for ranting :( [info]  [info] 1521670971
twx37o [info] Thanks for posting OP, I had the same question.  This July will be exactly one year since I was diagnosed with anxiety so I’m hoping that’s all I need to get into the new program. Good luck to you, and I hope you feel better soon. [info] None [info] 1559750187
studentofserapis [info] I was born muslim and the rest of my family is completely muslim. I started to doubt Islam when Inwas confronted with the verse that claimed that Maryam the mother of Jesus is the sister of Haroon. This Haroon in jewish tradition has a sister called Maryam but is not the same as Maryam the mother of Jesus. To me it seemed like the people who wrote the Quran mixed them up and it would be impossible that the Quran is a divine revelation. After that I discovered more and more errors in the Quran.This was about three years ago. After that I ignored this problem and became full on religious. Until last year when I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and suffered from severe panic attacks and health anxiety. I got therapy and meds and I got better. The world seemed more clear to me and I decided not to waste my time on bs anymore. I couldn’t even make myself to believe in islam anymore. I studied evolution and thought it made complete sense.No one around me knows I left islam. It’s not really necessary. My family is muslim but not conservative and not strict. I can do whatever I want and I have no problems keeping my apostacy to myself. [info] New User [info] 1530283415
lilybear032 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and anorexia, when I really have Graves' disease. It got significantly worse early on in my pregnancy. I could have lost the baby because nobody ordered a simple blood draw.  [info] None [info] 1520466519
Thunderfin [info] This is me right now (though I am going to the weight room, I haven't been as productive work-wise).  I've been diagnosed with anxiety and use procrastination to ease my worries -- maybe you have something similar.The truth is, that voice won't go away.  Even for the most disciplined guys in the world, there's a voice inside their heads as they get out of bed at 5 am to workout, telling them to go back to sleep.Some things that have helped me are:-Have a to-do / goal list.  What do you want to accomplish immediately and/or in the next week.  What about the next month?  Type or write this out and make sure it's visible.  Another way to think about it: what are your goals?  Set yourself some deadlines.  Eg. I want to impress ____ or reach ____, and I have until ____ to reach it.  Obviously you ultimately should be doing things for yourself and not for external validation, but it's better to do this than nothing at all.-Have a rough schedule.  Make one the night before for the next day.  Include enough break time at the start, because it's very difficult to go from 0 to 100 just like that.-I haven't tried this, but get someone to hold you accountable.  Family member, friend, even someone random on this sub.  They'll message you every day at ____ telling you to get off your ass and start working.All the best man! [info] None [info] 1533181387
slimgunner [info] I normally sleep on my side. When I was young I did fall and hit my head but that was when I was 10. I noticed this sensation when I was 18. Not sure if it could be related but I have always been thinking that they have. I couldn’t really say what brings it on because it is pretty much constantly there, just depends how much I notice it. The pain is on top of my head and is always in the same spot. But no sensation in my neck. I do sometimes get tingling and numbness feelings in my body and arm. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I have seen psychologist previously so maybe some could be anxiety related. But if it was a brain tumour or ms, wouldn’t my symptoms be bit more severe considering I have had this for 4 years?  [info] None [info] 1553287904
thesilversound [info] I was recently diagnosed and almost all of the friends I’ve told were really surprised and didn’t believe it, which has been discouraging. To clarify: I have childhood trauma issues that intermingle with the ADHD, and so most of my friends were more so expecting me to tell them that I was diagnosed with anxiety or a trauma disorder (which I still think I have, on top of the ADHD). I am also in medical school and always did really well in high school and college (except for the higher level college classes that I couldn’t keep up with due to my inability to follow what the professor was saying or study for exams earlier than the day before the test). So everyone is skeptical that I have difficulty focusing on a daily basis.For the past month or so, I’ve been overcome by this compulsive urge to prove to myself that I actually do or don’t have ADHD, which has led me to spend hours and hours each night searching this subreddit, reading about ADHD, and talking about symptom-related memories and experiences to my friends and partner every single day. It’s been really exhausting and has been really draining for my partner as well, who is dealing with her own issues but always patiently listens to me spilling all of my stream of consciousness thoughts on to her.My dad also confronted me yesterday because he found out that I filled prescriptions for Adderall and Vyvanse. He gave me this lecture about how I should stop being angry and frustrated that I have trouble studying, because there’s no use to being angry, and that I should just accept that I might need to take more time than other people. He told me that everyone needs to just learn to live with their hardships in life and work with what they have. He said that he also is more disorganized than his coworkers and sleeps a lot (uh... yes, my whole family is like this, where does he think I get it from?) and that when I was younger, I always concentrated really well on drawing and reading (yes, because those were my favorite hobbies and I hyperfocused to the point that my mom banned me from reading fiction books up until I was 18) and that there’s nothing unusual about all that. And that he hopes that I don’t rely on the meds forever.So all in all, it’s been discouraging because for once in my life, I finally feel alert during the day and I finally have been able to sit down and do work without stressing about how I keep reading the same sentence over and over again. Tonight, I tried to watch a video for studying purposes after my meds wore off. I had forgotten what it was like to study before I was diagnosed. And I found that as soon as I sat down and clicked play, my brain immediately went into a sleepy trance and I was using all of my energy and willpower to redirect my attention, all while still missing stuff in between. I know that checking and rechecking your symptoms is not a healthy solution to doubting your diagnosis, but it’s what I’ve been turning to. All this to say, yes, the self doubt is a real struggle. [info] None [info] 1545615325
CantHugEveryPlatypus [info] Last friday, I was diagnosed with anxiety. Yesterday, I made it through the office christmas party without making a single excuse to go home early. Yay me! [info] wine is kind. wine is delicious. wine is important [info] 1449340791
pandaax3 [info] First time on lexapro and I'm scared sh*tless. I've been diagnosed with anxiety for 3 years now. It's been tough and I finally can't handle it anymore. So i went to seek professional help. My doctor prescribed me 5mg of lexapro everyday for 2 weeks. I'm scared sh*tless to take new anxiety med. I read so many reviews about this medication and so far, it doesn't look that great. I'm scared of the side effect and the withdrawls. Is it worth taking it? Should I give it a try? Has anyone taken this medication without side effects? Whats the percentages of people who actually get the side effect? [info] None [info] 1517897998
SuperHaunter [info] Every human being has mood swings now and then, it's completely normal. We all have a bad day or some stress that gets us and make us a mess. So please be gentle to yourself. You're awesome, laughs at yourself, you're out there to make friends and as an ENFP you might feel too much a lot of the time.Like you, I have mood swings as well. And I'm diagnosed with anxiety. Yes, anxiety can give you mood swings. But it's because you start building up your stress without letting it out becoming a constant state of fear and stress because of literally nothing. It's not being moody like a normal human being. It can even trigger a panic attack. It's the feeling something really terrible is about to happen even if everything is alright.Because I wanted to have better control of my panic attacks, I started to rationalize my feelings so I could understand whether I was feeling that emotion or I was absorbing it/building it up out of nowhere. That made me understand when it was my anxiety talking or me being a normal human being. Maybe that point of view helps you somehow.Now let's talk about your boyfriend. He needs to understand that, as a human being, it's normal to have mood swings. One moment we're ok and the next not so good. We have pet peeves. We get stressed. And he is supposed to support you even in your worst. I'm not saying anyone should support an abusive relationship (or that you're or him are abusive to each other), but he should be patient when you're not feeling that well. On the other hand, you also should be aware of your emotions and actions not to outburst at someone. Take your time out to chill and everything will be alright.What I mean is: don't beat yourself up on this but try to rationalize your feelings to identify what is actually going on. If it's something that triggered your anger or if it's just accumulated stress that you need to let go. And talk to your SO about it. You can't change who you are but you can understand yourself better to not use someone as an outlet to build up stress.You two can work things out perfectly if you both open up to understanding and no judgements, only love and support. And the best way to get this is talking to each other and being honest about your feelings even if your anger has no reason at all and you just need some time out. [info] ENFP [info] 1489586977
YT_BRAMZA [info] PLEASE help me with anxiety and mainly blushing Hey guys, so my name is Brandon, im 14 years of age.  When i was 12 (i think) I joined secondary school and at the end of the year in the summer Holidays we noticed a small Tumor in my cheek, because of that i have not been to school since year 8, im in year 10 now and have been at school for 2 weeks. The doctor found a cyst on the hard pallet. I have not been to school in 2 weeks... As its Sunday i need to go to school tmoz and im so nervous and worried about going in, i have a public speaking exam on Monday which i am nervous to do, i dont want to do it but i have to  because my teacher said its part of my GSCE.  When ever im talking to friends out side of class im perfectly fine and dont go red. When im in class and a teacher asks me a question i instantly go red. Say my maths teacher picked on me and asked me a question i would go red and i hate that.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and have a support working helping the school get of our backs.  My life is terrible, school is terrible, i just want to be normal. I'm Anxious to tell people about it, im not that kind of person.  My support working knows i have it along with my nan (i live with my nan). Even when my teacher calls out the register i go red, my life is terrible and i just want to be like everyone else. I just want to stop being anxious about going in tomorrow and stop going red.  I have spoken to my GP and they said they cant do anything about it [info] None [info] 1548011160
numbdemgumz [info] I have some mirtazipines and trazodones. I haven't even tried the mirtazipine. Might tonight. May mess with my taper schedule tho. My goal is come off sleeping pills all together. But then again I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder and sleep problems so maybe I'm shooting to high. I used to be able to enjoy myself with beers here and there. Maybe take a small dosage of a benzo if my anxiety flared up every couple weeks. I was able to live a life like that for a good 3 years after going through a hellish cold turkey withdrawal. Huge mistake that I started abusing these things again. [info] None [info] 1521239077
I_Am_Echo [info] Too Afraid To Talk To Friends. How Have Y'all Handled This? Hello everyone, quick about me, I guess. I was diagnosed with anxiety about two years ago and am on medication and working with a therapist. I have made lots of progress! But there are still some issues that I can't overcome just yet. For example, I have been living with my roommates for about two years now. We are all pretty close. And I am afraid of engaging with them socially one on one. I have had deep, meaningful conversations with them when we are in a group, but the idea of hanging out with them one on one scares the living hell out of me. My therapist and I are working on it. She has told me to try making myself more vulnerable and reminding myself that awkward won't kill me. So I've begun hanging out with them if they are playing video games to watch them and stuff like that. And it's slowly helping. But the main issue that I realized is affecting my life just happen ten minutes before I posted this. One of the people in our social group that see occasionally, not exactly a friend, but more than an acquaintance, just messaged me on social media making a playful and friendly joke about something I had just posted. I fucking froze at work. I typed a funny banter reply.And immediately closed out of the social media. With thoughts like, "Oh god, what do I do?" "I'll say something to make him feel uncomfortable." "Oh god, why is he messaging me??" It was like I was being interrogated for murder and not a casual friend making a joke. This is not normal. I literally cannot talk to friends. I am too afraid to reopen social media to check the reply.How do other people handle this issue? I will bring it up with my therapist, but I just want to not feel alone in my weird issue. [info] None [info] 1547666035
the_fallen_pineapple [info] My [M21] crush on a girl [F21] has left me confused and paranoid. So I met this girl (lets call her Suzy) around two years ago in Uni. We often interacted though it was mostly for class related things like Labs and assignments. All the while, I just enjoyed every moment I spent with her, but didn't flirt or anything of the sort. I haven't really dated anyone, so i don't know anything about 'the art' per se, and I didn't wan't to make her uncomfortable.Side note: I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ocd and am currently in treatment.Fast forward 9 months, she started dating a classmate of mine. Finding out about it messed me up a bit because I was actually going to confess to her. But the early bird gets the worm i suppose. I did talk to her about it and she said it was fine and she wasn't wierded out or anything. I saw them together for a year, and she seemed happy, so that was good enough I guess.Fast Forward  a year and i find out she had broken up with him a few months ago. During this time I was still in contact with her, though it was just the occasional 'wassup, how're things going type convo. So once I heard about this I got my hopes high again and that takes us to the present day.I was informed that Suzy's breakup was pretty toxic and she still is affected by it and her friends feel that she wouldn't reciprocate anything I do. My OCD has been kicking in and this is all I think about, night and day. Its reached the point where my academics are being affected. I don't wan't to lose her again (unless she straight up says no ofc). Also, she's not much of the texting type as far as i can tell. What can I do just to keep my mind calm? I am constantly scared of making anyone uncomfortable.Would it be appropriate if i ask her to hang out after class one day and just tell all?I appreciate any advice. [info] None [info] 1567007417
deepseadarkdoom [info] ELI5: What is OCD? Why does it occur and how is it treated? I was diagnosed with anxiety that has OCD traits. So I have pure-O. I was wondering if anyone could help me have a better understanding of it. My OCD manifests itself as suspicious of other people's actions and reassurance that their actions weren't malicious or whatever idea I have in my head and what I can do to help it. I'm taking prozac 40mg. [info] None [info] 1476725397
captaincupcake234 [info] Heya, I also read some of your other posts on here. This one really stuck out to me:&gt;Well for one I don't know what I want to do anymore. I was in nursing school when I had my injury but I look back and am like "why the hell would I want to be a nurse. I'm a jerk" lol but there are things I want to do, but I don't really know what I'm capable of doing.&gt;I'm just a completely different person than I was then. Although I still relate to a lot of nurses and nursing students.&gt;Secondly, my friends all either graduated college or moved away. I've tried reaching out but I just don't feel relatable with them anymore and they most likely feel the same about me. I'll be real.&gt;There just feels like a whole lot of bs in my way and I don't know how to fix it.Six years ago I was in a sort of similar spot as you, so I'm going to post my story. It's really long so you don't have to read it. I'm hoping you can glean something out of it if you do read it. All I want to do is help, maybe provide some advice because when I was going through my ordeal, I wish there was someone who could have been at my side for me. Anyway, I was in my 3th year of undergrad as a microbiology major. My goal was to get to medical school but I wasn't feeling it. All of my life my parents and family (I'm Korean-American) told me I had to become a doctor so it was ingrained inside of my mind that I needed to become a doctor. Becoming a doctor also resonated with my love for helping people. At the time my ultimate goal was to work establish a Doctor's Without Borders presence in North Korea (where I'm pretty sure lost parts of my family still reside, they were separated during the Korean War). From age 13 to 21 I dedicated my life to taking pre-med classes (like chem, calc, physics, ALL the Biology), making pre-med students (yes even in HS). I read books on becoming a doctor, watched TV shows on doctors, etc. When I began undergrad this feeling started to wear off. I hated all of my pre-med classes, I didn't know why I had to slave through them. I began to fail all of them. My pre-med friends were soaring through these classes and I didn't understand how they were doing it. My pre-med friends somehow got jobs at biology labs and were excelling at them (some even got published as early as their junior year). I began to ask myself "do I really want to become a doctor? Or was it something forced on me? If I don't become a doctor, then what can I do? I'm not good at anything else? What's the point of life if I cannot become a doctor?" At this point I had also ruled out other medical professional fields like becoming a pharmacist, dentist, or nurse. I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on Citalopram that year.The hard part was, I could still mostly relate to my pre-med friends and friends in med-school. Like them, I wanted to use science to help people and make a difference in the world. But my drive to become a doctor had fizzled out. I tried reaching out to them but I discovered that I couldn't relate to them any more. If I asked for advice all they told me were variations of: Oh you're just hitting a rough spot, you'll get through it, I know I did; maybe take some time off?; just man up, we're all suffering here, just do it; maybe become a pharmacist, dentist or nurse. They just didn't get what I was going through. The worst part was, no one told me something like "maybe becoming a Doctor isn't for you, maybe look at another thing to go into? Here let's take a look at other options outside of medicine." So at this point I didn't know what else I was capable of and there was a lot of BS in my way and I didn't know how to fix it. A part of me still wanted to become a doctor, but I didn't want to do it anymore. On top of all this, I had ALOT of parental and family pressure from home to become a doctor. Anything else would have literally brought shame to the family. I'm not kidding about this, I know it's very stereotypical of Asian American families, but I was from one of those stereotypical Asian American families. I can go on-and-on about this, but that's another story. Anyway, I had been lying to my family about my grades. All they wanted from me was to get to med school. To tell my family I was failing my pre-med courses and/or losing my desire for med school would have devastated my them, they would most likely yell at me for hours over the phone, humiliate me, tell me I was hurting them, tell me I was selfish, I'm a failure at life, I'll die homeless and poor, just guilt trip me into oblivion. The summer before my 3rd year and the following fall semester was when I just gave up on becoming a doctor. I stopped going to all of classes, I slept all day, played board games with friends, played ALOT of video games, did anything that wasn't academic related. Maybe I had cracked? I don't know. I felt like I was only living one day at a time with no plans for the future. I was like this until March of my 3rd year in college. I went on a volunteer summer break trip to a state park in Virginia where I helped construct dams using rocks on the Potomac River and other labor intensive landscaping stuff. Being able to work with the earth while being surrounded by it helped me (yes this will sound super corny) connect to our planet for the first time in 15 years. I say 15 years because the last time I felt this way was when I was 6, that summer my parents took me to the Chicago Field Museum where I fell in love with the volcano and geology exhibits (there was a dark room with a glowing Hawaiian lava flow exhibit that frightened me at first, but I slowly become fascinated by it). Later that summer I took my first nature walk at forest preserve. Flash forward 15 years, back at the state park in Virginia, there were some other volunteers from my school who were geology majors. I overheard them talking about river delta systems while we sat on a bridge that over looked a small sandy river delta emptying out into the Potomac. I was drawn to their conversation as my memories of falling in love with geology and volcano exhibits from age 6. After talking with these geology students I became hooked. When I got back to school I scheduled a visit with the geology dept at my school. All of the professors I talked to were kind and saw in my eyes a passion for rocks slowly reigniting. Switching into geology was easy to do. But psychologically it was difficult. All of my friends told me I was crazy and stupid for changing to a completely different major during the spring semester of my 3rd year. People told me things like "just suck it up and finish your degree, you only have 1 more year", "it'll be a waste of your parents' money", and the worst "how selfish of you to waste your education like that, if you wanted to do geology you should have started as a freshman!". I also knew I had to tell my parents what I was about to do, and they would not take it kindly. Remember all of the things I wrote earlier on what I thought my family would do if I told them I had lost interest in becoming a doctor? Well it all happened on a Sunday in April when I finally made the call. I didn't talk to my family for 2 months. But at that point I had already decided to become a geologist no matter what anyone else told me, I had to right to be selfish about my life by that point because my passion to become something had been re lit. Now this didn't mean things got easier for me. From then until now things have been difficult. I barely finished my geology degree, wasn't sure what geology subfield I wanted to get into, had to suffer the reality of student loans, deal with the BS my family gave me for giving up becoming a medical professional, took 3 years off and worked for AmeriCorps, then finally somehow got into grad school for geology where I am now. Currently I am stressed beyond belief about my grad program, but I know I have the drive to force myself through the stress because I'm passionate about it. So long story short, it takes a lot of time for someone to discover a new passion for something when their old passion fizzles out. My story is vastly different from yours because I never had a severe brain injury that completely changed my life. But our stories are also related because I went through a phase of confusion and disillusionment and I wanted you to know you're not alone. I read you loved hiking and snowboarding with friends. Keep on doing that. If you love it and makes you happy, don't stop. Life is more than just having a career. I know that's a corny phrase, but it's true. And I deeply wish one day society will change where life experiences are valued over how much money someone can make. Finally, a little shameless pitch for you to consider pursuing geology. You seem like someone who loves the outdoors. Ever wonder how the mountains you snowboard on formed, study geology. Ever wonder why some mountains are volcanic and some are not, study geology. Ask any question about how a natural vista formed and geology will be able to provide fascinating answers. Come drop by /r/geology if you're interested. Lot's of nice people there who can answer any questions. And if any one is a jerk to you there, they'll be met with angry geologists armed with rock hammers, dynamite, and bottles of acid (we drop acid on limestone to see if it fizzes, helps us determine if a rock is limestone or not). I hope all of this helped. If you want any advice or have questions (about anything, us geologists do more than just look at rocks all day), feel free to reply to this comment or PM me.  [info] None [info] 1444243312
throwRA_4929482 [info] Extremely anxious - vaginal tear? So I (21) had sex a couple of times, a few days within my ovulation period. He used a condom and pulled out every time (I am not on the pill or anything else), but once he said it was a close call but he was out. We had sex the day before I was suppose to get my period and it was painful. That night and the next day I had the worst cramping I've every experienced. I thought my period had started but there was only slight pink when I wiped and nothing on the pad for two days. On the third day, I started bleeding more and had clots. However, the bleeding only lasted 3 days while I usually get my period for 6-8 days. Is there a chance I could be pregnant? Especially if the bleeding was just from a slight vaginal tear and not a period?I've been diagnosed with anxiety and this is the most unusual thing to happen to me after sex. [info] None [info] 1586094608
GreyPokedri [info] I came here so pissed because I was diagnosed with anxiety and I thought you thought it was a joke until I actually read it. I couldn't agree more. Thank you! [info] None [info] 1545198315
crypsis1 [info] Post Workout Anxiety Hi Everyone,I just started looking at this Subreddit and feel at home. I can see a lot of what I've been experiencing over the years from what you all have experienced also. I've been diagnosed with anxiety for years but have really not done a lot to help it. For one, I'm not a believer in medication because of the after affects with some, so I've been trying to help myself contain anxiety which I haven't been great at.I know running is my key for anxiety and stress but I don't do it as much as I should. I've found for a while, that the days after I run, my anxiety is at its highest. I feel absolutely great after a run but the next day I can just feel it build up. In my head I always said it was the run pushing the anxiety out. This weekend I decided to run both days and was feeling good but 3 hours after my second run while sitting on my sofa, I had one of the worst panic attacks I've ever had. It came out of nowhere and before I knew it my heart was at 213 bpm. I'm lucky that I have a great fiance that understands and can calm me down with her breathing and yoga techniques but it seems to get worse the next time it happens.My question to the community is, have you experienced the same? If I continue and keep a schedule of runs will this day after anxiety go away? I know I have to be in better shape and take care of myself but its tough to get that motivation when you know the next day you don't want to be around many people and are always worried.Thank You!"I will not let stress and anxiety define me" [info] None [info] 1493062777
idefk- [info] Why am I scared of “bad” 😂 Hi idk if this is normal or not or if I’m being dramatic. Ik it probably isn’t true but basically when I was little I was diagnosed with anxiety. Mainly social anxiety and it’s very annoying. I feel stupid for writing this but anyways I’m in middle school or junior high and it’s my last year. So I’m in grade 9 and next year I start high school. I don’t live close enough to my school for the bus but next year I will since my high school takes kids from the school I live by. Basically it’s like a small down on a hill. Not very many people live here everyone just knows it as apart of the city since it’s so small. But not very many people come up here or live up here. My mom grew up around here so she has friends with kids the same age as me since she literally knows everyone. I need to meet 3 kids. Which I’m fine with. It sounds weird but I lobe meeting new people it’s just that day when I start freaking out and when I’m with them. Since it’s a small group of people I don’t think I’ll have much trouble talking. Anyway one of the kids also has anxiety. This might sound mean so sorry if it is but basically my mom said he has anxiety like as bad as mine (don’t think mines bad but apparently it is). So I was like yea then I’m not gonna be able to talk to him that won’t work. We’ll both just get scared. Ig she kinda just stopped dragging it on cause she probably realized I was anxious or thought that’d make me feel betted cause I won’t be alone. I was fine after that but maybe a week or almost a week later we were talking about it again and my mom told me about the other kids then went back to the one with anxiety. My mom said he has bad anxiety again so I just said Ik. And she said that he don’t have it as bad socially and he don’t have problems talking to people. So I was like ok maybe we’ll be able to talk. I figured that’s be fine since my friend has anxiety like that and we’ve been close forever. Then she was like no like it’s bad bad like worse than yours. (She wasn’t meaning to scare me btw she don’t realize saying someone’s bad scares me and saying someone’s worse than me makes it worse). It’s not that I’m scared of them or think I can’t deal with them. It’s that I feel like I’ll hurt him. And I’m so scared to meet him. We won’t meet till summer so should be fine but I’m still scared. Especially since I have a very sarcastic and “mean” since I’d humour. That’ll make me more scared to talk. Thinking about meeting someone who gets offended easy makes me cry. I mean idk if he will. Idk him but Ik is I say one thing wrong I’m going to break down. Like once me and 3 friends had a sleepover at my house and I was bored. My other two friends were talking ome was making a tik tok. So I went out to see what she was doing and yk how like people jump behind people and like touch them. Idk hard to explain but I did that and she moved over and fell. Her first reaction when something happens is always blame it on someone else. (She’s not the one with anxiety btw not important but don’t want people to get confused if anyone answers). And she fell and my friends heard her fall so they came out. And one said what happened. And she said I pushed her so my first reaction was like I didn’t do anything and I tried to say what happened felt like crying I was sweating. So I just said fine I’ll leave and I didn’t wanna go in my room cause their stuff was in there and didn’t want them to come in. So I went to the bathroom and I was shaking and trying so hard to not cry. Was breathing heavy. Was texting the friend who has anxiety I mentioned earlier saying I’m so mean I wanna die what’s wrong with me blah blah blah. And then probably like 10 minutes later my friend convinced me to let her in. So I did and obviously and then she said are you ok and hugged so I said yea. And then she said what happened so I tried to say but I started breaking down bawling. And it was the first time she seen me cry cause I don’t normally cry infront of people. I just hold it in which I shouldn’t cause after I always have some temper tantrum. And my friend was saying she’s ok and stuff. And then we all went down to see her and she was making tik toks and laughing and stuff. And then she seen me crying and she goes no don’t cry I’m ok. Then I started laughing cause I always laughed after I cried. But holy fuck I still feel bad and she literally has no like mental problems so if I said one thing wrong to someone with anxiety who is very fucking bad idk what I’ll do. It sounds dramatic especially since I think mines nothings but when someone says somethings bad or especially “bad bad or very bad” or even worse than me. I’m like oh shot if I say one thing wrong they’ll hurt themselves and hate me forever. They’ll never wanna talk to me or look at me again and they’ll hate me and spread stuff about me and stuff will go around about how horrible I am. That sounds dramatic I’m but it’s soooo scary. Like I’m shaking writing this. I just really hope I don’t hurt him. I don’t wanna need to cover myself up and just be quiet like I normally am but I’m scared to show my personality because I’m scared it’ll hurt him or even the others. I’m just hoping we have the same sense of humour so at least Ik that I shouldn’t feel too bad and he isn’t just saying no it’s ok you can say that stuff. Like no maybe you’re dying I wouldn’t know. I think it’ll be good tho since I think most people with any problem at all is better in the summer. Ik I am especially social. I feel like in the summer I’m a different person. Like this isn’t me and I love that. So I hope that we’ll get close enough where he wouldn’t hate me so when school starts don’t need to worry about becoming friends. I mean we don’t even need to be close I just wanna know he can put up with me. I wanna know that I’m not alone cause being on a bus with a bunch of people you don’t know would be terrifying. Being on a bus for the first time with people you know is scary enough. I’m just hoping his anxiety isn’t as bad as I think. How I think is scary and if anyone has that it’d be a sin I can’t even describe it. Tbh if it was as bad as I think they’d definitely basically have OCD. Like my mom dropped me off to school and then his mom asked if my mom can drop him off since we go to different schools and his starts later I’m assuming. So my mom said yea and picked him up (his mom couldn’t get out of the driveway cause it snowed too much and covered it and probably didn’t want him to walk since it was so cold). And my moms told me she picked him up cause we were just talking. And the lifted so much weight of my shoulders. I was like ok he can’t be that bad he can get in the car with people. Like I stg there’s something wrong with my brain. I overthink so much. Like I can’t describe bad to you. Everyone’s so under dramatic about it. Like idk I don’t have an example. But bad just sounds like such a big scary word. It makes me scared it makes me feel like I’m either gonna hurt someone or I’m going to like die. If someone said a bruise on me was bad I’d probably be scared. Bads so scary. I need to teach myself that bad don’t mean someone’s dying. But can’t do that rn cause my brains trying to prepare myself for everything. Like for all Ik he could die if I say his names wrong (that’s dramatic but you get my point.) probably gonna come back and update in like months and be like oh it was fine his anxiety isn’t as bad as I thought it’s nothing compared to what I thought. I could bet money but at the same time I doubt it. [info] None [info] 1579140233
buttpincher [info] Looks like you're running out of fucks to give but remember don't run out of fucks for yourself. Seriously though and I know it's cliche and it's said time and again... exercise and proper diet do wonders. I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder after being rushed to the hospital in September in a state of fear and panic. My heart rate was over 150bpm and before that happened I was very similar to what you have described yourself to be now. My doctor told me "look I can put you on Xanax or something similar but first I want you to try and lose weight and exercise"... I told him I would but initially I didn't. I had an anxiety attack almost 3x a week all of September until I finally had enough.I've been on a Keto diet for 1.5months, down 28lbs and have not had an anxiety attack since I started the diet. Yesterday was the first day I actually worked out after losing weight with just the diet... and it felt great. Hang in there you can get through this, you've made it this far.  [info] None [info] 1479186113
BlueKushKingdom [info] I'm not sure what I have. I was diagnosed with anxiety at the age of 11 when I was down in the hospital and got surgery on my lung for an abscess. It was caused by my cystic kidney disease, but that's another story.Lately as I've been aging I've been noticing changes in my mental condition. When I was a very young child. I'm only 8 days away from the age of 16.Anyway, so I get hypochondriac often. I have every reason too. And on top of my anxiety I picked up a bad habit and that was the biggest mistake I made. I had smoked cigarettes to try and relieve my anxiety, but I learned more on how that can lead to a much worse outcome, so I used smokeless tobacco and that isn't any better. I noticed small bumps on my gum and had them checked almost immediately and the doctor told me mine isn't cancerous and nothing I should worry about. I have something called fordyce, but anyway back to the story.I had my flu shot. I'm not quite positive if I'm getting somewhat of a minor flu or what it is. I had this probably about a month or so back and thought I was losing my mind, before that I excused it saying it's anxiety.I am currently experiencing this as I'm typing it. I was okay for awhile and then it came back. It could be because I was anxious on something, that something is over now and I still feel this weird feeling.I have been seeing floaters. Not a huge array of them, just off and on and they are gray and sometimes black and they fly across my vision. I researched that and of course being a hypochondriac assumed the worse thinking I may lose my vision.I'm going to get my eyes checked, I remember something happening prior to this, I had permed my hair like "Hyde" style from that 70's show and I was getting it redone but it got in my eyes and I had acid perm in my eyes. I was rushed to the emergency room and by the time I got there they said nothing had to be done and that I was fine and my retina blah blah blah everything was good.But I've been getting floaters, or at least noticing them lately.I think the worse when I see this and read about cancer in your eyes and shit.I'm a hypochondriac. Fair and square. I get anxiety over the things.But right now I'm not really thinking about those things and I still have this weird feeling.I literally try to focus and I just absolutely can't. It scares me and I start getting scared. Like I'm lightheaded and the absolute best way I can describe it is like a flu but without the actual sickness part like throwing up, running fevers, etc. just the head madness!My aunt is a Nurse and she told me my Potassium is possibly low and to eat stuff with potassium. It kind of makes sense since I've been eating nothing but fast food and junk food lately, like hot pockets, microwavable crap, mcdonalds and crap.I ate a banana yesterday and one today. I don't know how much or how long it takes your potassium level to go back up, but I've just been losing it.It could be that I have a flu and I'm stressing over the weird feeling and giving myself anxiety.I also have a lot of stress going on in life. My parents are getting a divorce, me and my mom are moving to tennessee far from our relatives to a fresh life and I just am broken down. Like I feel this way when I'm not even thinking about the stuff. Then I question why I have it and I go crazy again.Can anybody give me somewhat of a description on what I'm going through. Is it possibly that I have a flu but because I have the flu shot it's not at full effect and I just have the head problem, is my potassium really low or what's going on? I'm going insane and loosing it over this. [info] None [info] 1457315352
bethestorm13 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and depressive tendencies. Everything just feels really frustrating at the moment. [info] None [info] 1570281093
FHRITP69er [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety. I had no idea what it was like before. I just thought people were nervous like a test. At least for me that just mild. It's more like if I'm going to live the next day because something must be wrong with me. It doesn't make sense that I can just sit innocently on my couch, watching a movie, eating dinner, and all of a sudden I look at my girlfriend and tell her I think i'm going to die.I sustained a leg injury from a back injury (sciatica maybe) and it just got so bad. Slept for maybe 1-2 hours total for 2 weeks when my leg issue started. Then randomly, I remember just talking to my physio therapist to help my sciatica and just before we even started, I remember a huge ringing in my ear, and then my head got super cloudy and almost felt dense. I just felt like life was leaving my body and told her I think my heart stopped. She laid me down seconds away from passing out. That was the first time. The second time, on the couch, and my heart was minimum 100bpm for no reason. And I remember panicking as fuck. Telling her not to let me die. Telling her to call my mom. What do I do. Do I call 911? I called my mom. Voice was shaking uncontrollably, trying to be as calm as possible. Fiancé instructing me to breathe as she rubs my back. I can't stop telling her I love her. Mom says go to the hospital now. I say I can't make it. I get off the phone. Call 911. Ambulance is at my house in 4 minutes. I'm laying on the couch now. I'm hooked up to their EKG, and they were insanely calm. Told me I'm going to be okay and I'm not having a heart attack. I'm not going to die. They administered my prescribed/Rx Lorazepam and swallowed. Heart rate went down... They said they don't need to take me to the hospital because it's not life threatening, so I signed my waiver and took their word for it.Since then, I caved and made a large post on social media for anyone on my friends list. I barely use Facebook but I creep alot just to stay up to date. This was a 3:30 in the morning because I couldn't sleep. Any time I try to sleep is my nightmare because that's when my walls come down. Idle hands and mind are the devils playground. So all day, all night I just wonder if I'm gonna make it. So so so many people reached out to me, and told me that I'm okay. And that they too have never told anyone they have been dealing with it for years. They thought they were alone. I thought I was alone. I cried for the first time in maybe 5 years. I cried hard. I just want to live. I'm crying as I type this.It made me so humble. I held my fiancé closer. I just celebrated my 5 year anniversary together with her and she's my rock. I think i'm going to be okay. Every day is a struggle. I'm going to be okay.I just love everything and anyone.Thank you for listening. This is extremely unlike me. [info] None [info] 1561582603
abdane [info] Anxiety symptoms, anyone share this? okay so I have been diagnosed with anxiety since 2015 when I had a panic attack out of nowhere, i thought i was done for and this will be my life forever. I went to see a doctor and was saved by benzos (ativan at the time). Then i went on cipralex for about a year and stopped it because it made me very tired most of the time. I thought the panic attacks would reoccur, but they didnt thank god. Now, my daily life is as follow:&amp;#x200B;waking up fine, one hour later my anxiety starts to rise (not sure if its anxiety or what at this point), what I feel is a weird feeling that I cannot explain, ill try my best. i dont get any physical symptoms that the rest get (heavy breathing, sweating, etc...) all what i feel is this feeling in my brain of un-focusness and it is very uncomfortable to bare. I came across brain-fog but im not sure if that is what im experiencing or not. its like my brain is not mentally clear and I cannot focus, but i can if i want to but its hard. as i said, hard to explain. But during the evening (8pm or so for some weird reason) the effects subside and i fell a bit more normal.&amp;#x200B;then the cycle goes again on the next day. some days i do not experience this (which is rare, maybe once a month).&amp;#x200B;Anyone else with same experience? any advice? [info] None [info] 1555037746
kratos0530 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, I didn't realise this was related but now it's obvious to me. [info] None [info] 1567227506
youjustwaitandsee [info] November by Tyler the Creator. The song came out months before my mother passed away, in November the same year. 2 years prior, I was diagnosed with anxiety, also in November. I broke up with a beard that I really liked and was left quite heartbroken in November, the year Over the Garden wall released.  Not to mention my dad also died in November 2012. Flowerboy is my part of gaming soundtracks. It relaxes me. I had to make a new playlist and exclude the song from the album. [info] None [info] 1557364141
ffHgdur1 [info] Has working in this industry made you paranoid? I feel stupid writing this out but I've been pentesting for a while now and I'm finding myself more and more paranoid (irrationally) about my personal computer security. I've been going to extreme lengths to keep safe but even that isn't enough to calm myself.I have formatted several machines for even the slightest worry I made a mistake. I regularly open wireshark to look for suspicious traffic. I keep buying devices to further separate activities I consider sensitive. I recently even got paranoid that someone was trying to attack me because they sent me a message asking for help with a ctf/wargame... I had to check the message source and their profile several times and still didn't feel comfortable.I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past, so that doesn't help. And I guess it is the nature of the industry.  What are your thoughts? Is everything as bad as it seems? [info] None [info] 1483811802
FromTheBetween [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and insomnia and was given klonopin for anxiety and ambien for the sleeping. You can take them together and I've found the klonopin works 6/7 times a week and then just use the ambien as needed. Been great so far! [info] Anxiety / Insomnia [info] 1484878162
collegestruggle [info] I just wanted to say that you are not alone. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was in high school and then my father died suddenly when I was away in college. After that my anxiety attacks turned from impending doom to death by (insert disease here). My side will hurt and I'll think my spleen ruptured or I'll get a headache and I am convinced I have a brain tumor. Anyways, I'm better now but it does stress me out at night sometimes. [info] None [info] 1407127716
innistradi [info] &gt; Can a man be both mentally ill and smart at a same time anyway? Or it sounds so ridiculous?I'm pretty seriously mentally ill (I'm diagnosed with anxiety, personality disorder not otherwise specified, mood disorder not otherwise specified, and post-traumatic stress disorder) and I'm "smart." I can learn, I can run my own homebrewed dungeons and dragons campaigns, I was in college for a while. I'm disabled-- meaning I can't function in society at large the same way many people can, especially off my meds, but I'm smart.However:I do have brain fog, obsessive thoughts, memory gaps, etc. If your character is severely traumatized (which any significant amount of time in total isolation), it is going to change the way her brain functions, and how *well* it functions. I would look into famous cases of neglect and abuse, such as feral children, as well as isolation experiments and cases of prisoners of war. Those should give you a good ideas as to what timeframe you would want. 800 years is excessive.Is your idea offensive? It depends on how you write it. [info] None [info] 1463273569
Gianni317 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was young but this has never happened before.  [info] None [info] 1510630969
semmc720 [info] I feel like I’m honestly at my breaking point and I just need short term ways to cope I was diagnosed with anxiety in September and put on medication which helped for a while, but I feel like the effects aren’t good anymore. I’m constantly in a state of mild to moderate panic and this morning I had such bad heartburn and a fast heart rate that I felt like I was going to have a heart attack. I’m passively suicidal, I feel like a massive burden and it’s hard for the people in my life to understand how much I’m struggling, although they really are trying. I’m going to ring my doctor first thing tomorrow for an appointment to discuss upping my dosage or switching my meds, but I need something to help me cope until then. Just something that’ll make me feel like life is worth living :( [info] None [info] 1546562746
Xenouz [info] I mean it happens to me, but I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder by a doctor so maybe it's just a small amount of people. [info]  [info] 1464311334
Aloha456 [info] How I realised my own nmum was a narcissist. I'm on mobile so formatting might be slightly off I guess.I'm 17 and currently still living with my nmum. I've been aware of her being an N for around two years. The thing that really kicked it off was when my brother a year younger than me kinda broke from her tactics and ruined his life. He was a 14 year old kid smoking weed and not coming home at night. We never knew where he was, and our nmum roped me into helping her, he ended up hating me after it. During that time I realised that some of the things she was doing to try and keep him under her were a little extreme. She began getting the police to escort him around, she tried keeping him locked in our room (at the time I shared with him and one of our other younger brothers.) Eventually, he moved out to live with my dad and I thought that that part of my life was over and we'd go back to being a happy family or whatever.Of course, we didn't. Things got really difficult for me mentally and I couldn't keep up. I was aware of everything she was doing to me now and it hurt. The pressure of it caused me to break and I stopped going to school a lot. The previous year I'd missed a lot of school because I'd had a really bad bout with my asthma, so that year I'd pretended it had surfaced again because I was struggling to do anything that required any energy. Of course it didn't stop her, she'd still make me do everything for her. Clean the house, pick up my younger siblings from school, look after the siblings, put them to bed. And then she'd yell at me for never helping her, for being useless and not doing anything ever. The most fucked up part was I kept telling her that I loved her.What drove me to realise she was an N was that because I was aware of her shitty behaviour and suffering from it, I vented to my friends when I felt like I couldn't hold it in. First time I did, one of them immediately said that it was abuse and neglect that she was doing. I didn't believe her and began making excuses for my N. I said that my brother had broke her (funny, isn't it?), that she was still suffering from the death of my nana/her mum, that she was really a good person going through a bad time. This spell of me thinking that she used to be a good person didn't break for a long time, but me believing that she would get better did after my suicide attempt in march of last year.I'm keeping this part brief because I don't like talking about this. Last year everything got too much and I attempted suicide. Obviously, I survived and my nmum knew about my attempt. She took me to the gp who referred me to therapist. She made sure I went to the first appointment which is where I was diagnosed with anxiety. I thought originally that this had jolted my nmum into going back to the nice caring person I thought she was. I was wrong, she refused to take me to any of the follow up appointments. There was always an excuse, she needed a nap, I had to pick the kids up from school etc. The excuse that made me realise was when she chose a day trip to the seaside where my brother now lives over my appointment. I knew then that it wasn't getting any better.It wasn't until last September when I realised it had been abuse my entire life. I'd been in college for about a week or two at this point and we got into a particularly nasty argument. Me, my elder sister and my mum. I don't specifically remember why, we have so many that they often blur into one but this particular fight was one that made me and my sister say to each other that we never wanted to go back. We talked a lot around this time, and I mentioned my ideology of her going back to how she used to be. That's when my sister told me that she was never like that, I had just been manipulated into thinking that she was. I'd been the most open to this manipulation because I was the most dependent on her. I have autism, dyspraxia and asthma, I spent a lot of time as a kid in the hospital or needing help with school or every day things. When she stopped me from seeing my dad all the time it was for my health. When I wasn't allowed out with friends it was because my autism made it dangerous for me to be out without supervision. She made me think my dad had been abusive to her and that was why they split up. She told me worse things about my dad that I'm not going to say here in risk of trigger warnings.I'm going to tell you two stories. One is my memory of what happened, one is what actually happened. First, the memory.This one happened when I was around ten. My dad often picked us up from school and he would take us out for dinner and spend time with us. This particular day, my nmum was out with my younger siblings and told my dad that he was allowed to take us back to the house. She had given my sister the spare key for the day to let us in. For dinner that day my dad bought us pizza, but instead of anything big we got a ten inch pizza to share between the 3 of us. That's not a big pizza to start with, but between three kids it becomes even smaller. We were starving that day, and when my mum got back later all the other kids had been fed pretty well and she said that because it was late and we didn't have any food in she couldn't do anything for us. This was my dad's fault for being a cheapskate and not letting us eat anything big. What actually happened isn't too different except for one big thing: she told my dad to not buy us dinner at all because she woulf feed us when she got back. He still got us a little something to eat for a snack regardless when her intent had been to starve us so she could manipulate us into hating him.That's the sort of things I figured out that day, and it's when I made the decision to live at my dad's half time when not in college and on weekends.The point of this rant is that some days I still begin to believe she never did anything wrong and I needed to relive all of this to bring myself back to reality. She doesn't love me, she never did and never will. The things here don't even scratch the surface of what she did and still does but it was all that I needed to force myself to stop being a dipshit and reliving the time I thought she was a good person. Sorry if the post is a bit of a mess, as far as timelines go it isn't the neatest [info] None [info] 1560347221
lustforwine [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and they said not adhd, but my testing showed adhd from neuropsychologist [info] None [info] 1567971670
TheOriginalDormdude [info] Disqualification Question I'm confused by one of the disqualifications on the JET website and it has me worried that I might not be eligible. The disqualification is " **When an individual has committed an inappropriate act or there is substantial reason to believe that an individual is likely to commit an inappropriate act**." It's fairly vaguely worded and I've spent several days trying to find an answer to my question or more information on this disqualification, but I just can't. So my question is, I have an attempted suicide on my record from when I was younger. Is that considered a disqualification as far as anyone knows? It was 5 years ago and by the time I finish getting a degree it will be 8 or 9 years in my past. I really hope it's not a disqualification because after learning about the program it's help to give me a lot more direction and motivation in life.Edit:I just thought of another somewhat related question that I haven't really been able to find an answer to. I was diagnosed with anxiety and mild Asperger as a child. Problems that I more than have a handle on as an adult. would either of these be disqualifications or be negatives in my application? [info] None [info] 1587881868
RockinMadRiot [info] Does anyone Have issues with loss of appetite and feelings of throwing up when you try to eat? I've been getting the feeling lately of being sick or not being able to eat due to the sickness. I just have this feeling in my stomach that I can't quite describe but anytime I try to eat I just gag or feel like I'm going to go ill. The issue is I'm also finding it very hard to sleep at time. I don't know why I am but I just seem to lie there awake or when I do sleep I wake up a few times in the night or get waken up. Then went I get up in the morning I feel too tired to eat and it's a like a circle now. I have been diagnosed with anxiety (I have social phobia issues. I've had them for a long time) but this feels not like that. Does anyone have an tips or advice on how to help? I have tried pills before but they seem to make me a lot worse in other ways and not better. Many thanks. [info] None [info] 1504872832
missrainbow12 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and the RAGE as it's know in my house has gone, I still have moments where I feel it building but now I can push it down as it's pointless energy that will only hurt me after its expelled. I tell myself blowing up just makes it worse so I try to calm down, often walking away from the situation and being on my own helps the most.  [info] None [info] 1499595777
flying_bat [info] One thing to remember is that you aren't asking for drugs, you are asking for help, and s/he will determine what drugs you may need or whether to refer you to a specialist.As for how I would bring it up? Well I'd probably do something like this:During the appointment I assume that you will be noting or talking about previous conditions, current conditions, and family medical history. This would be the time to mention it. If you are afraid to look like you are requesting drugs, simply bring a list of things that you want to mention to the doctor and add anxiety to the list. So let's say that the doctor asks you for previous medical problems and you say something like "Let me grab my list... Well I have had asthma as a kid but that's better now. I was diagnosed with anxiety many years ago but I was never treated for it. Actually, how do I go about getting treatment for that? It's been getting worse." If the doctor doesn't ask for things like that, you can always have it on the list and at some point they may ask "Okay anything else?" and you can say "Let m check my list of concerns to bring up" then pull out your list and be like "Oh! I almost forgot, I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back, and while I didn't want treatment then, I was hoping to get some help with it now."On a side note, every single time I have mentioned my anxiety to a medical professional they become 100x more understanding and make me feel safer. It is also important to know that there are two types of anti-anxiety drugs: long lasting (anti depressants) and fast acting (benzos). The long lasting ones aren't anything that people would go "seeking drugs" for because you get no "high" from them. The second there is potential for abuse, but I've never had a problem in the past because the doctors simply ask for my symptoms and they determine whether or not the second type is what I need.Edit: Oh dear this ended up being much longer than I expected. Sorry about that, I'm used to explaining things like this in r/explainlikeimscared format. Well I hope some of it was useful at least. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1407868279
AlexasBitch [info] ADHD cause you to be unable to focus, fidget and not really comprehend what you read/hear? Hey I really don’t know much about ADHD but it has been suggested a few times by friends and family members.The only things I honestly know about ADHD is the same as I probably knew when i was like 10 (“ADHD = hyper”) Which I’m sure isn’t accurate...I have been diagnosed with anxietySo maybe symptoms overlap a little and ADHD isn’t something I have, idkBut can you please help me understand if there’s can be symptoms of ADHD or maybe just anxiety• Finding it extremely difficult to behave in classroom settings... even in training at a job (I’m 24) I couldn’t not be silly/misbehave• Not being able to focus on what teacher is saying - You could ask me what she just said I chances are I wouldn’t have any idea• When I read, most of the time of you ask me what I just read, I wouldn’t be able to tell you• interrupting people as they talk - never been aware that I do it before so could just be a bad habit?• Spending money impulsively and in excess • Not being able to control over eating  I could have the thought that I should stop after eating X amount but I’ll always eat the entireIf these are symptoms, is there anything else I should look out for like common symptoms? [info] None [info] 1570032987
realstonned [info] See I have similar symptoms but I am diagnosed with anxiety and IBS and one of the few things that help me out is cannabis. I find eating a .1-.2 of a gram of rso before bed helps me not feel adominal pain and nausea. [info] None [info] 1441132020
Melania- [info] It's true. Even though I went to the psychiatrist and I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, many people around me keep denying this. [info] None [info] 1563818628
Olvenya [info] When is it useful / necessary to disclose that you have a mental health issues? I (27/female) started seeing a psychiatrist over Whatsapp since last month and I think it's going pretty well. He's a good listener and he's helped me understand a few things about mental health. I'm only 3 sessions in, we talked about possible treatment (medication, MBSR and MBCT) but I haven't technically started any form of treatment.I have been diagnosed with anxiety (I was fairly certain of it but never had confirmation from a professional). Once the current lockdown is over and things go back to semi-normal (I'm in Europe), I will be also checking for adult ADD with a neuropsychologist, and for autism.Most people around me (family, friends, coworkers) don't know that I'm seeing a psychiatrist (except for 2 very close friends). They don't really know that I have sometimes been struggling, mostly because I've never had any major issue or incident in my life so far. At best, they probably just think that I'm a naturally nervous person.There's stigma associated with mental health, so if either ADD or autism are confirmed, I'm not sure I want to disclose it to friends, or to coworkers. I started a new job 6 months ago, so my colleagues / boss know me only superficially. I don't want them to think of me differently because I have diagnosed anxiety or possibly autism.That being said, is there a general "rule" on when/if you should disclose such things, especially regarding work? My issues haven't greatly impacted my job (I have good reviews), but you never know what could happen.Thanks! [info] None [info] 1588177241
xemmxxo [info] can someone help and tell me if this is rocd? Hi I've been having a few problems lately regarding my relationship with my boyfriend. I've been diagnosed with anxiety by a doctor after I told him all I ever seem to do it worry all day everyday. One thing I didn't say about was my ocd that I've suffered with I constantly have to close things or put my clothes on right etc other wise I feel like something bad will happen 😕I find that my anxiety rises every time I'm in a relationship like I know when I was with my ex I constantly worried about if he was going to leave me and suspecting him of cheating when I know he wasn't but I could never shake the thought. Now I'm in a relationship with someone amazing and caring I dealt with a lot of horrible guys before I met him and I never felt so happy. We've been together a year now and have been talking about marriage and getting a house together and just the thought of this makes me excited and happy I've worried constantly so far since I've been with him but about 2 months ago I was worrying about if he'd ever leave me or find someone else etc and when he gave me peace of mind I was calm but less that 5 minutes my brain was making me think of what else could happen to break us up and it made me think of if he really loves me but then I thought no that's stupid I know he does then I turned the question around on me and I said to myself of course I do and I felt so much fear and panic when I asked myself that question and made me think what if it's lust what if he isn't the one and we have to break up etc I couldn't shake the thought off it was there with me for a month everyday worrying the hell out of me. Then one day it stopped because I had something else to worry about I went back to him leaving me which I obsessed over for a few days and all the love and feeling came back then went back to this again the not loving him it's like a vicious never ending cycle! I've worried and thought about it so much I'm starting to feel and believe it's true and I worry I'll go out and find someone better because of the way I'm feeling now but I know that's not what I want I mean just writing that upsets me 😔I don't want this to be true I love him I know I do but these feeling are making me feel so numb like I wouldn't care if he left me or the other way around but that's not what I want it's driving me insane! One day I can fight this and have so much feeling and love then the next I'm like this again it starts from the moment I wake up and with me all day could this be rocd? Please someone help 😩 [info] None [info] 1465563300
myknifeurlife [info] I would say mentally ill before I found emo, at least got really into emo. When I was young (age 10) I found bands that I felt were emo but was only somewhat into them.  As I got older I was diagnosed with anxiety and it wasn't until maybe 3 years later I found and fell in love with emo music.  From the age of 19 to now (23), I would say that emo music became a remedy for sure, or at least a great way to know that I wasn't alone in a lot of the feelings I had.  Now, I still love the music, and I honestly feel like it helped me learn a lot about myself and find out what (i hate using this word lol) triggers my anxiety.  Now, its pretty rare for me to get the same bad anxiety attacks I used to get, I still have my problems with my anxiety disorder but overall it has gotten a lot better and I honestly can say I feel like emo music had a lot to do with it. [info] None [info] 1510759464
NeedHelp31 [info] I need help dealing with the remnants of anxiety Around 6 or 7 years ago I used to have anxiety pretty bad. I couldn't go anywhere without my mum (she was my safety blanket) otherwise I felt a terrible sickness and broke down. Now I am 18 and I have no issues go anywhere but I still fear staying the night at people places and I haven't done it since before I was diagnosed with anxiety. Well anyway, I want to go to this thing on Saturday but mentally I keep trying to make excuses to not go. I don't know what to do. Please help. [info] None [info] 1338446275
ghghyrtrtr [info] Same here with the faking being sick. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, acid reflux (get my first endoscopy this year to determine the damage due to years of no treatment, it was so bad when I first had it diagnosed in my early 20s the doctor thought I had asthma because of the wheezing), anemia (woohoo for headaches caused by lack of blood), severely allgeric animals (grew up with constant hives to the point I of bruising and trouble breathing but never taken to a doctor, I really thought it was normal to pop benadryl  when your kneck and face were swelling up). I was always just being dramatic!! Oh and when I really needed medical treatment- why didn't I say something? They seriously didn't take me to the dentist until I refused to eat. I had told them when I chipped the tooth, gone through two tubes of numbing stuff that they bought because of tooth pain, had had a headache for two weeks that I told them about. Hmmm how is that not speaking up. Complaining about pain for a month. Then they made me feel guilty about having a $300 filling that was done with minimal novacaine because they refused to pay extra to take me to the pediatric dentist. The dentist was apologetic because he thought I really should have pain meds but he couldn't prescribe them. My tooth needed to be treated or I'd end up loosing it through surgery because it wasn't grown in all the way. He drilled all the way to the root, cleaned the root and filled. He said he didn't know if it would grow in and need a root canal or just need to be pulled out via surgery.  When my dentist I went to as an adult saw it he was horrified to hear that I wasn't on pain meds and only novicain when they did the work. When I was referred to a specialist for the root canal he was horrified too. This was after both had looked at the X-ray and assumed I had been put out for it. Nope white knuckled through the pain. Feeling guilty for costing so much money and knowing if I couldn't handle it I'd have to go get surgery to have the tooth pulled and my parents' didn't have the money. [info] None [info] 1533784822
fullsunflower [info] I agree that some people need to chill out. I go to a school with a very large Asian population in America. As an Asian myself, I always feel obligated to get the highest grades possible. I always feel guilty doing poorly in school because my parents who immigrated to America when I was little sacrificed so much for me to get American education, so that I wouldn't have to go through even more rigorous education in Asia (literally 1 test defines your life). As time goes on, my parents have become more relaxed with me. Ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety, they've started to focus more on my happiness instead of my grades. [info] None [info] 1537915540
WardenessoftheNorth2 [info] This lady who claimed to be a psychic &amp; I believe she truly was. She has since passed away but she just knew everything about me. It was scary even though she was really friendly. She told me my life would change when I turned 24. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder that year, my guy proposed to me &amp; I got my first short story published.  [info] None [info] 1521911233
Bob4856 [info] Thanks sometimes I feel like I'm a failure and I'm gonna go to hell and there is no hope and I just worry but that could be because I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder [info] None [info] 1554382341
RainInMyHead [info] [Help] Lost a friend during a meltdown. TERRIFIED that nothing can be done to fix it. Hi. Sorry this is so damn long. I just need all of this written out to sort through it myself, and I hope it helps you sort through it, too.I'm studying a really hard major at a really prestigious university and I am having a horrible time keeping up with my school work. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year (while I was at this school), and since then I've convinced myself that my anxiety is purely an environmental thing, and not an actual issue with my brain (a serious one, anyway).  I hated the idea that I had to take meds just so I could do my schoolwork, especially when I was really happy with the other aspects of my life. So I stopped taking them about two weeks ago and have felt great up until tonight. (Now am thinking this was a horrible idea. Read on.)Now, rewind. About the friend: He's this guy I've been hanging out with off-and-on for a couple of months, and moreso in the last few weeks.  We really like spending time with each other and get along well and have a ton of common interests. I have horrible relationship anxiety (and I know this to be a real thing), and I know this about myself, but I wanted to be with him so bad. I would do anything to have him be the person that makes me feel okay, even just as friends.So it turns out that he had feelings for me, too. I felt it was necessary to disclose to him my issues with being panicky and doing really shitty in school because of it.  He decided he didn't want to be with me romantically because he felt he couldn't support me if I had issues like that. Although I get where he was coming from logically, it kind of hurt my feelings--it just felt like he was reducing me to an illness and less than a human being.Fast forward two weeks with no contact, and we're suddenly friends again.  He changes his mind and asks me to go out with him. I say yes, everything is happy, hooray.Five days go by and our friendship feels really...off. He stopped being himself as soon as we started going out. I fell ill and couldn't see him in person, and rather than being friendly/supportive, we just stopped talking altogether.So tonight I texted him, in the middle of a panic attack about something school-related, saying I don't think things are going to work out in a relationship context.  He said he agreed, that he felt weird about it, but still wanted to be friends.  He then apologized for all of these different flaws he thought he had...and for some reason that really pissed me off that that he was feeling so sorry for himself when I was suffering so badly from my illness and schoolwork and things.  So I yelled at him, and he yelled back, and eventually it got to the point where he was just like "you have meltdowns all the time and I have no patience for it" and he told me to stop talking to him.This all feels like it's 1000000% my fault, but I can't help but think it shitty that he took my feelings and crushed them to bits while I was in such an emotionally-fragile state as it was.  No idea what to do, if this is a lost cause or if he's a prick and I should be happy he's out of the picture, or if he'll be understanding if I try to make amends (and if we DO make amends, what if I freak out on him again?)I seriously can't sort through all these thoughts in my head and need some help putting them together so I can figure out what I do. Any thoughts or advice or experience or virtual hugs are greatly appreciated.tl;dr: One of my best friends lost patience with me while I was panicking, to the point where we got into a fight and he told me to stop talking to him. Not sure if I am to blame or if he is just a prick or if this was just an unfortunate situation.:( :( :( :( :( :( :( :( :( :( :( [info] GAD [info] 1426832977
klumpp [info] &gt; If I invite him to come along and meet them he says it would be imbalanced because I got to know them first.--&gt; I try inviting him to meet people with me. He hates it. I try letting him know he's wanted, but it's fine for him to not interact with my friendsSounds like how I was before I was diagnosed with anxiety issues. Have you or your husband ever considered talking to someone about that? [info] None [info] 1434470915
Throw444555332 [info] Stress or heart problems? 20 year old male So to start I'm a healthy and active individual with a few sedimentary days which, even then, are flecked with exercise (walking the dog etc.)  Recently I've been diagnosed with anxiety, mainly hypochondria, and that naturally has caused me to start mixing up symptoms. Please bear with me if I must sound stupid.  I've been suffering pain in the upper left area of my torso and down what feels like the muscle in my arm. I've also been having heart palpitations all-day, everyday for the past week and I've had problems with gaining and maintaining an erection with my partner. I haven't suffered any shortness of breath aside from when I get anxious and no matter how relaxed i am the problems persist.  The issue is all these symptoms correlate with stress and heart disease and I feel if it is stress, it's a self-fulfilling prophecy of getting stressed about my heart which then causes it to beat faster and so on.  Is there any big difference I'd be noticing if I had, say, heart disease? Like sweating or vision loss? If so I'd love to hear any advice, doctor or not.  Thank you [info] None [info] 1477395984
Lassa76 [info] I know what you mean. Are you on medication for the anxiety? I can't be of much help (I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but most psychiatrists say it's psychosis), but if there's any consolation, just know that you're not alone. That happens with me a ton, and unfortunately, I don't have any advice except to think about the great times you've had with her when these attacks begin. It always helps me when I worry about my SO cheating.  [info] None [info] 1493521055
pandaruffles [info] Silence. It developed during highschool "silent reading period". Half hour of pure silence. I don't know why, but usually if I'm STUCK in a silent place I get a horrible panic attack. Eventually, i developed agoraphobia because I didn't want to be put in a situation like that ever again. I was diagnosed with anxiety, and the meds help with the silence but I still feel agoraphobic. However after a while I get cabin fever. [info] None [info] 1416097076
helpmeoutpls777 [info] Vivid dreaming is no longer fun Hi there. I've always been a vivid/lucid/active dreamer and a light sleeper. It has gotten progressively more intense, I usually have 2-3 dreams a night that I can remember. I used to love this quality, until I realized that I wake up often because of this and often wake up feeling unrested.Additionally, it's gotten to the point where I can't even take an ~hour long nap without dreaming. It's exhausting.I have been diagnosed with anxiety which I think plays into my sleeping/dreaming habits as the dreams usually call my stressors in to play. However, melatonin, Ativan(benzo), weed, zzzquil, etc, have little to no effect. Anyone have a similar experience/advice? I'm so tired of being tired. I can't remember the last time I slept a full, uninterrupted sleep. Thanks! TL;DR:Constant dreaming = no sleep. I've always been a light/poor sleeper. Have tried sleep aids with little success. [info] None [info] 1493566733
jesseroundy [info] I am a 17 teen year old and was placed in a "youth treatment program" at the age of 13 and was only recently just discharged. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder  and have a almost constant overwhelming feeling of panic in public spaces and have a fear of leaving my home. The reason I was placed placed into the ""program" was I was using drugs. [info] None [info] 1328737631
jesssrhee [info] I think I have tinnitus? Hi everyone, I’m 21 and am in college rn. Just as a background before I get into things: I was diagnosed with anxiety two years ago, but it’s been a lot worse these last two months. It’s always the worst when I go to bed because I have an irrational fear that something bad will happen while I’m sleeping. Over the last two months, random aches and pains in my body set off my anxiety into thinking there was something wrong with me, when in fact there was not. So, this brings me to last Sunday when I heard a faint ringing noise in my left ear as I was trying to fall asleep. This immediately set off my anxiety, and I became paranoid about what I was hearing. Suddenly I felt as if I was hearing a faint ringing noise. Eventually I was able to fall asleep and when I woke up I didn’t hear the ringing. As the week progressed, it felt like every night when I tried to go to sleep, the silence was too loud. Last night, I only got about 1.5 hours of sleep, because it seemed that the ringing was louder. I don’t know if it’s my mind playing tricks on me since my anxiety tends to do that, or if I do have tinnitus. The ringing seems to be very noticeable at night. During the day I can only hear it if it’s quiet and I’m focusing on the sound.I’m starting to freak out that it might be tinnitus. I recently started taking anxiety medication and have a fear that may have caused it. Also, I’ve abused the volume on my earbuds/headphones for way too long now, and am thinking that may have caused this.I’m mostly just writing this for sanity lol, but also to get some insight from others in this group. I plan on meeting with my doctor to get things checked out.Thanks so much for reading! [info] None [info] 1581768729
JustGuru [info] Hi there. I know exactly how you're feeling. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder as a teen and have been suffering with it since. I remember I would have irrational fears, such as a huge fear that an asteroid would destroy the planet. I remember one time I got so terrified that I literally ran around the neighborhood screaming that the world was ending once because I had watched some crazy documentary about how an asteroid would strike us and I was convinced that it was imminent. I didn't understand it at the time, but I was being manipulated to buy survival gear. I never really feared nuclear weapons, but I can understand why you would be scared. Trump is a foolish person who is manipulating the situation with North Korea to gain approval points, because his polls are so bad. I have a degree in national security and have worked for the Defense Department. While my area of focus wasn't nuclear weapons, I learned a lot about national security risks and how states act rationally. It is irrational to use nuclear weapons in today's world since it would immediately receive a massive response from world powers. If Kim launches a nuclear weapon, his power would be incinerated. It is utterly foolish for him to actually use nuclear weapons. So why does he have them?We are living in an age where dictators are a rare species and countries such as America have been known to overthrow them. Kim is also looking at the situation in East Asia and sees a strong Japan and South Korea, a major US presence in the region (we have tens of thousands of troops in ROK and Japan), and an increasingly weakening North Korean state. He legitimately fears that he may be overthrown in a moment of weakness and get the same treatment that Gaddafi got in Libya. The only way he sees that he could prevent this is by becoming a nuclear power. Nuclear weapons serve as a huge deterrent. Ever wonder why Russia and China haven't been invaded since World War II? It's because they have nuclear weapons. If Germany or Japan get any stupid ideas, they would be annihilated in a matter of hours. Therefore, it would be incredibly foolish to attack a nuclear armed stated. Kim knows that the South Korean military on its own is vastly superior to the North Korean military. While he has more manpower, South Korea has one of the most technologically advanced militaries in the world, while Kim is still using outdated weaponry from decades ago. This is not to say that it wouldn't be painful for South Korea, but Kim knows that eventually, he would lose. On top of that, South Korea is supported by the US which all but guarantees that he would lose. Therefore, he develops nuclear weapons and threatens to strike major cities or US bases to deter any attack on him. Many experts would agree that even though North Korea may seem irrational, it is in fact acting very rationally. [Here is one article you can read about it. ](https://www.google.com/amp/foreignpolicy.com/2017/04/26/kim-jong-un-is-a-survivor-not-a-madman/amp/) I can find you more if you're interested. Now I get that Trump is another issue to worry about. I worry about him too. But even with him, I still highly doubt he would use nuclear weapons. Even if Trump launched an invasion of DPRK, the first thing that would be taken out is Kim's nuclear launch capability. We have a multitude of means to do this. The real concern is artillery strikes on Seoul. Let me tell you though, that South Koreans themselves are not overly concerned with this. They have been living with this for decades and are used to it by now. If you are concerned about Russia, I would understand. It is rational to be worried about it because Russia is far more powerful than North Korea. But even then I think a major war is very unlikely. I have been studying this country for years and I have predicted many of its actions (such as an invasion of Ukraine and political interference in the West), but I don't predict any sort of nuclear war in the future. Russia has the same fears that North Korea has and it is acting rationally to regain its influence in the former Soviet Union and Central Europe. It is hard to explain because the situation is much more complex, but I think a war with Russia is even less likely than a war with North Korea. I am not saying that the risk is null, but it is still very unlikely that a nuclear war would break out. Personally, I'm more worried about issues like climate change or a major pandemic than I am of nuclear weapons. Nuclear war is not something to dismiss, but it is not something to be overly afraid of either. Kenneth Waltz, a noted international relations scholar, famously said DURING the Cuban Missile Crisis that nuclear war between two nuclear armed states was practically impossible. People thought he was crazy, but he turned out to be right.I hope this helps put you at ease.  [info] None [info] 1502278537
Alycat707 [info] It feels like my anxiety is controlling my life.. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and have been taking 20mg of Prozac a day for approximately two years now. Every single morning of my life, I wake up anxious. I Immediately start feeling nauseas and having stomach pains when I wake up. Nothing do suppresses the nausea, I've tried everything I can think of. The only thing that seems to calm my stomach is taking a lorapazam which I am prescribed to take during an anxiety attack. About %75 of the time I end up vomiting from the nausea. The nausea usually surpresses itself by noon, but sometimes it will last all day.. Other times I will have severe panic attacks when in stressful situations. I don't know what to do. Sometimes it feels like I can't even get out of bed. I just was wondering if anyone else feels this way. [info] None [info] 1453712064
tinybluesock [info] I made an appointment to see the doctor.. ...and I’m so scared.  All I feel is angry or scared or sad.  For over a month now.  Before that I had a period of feeling amazing...everything was spotless, I was up on all my reading, I hardly slept and got everything done!  I was productive!  Then... it just stopped.  I stayed in bed all day and skipped classes.  I yelled at my son.  I yelled at my SO, I yelled at myself.  I feel like I just cycle through “everything is awesome!  I am the most productive!” And “everything is shit, I fucking suck!”.  It’s been like that as long as I can remember.  My mother used to tell me I was such a drama queen and needed to grow up.  When I was in high school I was diagnosed with anxiety and possible ocd... but my treatment ended and I still had this flip-flop with no in between stage of “things are going well but I’m not insanely pumped”.  I’m never just... living, im always needing to do all the things, or none of the things.  I always believed that my mother was right and i was a crazy drama queen but I’m starting to think that if I know I’m a drama queen.. shouldn’t I be able to chill a little?  I feel like I don’t have any balance in my life... everything is one extreme or the other, never just...  the grey area?  I guess.. I don’t really know how to explain it and I’m worried my doctor won’t understand.  Or worse, he’ll confirm what my mother said and tell me to grow the fuck up... anyone else ever felt this way?  I feel like I’m crazy.  I feel like I’m realizing that all the things I’ve started and failed (in school mostly but also in relationships, sports...etc) always ends because I hit my “sad phase”.  My SO commented that he thought I should see a doctor, and I took one of those online tests from some Canadian psychology centre and it said I have like a really high chance of having some kind of mood issue so.... I’m kind of hoping I do.  I think it would be nice to be able to feel solid and to be able to function and succeed at stuff :/.  Then again, maybe I just need to work harder?  Sorry this is so long and rambley .... I’m just kind of freaking out, I feel like I’m just a big baby who needs to put on her big girl pants... but then again if I’ve tried that for well over a decade and it hasn’t helped maybe I do need to see the doctor?  Idk what the point of this post is... if anyone has any relatable experience I would love to hear it. [info] None [info] 1515163878
efogs11 [info] Vent/Question about maintaining and navigating relationships Hi friends. I (23F) am struggling with maintaining meaningful relationships in my life and I am wondering if anyone else in this community can relate and/or help me gain some perspective. **Brief background**: I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD about 4 years ago. I feel very fortunate that I am able to say that with the help of meds and the tools I've learned through therapy, I have found what works for me to function comfortably for the most part. *Here is where I am struggling* \- I feel like I get so hyper focused on a new person in my life whether that be a new friend or someone I've gone on a few dates with and am interested in romantically.  I have come such a long way from the anxious, terrified, self conscious, little girl that I once was - the little girl who hated herself so much that she truly was a bigger bully to herself than anyone else ever could have been. Thanks to many many years of therapy and listening to Lizzo on repeat (*Soulmate* = a banger), I have grown to love myself and am constantly reminding myself to be nice to me. I think some of the residual affects of this is very evident in my struggle to form meaningful relationships with people. If someone doesn't respond to a text I send, for example, there's this persistent and very loud voice in my head that loves to poke me relentlessly and freak out, saying things like "shit. fuck. What did you do wrong you idiot??? obviously its your fault that they aren't responding. They hate you for sure. You always ruin these things" - you get the idea. *For the record, I'm not actually hearing voices or whatever - sometimes the best way I can describe my ADHD brain is by giving it a character who is trying to have a conversation with me. This seems to help neurotypicals understand how I'm feeling.* &amp;#x200B;**Here's my question: How do I navigate the early stages of a relationship with a person I really like?**I feel like I go all in way too fast when I am seeing someone new. I really value feeling comfortable to totally be myself with a person that I am spending my time with - I want to jump to the "old and married for 50+ years" stage of a relationship with people I legit just met. Do other people with ADHD/anxiety feel this sort of dilemma in relationships? **TLDR**: I feel like I freak out and rush relationships because I am so scared that the other person is going to become uninterested. How do people navigate the early stages of a relationship with an ADHD brain?? [info] None [info] 1563912747
HireALLTheThings [info] Another death to the pile. Was riding my bike with a friend when I got a call telling me that another friend had suffered massive aneurysm and was about to die. It was the first time in my life that some one I really, truly knew had suddenly, without warning, passed away. I was completely numb for the ret of the day, then spent the following day completely wrecked with crying.I'll also never forget the first time I ever had a real panic attack before I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Felt like 3 days in hell while the world went on normally around me.Just for a dash of positivist, I have to add the feeling I got attending the graduation of a friend I made while working at  homeless drop in center. He had been addicted to crack for 5 years, but I saw something in him that I hadn't seen in other addicts in the center, and went beyond the job requirement to help him, which is  a HUGE risk for a social worker to take, but since that rehab graduation day, he's been clean for 3 years now. [info] None [info] 1374525900
Thannox [info] I understand what you mean. But in my case I feel incredibly sick throughout the day, as I was diagnosed with anxiety.Due to this I have missed substantial amount of high school due to feeling sick because of anxiety. [info] None [info] 1551628331
Kafke [info] I don't think I've experienced trauma, but I definitely get it. And I've been diagnosed with anxiety. I just wasn't aware there was a link. Interesting... [info] My toucan is also trans [info] 1478961937
justdustandechoes [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety 2 weeks ago when I finally picked up the confidence to see a doctor after dealing with it all for ~2 years. I'm 20, I can't do therapy because talking about it makes it worse, I've been given pills (10mg Citalopram daily) and so far they've been okay, but I still get waves of painful thoughts and worrying multiple times a day. [info] None [info] 1445265824
OhNoFlyingRhino [info] Would you have other resources? My problem is embarrassment. My mind remembers all the embarrassments and I blurt our an expletive. I hate this but I can’t seem to control it. I have been diagnosed with anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1546205859
XANAXandDABZ [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety, I'd definitely recommend just getting a benzo script, at the end of the day it's better for your liver. Plus if you have health care it winds to being cheaper for higher quality drugs  [info] None [info] 1427084150
spookyartskeleton [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and while it's gotten better than it used to be, I still get the occasional anxiety attack. One night I was laying in bed trying to sleep. I usually don't have problems laying alone in bed but for some reason unbeknownst to me I couldn't rest. I turned onto my side, and I felt someone breathing on me, as if they were inches from my face. I opened my eyes and there was no one. I listened to see if I heard the A/C turn on, but heard nothing. I swear to this day I felt distinct breath on my face. I turned over onto my other side and tried to forget about it. After a few minutes again I felt someone's breath inches from my face. I looked around my room. I have posters on my walls, and while I looked at them trying to calm down they seemed to morph and twist, like I was hallucinating. I thought I was dreaming so I checked my clock and pulled out my phone to try and confirm I was awake. This is when I got the sickest, most paranoid impending doom feeling I've ever felt. I felt like something extremely horrible was about to happen. My stomach did flips, I was sweating and shaking but I couldn't find the energy to move or get out of bed. I've never felt unsafe in my room, and I've had anxiety attacks before but this was by far the worst. It might not be paranormal but Jesus did it scare me. Eventually I just noped straight out of my room and slept in a different room that night. The following nights I took melatonin to help me sleep and I was fine. I'm still not sure what happened and why I got that feeling, because nothing did end up happening that night. [info] None [info] 1559493220
triplexpac [info] It’s funny, I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on meds, which helped a lot. Now I have been diagnosed with severe sleep apnea as well. Very curious to see how things change as I get my CPAP [info] None [info] 1570638880
bcxx143 [info] I was treated for PTSD, Depression, Bipolar disorder as a teenager and I've been off meds for like 6 years. Now I'm diagnosed with anxiety and it's really bad, so back to therapy and medication I go. So, yes. [info] None [info] 1473809377
WookieRubbersmith [info] Any experience with Wellbutrin? Hi, friends!I'm in my late 20s, and have not been medicated until this point (parents "don't believe in ADHD" and are against pharmaceutical intervention, so it's taken a while to work through that).My coping mechanisms aren't enough anymore, so I decided to talk to my therapist about meds. I've been diagnosed with anxiety on top of the ADHD, so he's pretty sure stimulants will be a bad fit for me. He's recommended Wellbutrin, which is an antidepressant that's apparently cross prescribed for ADHD.Anyone have any experience with Wellbutrin for ADHD? Anyone taken both stimulants and Wellbutrin before who can compare how they work (for you, not chemically as a drug)? Anyone with anxiety as well who has had a good experience with stimulants or any particular non-stimulant treatment?I'm a little freaked out about the idea of taking an antidepressant when I'm not depressed, but that might just be my "pharmaceuticals are baad, mkay?" baggage cropping up. [info] None [info] 1541001221
ChocChipCookiee [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, I have panic attacks often but they feel very different to what I described above. My panic attacks are often a result of my worrying, followed by increased heart rate and heavy breathing. I often begin crying and getting angry as well but my anxiety attacks feel very different to what I described previous. Also to answer your question, I am not on any medication beside a few herbal extracts to ease my symptoms - however I haven't been on them enough to say if they have any effects or not  [info] None [info] 1441539765
anonomie [info] I definitely do not lack empathy. And you're wrong. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. You're flipping this onto ME, when this is about YOU. This shows an extreme lack of maturity.  [info] None [info] 1479056480
AndBack983 [info] Extremely Frustrated. Trouble Swallowing. Anxiety and Acid Reflux. Just a little bit of background, before the question.I am diagnosed with anxiety, and acid reflux.I was diagnosed with anxiety and acid reflux a few years ago. I am a smoker as well as a heavy caffeine drinker. For the last couple years I have had on average moderate-severe(severity is off an on) acid reflux symptoms, burning in stomach and chestt, lightheadedness, and my throat burning and numb. A day or two a month the burning and sickness gets so bad I have  to lay down and feel like death.I guess the way I was raised I do not get check ups unless it is a life or death health situation. And obviously I smoke and have continued to smoke which I'm sure worsens my anxiety and my acid reflux, therefore making my swallowing even more difficult.The doctors have told me that nicotine and caffeine will increase anxiety as well as acid reflux-which will then cause difficulty swallowing. So I have cut my nicotine intake by about half and am having less caffeinated drinks and sodas.  But still the problem persists.For weeks my swallowing gets severe and then goes down to a smaller level of difficulty, but still gets in the way of my eating and happiness in life.I do not eat in public because my anxiety gets so bad while I'm eating and I can't eat, or I take an hour to eat. It gets extremely embarrassing when I have to turn down eating out requests or eating at a co-workers house. The times I have forced myself to go have been embarrassing due to me being unable to eat and having to walk out. Just imagine if you invited some one over for dinner and they got a mouthful of spaghetti and spit it out into a napkin, and then finally made up an excuse, left the house and their food at the table. That's me. There are foods that I don't eat at all because I feel them get stuck in my throat. These are foods like long noodles and most meats that are chewy. My problem isn't so much that I think I will choke, its just that trying to get myself to even swallow takes so long I get angry and quit trying. I chew my food very finely and even when I swallow its like my swallowing mechanism glitches. I go to swallow and can't make myself do it. So I just keep trying to swallow. When I finally do swallow I can feel the food get stuck and slowly works it way down my throat (even when I chew the food until its almost liquid.). Also, some days I eat almost anything and don't have any trouble hardly at all. But those days are rare.So if someone could recommend something to me. I'm in kind of a binder due to my smoking habit and caffeine habit, but am working on it and have cut down by about half a pack a day in the last week. Even though I'm smoking less, I still am having trouble swallowing. Is their any steps I can take to get this solved. I'm worried since I never got this acid reflux and anxiety ever treated or medicated that I have done permanent damage to my throat.THanks. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1450413449
Shraamper [info] Oh thank you! I work on philosophy quite a bit. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, so I philosophy my way out of it. [info] None [info] 1562597327
LurkingForMusic [info] I posted twice on a personal subject and now my heart is racing. Hey r/anxiety: I've never posted here before but but I've been lurking a long time. I was diagnosed with anxiety several years ago and it has been a daily struggle for me. Especially here on Reddit, which is where my anxiety is focused on right now. So I'd appreciate some advice or even just support. Sorry for formatting, I'm on mobile...Ok so...Usually I just lurk and rarely I make a comment on reddit posts. Over the years I've made and abandoned many accounts because I made a comment I later regretted and couldn't bear to have the account anymore. The stress always becomes too much. With this account I tried to swear off posting forever: but now I'm going down that same slippery slope again. This morning, I took a leap and shared a little rant on a very personal subject (being trans). The first post actually went ok and I was proud of myself. Or at least it's been doing ok. It had positive votes. But then I made another post... a second, unintentional rant... replying to someone who commented on my original post. That one did not go over as well as the first. Negative vote. Not a lot, but nevertheless: that minus sign always makes me panic. Now my heart is beating like crazy and I can't stop thinking about it. I keep editing and rereading my post over and over again. I've edited it several times for typos, clarification, etc... and have come close to deleting it multiple times. I'm trying really hard not to. I feel way in over my head and in the past hour have not been able calm myself down again. I thought I was ready for this but I think I pushed myself too far yet again. I don't want to abandon this account. I don't want to delete my comments or keep editing and rereading in desperation to get rid of that meaningless, yet all-powerful negative sign. I want to be OK with seeing it there. I want to be able to contribute to Reddit and make comments without spiraling out of control whenever they don't go over well. I'll never meet the people who argue with me on here or give and take these imaginary internet points. And yet, I'm thinking of abandoning account number "who-knows-I-lost-count-years-ago"....So... what should I do? What steps can I I take to finally overcome this? [info] None [info] 1506552107
unpubpoet [info] So the anxiety goes in and out? I was diagnosed with anxiety at like 8 years old, so it’s nothing new. I do feel like pregnancy has made it worse! [info] None [info] 1506718017
Ownfir [info] Up until I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago I honestly thought that all people thought the same way I did, with this much worry. (I'm a guy.) My mind is similar to this but with more future concerns and less present concerns. To think that someone just has like a blank empty mind is almost impossible for me to comprehend because my mind is *always* thinking.  [info] None [info] 1454214832
Throwaway93728 [info] BF [24M] said I was needy after I [24F] had a panic attack. Hi everyone! I wanted to get some more opinions to if I'm being too needy or not since that's the last thing I want to look like. We've both been together for 2.5 years now.To start it off, a few months ago, both of us had been really stressed out due to our jobs. For me, I was experiencing other issues as well, like my grandma, who I'm very close with, falling down and slowly getting worse in health.I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I take medicine for it on a daily basis plus another prescription for when I have a rare panic attack.Well one morning, I had a pretty sever panic attack despite not having one for ages. I believe the stress that weekend really got to me. My BF was planning to come over that day later but since it was the weekend, we both were pretty free from obligations. I text him telling him what's happened and if he could come over earlier instead since I was still feeling bad. Well after a three hours, he finally comes over. He agrees to come over but for some odd reason, it took him two hours rather than the usual 40 minutes. I texted him asking where he was and he told me he had decided to stop by Office Max to scan some papers for his new job. To me, I felt like despite knowing that I was upset that morning, it seemed like I was pushed to the back burner. I know he needed to scan some documents but I don't understand why he couldn't of done it after he had come over? We later talked about it and he told me I was being needy for wanting him over and that stopping by a place real quick. I feel bad since I feel like I'm the future when something happens, will I be put on the back burner as well? I understand scanning these documents was important but something just rubs me the wrong way. I told him if he was upset and needed some comfort, I'd go directly to his place. I want to be there in times of need for my BF.So my real question is, am I being too needy? I really don't want to come off that way so please let me know! Thank you!TL;DR: Had a rare panic attack and asked if my BF to come over earlier than planned. He said he could but took longer than expected since he went to Office Max first to scan documents. Despite knowing I was upset, him going to Office Max made me feel like my feelings weren't important. He claims I am being too needy. [info] None [info] 1468675504
StevieKnickers [info] After the fall of a ten year (on and off) 'relationship' with my high school sweetheart, I had a nervous breakdown and sought a psychiatrist. I was diagnosed with anxiety and an eating disorder. I am also codependent and a perfectionist...being the daughter of addicts/alcoholics, I've known this for quite awhile. Low dose ntidepressants have really helped me get over the hump, but I also do bi-weekly therapy and nutrition counseling. I'm learning how to obtain balance and use healthy coping skills when I feel out of control.  This has been mostly journaling, exercising, and positive self-talk. It's still hard every single day, but I feel myself thinking/acting more mindfully. The next step is hopefully moving away from my family, which is a huge trigger of mine. I love them more than anything, but we tend to enable each other's unhealthy behaviors. I also want to explore my own interests and abilities as a young woman since I've always relied on my family and ex for emotional support and to occupy the time when I would be learning about myself. It's a slow journey, but I just remember that I need to get better so I can love myself and appreciate a healthy man. Good luck on your own journey! :) [info] None [info] 1363326029
kariroxygirl [info] I feel the same way and I was diagnosed with anxiety. I still feel out of it and crazy :( idk how much longer I will feel like this. Also I got sent to a physicist  [info] None [info] 1548400505
theclamguy [info] It started about a month ago before I was diagnosed with anxiety.  I believed it is anxiety induced but i was wondering if anyone with anxiety went through this too. [info] None [info] 1571086096
HondaGirlMN [info] I have agoraphobia. I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder about 5 years ago. Since then I've been taking Zoloft. It helps take the edge off a little bit, but by no means has cured it. I tried going to a psychologist but I panicked too much and would just not show up to my appointments. Now, years later, my anxiety is the worst it's ever been. I discovered the books by Dr. Claire weekes and holy shit, this lady knows what she is talking about. One of the best books I've ever read..seriously. I've been following the steps in her book and pushing myself. It's hard. Really hard. But totally worth it. [info] http://smile.amazon.com/registry/wishlist/15YFVGGE3DLZH  [info] 1412282623
reallyokfinewhatever [info] &gt; How can you tell if your struggles are due to an actual issue, or due to finally hitting a "challenging" level of work that is actually hard for you?In grade school up to 6th grade, school was shockingly easy for me. Laughably easy. I was told I was a bright kid. I was told I was naturally good at everything--sports, music, math, writing.In 7th grade I got my first A instead of an A+ (*shock!horror*). And I wondered if I wasn't smart anymore. In 8th grade I got my first B+ and I honestly thought I was completely failing, or had contracted a terminal brain diseases or something.In high school, I realized kids did this thing called "studying" and I didn't get how staring at a textbook made you smarter. My strategy was always to get really stressed out the day before a test and just wing it. I thought, if I didn't just know it then I must be inherently stupid and bad at learning.I spent SO much time trying to figure out how to study. I could stare at a textbook taking notes for hours and retain nothing. Meanwhile, I also found that turning my studying into games--like simultaneously teaching myself PHP in order to code myself a practice test for history class--made my information retention skyrocket.As I continued to go up in grade levels, college, etc. I came to find that I actually had NO sense of discipline, motivation, or focus. My entire four years in college were spent agonizing over how much I could not focus, feeling like a failure, and missing deadlines.I wished desperately for the years when I was little that everything just made sense to me because I thought that was how I was SUPPOSED to be--just inherently knowing everything without trying. When I had to truly focus and work hard to learn, I found my thoughts were actually completely scattered this whole time, and it made me increasingly agitated and incapable of functioning.For a long time I was diagnosed with anxiety (which, to be fair, I totally had/have). Like the typical high-functioning kid/young adult I was, every time I said something that revealed my low self-esteem, I was tagged as the typical perfectionist pretty girl with anxiety and an eating disorder. No one ever suspected ADHD until I did, and it wasn't until AFTER college when my symptoms finally became so extremely obvious, completely outside of an academic setting.All this to say maybe think about the non-academic symptoms you might be having--it became laughably obvious to me that ADHD was the driving factor my whole life once I came to identify all the symptoms I had that were not aggravated by school. [info] None [info] 1512315215
therandolphcarter [info] Thanks for the response. A few years ago I've been diagnosed with anxiety but it also happens when I'm relaxing at home. It happens simultaneously. Whenever my feet gets cold (but only my feet, not the whole body) my face starts to flush almost immediately.  [info] None [info] 1453023658
sinamonbun712 [info] Feel Separate From The World Around Me **trigger warning**So I [22 f] have been experiencing this frequently, and it makes me feel alone. I want to know if anyone else feels like this too? I was diagnosed with anxiety at age 15, and known I’ve been anxious my entire life. But over the last few years I have started to develop such a weird experience that I don’t know if it’s attributed to anxiety or not. There will be times, and I notice it gets worse as the day progresses, where I feel like I’m not alive. Like I am almost looking at my life from someone else’s perspective. I feel like I’m in a trance. Like I’m somehow living in a dream. I will think about this and let it consume me. Then it makes me think that I am dying, that I will die when I go to sleep, or that I am not alive at all. But then all is well when I wake up in the morning (after combatting with my anxious thoughts before falling asleep from exhaustion). Am I the only one that feels this way? It’s such a hard thing to describe, and I don’t know if I am even describing it that well. But I’m experiencing it now and no one in my life has anxiety or will understand at all what I’m going through. If you experience this, what helps you overcome these feelings? I feel scared and tired and alone. [info] None [info] 1516936192
OnlyLewbert [info] Can someone help explain what this feeling is?? I was diagnosed with anxiety months ago however I never think I experience “anxiety attacks” however the other day I was sat at my computer and in a split second my mood just switched to what I can only describe as a severe sad feeling, my stomach just dropped, and I just felt horribly sad about I guess life in general, I just felt like suddenly crying. Is this an anxiety attack or is it something else? [info] None [info] 1557962461
disappointmentpanda1 [info] The midday zone-out OK, guys. I need your help.First, the backstory: I'm in my mid-40s. I was diagnosed with ADHD about three years ago. I take medication — and it helps. I've also been diagnosed with PTSD, which started to come on about six years ago (I had no idea what was happening for years). I grew up with an alcoholic father (now many decades sober and awesome) and a borderline mother (still borderlining!). Long before the PTSD surfaced I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder. There's more to the story behind the PTSD, of course, but we'll leave all that be for tonight.Despite all this I've accomplished a lot in my career, earned some accolades, made some dough, etc. Of course, under the surface has been — and remains — a ton of shame, all from endless talking-tos from bosses, performance reviews that point to my talents but plead with me to correct my poor work habits, authority figures exasperated with my inability to grasp the concept of time and my constant marching, despite my best efforts at the time, to the beat of my own punk band playing nonstop in my head, etc. You know the drill.In time, the PTSD totally derailed me. Job. Family life. Ability to enjoy anything. Basic... functioning as a human being. Full stop. I was in the blackest, darkest, loneliest place. It's indescribable. I never thought that could happen to a guy like me. I always knew something wasn't quite right. I never understood why I couldn't "get it together" and why I felt like I was always fumbling my way through life like a Steve Martin routine. Years ago, I wasn't sure if I believed ADHD existed and I *thought* I would never be able to identify with anyone experiencing "flashbacks" or "triggers." But it's real. It happened to me. I'm told I'm a textbook case. (Of course, we all know that trauma, anxiety disorders and all the rest run with ADHD like a pack of wild dogs. I'm one of those cases, and I'm super grateful to know what's going on on both the ADHD and the trauma fronts.)I spent a number of months in treatment for the PTSD. It's been a long, strange trip, as they say, with a fair number of dead ends and wrong turns. But it's getting better all the time. I was able to get a long run of TMS treatments, which were a miracle. I read. I pray. I try to get to the cushion and mediate (that part of the routine is a work in progress.) I'm getting back to my old self. It's amazing.I recently took a job as a delivery driver — a wide departure from my career path — and it's been awesome, because it's starting to show me just where my cognitive deficits surface and how they affect my day. It's like a lab where I can experiment with my ADHD, anxiety and assorted cognitive glitches. The driving gig lets me put all that under a microscope and see it do its thing. The gig is intense. 10 hours. House to house to apartment complex to office building. No time for lunch breaks. Where's the next address? Where's the package? How many packages are there? Go. Go. Go. I pee in a water jug in the back of the delivery van if necessary.The job forces me to focus just on what I'm doing no matter how boring — follow the GPS directions, find the private road in the countryside, turn the hulking beast of a delivery van around without rolling it into a ditch or hitting a mailbox. It's a challenge. Directions have always been hard for me. It's like my brain takes an extra beat to process what Google Maps (or any human being, come to think of it) is telling me. I often miss turns. (Again, more shame, the kind that comes in little doses and poisons your whole view of yourself.)That's my backstory. (Maybe unnecessary, for our purposes here. But what the hell — it's the ADHD sub and maybe one of you will spot something that speaks to the question at hand.)*So here's where I need your help tonight. No matter what job I'm working, white collar or blue, I've always  run into the same problem: Start the day in a bit of a fog (mornings aren't my thing), sprint from late morning into mid-afternoon (killing it!) and then, sometime around mid-to-late afternoon, my brain goes... I don't know how to say it... soft, foggy. It's like I run out of stamina. I have a lot more trouble focusing on what I'm doing, the words in front of me, what I need to do next, even if I've taken my meds. The little ADHD demon on my shoulder whispers, "You've got a bunch of more hours! You're good!" Somewhere in that haze I lose my sense of time.*And then suddenly I come to — maybe it's a jolt from the boss; maybe a glance at the clock. And now, panic. I'm racing to get the job done. I'm late. The boss is pissed. Some days I scrape by. Other days I get the same feedback I've gotten in every job I've ever worked. And then the shame and the feeling of defeat. I had been determined that this day was going to be different — I was going to get it done and feel great about myself at day's end. But again, not to be.The delivery driving job has brought this into stark relief (again, it's my ADHD lab) and I'm determined to stop this cycle. I don't expect to make it all go away forever, but just to work with it — win little victories and enjoy those victories. Little by little, I just want to have a workday like other folks, come home and know it's time to relax with the family, be of service to my wife and kids, and leave the stress of the workday behind. You know, normal.But I just haven't gotten there yet. And I'm so tired of getting chewed out by bosses, talked to like I'm... a kid (ugh!) and feeling less-than and not good enough all the time. It's a familiar tale, I know from reading this sub for several years.***My questions are these: Why do I go into that midday fog? How can I avoid it? How do you guys handle it and work with it? How did you find success in overcoming it, finding a workday rhythm. What did that look like at first and what does it look like now?***I'm grateful to all of you. I haven't chimed in much on this sub, but you've all been telling my story in your own way and it's been a great experience.Any suggestions are much, much appreciated.Thanks much.\[EDIT: Added a sentence I forgot to include.\] [info] None [info] 1564803002
Nasserahmed094 [info] Bro I was diagnosed with anxiety/OCD and was prescribed with anti-depressants. They made feel like I'm 10 years back without any worries and nothing that I have slept one of the best sleep in almost 10 years (I'm 22 btw and this was 2 years ago). I think the main cause of all this is PMO but the anti-depressant and supplements stopped having effect after 2 weeks of taking them and I decided not to take anymore. Now I'm on day 83 of NoFap and the anxiety is killing me. Do you think I should see a doctor or wait for a few more months? [info] 35 days [info] 1467567520
Aezthetics [info] Strange sensation when stretching neck/shoulder. \[23\]\[M\]\[5'11"\]\[200 lbs\] When i try to stretch my neck, specifically the back neck muscles, i can feel this odd sensation on the right side of my chest and shoulder. It's hard to explain the sensation. It's almost like a ripping/tearing feeling with no pain. It feels like its a straight line going from my right pec to right shoulder. I'm not sure if these descriptions are descriptive enough, but i figured i might as well try. I have mentioned this to my doctor but since i'm diagnosed with anxiety most obscure things like this are written off as stress symptoms.Curious to see if anybody has any clue as to what it could be. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1569840376
Oniguri [info] What? It's not subjective, I have cysts scans from before my diet and a year after and the cysts on my ovaries are literally gone. It's insulin related so being ketogenic stops the progression, but carnivore put it into remission. I was diagnosed with anxiety by a practitioner, I'm not self-diagnosed, I know what it felt like and the fact you're telling me 'it's denial' shows a significant lack of empathy and bias on your side.Why are you so against people getting better? Who cares how it's done, lets just acknowledge something positive is happening and try and understand the mechanism. Maybe I'll die of CVD in 20 years, who knows? But at the moment I feel better than I ever have in my life and my mental clarity is something I thought I'd never achieve.Science is about seeking truth not your predisposed dogmas.  Also, what you don't seem to understand, I didn't do this diet first. This was literally my LAST course of action after trying every single diet that was supposed to improve symptoms, none of them helped. I didn't wake up one day and decide to eat lamb fat and rare liver lol, it was slow progression and following the things that made me feel good and lessened my symptoms. Digestion being the most impactful. [info] None [info] 1561388123
hspt91 [info] 0/90 - I need to get it off my chest   Addiction in PMO is not easy to talk with friends or friends, or maybe I’m just a coward and that's why I’m talking to you who have the same problem as me. I was always a reserved and quiet person and at 16 I was diagnosed with anxiety and PMO seemed to be the solution. It was something that at that moment made me feel that I was alive. Fast foward I am 28 years old and I feel alone.I have a good job, actually better than most of my friends, but I see the people around me having serious relationships and being happy and confident. And I? I feel like a spectator on my own life, a spectator just like the porn movies I watch. I can't have deep relationships with other people. I never loved and I was never loved.I found Nofap a year ago, and soon realized that PMO I'm an addict. I've had a 20-day streak where I've noticed great benefits, and yet I keep failing.I just relapsed cause I’m feeling lonely, and this time I am writing this post to have the motivation not to start from 0 again in the futre. I think Nofap is my last resort to not continue wasting the best years of my life .From this moment on I will plan my days, I will meditate, I will find new hobbies, I will try to socialize more, I will try to keep busy to not fall in temptation again.Finally, I want to thank you all, I want to thank you for showing me that I am not alone in this fight. I wish you all to keep fighting this addiction. Please fight, cause I will. [info] None [info] 1567029722
lazahisa [info] Unintentional Weightloss, fatigue and more! 42FIn the last couple of years the fatigue has become unbearable. Then in the last year my weight has gone from 163 to 140. Most of this occurred in about 1 months time. I was having horrible stomach cramps, nause and diarrhea so I figured it was a Gastro issue and that was the cause weightloss. I was given stool tests for blood and parasites. Both negative.  Then one day the diarreha turned to constipation. I go days now.  The nausea is better and I have more of an appetite and am eating a lot and I'm not gaining any weight. Other issues are cold feet. Like painfully cold. Horrible anxiety, concentration issues and brain fog, hives daily, joint pain and rashes in the bends of my elbows.I have been diagnosed with anxiety, fibromialgia hydratinitis suprativa, SVT and IBS. I have had cbc with diff, RA test, TSH, Celiac test, uric acid, and ANA blood tests and all were negative.I was given an abdominal and pelvic ct with contrast and it was unremarkable except for kidneys. I was given a renal US and it showed bladder retention and mild bilateral hydronephrosis. I assume this is from a urethral or bladder prolapse that I have. I have an appt with Urology in Jan.  I don't think the mild hydronephrosis could be causing the weightloss and fatigue though.Anyway, what would you ask for or do next. I have a family history of heart disease on my maternal side and cancer on the paternal. Cancers were colorectal and throat I believe. Oh and I has my gallbladder removed a few years ago. Thanks! [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1577578605
firfetir [info] Well, I can relate to your symptoms.. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back and breathing has been a problem more like every once in a while, usually when a specific thing is stressing me out, but not always. I sometimes, very suddenly, will start feeling terrible and realise I've forgotten to take a breath for a moment. Sometimes it's because I'm so lost in my thoughts but sometimes it can be because I'm so lost in whatever I'm watching/doing. Then, I take a breathe and my heart races and I'm focused on not just breathing but taking good, deep breaths.It really sounds like anxiety to me - even more so because you're so worried it's something worse. And it makes sense, since your vacation plans got fucked up. I hope you can find an alternative to your plans and I think you should read up on anxiety some more - it manifests in many ways. I've never had a lump in my throat but I have a bad habit of picking at my skin. If it is anxiety, it's important to learn how to relieve your stress day to day - without the vacation. Diet, exercise, hobbies, therapy, medication... There are a lot of ways to improve.I don't feel like my response was very helpful but it's all I could think of. Trouble breathing is a common problem with anxiety so I'm surprised this doesn't have more comments. [info] None [info] 1496444243
scaredthrowawayUSA [info] [United States] [Ohio] Bought some DVDs/Blu-Rays online a while back and are afraid they might be pirated. Should I be worried about being arrested? Seller has my name and address since I thought they were run by the content owners. Veteran Reddit user, throwaway for obvious reasons.So I'm a big pro wrestling fan. A while back (several months) I decided I wanted to check out some stuff from Japan, since I heard it was good. Searching online, I found the website rudoreels dot com. It looked legit, had apparently been around since 2011 or 2012, didn't give my PC any viruses, and the person running the site's Twitter (@rudoreels) was very friendly and helped with my questions. So I bought a bunch (~$150 US, about a dozen items) of DVDs and Blu-Rays from the site, figuring it was run by the Japanese companies that made the shows. They worked fine and looked great. But then I saw a well-known blogger (@enuhito) call the site a pirate site (https://twitter.com/enuhito/status/232425124832362496) and got worried. I thought the site was legit, so I had put my real name and address in the mailing address "box" and used my real e-mail to make an account. If the people or person running the site (who apparently live in Massachusetts) turn out to be a pirate and get arrested and their documentation/data gets seized by police, can I (an Ohio resident) be in legal trouble even though I thought they were legit? Also, if they are arrested and their data is seized, what is the likelihood that the police would go after me? What punishments could I face? I still have the DVDs/Blu-Rays in my residence.Thanks for any help that you can provide. Been unable to sleep tonight (currently about 5:00 AM) since I'm worried the police are going to target me for this (I was diagnosed with anxiety ~10 years ago and tend to over-worry). [info] None [info] 1470215750
nikkissippi121 [info] Interestingly enough, I was diagnosed with ADHD years before I was diagnosed with anxiety - the actual cause - even though it should have been apparent based on my frequent panic attacks (these happened daily - I was only 8 and they'd been going on since preschool at least). [info] None [info] 1432643744
ndp506 [info] Hi mom, sorry I'm not my sister Hi mom, I'm sorry that I'm not my older sister. I've tried to do everything I can to make you proud but it's never felt enough. Every time we get together, I'm reminded how much you prefer my sister and brother in law over me and my wife. Every story we share, you some how manage to bring up a similar situation they went through. I don't know if you've noticed but I have stopped sharing things I'm going through because I can't hear anymore about what they may or may not have gone through. Yes I know they experienced an extremely scary situation when they were expecting their first child. Yes it was traumatic for my brother in law to have a 6" brain tumor but he survived and is thriving now. You and dad still act as though he's not. You and dad have made us feel like we're not priorities.During that time, I had plans to propose to my now wife. I asked you both if I had your blessings and the  things dad said to me to degrade, humiliate and just break me were horrible. I needed you to have my back, but you didn't. I've had to sweep it under the rug. I don't know if you've even noticed that I'm not open with you or him. You are always concerned about what people you know think about you but you could care less about what your son thinks of you. I'm sorry that we're not physicians and business owners but we're doing fine. Our son has a great life and I've promised him that I'll always support him, listen to his feelings and never compare him to others. Growing up, I thought it was normal to be compared to a sibling. I thought it was normal to be called various names because it came off as a joke. I only started to realize that's not how it should be. I'm almost 35. I was diagnosed with anxiety last fall but you don't know about it because you and dad don't think mental illnesses are real. I sought help, I'll be fine. I just hope that one day you'll see that I tried. That I'm doing the best that I can. I hope it's before you regret it. [info] None [info] 1587570141
FreezeWolfy [info] Agreed. Another issue is, if you think you have a serious issue, get HELP and don't just leave the diagnosis without seeking proper care. When I was diagnosed with anxiety it was my kindergarten teacher who realized my anxiety levels were abnormal, and she talked to my parents/school guidance counselors, she didn't just say "oh, this girl has anxiety, cool".  [info] Shitlady [info] 1424365943
nacreous [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety issues a while back. Anxiety is not a legitimate excuse to be mean to your SO, and you need to let her know that. She needs to take this up with her shrink (I assume she's being treated for her anxiety) and she needs to learn how to fight fair. [This link](http://www.wikihow.com/Fight-Fair-in-Relationships) is to a quick overview of how to fight fair in a relationship.Seriously, don't take this lying down. [info] None [info] 1290021999
djsnek69 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety last week lmao. Just relax man. Try talking to your school counselor [info] 🎉 1,000,000 Attendee! 🎉 [info] 1552984062
nedermeier [info] okay. thank you very much. maybe it is, I am diagnosed with anxiety also. [info] None [info] 1488827696
clearlyalark [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks and bpdII.  This sounds like tachycardia or maybe even ventricular fibrillation (beats around 300) if it feels like you had to go to the hospital.  I have only officially been diagnosed with “panic attacks”, not heart issues, because I’m never in the Dr.’s office when tachycardia occurs - though my provider agreed that it was most likely what I was experiencing.  That being said, Pranayama yogic breathing exercises are really the ONLY thing that helps stop rapid heart beats for me.  Hope this provides some useful info 🤟🏻 [info] None [info] 1538840948
summer1171 [info] I have gp. Have you ever had an endoscopy? Honestly anxiety shows it’s self in many ways. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 7. My main symptoms were nausea and vomiting. But because it came with lots of crying it was thrown off as anxiety. Not until age 22 was I given an endoscopy and then a gastric emptying scan ultimately diagnosing me with gp. So I in no way want to tell you it could just be anxiety. But what I will say is that there are many other gi illnesses than gp. It seems to be the new thing everyone comes up with! Your symptoms definitely mimick some symptoms but it could be a number of things. Research the gp diet and follow that while you wait for an appt with a gi doctor. I’m keeping my fingers crossed for you that it’s not gp. Just know if it is there’s a separate group on here as well as Facebook devoted to gp :)  [info] None [info] 1539316816
vNotrix [info] Looking for advice, most likely anxiety related insomnia Hi, first post here. I’m a college student, and for the past 4-6 weeks I’ve been having difficulty falling asleep. It used to be just once every 1-2 months but now it’s every weekday. I’ll lay in bed around 12am and i’ll toss and turn until 1:30-2:00am when I have to wake up at 8am. The weird part is that this doesn’t happen on weekends (friday and saturday night) and it has never happened to me at home. It also started and has been getting worse when my roommate started snoring. I have tried melatonin, generic Zzzquil, cbd, and nyquil. Nothing helps me fall asleep at a normal time. All they do is increase my heart rate. Is there anything I should try or any tips on how to get over this? I’m assuming it’s some sort of anxiety related. I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past. Not getting 7-8 hours of sleep makes me grumpy and sad in general so that hasn’t been helping. Thank you [info] None [info] 1583860626
dunkkyyy [info] Require Guidance on Medication I am a 22 year old male recent college graduate. I'm about 5'10 and 130 lbs (underweight i know, but it's the same story with my parents. I am caucasian. I have had issues focusing and having a "drive" throughout my life (probably since I was 14 or so). I used to consider my racing mind as a strength but the anxiety and overthinking and inability to get things done has taken its toll.  This is a medication question. My parents are very against adderall/vyvanse type medications (and who can blame them with all these children being given a drug they might not need, they are just kids. My doctor is aware of my past history of self treatment and i think he would laugh off this request. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and take Lexapro. I'm wondering what are my possible next steps to fixing my current mental situation and I thought this was the appropriate subreddit, my apologies if it is not.I have included my location in the post incase state regulation may play a part in this. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1563101973
solojones1138 [info] I thought I had a TIA once and my roommate had to call 911 for an ambulance. Turned out to just be a random panic attack (this was before I was diagnosed with anxiety). But my face was numb and I couldn't speak properly, so it was definitely scary. [info] None [info] 1571242611
adhdmaybe [info] I have both. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. I wanted to be sure anxiety wasn't the reason for the ADHD symptoms. The second when I told her the problems I was having said I had a clear case of ADHD.  [info] None [info] 1451847944
PentaQQ [info] I feel like I'm a complete melt and am being cornered Hey guys! First time posting here. I don't really know how to structure long posts so it might get messy. Furthermore, I know I might sound EXTREMELY selfish in certain points but I'm just so burnt out I dont know anymore. And finally, sorry for the long post. There's a lot that I wanted to go through...I'm truly sorry for that :(.So a little background before I get into the my problem. A few years prior to the events I'm about to unfold, I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and have since been on medication from then till now. Fast forward a few years till 2018, I've been studying abroad since Feb 2018 in Canada (and I'm in Grade 11 so I'm not having those freshman problems I think) and during the semester from Feb till June, everything was going fine. I made some new friends, met a store clerk from the music store who was willing to teach me all about music production (which I was REALLY into it) and was I generally satisfied with how life was going. Then, I went back to my home country during the Summer.However, things started to go downhill after I came back from Summer. (to be honest my summer didn't go particularly well as I had several breakdowns and confrontations with my friends back in my home country but I want to solve my current issues first). The first issue I encountered was that I felt so different when I'm at school, as if I was an outsider to the school. It's just as if the school's atmosphere had took a 360 degree change. I don't know why but I just feel an external pressure pushing down on me for every step that I took within the school grounds. I just don't feel like myself anymore when I'm at school. The second issue I had was with the music instructor (the aforementioned clerk). He was a genuinely good teacher and tolerated me. However, when I tried to ask him when he will be available so we can have a lesson, he didn't respond. I know he had a busy schedule and stuff and I completely understand that. But he was constantly in game which had me questioning. Am I a nuisance to him? Does he want to stop teaching me? Theres still so much I wanted to learn about and this made me scared and unmotivated as I feel like I was left in the dark, trying to find the exit to this darkness with nothing but a dim of light.I'm just so burnt out at this point where normally everyday afterschool, I would be quite enthusiastic to talk with my friends in Canada and just make music in general but now, I'm just finding contents on Youtube to take some stress off my mind, wasting time. I don't know what to do. I don't feel like I'm myself at school anymore and I've started to fear what I once used to have a passion for. I'm just a complete melt and feel like I'm being cornered.Once again, sorry for the long and unorganized pile of text...I'm just so stressed and shit I don't know anymore...but big ups to whoever read the whole thing :) You are the MVPs. [info] None [info] 1536636831
jennlody [info] I definitely do. I started getting sicker when I was 15, and no one believed me. I never threw up so they couldn't actually see any symptoms so they thought it was in my head. They thought I was being bullied or was scared to go to school so I was making up being sick so I didn't have to go. They bribed me with donuts ironically. I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on meds. After months of treatments not working, my mom asked to rule anything else out and they found the Celiac. Now over 6 years later I actually do have awful anxiety, especially when I go to see new doctors and when eating around other people. Luckily my family believes me now but they don't fully understand how stressed I get over these things. At least my parents apologized back then for being mad at me for skipping out on plans once they realized I really was sick at the time. [info] None [info] 1562727080
distant_d [info] Is this normal for anxiety? I am diagnosed with anxiety/stress disorder. Whenever I'm not actively doing something i.e. Reading talking or even typing this out my mind starts to race in a way. I start hearing murmurs in my head and I can't identify the voices usually and I will sometimes hear some random tidbit that makes me want to know exactly what was said on but if I try to focus on it I lose it. The murmurs get really loud/annoying if I just try to ignore and can be positive or negative things, primarily focusing on things that have happened to me. The easiest way for me to help picture it is your in a room with a lot of individual conversations and the room gradually gets really loud until people notice it's loud then everyone quiets and starts getting louder again and so on.Whenever I try to tell my doctor about them I simply cannot remember a single thing and if I try to write them down I can't remember either, I'll instantly forget even if I shoot up and try to write them down. Over the past year I have had the tendency to reach a point of self harm if I drink but there has been no seeming correlation because it's not every time. I know alcohol has varying effects but I sometimes will start getting hazy memory after a single drink or two to the point where I'll not even know what happened. I have been told that I can become a completely different person when drinking and sometimes for no reason.If anyone has any ideas on how to help me accurately explain to my doctor or advice, I'm seeing him Thursday so please and thanks.Hopefully typing this will let me sleep. [info] None [info] 1504064597
LGBTerrific [info] &gt;have met the likes of Kevin Rose and Mark Zuckerberg, and a pile of other "famous" Silicon Valley types.Any interesting stories?  Any surprises?  What were they like in person?  I'm always curious when people meet someone who's famous, mostly to hear about how they met the person and how that person reacted to the public.&gt;I've been diagnosed with anxiety this year, and am receiving treatment for it.What led you being diagnosed?  How are your treatments working out?&gt;I've just joined up as a member of Australia's only GLBTI radio station (Joy 94.9)[Joy 94.9](http://www.joy.org.au/) - now added to my list of streaming radio stations. :) [info] New Mexico [info] 1302779123
Katherington [info] I am the same way even though I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 5, and have been on antidepressants since I was 8. [info] None [info] 1471657099
HideInTheHouse [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well. I would go to the silent kitchen and make me something to eat when I got home from school, or the silence of the bathroom to refresh my brain. Bask in the nothingness.  [info] None [info] 1553819034
IHateYouVagina [info] Lol, no I'm fine. My family is just super nosey and invasive and I am being raised by an African american single mother in her early fifties. She never talked about sex much with me and I never had an "official sex talk". I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but it doesn't really affect stuff like this, just social as far as I know. [info] None [info] 1544822906
rainbowinthedarkasdf [info] Weird guy in a weird situation Hi,I'm in a weird place. I'm 25, and I recently moved away from my mom. My mom kept me in my home for years and years. She did not raise me well and I have suffered greatly for it. I was diagnosed with anxiety at an early age and later OCD. I have always forever felt the sensation that something is terribly wrong. My mother and I have always been violent with each other. There have been many broken bones and bruises. She expected fear from me, but I wasn't afraid, so we fought and I became afraid. She never let me have any friends or hang out after school. When she became unable to stop me from leaving the house, she would stalk and humiliate me. This happened enough that I isolated myself and didn't leave the house for 5 years from age 18-23, when I no longer had to leave for school. During that time my mother and I continued to torture each other until finally my father died in march 2017. Our lives exploded and I became extremely symptomatic, unable to function. Every waking moment was a terrible nightmare, and when I slept I relived that nightmare in my dreams, and when I woke the nightmare was still there. I became unable to leave my bed due to the intense stress my obsessive compulsive disorder put me under. In bed, I would writhe and turn in very particular patterns, rolling my eyes across every inch of the ceiling and walls and floor to perfect satisfaction, only to be forced to repeat the process again and again. This would happen until I became exhausted and fell asleep. If I dreamed I would dream about writhing in bed and rolling my eyes across the ceiling and the walls and the floor. I lost a lot of weight during the year I spent in that constant, constant, constant state.  Prior to that year I had experienced severe, distressing symptoms of OCD but nothing so terrible and extreme.The only relief from this state was Klonopin. Klonopin was the king of calm. I could only feel calm with Klonopin. It was my forbidden love, I felt I became the real me when I had Klonopin.I somehow left. The details aren't worth writing down. After an extended period of recovery the details of which again will not be written down, here I am. I am functional, no longer writhing in bed, living far far away from my mother. OCD still haunts me and runs part of my life, but I have a life away from it which is steadily growing. I go to college. I am in therapy, which is working for me. And yet I feel like an alien. I didn't have the normal life my well adjusted peers seem to have had. I can't carry on with conversation. I cannot hold down a friendship. I can fake it well enough and get by superficially, but I do not relate to these people. All I want is an average life, with an average car, an average girlfriend, and an average job. I aspire for either this or total annihilation. I want to be ejected out into space and freeze there, back to the nothingness I feel inside myself. Hello? [info] None [info] 1557297857
Bmore_sunny [info] Sensory issues at night Hi, a bit unusual situation here. For the past six months I've had what I would call disruptive sensory issues in most evenings. I feel itchy all over, can't relax, feels like my skin is crawling. It only happens at night and I'm fine during the day. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and it's been pretty under control. I don't have anxiety at night anymore, but when it's 2am and I can't sleep but know I have to get ready for work at 7am, I begin to get very emotional and anxious. At first I thought it was a medication causing the sensory issues and restlessness, but I went off the meds a month ago. My doc has suggested taking Benadryl or another sleep aid, and although I don't want to take more medications, it's the only thing that helps.I've tried things like changing my sheets often, being very picky about shirts I wear to sleep, and even turn my clothes inside out so that the seams and tags don't bother me. It helps a little. I've tried showering at night, body oil, lotion, weighted blanket, nature sounds and meditation music, humidifier. I use a detergent that is fragrance free. It's winter now, so not too many allergens. I use a special mattress cover that helps with dust mites.  Nothing I try helps. I think it's strange it only happens at night, which makes me think I don't have a sensory disorder, but I don't know what else to call it.**All this to say... Any suggestions of what I can use to relieve my discomfort at night? Or anyone have a similar experience? Thank you in advance!** [info] None [info] 1574229794
Legolas170 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder so yeah, I know what I'm talking about. Fortunately social interactions don't causes them to trigger generally, I imagine that's hell for those people. Nice burn tho  [info] None [info] 1542350198
BoogerInYourSalad [info] I used to drink at most 10 MUGS a day. Then I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, the psych almost a had a heart attack upon mentioning my caffeine intake.  Slowly reduced the cups, had headaches/felt lethargic and had to look for caffeine-free substitutes. I wouldn’t declare I’m anxiety-free but I feel “flatter” now and it’s been awhile since the last time I felt there’s a tennis ball in my throat and balloons in my chest. [info] Because Itchy Nostrils [info] 1507717780
dolphinblood [info] Yes, but how do I find a "special" doctor? Like right now, I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but my "instincts" tell me it's something else. How do I affirm that it is something else? How many doctors do I go through until I think, "yep, they're right" [info] None [info] 1386005028
hairpuller_ [info] I haven't been officially diagnosed with trich, but I've been diagnosed with anxiety/OCD, so I'm assuming that the trich is just an offshoot of that.I've never mentioned my trich to anyone besides family (who think it's long gone by now) just because I'm embarrassed by it. I'm on an SSRI which has helped a lot with anxiety, but not at all with the trich. Unfortunately, there's not a lot of treatment options for it. For me, it generally just comes down to willpower. [info] None [info] 1338713457
theonecalledzach [info] [NSFW] Unable to maintain an erection? (18 years old, no HRT) I've just gone to England to visit my girlfriend, &amp; can't express how happy I am. We've decided it's time to have sex, but, I've encountered a problem I never expected... I can't get, or at least maintain an erection during penetration. (I've never had sex, or done anything, before) Handjobs and blowjobs are fine, but not sex. I love doing things to her, but when it comes to sex, while  I like the thought, I just can't maintain an erection. We've had sex successfully once, with her on top, but when it's me, I just can't do it. I rarely experience genital dysphoria, and don't think that's the problem. I've been diagnosed with anxiety as well, if that helps. But, to my proper question: have any of my trans sisters had any similar problems? Any advice? Thanks [info] None [info] 1438030994
localTXmom [info] I used to be like this until I was diagnosed with anxiety and started on an antidepressant, try talking to your husband but also talk to your doctor as well, I feel so much better and in control now that my hormones are balanced [info] None [info] 1572844260
TheRosesAndGuns [info] I tell small white lies when I think it'll protect people I love. I told my mum the other day that I'd slept good (when I hadn't) because she's worried after I was diagnosed with anxiety and am on medication for it. Other than that, I make a huge effort to make sure I don't lie. [info] ♀ [info] 1396983219
BFNYPatMatt [info] Guided meditation experience I hope I'm in the right place.  I've been lurking around here for a little bit reading different posts and trying to learn.  I am, for lack of a better term, a massive newb when it comes to all this.I started dabbling in meditation several years ago as a relaxation technique when I was diagnosed with anxiety.  I tried it at the behest of my doctors but have used it only as a way to stave off attacks and that was it.  I ended up reading a book where the author mentioned that she found great help from guided mediations by Belleruth Naperstek, so I decided to download some and try it.  The one that I was using when this experience happened was for unlocking  intuition.Now, I have always thought of myself as being fairly intuitive, having had experience where intense "gut feelings" have kept me safe or alerted me of dangers with loved ones, but I never tried to harness it.  The meditation just caught me eye as interesting.I started out with the question of how do I become more wealthy.  I know, very generic, but I didn't know where else to start.  The meditation has you putting yourself in a safe place in nature and my mind took me back to a river I would go fishing at in my youth.  After about 5-10 minutes something happened.  My grandfather, deceased now 8 years came to me.  I didn't see him, but it had his energy, his mannerisms, his "feeling."  It felt really nice having his presence there, then I had flashes of my mom growing up, of myself and my siblings being born and growing, I felt the joy he felt in watching us all grow and mature and spend time together.  And, as the images subsided, I felt his voice in my head say "this is what wealth is."  The guided meditation ended and I came back to the room.I have NEVER experienced anything like this, but I honestly felt great afterwards.  I just don't know what I experienced.  Was it really him?  Was it just my subconscious telling me to shift my focus?  I really don't know.  Any insight that could be provided would be much appreciated as I feel that I am dabbling in things that I don't fully understand. [info] None [info] 1530651556
invaderpixel [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety in the past, not taking or doing anything for it at the moment, the BIGGEST thing you have to watch out for is everyone else. A wedding is the ultimate small talk for most people, even though for you it's deeply personal. I had a ton of random acquaintances who found out I was planning a wedding in 7 and a half months tell me "WOW THAT'S REALLY FAST!" and go on and on about it, to the point where I was convinced I had something seriously wrong with my wedding and everything would be a disaster. (I actually even had my dress and venue, catering and drinks taken care of before I was officially engaged with a ring on me because my FH was saving up for one) I think anxiety made me freak out more about people's reactions to how short my engagement was, when really my engagement length wasn't THAT short or unheard of. The thing that helped me the most was making quick decisions after basic research and then reciting all the things I've done so far. "I already have my dress, venue, catering, invitations, cupcake tower, cake topper, shoes, undergarments, dj, photographer, flowers, etc." Little random things will pop up (absolutely need a musician to play at the church? Ok I guess) but I will handle them after reciting all the big things I have done already.  [info]  [info] 1370648039
daniellamk [info] Will I be discharged from the Army National Guard if I'm diagnosed with anxiety? [info] None [info] 1479841235
KitsuneExistISwear [info] I don’t know how I survived until now... I was a small anxious bean as a child. Always concerned with routines and had very specific definitions of clean. I was diagnosed with anxiety with OCD when I was 7. It’s held fairly true but a lot of therapy helped me manage it.I always prided myself on rarely getting sick. The worst I would get would be strep every couple years for a day or two. Or a head cold. This past February I managed to get the stomach flu for the first time in fifteen years. I HATE vomiting. It honestly didn’t even hit that hard and I was back to work after 2.5 days, but I hated it. I made myself get up and clean everything I could the day before I went back to work, but after that I felt okay about everything.Then 2 months ago my coworkers girlfriend got hit with food poisoning, but we didn’t know that at the time. He tried to call out 15 minutes prior to his shift because she would be home alone and he didn’t want to leave her home sick. My boss told him he can’t leave us high and dry like that and to come in, and my stomach twisted itself into knots. Cue the start of my misery.I now have to leave the house with almost all my skin covered, all clothes immediately go into the hamper upon arrival back home and I scrub my arms to the elbows just in case. I no longer want to go on dates or go out at all after work because I feel so anxious and uncomfortable. I only want to go out on my days off. I sanitize everything at work as best I can at the end of the day. Logically, I know that getting sick is a part of life and even despite my lesser standard of clean I somehow managed to avoid it for the past 15 years. Logically, I know that if I just wash my hands before I eat with soap and water avoid touching my face and use hand sanitizer if I touch something gross I’ll be okay. I know this. But my head doesn’t. Everything is dirty. People are dirty and disgusting until proven otherwise. Things are loath to be touched. I hate it. I hate that this is my life now.I just started therapy but it took a while because my insurance is an asshole. I just had my first session this week and I’m so frustrated. I know it’s not reasonable for me to expect major change because we JUST started working together, but I’m so ready to be DONE. This is exhausting. The low level of stress that can get rocketed up at the drop of the hat sucks. The fact that my coworker can just describe that they have a stomachache and I immediately panic to the point that I’m sent home is AWFUL. I feel out of control and I just want to sob.I just want to cry. I’m tired. I’m done. I don’t know how I managed to live before this. I don’t know how I can go on. I know it will get better because it has to. But I feel like I need it to be now because I don’t know how else I’m gonna live through the rest of the year. TL; DR: I’m tired. I’m done. Therapy is a start, but I’m ready to just become a hermit. [info] None [info] 1560396268
redskins98ac [info] Wow that’s very inspiring and also very true! My being a black male in my school,  I get a lot of racist comments and stuff said. While I don’t have autism, I am diagnosed with anxiety and ocd so I definitely feel you on that. And I feel like Target is very accepting of who I am. And I’m glad you also found a place that makes you feel welcomed😊 [info] None [info] 1550210034
TwinkleTwinkle10 [info] Anxiety Over Too Much Time Alone Hi. I am new to reddit and this is my first time positing. I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD abotu 15 years ago. I have been in therapy and for the most part things have been good until recently. I am a stay at home mom and am recently divorced. I also have a child with Autism so I am used to having a lot of stress but mostly my axiety stays under control. This year both of my kids started school full time. This is the first time in 6 years that I dont have kids at home all day and I am pretry much on my own.  I have found that I have major anxiety fscing a day myself. It is not a lack of things to do and I have managed to get things done that i need to but this is day 3 of having free time and i am findinf it incredibly overwheing. Has anyone else found your anxiety to be worse when you have more time to yourself. I feel like i have to accomplish everything i wasnt able to before. it become oppressive thinking about what i want to get done. [info] None [info] 1505319217
b1gfish3rmen [info] Why dont i care about most people? Also social anxiety? Hello everyone! This is my first post on reddit!!For about 7 years i have noticed a decrease in my desire to socialize. I just dont like it. I like to be in my own head and think logically. I love making up math problems and solving them by memory! I dont like socializing because to me most people cant see things the logical way. They dont use reasoning and critical thinking, and are often hypocritical. (I know im usually wrong about this, but its just how i feel). Because of this, i dont really care about them, its almost as if since they cant see things the way i consider to be the right way, my brain just writes them off. I dont care what they are talking about. Or their emotional wellbeing. I dont want to hurt them, i just dont want to be around them because i get internally very frustrated. I dont like this behavior. Externally, i dont look frustrated at all. People tell me im the kindest person amd stuff like that. I have to try really really hard in a conversation to keep concentration, and try to care about that person. Trying to focus on the conversation amd not getting frustrated leaves me INCREDIBLY exauhsted. Since this is like 98% of people for me, i dont want to get tired trying to act like i care about the conversation, and i dont want to get frustrated with the persons lack of critical thinking and inefficiency, so i just dont want to go out. This super sucks because i have people in my life that i want to maintain relationships with, and latley my behavior is making this really hard to do. I am so frustratedbwith myself for not caring about the other people in my life. I have been diagnosed with anxiety for a long while. It started at the exact same time i started acting like this. I see my therapist in a few weeks, but the behavior above is getting so bad i just need some help. Is this anxiety? What can i do about it? I try to force myself to go out with friends but most of the time that just makes me more frustrated, and want to isolate more. Please give me some tips if ya have any? [info] None [info] 1586401457
1135742 [info] Sorry I forgot to add that I've been diagnosed with anxiety and body dysmorphia is these are any relevant [info] None [info] 1468292924
sparklingicekiwistra [info] Health anxiety I’ll start off by stating that I have been diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago, but am currently not taking any medication. My anxiety has been terrible the last few months. I started having panic attacks which I’d never really suffered with them before. I’ve been skipping classes because I become so anxious when I have to sit still for too long and I start to think too much and stress. Recently I’ve been extremely hyper sensitive to anything that I feel physically. My head has had so much pressure in it and My muscles have been twitching. (Mostly in my toes and sometimes my head jolts) so this made me believe I was going to have a seizure.  earlier this week I left school with a terrible headache which later resulted to me pulling over on the side of the road to vomit. Now I am convinced i have a brain tumor.... I’m just so mentally exhausted from not just being like “oh the pollen count is extremely high I prob had a sinus headache which made me feel sick.” But my thoughts are more like “I have a brain tumor the cancer has probably spread through my entire body and I’ll be dead in 6 months” [info] None [info] 1553787117
jma1024 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 16 I'll be turning 26 this year and yes that can be caused by anxiety. The reason I went to the hospital when I was 16 was because I was having chest tightness and my heart was racing and felt like I couldn't catch a breath they found nothing they said I was having a panic attack and diagnosed me with anxiety. I went through a series of test some that you've been through to make sure it wasn't my heart or something life threatening and all came back normal.I wasn't feeling a worry or depressed before my first panic attack it just came on all of the sudden. I still remember just watching TV and my heart started racing and I couldn't catch my breath chest was tight and burning thought it was a heart attack. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1471050021
morgannwoods [info] Ideas on what to include in ‘letters I’ll never send’ to try to get closure? I’ve been working on self improvement non stop since high school when I was diagnosed with anxiety &amp; panic disorder, but I often struggle letting the past go or I guess forgiving people. I have heard writing letters you’ll never send has helped people find some kind of closure and I really want to give it a shot, but I’m not sure what to include. I want to write to an ex of 5 years, an ex best friend that lied &amp; destroyed the relationship, and my dad who passed away last year from alcoholism. Do you guys have any ideas on what I should include or should I just sit down, start, and let it flow? [info] None [info] 1585020113
noc-caregiver [info] Need job advice please... So I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back.  I have been working at my current job for eight months now; I am a night (NOC) care giver.  A few weeks ago my boss asked me if I would take a position as a NOC med tech.  Everybody encouraged me to take it and it seemed like the logical choice so I agreed.  I did two days of training last week and covered a med tech shift for a night.  However, since the training and everything my anxiety has gotten very bad and now I am not in a good place mentally.  I cannot eat right, sleep, and every few hours I break down crying.  My chest constantly feels heavy.  I know for people without anxiety this sounds silly...I went and saw my psychiatrist yesterday evening and he suggested that I tell my boss that I would like to stay a caregiver and that this med tech position is just too much stress mentally.  He also suggested that I tell my boss I will do this med tech position for a week until he can find somebody else.  I am scared to tell my boss.  I was planning on texting him today to let him know as soon as possible.  I wanted a face to face meeting but he doesn't come back to work until monday.  I'm worried that I will get fired over this.  Under the EEO is states that I can't be discriminated against for mental health problems but Im not sure how well that will protect me.  I guess I am just wondering what I should do... [info] None [info] 1448151611
RandomGenericName4 [info] I worked through an anxiety attack all on my own! I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back and even though I see a therapist I've struggled with it a lot since then especially when it comes to school. Today in class I guess the stress finally got to me and I got that feeling I usually do when I'm about to have an attack, so I excused myself to the bathroom (it was empty too!) and managed to calm down. Typically I have to be picked up early and my mom has to help me relax when I have my attacks (which I realise I need to grow out of) but this time I did it completely alone! Not as spectacular as others but I'm proud of myself for once. [info] None [info] 1569900060
Pikkusika [info] I take propanolol for migraines, and it works really well for me. It also helps minimize the irregularity and heart palpitations that I have. I was diagnosed with anxiety several years ago, and the propanolol has helped me decrease the amount of Xanax I take daily, although I still take 0.5 mg Xanax at night. [info] None [info] 1418780747
JordisTheSwordMaiden [info] Thankfully not always the case. My manager found out I was interviewing somewhere else and told our bosses. An hour later they put through a $10k pa raise. (No shit). That was 13 years ago, I’m still there and now earning almost double what I was. They have their moments where I want to tell them to stick it, but they give me all the time off I need to look after my daughter (single mom with a severely depressed teen), paid for therapy when I was diagnosed with anxiety, and took out income protection insurance for the entire staff (90+) when one fell terminally ill so she could have an income, with no wage adjustments etc. Awesome place to work.  [info] None [info] 1531622281
hellohealthyliving_ [info] I've officially been un-diagnosed with binge eating disorder. My therapist told me my eating habits no longer qualify me as a binge eater and that I now fall into a "chronic overeater" category due to anxiety. Instead of working on improving my binges (which aren't binges anymore!), we're working on ways to better manage my anxiety so that the overeating happens less frequently (about once a week right now). I broke down in tears in her office yesterday, it just felt so liberating to officially be "cleared" from being a binge eater. Her and I agree, the switch to Keto played a huge part in the whole thing because I am no longer eating the foods that would have originally triggered me to binge.I thought this was something I would have to deal with for the rest of my life, but I feel as if I'm finally free of my emotional tie to food. (Edit: I worded this poorly. What I meant was having someone tell me that my eating habits no longer qualified me as someone who suffered from binge eating disorder made me feel free from the Black Cloud that is BED and has been hovering over my head for quite some time. I would feel guilty every time I took an extra spoonful of peanut butter out of the jar and ate it and every time I had a piece of candy because the BED that had consumed my life for so long told me that if I ate that stuff, it was bad and I was bad. My therapist broke down my last several “binges” and what I ate and she said to me “Just because you eat more than you should sometimes doesn’t qualify you as a binge eater anymore.” So to me, that is emotional freedom not from the food, but from the BED.)***EDIT: For those of you asking, [this](https://www.reddit.com/r/keto/comments/86smg6/ive_officially_been_undiagnosed_with_binge_eating/dw7w6zt/) is the eating habits I was dealing with that originally got me my BED diagnosis. My most recent overeating sessions have stayed well under 4,000 calories at their worst (but that is absolute worst, usually now it's like eating a total of 2,000 calories in a day). No, I'm not diagnosed with "overeating while stressed" I'm diagnosed with anxiety right now and we are hoping to resolve it without any medication. Everyone copes with anxiety different. Some people don't sleep, some have panic attacks, some physically harm themselves, I overeat and by treating my anxiety and finding ways for me to cope with it, it should help reduce the amount of overeating that I do.I also noticed a lot of people writing and saying that it's something that they're struggling with as well, I'd just like to put out there that my therapist gave me [this](https://www.barnesandnoble.com/p/the-dialectical-behavior-therapy-skills-workbook-matthew-mckay/1008150072/2679449628496?st=PLA&amp;sid=BNB_DRS_New+Marketplace+Shopping+Textbooks_00000000&amp;2sid=Google_&amp;sourceId=PLGoP164997&amp;gclid=CjwKCAjw7tfVBRB0EiwAiSYGM6R-ME0VJ6Cd3vdgcVjroPeAmVXp6uA_joAfbsecLtRXqA8s5KIv3xoCi18QAvD_BwE) book and we have been working through it and talking about different coping mechanisms together to help me to regulate and better handle the overwhelming emotions I deal with when anxiety strikes that is not overeating. [info] F23 | 5'3" | HW: 174 SW: 127.8 CW: 125.1 | SD: 03.07.18 [info] 1521893264
Tatasmmm [info] Labor attorney HR questions I was just laid off by my employer reason was paperwork that I never filled out. It's a medical device company. Nothing life threatening. The day of the incident I had a panic attack unbeknownst to me. I had never had one before but I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I'm on medication for it. It's also documented in my medical work profile. I had 2 interviews with the HR department and I was still freaking out about and I really had no answers. Any chance of getting my job back? [info] None [info] 1584973985
anxietydisorder1 [info] How to stop worrying too much about this? Hello, 2 months ago I accidentally found a folder on google drive that is filled with sexual images of a minor. I decided to report it to the Cyber Tipline. However, when I clicked on the folder to get the URL to report it, i mistakenly clicked the download button. Needless to say, I deleted the download process right away. I deleted it while it is still preparing the download process. Then I reported the URL to cybertipline. However, I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I have been worrying about this a lot. I am worrying that the police will somehow finds me and arrest me. Am i worrying over nothing? [info] None [info] 1499680268
Cutteone18 [info] Yea, I was diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd-d at 19. Didn’t get my fibro diagnosis until it was so bad I couldn’t work at 25. It seems to me that the more under control you get your mental health issues the better your pain will get. Just in my experience. [info] None [info] 1517795112
Miraade288 [info] My life is changing alot and it's making my anxiety flare. I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2018, but I've dealt with it probably since before I was a teenager, (I'm 17 now) and it's only gotten worse since then. A good way I found to deal with it is to have a routine. If I know what to roughly expect from my day, I worry about it just a little bit less. When that routine is changed, I just get anxious. My mind feels like it becomes crowded, and everything in my body feels off.I'm going to turn 18 in a few months and the pressure of graduating high school soon, having to find a job after, and the whole adult thing is just kind of alot for me.But the big stressor on top of that; my dad has been pressuring me to take a trade school, (something I desperately don't want to do) and how he doesn't support me going to college to become a novelist, which is my biggest dream. And knowing he thinks I'm going to fail at that also causes me worry, cause maybe he is right.I cut this down alot cause if I went though everything making me anxious we'd be here forever.And I know I probably sound kinda ridiculous for worrying so much about all of this, and I'm not very good at explaining myself, but I hope some of this makes sense. I kind of just needed to rant about it a little cause I haven't slept well in weeks.Anyway I hope all of you have a great day/night. And if you're going through a similar issue right now, or having bad anxiety at all, I'm thinking of you and wish you the best! ^.^ [info] None [info] 1579852515
the-masculine-egg [info] I go through cycles - I move forward with transitioning, feel happier and less dysphoric, and then feel "less trans" for not having enough dysphoria. I always seem to forget that the reason I feel less dysphoric than before is transitioning. I know I'm moving in the right direction because when I think about going back to living as a woman - well, I don't want to be too dramatic, but sometimes it feels like I'd rather die. I don't know about you, but I've been diagnosed with anxiety and have a long history of worrying about everything all the time, and I strongly suspect that's why. [info] 💉4/25/19 [info] 1556345435
anxiouslittleflower [info] Relationship Anxiety Hi guys,I know that nobody is probably going to see this, but I don't know what else to do, so here I am. I have been in a wonderful relationship for about 2.5 years and the guy I am dating is great. He always tells the truth and has never given me any reason not to trust him. He has tried to help me though so much and our relationship is absolutely blissful except for one major problem.     I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder last year. I had apparently had anxiety my whole life, but it didn't flare up until last year. I was having panic attacks every day and it didn't seem to get better at all. My boyfriend helped as much as he could and still does to this day. Now as I said before, my anxiety is affecting my relationship and I am here to ask for help. Since my boyfriend left for college, I worry constantly about other girls even though I know deep down that he would never even think about it. I just cant get my inner voice to believe that and I feel like I am losing control because I trust him, but nobody else. He constantly reassures me, but I want to take matters into my own hands. I don't want my constant worrying to take a toll on him and I want to get better so badly. Does anybody have any advice to quiet my inner voice? [info] None [info] 1487209610
undercover_gk [info] Seeking insight about my own ability to feel when death is near someone I know. As a child I was diagnosed with anxiety. As in I was medicated at 15 for it. I eventually learned that I have 2 very different types of anxiety. One is actual anxiety, which is a pretty mild form of gad. The other is what in the beginning seemed like random moments of feeling like the world would end. Well more of a creeped out impending doom sense. Like someone walked over your own grave, or a demon passed right beside you. I now work in end of life as in a nursing home and have for almost 10 years. I've had plenty of time to test this other form of anxiety. It only happens a few hours before someone I know dies. I rarely know who it will be, how, exactly when or any details. I mean sometimes I do know all the details. It's just rare and has to be someone I'm close to. Until, this past week this feeling has never lasted more than an hour or so. However, for the past 8 days I have been fighting this feeling constantly. I can barely sleep for it, and nothing is helping. My theory is that I'm about to lose someone really important to me, or possibly several people. If anyone has any sort of insight into this sort of thing I would be greatly appreciative. I know my grandmother has the same abilities, she just won't discuss it with me as she's very religious and doesn't like it. It's a crazy case of native American turned pentecostal. [info] None [info] 1568601035
Rollins10 [info] Big feels out to you man, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder years ago and have been taking Zoloft for almost a decade now. I've learned (still learning) you just have to take life one day at a time. [info] All your base are belong to us [info] 1453298351
ORLY_FACTOR [info] Why does elevating my side remove my chronic headache? Hello, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and headaches related to anxiety. Meditation and thought journals seem to have very little affect on my headaches, but when I elevate my left side on a pillow the headache goes away. Could I have been misdiagnosed? Age - 25Sex - MHeight - 5'10"Weight - 145Race - caucasianDuration of complaint - 3 yearsLocation (Geographic and on body) - head, usually right sideCurrent medications (if any)  - I use ibuprofen, niacin, valerian root, L-Lysine, and Saint John's Wart each once or twice a week.Ibuprofen and niacin are the most effective. The others are marginally effective at best. [info] None [info] 1414538608
nexiviper [info] Feeling overwhelmed (UK) Good day to you all, great community you have here.I've never thought of myself as having ADD until relatively recently, I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago but have begun to realise a lot of that may be linked to ADD.I needn't go into complete detail, but I consistently overestimate how much I can get done, get things done that I enjoy and end up staring at the screen when I could easily be accomplishing the other tasks. My mind wanders, I have no focus at all - everything is disorganised, I'll attempt to start cleaning my flat and end up starting cleaning my computer / keyboard etc then giving up after that is done, leading to a feeling of worthlessness that I'd achieved nothingStuff like that.My problem though, is how I can do somethibg about this, I'm worried about going to my GP in case they feel like I am making stuff up or being a hypochondriac, even if they do refer me to a specialist I may be waiting years for an appointment.I have phoned a few private psychiatry practices around me and a report costs a minimum of £395 ($500) which wouldn't necessarily be a deal breaker, but it doesn't mention their ability to prescribe medication - it says any prescriptions get referred to my GP and the more expensive medication will likely be refused (it specifically states ADHD here)I fee helpless and don't know where to start, and it's getting me down :-( [info] None [info] 1522330350
thesweetbabyg [info] That I was diagnosed with anxiety several months ago [info] None [info] 1561491219
sookisucks [info] Yea I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I saw a therapist for about 9 months and sometimes feel I should find a new one in this state. I just simply decided to own it. Some shit really messes with me. I was once driving about 4.5 hours with just one of my gfs friends. I knew her but wasn’t all that close. Night driving in the highway really fucks with me so I just told her up front what was going on. I’m not shy about saying that issue because it really helps and most people will understand. [info] None [info] 1522019256
TanLovesMakup [info] Haha I'm 25 I watched her for years then eventually stopped but kept up with the 'drama' every time I see her come up on recommendations I cringe! Everything she does is just WRONG! I think she's actually a really bad influence on younger girls she's so bad with body image and so desperate for subscribers and views. The mental health stuff she goes on about.. girl doesn't know what anxiety is! I am diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety and panic attack disorder and it would be my worst nightmare getting on a flight myself or moving country or even speaking at an event she's so unappreciative of everything and I understand why she's lost so much subscribers and friends in the Beauty community. I dunno she's just that one 'Guru' who really irritates me. Yeah I think Talia is so talented with makeup and her music but that tutorial really annoyed me. Apparently if you can only afford primark makeup your not good enough? It annoyed me when she said 'oh my god, I actually have to answer the door looking like this' there was nothing wrong with her makeup I feel she could have went about the entire video in a better manner.  [info] None [info] 1505427033
BennyBooper [info] WIBTA if I hung up my sisters phone Do to some recent circumstances me(14M), my 2 sisters (19F), my Mom, and my dogs have had to stay with my Oldest sister and her husband. I have only put the age of the aforementioned sister.So me and my sister have decided to stay in the same room while my other sister and my mom sleep in a different room. Because me and my sister both stay up late. But I didnt know that she kept her boyfriend on the call while she slept. They are in their early stages of a relationship where they do all the cutesy couple stuff and they stay up all night and the recent events have made them miss eachother, which is fine. But she leaves him on the call while she sleeps. I cant fall asleep because I can hear him awake on the call, he is continuing like this is normal but I get severe anxiety for certain things. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. And I cant fall asleep comfortably. Its 5 AM where I live and I dont feel comfortable with him on the phone. Even then I dont know her boyfriend that well. I've met him twice and they've been dating for about 8 months. So WIBTA for hanging up her phone? I'm planning on talking to her about it in the morning. I will post an update when I can. [info] None [info] 1587816218
kelseylynne90 [info] Has he looked into IBS? I had issues similar before I was diagnosed with anxiety at 17 (I’m almost 29 now) and my stomach is still wonky as hell.  [info] None [info] 1548881392
JayJay729 [info] I have very little body fat and have some nice definition. My problem is that I have difficulty eating exorbitant amounts of food and therefore have trouble putting on weight and staying energized at the gym. I have found that SS requires lots and lots of eating and energy. I know I need to eat more, but I just have trouble doing so. I have been diagnosed with anxiety (GAD) and my lack of appetite is one of my biggest symptoms. When I'm hungry, I eat, and eat some more, but there are times during the day when I just don't feel hungry. Liquid food is easiest to get down, but I just don't have the time available to liquefy everything. [info] None [info] 1330381745
zingersting [info] That's true. I am saying anxiety because I have been diagnosed with anxiety by more than one professional. This is a similar thought pattern to my own which does cause a constant hum of irrational fear and/or a full blown panic attack. Ruminating on these things are what is my issue. I'm not trying to Dr.Google or anything.  [info] None [info] 1524192526
kiosk68 [info] Yes!! The same exact thing happened to me. Before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I told my doctor all of my symptoms and he suggested “meditation” which was bullshit. I later found out after going to a psychiatrist that i did have anxiety and all of my head aches, sleepless nights, etc. were due to that. It’s best when you have one of these head aches to be in a dark room if you can. Try getting peppermint oil and rub that on your temples. Aleve personally works somewhat better for me. To help the physical symptoms, it really does help eating as healthy as you can and exercising. [info] None [info] 1560150647
hedgehoggodoggo [info] An autonomic specialist that I saw suggested SSRIs when I was diagnosed with anxiety. They can help the anxiety for sure, but he says they can also help with POTS symptoms in some patients.  [info] None [info] 1546042114
strongerthenbefore20 [info] Fresh college grad seeking advice on what to do for a career? * I literally just graduated college with an Associates Degree in liberal arts* I have had a wide variety of part-time jobs, with all having at least some aspect of customer service involved * I'm currently working at a mattress sales store. The job itself is very easy, with most of my time being spent online or watching stuff on my phone* The biggest problems I have is that it is only part-time, and I barely make enough money to cover my essential bills* And because it is so easy, the job is not very fulfilling at all* I have been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD, so I would prefer a job with a fairly calm environment * I enjoy working with word and excel* **What  I am looking for in a job*** Enough pay that I am making at least $30,000 a year* Decent benefits* A calm environment, but stimulating enough so that I do not spend most of my time bored* Something indoors* A job where I do not have to be on my feet all-day* The more casual the dress, the better* I am fine with interacting with people, as long as I am not trying to sell them something they don't want or need* A job that is not super stressful or high pressure [info] None [info] 1577152335
hungrysoul91 [info] Dear porn... Dear Porn,&amp;#x200B;Today I say goodbye to you and to the false illusion you have given me, if we ever see each other again ... I failed.&amp;#x200B;We met when I was diagnosed with anxiety, and in those that were the worst times of my life, you give me your hand and you seemed a solution. I was 16 years old.&amp;#x200B;And here I stand... 28 years, and somewhere along the way you became an addiction.&amp;#x200B;I am writing to you because yesterday I realized how alone I am in this damn world.&amp;#x200B;I have never loved, never been loved, I can hardly talk to women, I suffer from social anxiety, I spend the days looking at the past  thinking about what I could have done differently.&amp;#x200B;I feel that I wasted opportunities after opportunities.&amp;#x200B; I realized that  hit rock bottom.&amp;#x200B;But today ... today I feel a fire inside of me, a thirst for revenge and an insatiable desire for change.&amp;#x200B;Today I decided that I want to start living, I want to regain everything that you have taken away from me.&amp;#x200B;I hope there's still time for me. I hope there is still time to live what I have not lived&amp;#x200B;Today is the first day of the rest of my life.&amp;#x200B;Sincerly,A future happy man&amp;#x200B;PS:  Thank you all from the bottom of my heart for inspiring me.(Sorry about the English) [info] None [info] 1556833705
lildoxie [info] Quitting a job... I was diagnosed with anxiety last summer, and it’s through the roof this week as I am quitting my job soon. Does anyone have advice or tips for quitting and how to reduce my anxiety about it? [info] None [info] 1528606569
Im_Tripping_Balls [info] &gt; when you know you need to do something but can't remember what it isHoly hell, that feeling. I know it. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I remember getting this for no apparent reason (and it terrified the crap out of me) back from when I was about 10 years old. [info] None [info] 1381295377
ouiserboudreauxxx [info] I hear you completely. I've been in therapy for awhile and realized how messed up my childhood was through that.  I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on anti-depressants, and they just made me apathetic. I was on them in college for about a year as well and that was my absolute worst year academically. I got a new therapist last year and she is the one who finally suggested ADHD and then referred me to a new doctor.I agree with you that I too think my problems are greater than just ADHD(even though honestly I don't think anyone really understands 'adhd' very well) but for me the ADHD meds help me so much that I don't really care what label they want to put on it. Definitely don't give up on yourself! You're more proactive than I was back then. Aside from being on meds in college for a bit, I didn't pursue therapy or other treatment until I was 29. [info] None [info] 1564796243
mollysdollys [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety last year.It was all downhill from there. (Somewhat literally- I weighed a healthy 120 when I was diagnosed and now I’m 98 pounds) [info] None [info] 1526686515
Shadehz [info] Hi Andrea. I'm Nicole. I don't know if you remember me, but I opened for you at Ivywild in Colorado Springs.I just want to say that earlier this year, I was diagnosed with anxiety. It was around that time that I heard your poem Panic Button Collector for the first time. I'd always looked up to you as an artist and poet, and it meant so much to know that if you could break through that fear again and again, maybe I could too. I want to say I really appreciate everything you do, the way that you enrich the world with your words and make it a better place every time you perform. That's what poetry is for, and you embody that purpose so completely. Here are my questions. 1. What got you started with writing poetry? 2. And more importantly, what along the way encouraged you to keep moving forward? 3. What do you think is harder - getting the words out there, or editing them?  [info] None [info] 1407705449
bmollberg [info] OCD and Fear of leaving home. So I was diagnosed with anxiety a while ago and I have been on citalopram (off brand celexa) and I have always had issues with OCD. I feel like I need to do things twice or in fours or whatever (like turning light switches or opening things.) And it hasn't gone yet. However my biggest problem is I can't ride with people or drive too far away from my hometown or I feel trapped and have panic attacks. I feel like when I ride in a car with someone I can't leave if I want to and it freaks me out and I hate it. Does anyone else have symptoms like these? What helps for you? [info] None [info] 1357796324
soapyspooks [info] How would you want to be approached about this issue? This might sound silly, but I've been diagnosed with anxiety and autism, so I tend to have trouble communicating (especially with authority figures), hence why I'm asking here . I'm in tenth grade and we're doing a pottery unit in my art class. I'm absolutely horrible with it and have no prior experience (Note that we had zero lessons teaching us the basics, we were just told to make something fitting into a theme). I love my teacher, I think she's really skilled but she constantly lectures me and calls me out in front of my class for not doing it right. Now, I get it but I just want her to show me what I actually have to do? I'm not doing the wrong thing because I'm lazy, and I sit alone in class off my phone. I'm genuinely trying so hard but every time I ask her for help I just get told to hurry up (it doesn't help that I'm pathetically sensitive, and tear up after almost every time she talks to me). If you were a teacher who thought they weren't doing anything wrong, what'd be the most respectful way I could approach you about this? [info] None [info] 1580216613
uselessat50 [info] Beta blockers instead of Xanax? I want to stop taking Xanax because I've given up opiates and alcohol and want to be clean. I was diagnosed with anxiety 20 years ago and started out with Valium and slowly worked my way up to 8 mg/day of Xanax. I'm currently down to .5 - 1 mg/day. I was at my doctors today and told him about my desire to stop and he suggested propranolol for my anxiety. Has anyone heard of this or should I find a new doctor?! [info] None [info] 1475540390
FedexMeYourJewGold [info] I've been wondering if I might suffer from some degree of bi-polar disorder. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and take antidepressants but I just feel like there is something more to it. Sometimes I will feel so fucking down and depressed, with absolutely no desire to speak to anyone. Then again, other times I will feel almost wired and completely sociable.  Sorry I know no one asked for that rant but it's been something that has been floating through my head for a while now. [info] None [info] 1537979055
hobogauntlet [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was 17. I'm also shy, but I can tell when I'm just being shy and when I'm having massive anxiety. [info] None [info] 1373048654
blueboy1095 [info] This is not the right thing for here. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I hear “it’s not that bad,” and “just get over it,” all the time. [info] None [info] 1548951587
RonanIsRadioactive [info] Thank you very much! I am diagnosed with anxiety, so I definitely think you read that correctly lol. I will keep these priorities in mind.  [info] None [info] 1551756100
mizzuus [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but I am making a fast recovery, actually! I really need to say, once you find a good friend it really lightens your emotional weight.Knowing to be that kind of person to someone as well, is 50% of the joy. [info] None [info] 1556196505
BloodinmyMouth [info] Panic out of control, probably due to in-law drama and life changes Hey guys, I am normally a poster in another subreddit, and I strongly believe the events of the last year have led me to where I currently am. I am mostly just looking for any kind of coping tips/advice that can help me regain some sense of security and safety, and help curb some of the anxiety I am feeling. Internet hugs are good too though.My DH left active duty military earlier this year. We moved back to our home state right away, which I really didn't want to do. We also moved in with my shitty MIL, which I also didn't want to do. I have a school-aged child, LO1, and I was very pregnant with LO2 at the time. I left a career that was everything to me as well. Basically, my entire life changed overnight. I didn't really want to do any of it, but DH was really insistent on getting out and moving back home, and going back to school to complete his degree at the university where he started it. I walked away from the life and career I worked very hard to build there to support him in this endeavor. I am not blaming him-- I am obviously an adult, capable of making my own decisions-- but I believe the context is important. I was afraid to leave and feel like I was "going back in time" back to my home state. I went because I love DH and wanted to support him. Like I said, we moved in with my shitty MIL-- I won't bore you all with details, but she is a pretty terrible person, and mentally unstable to the nth degree. I felt it was a bad idea from the start, as we have had problems with her in the past, but again, I wanted to support DH. He felt strongly about staying there with her and wanting to take care of her. So I tried to do that. Again, I won't bore you with details (and I'd like to maintain some anonymity here)-- but, suffice it to say, it ended badly. We had to leave to protect our children from her, and to protect DH, and had to end communication with her and with one of DH's siblings in the fallout. We've maintained contact with his other siblings, but as a result of ending communication with DH's mother and other sibling, we've incurred the wrath of other family members. DH's mother and sibling also do not leave us alone and we are frequently subjected to unwanted text messages and phone calls from them and extended family members. I took a new job several hours away from our hometown where MIL lives in an effort to get us away from there. MIL does not know specifically where we are, though I suspect she knows we have relocated to New Town. I should feel safe now. I mostly do. I am no longer afraid to let LO1 out of my sight, or put down LO2. But I am experiencing intense anxiety now. During the time that we were living in MIL's home, before we moved out, I felt on-edge all the time, like a cornered animal. I felt like I couldn't let my kids out of my sight for even a second. I slept with my kids in the room with me, out of fear MIL would take them if they were in their rooms alone. It was for good reason. But I wasn't experiencing what I would call anxiety at that time. I was just... vigilant. Very vigilant. Have you ever gotten too close to a nest of baby Blue Jays while the mother was nearby, and been dive-bombed and attacked as a result? I was the mother bird.We left that house seven months ago, and while there is a buffer of several hours between us and MIL, and she doesn't know where we are now, I am now experiencing intense anxiety. It's as if since I know that the immediate danger has passed, my brain now feels it's safe for me to finally have a reaction to everything that happened. When the phone rings, or when DH gets a text, my heart rate picks up immediately and I may or may not have a panic attack. I have nightmares about MIL taking my kids and I can't find them. I've recently started having panic attacks that don't even really have a trigger at all. I am living in fear. We have safeguards in place at the kids' school and daycare, and they know that their grandmother is 100% not authorized to pick them up, and neither are any other relatives. DH is able to get free counseling for everything that happened through the university he is attending, and is considering making an appointment, and LO1 is in behavioral therapy through the university (this has obviously affected LO1 as well). I also want to stress that, though I felt that moving in with MIL was not a good idea, DH and I never could have fathomed things would deteriorate to the extent they did. We never would have predicted some of the things she did, and said, and threatened to do, and have certainly learned our lesson. We are committed to maintaining no contact with her, and with DH's sibling. I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past and have been on medication as well. I am not currently receiving any treatment, because of the cost. But I do remember a lot of coping methods from times I was in treatment in the past. I do try and use them-- things like meditation, slow and measured breathing, etc. But I'm hoping someone somewhere has some advice or relaxation techniques or even words of encouragement that I haven't heard before. Please help. [info] None [info] 1511298936
alliesbachshitcrazy [info] Help! First experience last night So last night I woke up at 2am hallucinating, but I knew I was awake and seeing things that were not actually there. This had never happened to me before, so I sat in the bathroom wondering if I was reacting weirdly to one of my medications and began to get anxious that I needed to go to the ER. After I stumbled to the bathroom and turned on the light, I noticed that the light helped. My hallucinations were all sorts of things, from little things flying around my vision to my fiancee’s face swirling. Nothing truly scary, though, just odd. I was terrified because I had never experienced this before. I’m wondering if it was due to alcohol/late nap, here’s how my day went: my fiancee and I were out all day from like 10am-7pm, and by the time we got home we were exhausted and I had had quite a few mimosas at brunch and the farmers market that still hadn’t quite worn off. We both fell asleep accidentally from about 7:30pm-10pm, woke up, ate something, and I fell back to sleep around midnight. Then I woke up around 2-2:30am hallucinating for the first time. The hallucinations lasted for about 20 minutes while I sat in bed trying to calm down and drink water.Additional info: I am diagnosed with anxietyMy question: should I expect this to happen again tonight? I’m terrified. Or do you think it was because of alcohol and a late nap, etc? [info] None [info] 1578281419
throwawayvdilators [info] Thank you so much for your response!  It really meant a lot.The more I think about it, your point about just having tension in your pelvic floor makes a lot of sense to me. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and although I can often rationalize the distressing emotions away and not "feel" anxious all the time, my body does react to the stress a lot (I have periodic breakouts of eczema on my fingers, and a fairly rare reoccuring gum problem the dentist thinks is related to stress, for instance.) More than that though, I've had some massages and the woman has said I'm ridiculously tense all through my shoulders, neck, and back, even when I'm very relaxed and have had periodic massages, so I wouldn't be surprised if I just also hold a lot of tension in my pelvic floor as well.I don't think having sex until I finish the different sizes will be possible, unfortunatley, as our attempts ended up with terrible pain only like half an inch in. But then again, after this week we'll be in a long distance relationship so hey, between times we can see each other I'll have plenty of time to get ready for it :P [info] None [info] 1442379501
bridget22 [info] I used to sweat through multiple shirts a day, only would wear dark shirts but would often just wear hoodies. it never went away until I was diagnosed with anxiety and got on a good medication. I remember 7th grade was so embarrassing because we switched to gray gym shirts and had to stay in them all day. I was sweating through the shirt before gym class even started. My white uniform shirts had yellow stained armpits.  [info] None [info] 1531621322
becbecmuffin [info] Anxiety and ADHD So I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. Today I had a lot of work to get done, so I took one of my as needed adderall. Of course, I forgot to set up my usual system of something to snack on so I don't forget to eat. So I finished working. And then I was starving. And getting too hungry is one of my anxiety triggers. And adderall is a stimulant so my anxiety got bad way fast. So now I'm lying in bed, post-xanax, trying to fall asleep so this hell will end. And I'm just so frustrated that it's so difficult for me to deal with both of these issues. I just had to get that out. [info] None [info] 1525140530
12KMMRPRO [info] I used to read books before I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder; but ever since I went to university I stopped. I thought going back to reading would help but the brain fog I am in makes it impossible to understand atleast 50% of what I’m readong [info] None [info] 1544541717
kateord417 [info] It’s so sad that we’re afraid to talk about having anxiety. If we’re diagnosed with diabetes and have to take insulin injections, we talk about it all day with zero shame. I was diagnosed with anxiety 15 years ago and was told to not tell anyone. Screw that!! The chemicals in my brain are off, just like the insulin levels in your pancreas are. We aren’t different and shouldn’t be made to feel like we are!!! [info] None [info] 1546007648
ThrowawayHorse0 [info] I don't know, I have plenty of reasons... my head just gets filled with thoughts and it's hard to articulate it all. Maybe you won't relate to this but I've been diagnosed with anxiety and my main issue is my anxiety for pain. It's also what set me off today, prompting me to make this post. I'm so scared of any kind of suffering but everyone tells me it's just a part of life. If I can't accept an unchangeable part of life, then wtf do I do?It's the worst one cause it gets triggered so easily. Every time I get a random twinge of pain I'm convinced I have some kind of illness and it's only downhill from there. Drinking anything but water and I'll get kidney stones, my contact lenses will make me blind, every mole is cancer, I'm only 20 but if I encounter stairs I fear for my knees, etc. The list doesn't end. Pain is inevitable, it's only a matter of *when* it comes. I can't handle it. Sorry for the wall of text [info] None [info] 1556491156
NotAnyOrdinaryPsycho [info] Huh. That makes me wonder if there’s an offshoot where you don’t pass out, but you do get really dizzy. A long time ago, I went to an interview for a college scholarship program. Those assholes put me through the ringer over a paper I wrote. I broke down crying there in front of the tribunal, but before I started crying, my head was swimming and I couldn’t figure out how to hold it upright. I felt like I was sitting sideways, and I couldn’t get back to normal. It was terrible. Maybe I was having an anxiety attack. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years later. But maybe the two diagnoses are linked, or have a common thread. [info] Teach me with your special eyes.  [info] 1568647012
stellamilf [info] My Undiagnosed Depression Ruined My Relationship Last Monday, I couldn’t seem to take it. I asked for a break. He didn’t want a break. I knew something was wrong with me, but I didn’t know what. He asked to rebuild, I was unsure. Not even 24 hours, I was ready to rebuild. Then he was unsure. That Friday, he broke things off. That Saturday, he had another girl as his Facebook profile. Monday I went to my gynecologist , she said my birth control can be effecting my mood and suggested going to a psych professional. Wednesday, I was diagnosed with anxiety-depressive disorder. He refuses to talk to me. I wish that he would so I could explain and apologize. I had only been distant for three weeks, but he apparently found another girl. I don’t even know what to do. Anybody else experience this? Advice? [info] None [info] 1569033597
letthewolvesrun [info] Fuck. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year, and am in university now. I was always an overachiever in high school, so transitioning was difficult. I'm doing well now, but it's still a struggle when you go to a competitive university.  [info] None [info] 1452865585
ajconway [info] Doctor won't talk to me about dosing cannabis for PTSD. Looking for advice. I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD after an extreme traumatic event last November. I see a wonderful psychiatrist but I needed medication to be able to function at work without collapsing into tears or have a single night's sleep without waking up screaming. My PCP has cycled me through a variety of anxiety prescriptions, and they have zero effect on me. 5 months of trying and I can't see any method of returning to my happy, creative, functional self. I've only kept the lorazapam for the extreme panic attacks, but it reduces me to a sleepy potato, so I can't take it at work if I plan to do anything other than take a nap at my desk.After the third failed medication, I asked my PCP about medical cannabis and other drugs and they absolutely refuse to hear anything about it. Weed is legal here in Boston but I'm not a recreational user. I've probably smoked less times than I have fingers on one hand. But I know there is **some dosage**, and **some frequency of use** that could benefit me enough to survive through the day. Eating is also a massive part of my PTSD too; I've lost 20lb in the past two months. I've never had an eating disorder before but because the trauma relates to starvation, I've frequently gone days without eating, or throwing up after a meal simply out of the stress and guilt. I'm sure I'm on the right path when I ask my doctor if I would be suitable for cannabis for all these reasons. I know I can just go purchase it myself, but I wanted to know how/when/how much I should be taking in order to remain productive at work, sleep at night, and regain my apatite. My PCP wouldn't give me any information, so I guess I'm turning to the internet.General stats that can help: I'm 130lb (down from 160lb before this happened), work 9-5, don't drink alcohol, have very little experience in drugs. I don't even know where to start in terms of smoking or edibles, and what mg could at least help me begin to regain myself. Any help is appreciated. [info] None [info] 1585272573
batman1285 [info] That was really well worded. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd. I am wondering if you have any reading, podcasts or videos you'd recommend with more information like what you just shared. [info] None [info] 1558823836
iflananifi [info] Vasovagal Syncope and Cataplexy SORRY LONG! I kind of felt I had to describe a timeline of diagnosis and some of the things I experience. Feel free to give some long-ass replies if you have a lot to say. :)  So, I'm wondering if anyone else who has been diagnosed with Narcolepsy, has also been diagnosed with a syncope disorder. I have questions for you, and are looking to see if anyone has a similar situation as me with co-morbidity of disorders causing some symptoms to be masked. I'd like to be able to describe things properly to my Dr at the next appointment. First things first: my absolute (kinda edited) word vomit.Background:   I  have vasovagal syncope. I was diagnosed in 5th grade when I had a number of fainting spells tied to getting my ears pierced, changing my earrings etc. Symptoms are usually a sudden feeling of tunnel/blurred vision, distorted hearing, weakness, and sometimes nausea. It feels as if all of a sudden someone is sucking all of my blood and fluids out of my body through my toes. Then I faint, or sometimes it passes if I recognize it early enough. This also lead to therapy since vasovagal can often be stress or anxiety-induced, and I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, but I hate taking medications so after a bad reaction to the first batch I refused. Luckily, this has all been manageable on my own. I do occasionally have panic attacks, that always end in me fainting, waking up, and throwing up.A little over a year ago I was diagnosed with type 2 Narcolepsy. I have always struggled with sleep, but always made excuses for it. I was at the point last year where I was working two jobs to finish off my student loans, which put incredible stress on my body, and I could no longer make excuses. I would be so tired at night, but unable to sleep through the night. I was at the point where I stopped taking naps because I was guaranteed to have sleep paralysis and or hallucinations, and was micro sleeping. I initially went to a sleep Dr because a friend suggested maybe I was suffering from sleep apnea. It took about 10 minutes of talking with this Dr and she suggested Narcolepsy. I had a dumb sleep latency that was under a minute for all the nap tests and went into REM twice. Narcolepsy. Never would have guessed. But it made total, complete sense. I have suffered the paralysis and hallucinations regularly since I was at least 10. I commonly have dreams bleed into reality. After discussing my symptoms with my Dr she asked if I had muscle weakness when I had extreme emotions. I didn't believe at the time of my initial appointment that I experienced this, so I said no, but that I do faint due to vasovagal syncope. Test results came back and I was diagnosed Type 2. My doctor was actually, really upset nobody had thought of this before over the years. She called me a perfect "textbook type 2 case." But, she said to keep an eye out for cataplexy signs.I have my vasovagal syncope episodes tied to triggers involving injections/blood being drawn. I can also have episodes when I am reading about vasovagal, or even watching a depiction of fainting (Dallas Buyers Club made me faint on a plane onto a very nice Japanese woman). Less commonly there are ill-defined triggers. Sometimes dehydration or sickness can trigger since I'm already weak. When I got my ears pierced in 5th grade I fainted multiple times throughout the year due to touching or twisting my earrings, and also fainted every single time we had to have the "Don't do heroin and stick dirty needles in your arms" talks in 5th grade, 8th grade, etc. I have stress related syncope events, and have throughout my life. I am usually able to tell an event is coming on, get myself to the floor, and wait it out. This either results in me feeling like I cannot get up or move once I've made it to the ground, or I faint shortly after getting myself to the ground. After peeing your pants in 5th grade because you twisted your earring and fainted, you become HYPER AWARE of the smallest irregularity or weakness, and just get to the floor to let it pass. You know, so you don't piss your pants in public again. I don't think I have severe cataplexy. But after reading and watching a lot of people describe their cataplexy, they describe a lot of situations I learned to avoid or manage due to the vasovagal. I will, very often, stumble while walking for no reason. I've dropped things for no reason, as if my hand just stopped working for a few moments. I get the pins and needles in my legs and they feel wobbly all day. Because of the anxiety, I'm pretty much always thinking, and my thoughts are racing. Could thoughts I'm having that are disturbing or causing me stress, cause a mild cataplexy attack?I've been pondering it for awhile, but I watched the new Netflix show Diagnosis (SPOILERS I GUESS). And in episode 5, vasovagal is a suspected case. When they got to the end, they ended up determining that anxiety and stress was triggering this loss of consciousness. And when the patient starts managing their stress levels better, their quality of life improves. This was essentially me and my vasovagal. Once I learned my triggers and early warning signs, I basically learned to keep myself calm, collected, and when to get to the floor to avoid injury. The thing is, this sounds a lot like some people who have cataplexy and how they learn to avoid some episodes.For some reason I started digging again, as I've always thought my two disorders are a weird pairing, and found a video on Know Narcolepsy that was something I was never able to describe before. [https://knownarcolepsy.com/cataplexy](https://knownarcolepsy.com/cataplexy)  Nicki's description of just being unable to control your gaze, and kind of zoning out, and not realizing you had lost control until after the incident. This happens to me all the damn time. All the time. I'm starting to think that I got the vasovagal diagnosis so early on, likely before any sort of narcolepsy/cataplexy symptoms were manifesting. On some occasions I start to feel weak and get to the floor to avoid a vasovagal attack, and I don't recognize a specific trigger for it. I think I am actually experiencing some sort of cataplexy. Sometimes I'll barely get to the floor with my own strength and then just lay there a bit as I can't really bring myself to move. I never end up fainting in these cases, but I feel almost exactly the same as I do when I have a vasovagal attack. Tunnel vision. Pins and needles feeling. Difficulty controlling myself as I suddenly become weak. Distorted hearing. Struggling to get myself back up. But, there is a distinct lack of the nausea that almost always accompanies many of my near misses and all actual faints. This is not common at all for me, but I always assume it is a syncope episode that I was able to stop before the fainting. The more reading I do, the more I realize that these triggers can be very similar. I know cataplexy is often confused at first with syncope disorders. But, I'm thinking, what if I have both, making the cataplexy difficult to define because it was the second thing to manifest? I'm trying to think how to explain this to my doctor. She knows I have vasovagal. As a result of this, the last few times I went in for refills she dismissed some of the more milder stumbling and dropping things as not cataplexy because I could not define a trigger for those incidents. She has been a wonderful doctor as far as diagnosis and even management, but I think she's weary to entertain the cataplexy without a very clear-cut example, even though she asked me to keep an eye out for it. And I don't know if I can ever define that because I'm starting to wonder if I have too much of an overlap with the vasovagal.Getting this catalpexy diagnosis is not really necessary for my treatment plan. I already exist with the fear of falling over, and have learned to deal with it. I just want to know, to inform my future management of symptoms. And also curiosity. **So, does anyone have a similar experience? Or do you also have more than one diagnosis that has a bit of an overlap area?** Partially I wanted to organize my thoughts. But also, I wanted to see if anyone has a similar story to me. I'm not sure if I do have it or not, but I'm starting to think I have at least some partial-cataplexy esque episodes. Looking for some support and some more, perhaps resources before going to my next appointment.    I over explain things. :) [info] None [info] 1566315968
Prestiegefull [info] I get this alot as well. However, I was diagnosed with anxiety. As long as im avoiding triggers and keeping busy in life, I do fine. The thing that matters most is friends, hobbies, etc. It doesnt help to sit and loathe. Whenever I just sit around with nothing to do, I think too much. This makes me very sad and sometimes I get suicidal thoughts, and I self harm. But recently I've been trying to fix that, and I hope you can find out whats wrong and help yourself, good luck. [info] None [info] 1389104452
rubenmc11 [info] I can tell you probably haven't read most of Neville's teachings, I have... Now, 5 months ago I was diagnosed with anxiety, 2 years ago I was in a toxic relationship that hurt my self-esteem because I had weight issues, I'm 5' 10'' and was 225 pounds. I have been going to the gym for 1 year, at the most 3 times per week and haven't had great results until recently, What did I do? I have been imagining my friends surprised faces, huge smiles, all of them are happy congratulating me on how good I look... What has happened? I have been going to the gym 5 times per week, I'm doing intermittent fasting and I'm not struggling at all, I've been walking with a 20 pound vest on and jumping rope every day for the past 5 weeks and most importantly I went from being a 36 to 33 waist, I could be a 32 but my legs are getting big (BTW I used to hate doing legs, and now I love it) and have lost 16 pounds of fat in 5 weeks.... I'm not forcing any of this, I'M ENJOYING IT... so I'm manifesting losing weight, how is this happening? I'm enjoying my workouts, I'm not hungry in the mornings any more, I have motivation to go and work out twice per day.&amp;#x200B;You live in the world of CAESAR, things take time and most of the time you have to go through a process... If you expect to imagine the scene of your wish fulfilled and wake up tomorrow with a greek god body or being the president of the United States... well, I have bad news for you... [info] None [info] 1563946674
masterofnone_ [info] Yes.  My palms start to sweat, my pulse increases, I get very fidgety and I have no idea why.  This usually happens when nothing is going on around me.  Unfortunately I was diagnosed with anxiety only recently, therefore I cannot provide and useful advice.  Sorry. At least you know you’re not alone in this.  [info] None [info] 1514868521
666bich [info] Hey, this is long... Just to warn. But if you don't want to read the whole things... Shut gets better but you have to let it get better and work at it to make it better. 'It' being whatever it is that's tying you down. So, first of [TRIGGER WARNING] this involves my sexual abuse as a child and how it affected and still affects my life.I was a happy kid. I wasn't perfect, my family weren't perfect. We were kinda poor, always struggled for food and to pay the bills. I never went on school trips and I always had holes in my clothes. I was picked on for being weird, having glasses and all round just not fitting in. However, this never really bothered me. I had my own fun and my own friends who liked me and a family who, dispute their troubles, loved me. And this part come in handy later on. I was eight when I was sexually abused and almost raped. It was by a family friends son who was 17 at the time. I trusted him. And his brother. I don't want to go into details because it still hurts to talk about but I shouls have spoken about it when it happened. He touched me (a girl) and hurt me and made my whole life begin to spiral out of control. I didn't speak to the police. They came to my house but I couldn't speak to them. I was ashamed and embarrassed and scared. They sent two male officers and I didn't even want to sit next to them. I started self harming almost instantly. I started having panic attack that got worse and worse. I was diagnosed with anxiety at ten. I felt so disconnected. I was at an age where I needed to be able to talk and share my feelings but, I couldn't, I didn't know how. By 11 I was acting out daily. I needed a way to get these emotions out of me. I got into fights at school. I caught with my parents and my siblings. I even tried smoking because I thought it'd make me look cool and I thought people would like me. When I was 12 my parents broke up. And I had been suffering a lot of the arguments and lashouts they were having. My self harm was daily by this point and somehow, nobody knew. Nobody asked. The cuts didn't really leave scars because I was just using sharp plastic or wire, things I could easily access. So nobody could even tell I was hurting myself. Thirteen to 16 were really, really hard. By now I was constantly hurting myself. Skipping school. I was sexually harassed by a boy from school and then again, forced against my will do give him oral sex. At the age of 14. And then things started going around school. I was a slag, a white, I was asking for it. People even found out about what happened when I was a kid and it tore me apart. Home life was horrible. School life was horrible. I had no friends, nobody to talk to. So when I was 16 I tried to hang myself. Again the details are hard to talk about. My sister saved my life and she never told anyone but she forever me to go to therapy. I did for about six weeks, then I started lying to her. I wasn't going anymore. I fell into a bad crowd with some even worse people who showed me drugs and alcohol and that giving a fuck was for idiots and people who had reason to. They were not my friends but they took my mind off of things. I started sleeping around, stealing, fighting... Again. But I liked it. I was happy for a while. I started dating a 19 year old (I was 16) and I thought he was the love of my life. I think I was addicted to MDMA at this time. The way it made me feel was amazing and I didn't have a comedown the next day. Oddly I was actually going to school. In my final year. Constantly smoking weed or high on MD. In school... I was an idiot. But I got my GCSEs. All but my maths and history. I decided I was going to fail them anyway so I studied harder on everything else and got mostly B's and A's. I was proud of myself for once. That happiness and that pried was quickly torn away though. My dad wasn't overly upset when he found out about my grades but he was fuming when he found out about my boyfriend and what we had been doing together. And all of this happened on the day of my final exam. For some stupid reason, after like six months of not hurting myself. That night I cut myself. And I didn't even intend for this to happen but, it did. I bled for an hour straight, no stoppage. I was using my bed sheets as a bandage and the blood had soaked them through. I stumbled down stairs and fell into a bookshelf. My dad rushed over to me. Asked me where I had cut myself, called my mum, called an ambulance and that's all I remember. I woke up in hospital that night and I just cried and cried and apologized to everyone. Even my nurses. This now meant that I was gonna be forced to get better. And I was glad. I kinda had that attention that I needed now. And no this isn't attention seeking. Well it is. But not how you know it to be. I wasn't doing these things for attention. I was doing them for help. And this was the help I needed. The months after were horrible. My "boyfriend" left me and my "friends" didn't even text me a get well soon. I was alone again. And I was in and out of hospital constantly. If not for check ups it was because I had hurt myself. If not that it was because I was under weight. If not that then something else. My therapists were shit. But two of them were amazing. They actually cared. And it was one on them who made me realise something. And don't get me wrong I was 18 when I realised this. That was like two and a half years of therapy and constant eyes watching me. He reminded me of something I told him in the begining. Something I said at the begining of this story. When I was a kid I was strong. Things were tough and things were shitty but I knew that people around me loved me and cared about me. And for so many years I had forgotten that. I didn't realise that what I was doing was hurting my family. Well I did but I guess I didn't care. I realised that maybe I had been selfish all those years. And maybe my fear had turned me into this defensive horrible person that could never see the light at the end of the tunnel. He told me things might not get better but they will even out. And he was right. Things were and are still hard and I still think about killing myself when things have been too much to handle. I haven't hurt myself in almost a year. I've spoken about my problems and I've helped others who have felt the same. I've been into schools and spoken to young girls (and the boys who wanted to be there) about rape and sexual abuse and where to go and who to talk to. I know that what happened to me wasn't my fault and I know now that punishing myself will never stop the cycle. Just make it stronger and harder to break. I live with my fiancé, he knows everything and he loves me all the same. And I only present myself to people who love me for who I am... Warts and all! Oh and my parents went on a date last month... That made me real happy. They still aren't together but they changed as people, for the better, and anyone else who is struggling can also change for the better. Not to be cringe but recovery starts with you. You have to accept help, ask for help, help others, do what makes you feel good!!! [info] None [info] 1568723000
PenguinsGoMeow [info] I am such a hardcore nailbiter that I bite polish and fake nails off. :( I was diagnosed with anxiety at 5 times the clinical level though so I think I will bite my nails forever. I've tried to stop and it just never works. :( [info] http://smile.amazon.com/registry/wishlist/1UBORK18CHCK6  (Multi) [info] 1426510017
TheNinjaNarwhal [info] I just realised I may have ADD, I'm afraid to tell my parents. Hello! I knew about ADHD for quite a long time, but without its name, or most of its symptoms, and I never really knew anyone with diagnosed ADHD.  So I stumbled upon a video and did a small search, I did a couple of test on some medical sites, and, not going to go into details, I'm almost sure I have ADD:/ (going to visit a psychologist as soon as I can to see what I can do about it and make sure)    Recently I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder as well, which was weird to me at first, because before 3-4 years I felt like I am was anxious about anything. I heard that many ADHD patients have anxiety disorder as well, and that they are linked, so that might be the cause.    So my parents know about my anxiety problems, but since "I am smart" and I've always been good at maths and similar lessons(I never really studied for anything else, I realise why now) they always expect me to do my best, and by this I mean that they expect me to do perfect.  They are both doctors (haematologist and orthopedic) and they know about such stuff, but I feel like a  mental disorder is really different than the more obvious bone breaks or illnesses and problems that you can see with your own eyes.  Since(as I said above) they always expect me to do things in perfection, if I don't, they always tell me that I'm finding excuses. "Why didn't you read before the last days? Why do you just leave everything for the one last day? You had time." (if only I knew the answer earlier)    So, and sorry for the long post, my question is: How should I tell them? If they don't listen how can I convince them? I'm really afraid of what might happen.    There are so many more things I want to know, but I'll most probably get to this stuff with my psychologist, no need to spam here.Also a big thanks to whoever made this subreddit, as soon as I work things out, I'll be sure to come back and help anyone with any way I can.  **TL;DR:** I just realised I most probably have ADD or ADHD, but I'm really afraid to tell my parents, because, since I know them well, I'm almost sure they won't believe me.(even after a psychologist visit) Any suggestions on how to convince them if this happens or how to say it? [info] None [info] 1390766877
allfatandsassy [info] Absolutely. Anxiety can cause crazy physical symptoms. The entire year of 2015 was literally painful. I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks. I felt constantly chest pain. Sometimes it was a strong pulse, sometimes just tightness. Always uncomfortable. I had a whole host of other physical manifestations of stress and I didn't believe it at first. I thought every pain was a sign that something major was wrong. Nope! I've just learned through dozens of doctors, MRIs, scans, and a few visits to the ER that I'm pretty much healthy and that I just have health-related anxiety. Now when I have a small pain, I have to tell myself I'm not going to die of a heart attack or anueyrsm in 30 seconds. :)  [info] 96 days [info] 1531847854
LayersOfDysfunction [info] I'm on extended release ritalin, which is basically concerta. 80mg. Some days I'll have terrible anxiety. I get horribly tense. When my anxiety gets bad, I won't be able to focus or do anything. I also have days where I'll have no anxiety. I've taken doubly my dose on several occasions when I wasn't paying attention. Even on 160mg I didn't have much anxiety at all. I think the stimulants just exaggerate what's naturally there. If I sleep well, or take it after exercising, my change of getting anxiety is much lower. Though, I'm diagnosed with anxiety. The ritalin isn't the cause of my anxiety, though It might be a factor in making it worse if I get anxious. On the other side, If I took a sugar pill, believing it to be a stimulant, I wouldn't be surprised if that had the exact same effect on my anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1468540800
CeeDiddy82 [info] You may possibly just be having anxiety/panic attacks.I have had experiences like this for a long time. Being atheist, I didn't have the spirit thing going for me. I actually thought aliens were going to abduct me. For a while, doctors attributed the symptoms to complications from being overweight (blood sugar spikes, high blood pressure, etc).I have dropped almost all the weight I needed to and became more active so I am actually tired at night and sleep. I also cut out carbs, as they are basically sugar and cause blood sugar spikes with me (/r/keto or /r/paleo can be helpful).Even though all of that has helped a lot, I still get anxiety attacks. Not sure what triggers them. I had one the other day at work I actually passed out and they called an ambulance and I went to the ER. After that I started getting panic attacks nightly, over nothing inparticular, usually I was just scared I would pass out again. My dreams I would have following waking up during a panic attack were scary. I dreamed I heard loud screaming, I dreamed I was in car wrecks and plane crashes. I dreamed some vortex was sucking me in. Just downright scary shit in that state between sleeping and awake.Finally, after "stone cold perfect" blood tests from the ER and from the follow up doctor visit, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.Doctor prescribed xanax and I have to go to a therapist who specializes in anxiety.I recommend getting healthier eating/exercise habits and telling a doctor about panic attacks at night. The xanax works wonders for me. I don't take it everyday, only when I start to feel anxiety. Kind of like aspirin to headaches, only take when needed. Xanax is a highly addictive chemical, so hopefully when I finish my therapy I won't ever need it. If you have an addictive personality you need to get into anxiety therapy ASAP.  [info] None [info] 1353570956
TomCweams [info] Anxiety and Diabetes I’ve been Diabetic for 5 years and am currently on a Medtronic pump. 3 years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. Having to worry about my blood sugar high / low added on top of over analyzing everything can be a lot to handle. Ive noticed my blood sugar dropping after my anxiety gets bad. Anyone else have this problem? Or know of any study’s to support this? [info] None [info] 1541931741
CautiousMiddle [info] Personally, I feel like I’ve gotten a better grip on my mental health after my first trip. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year and struggled with it a lot before being diagnosed. But my biggest advice would be to make sure you have a strong grip on your mental health before you really consider tripping. Leading to my trip I had already learned to cope with my anxiety to an extent, and felt comfortable enough to take shrooms. I now feel like I have a lot more control over it, and it’s almost suppressed now. [info] None [info] 1529677903
speedhating [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety, and do work a high stress type job so... that would make sense... [info] None [info] 1493330387
gene1113 [info] It'll be ok.I was just diagnosed with anxiety and had trouble learning to cope with the panic attacks. It was rough.  [info] None [info] 1526345969
mckski [info] 1.That I am always anxious. Yes I am diagnosed with anxiety but that doesn't mean I cant be confident and be able to talk to random people I can I just need to be in a good mindset2. That I hate soical interactions, I love meeting new people, talking to tourists, making new friends and talking I just so happen not to be very good at it [info] None [info] 1565048509
Dr3wcifer [info] *Update* We are unable to establish your eligibility to hold an airman medical certificate at this time... [My Original Post](https://www.reddit.com/r/flying/comments/c0aoa4/we_are_unable_to_establish_your_eligibility_to/)&amp;nbsp;Since the initial letter I received from the FAA specified that my initial medical was not suspended pending review, I decided to go the least intensive route first to see what FAA would request as followup while continuing to fly. I had my primary care doc draft a short letter basically saying I was fine. While I was overseas on a vacation, FAA finally responded to that certified letter stating that after review, they have found that I AM eligible for my current third-class medical and I may now continue to use it as if nothing had happened. No special issuance, no followup request for records or imaging.&amp;nbsp;So basically, here's all I did - I went to my VA primary care doc, since the VA is the only place with an records of my anxiety diagnosis, and the only place I've ever received followup care for my broken back. I had them write a short letter that specifically addressed and answered the exact questions presented in the initial FAA letter. The opening paragraph of his letter stated that he was my primary care doc, and that he had evaluated me previously in the year (February) for a routine evaluation. Second paragraph precisely refuted any inhibitions due to back pain, third paragraph precisely refuted any inhibitions due to anxiety and confirmed I had never been prescribed for the condition. The doc used the same language in his response that the FAA used in their request, and he also specifically stated that my most recent evaluation for anxiety found that the symptoms were "mild or transient." I'm not entirely sure if the VA will be dropping my disability rating for anxiety, and it wouldn't bother me if they did - I made it clear that I didn't think it was an issue during my last VA evaluation, but the doc essentially said "better safe than sorry" and kept the rating.&amp;nbsp;If anyone is in a similar situation to this, especially since the VA has been handing out mental health diagnoses like candy for the last decade, I can post up the entire initial request letter from FAA, my doc's response letter, and the follow-up from FAA.&amp;nbsp;To be clear, I was diagnosed with anxiety a decade ago but never treated/prescribed for it, and it's never really been an issue. I have also never been hindered by my broken back, other than being a bit shorter and fatiguing a bit faster when I go backpacking. Overall, probably not a common situation, but if anyone can learn from it, awesome. [info] PPL SEL [info] 1565706239
lambsghory [info] My (22F) brother (28F) passed away almost a year ago and I'm having a difficult time dealing with the flashbacks. So it's been almost a year since my brother passed away last year. Long story short because I would rather not go into the details for my own sanity - my 15 year old sister at the time (along with cousins, aunts/uncles) witnessed my brother drown in a whirlpool while on a hike in the forest.   We're fairly religious being Muslim and we believe  that death by drowning is martyrdom. Having faith has kept me pretty strong, we also have an incredible support system.   But my sister is 16 now and we both have been diagnosed with PTSD. I try to distract myself by finally planning my wedding, even tho the guilt can get to me sometimes. In our culture we usually don't celebrate anything for at least a year. At times I don't want to do anything at all because the memories from that day are too awful and painful. Not only did I have to witness his death, I saw my sister lose it and worst of all - seeing my loving parents lose it and question basically everything while also dealing with my own guilt/sadness/loss/disbelief. We were so close to my brother and he's the eldest out of the three of us. There's no one else like him in my family or in my community, he was an absolute angel from God.   Thankfully my parents weren't there when it happened, my dad came to the site and seeing him that way was traumatizing enough. But coming back to the cabin to see my mom and the rest of the relatives...I still can't forget the screams.   Fast forward 11 months and thank God, we're doing pretty well for what we went through as a family although I won't deny that this past year has been absolute hell. I'm here mostly to vent as I'm pretty new to being an active member on Reddit. But I do need some advice on having to deal with the images and flashbacks. I thought flashbacks were only in movies but that's clearly untrue. I have been diagnosed with anxiety prior to my brother's passing, but with the PTSD sometimes I feel like I'm being suffocated. I try to take it easy and I have a wonderful fiancé who has literally done everything in his power to be there for me. Not gonna lie tho, I am on Zoloft and it's helped a bit.   **TL;DR I lost my brother last year and need some help or words of advice on having to deal with the flashbacks.** [info] None [info] 1500283938
chelbren [info] Yes, yes, yes. I always thought I was just a massive bitch, but then I was diagnosed with anxiety and it made so much sense. It's honestly the most frustrating part of anxiety for me. I wish I could just brush small stuff off, but it's not that easy. [info] None [info] 1519134527
brokedollarsign [info] I'm not okay :( So some background:I'm Canadian and I'm about to graduate from a college ( american refer to as community college) and once this is done I'm moving away for university elsewhere. Well because of Covid, idk if in school will be a thing and i'm super anxious that i'll be in my room isolated for a year. I was diagnosed with anxiety about three years ago.However, I also don't want to sit around at my parents home for a year because my dad isn't the best person and he makes my anxiety worse.So, I plan to move and just have a room near campus and focus (as much as possible) on school. But rverything about my future and Covid scares me. I want to make friends but if campus is closed I don't see how i'll do that. But I also do not want to put off continuing my studies because I'm already going to be spending an additional 3 years ( i can make it two if i fast track) at University on top of the three at collegeHaving anxiety plus the uncertainty of Covid sucks :( [info] None [info] 1587084912
EllieOrion [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety too a few years back and then a couple of years later; aspergers syndrome. All as an adult.My dad started teaching me and my sister to drive at age 15. We refused to drive on the open roads because we were afraid to shift gears, so we practiced driving in parking lots for many months. Only shifting from first to second gear because straight down was easier. We went like this for months. Thankfully our dad was supportive of our slow process. It all comes down to "getting the feel" between the clutch and the gas. Practice in parking lots. You will get the hang of it! [info] None [info] 1559415177
revmyk [info] I can only speak for myself, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder (also PTSD) about two years ago. I was prescribed Xanax, then decided to give it a weed a try after reading about experiments conducted for anxiety and ptsd. My symptoms were chest pains and panic, usually when I had to go shopping for groceries or sometimes in other public places. I have found great relief from using weed. I prefer vaporizing.  [info] None [info] 1358912950
a_mich21 [info] Should i tell my s/o about my past physical and emotional abuse from my parents? Growing up, my mom was insane. She was both physically and mentally abusive. Dads an unreliable alcoholic. I've been in therapy on and off for two years. They all tell me i'm resilient and have good coping skills. Eventually I just ran out of things to say to my therapist. I was diagnosed with anxiety two years ago (he knows that). I'm almost fine but i just have major issues trusting people, and i'm always scared people are secretly angry at me so i ask him a lot if he is. He doesn't understand why, and he get's offended that i don't trust him. We've only been together for two months. It doesn't feel right to tell him, but at the same time, i want him to understand why i act the way i do sometimes. [info] None [info] 1553812770
TuloCantHitski [info] Lots of ppl will take "I am stressed and have work to do" as "welp, I guess I'm diagnosed with anxiety now" [info] There's money to be made in prolonging the problem [info] 1554782419
Bobosanman [info] You need to talk about it. Once you open up you will find out that you are not alone. I had similar problems when I was in high school. Even I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I take medication and see a counselor. It has done wonders for me. I am not trying to diagnose your problem but only trying to tell to talk about it and ask for some help. It will take some effort on your part but only can change things but help is available. [info] None [info] 1560639697
MrsTheJones [info] Never apologize. This is what this subreddit is for. I'm a woman too and I know exactly how you feel. And the multiple headaches? Yup, I've had a headache every single day since I was diagnosed with anxiety a year ago. This subreddit is here anytime you need to vent.  [info] None [info] 1406094087
forensikat [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I went to college, and I know I had some OCD tendacies as a child (could never step on a crack or tile line, had to finish walking up stairs with my right foot), but I grew out of those.I think this is an example of how religion compounded issues that were already there, not a statement on all Catholics! [info] Ex-Catholic [info] 1494297291
sodaigomi [info] Help, please? I was just diagnosed with anxiety, and, on top of that, I have to deal with a recent breakup. [info] None [info] 1450509120
garlotch [info] Still, d1fty has a good point. Check out /r/chch. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, as well as a list of other illnesses. I was put on resperidone, a drug to calm my anxiety. It was so powerful, that for all the time I was taking it (3 years) I was quite literally a zombie. The best decision I have made, was to stop taking it, and throw it in the bin. Despite my anxiety, the surges of hot prickles up my body, I have definitely changed. I made it to the second audition of New Zealand's got talent, in Wellington (2012), and I went up on stage in front of thousands of people, that was probably the most frightening thing of my life. I also play in a highland-pipe-band, and go to events every year, thousands of people watch me there too. But you know what? I don't feel scared of them any more. I honestly could not care what those people think of me, and when I get out there in the spotlight, I am proud of what I do, and have accomplished. Now, I welcome fear, I welcome anxiety. It reminds me that I am human. Fear is one of the most vivid feelings in your life, and if you embrace it... you will live a lot happier. My doctors have urged me to get back on ANTI-ANXIETY medication, but I wouldn't take that again. Even if I was paid 300 dollars a week, I wouldn't take it.Point being, I got over my anxiety from 'Practice'. From being out there in the crowds. The more you experience it oxychromaticdynamite, the less it will effect you so.Sorry If I rambled/ranted on, I'm really bored, and this is the perfect thread to vent my thoughts onto. &lt;3 [info]  [info] 1432191032
megawalelord [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety as a kid, but through a lot of practice I have it pretty much 100% under control. I would say I am genuinely happy and content with my life around 80% of the time which I think is really good. It's all about balance. I pick an area of my life that I would like to work on and focus on that. This year I am focusing on extracurricular involvement and actually joining things that interest me or I am passionate about. I'm also really careful of not falling into the trap that I need to be constantly working on myself from the moment I wake up to the moment I fall asleep every day. You need time to do the things that make you happy, because those things are making you a more whole person too. It's pretty much about finding things that make you happy and balance them with things that help you grow as a person. [info] Female [info] 1474049329
NoMasGnomos [info] So true. I used to have anxiety back in high school. If I got nervous or stressed, my body would overreact and feel so tense until I got physically sick. Not knowing why this was happening only added to my stress, which made me more tense, and you can see how this spirals downhill.Until I was diagnosed with anxiety. Just knowing that, I was able to focus on mentally relaxing, telling myself it's gonna be okay, your body is just silly. No reason to fear, it'll pass. It helped tremendously. About ten years later, I mostly outgrew it. As they say, knowing is half the battle.Just prepare positive things to tell yourself, whether you believe them in the moment or not. Your future self will appreciate it. [info] None [info] 1509807325
Hooze [info] Scheduled to run my first half-marathon this upcoming Saturday. I am physically capable but I am not sure if I am mentally capable. Help? Roughly a month ago, maybe a little longer, I ran 10.1 miles in around 1:27.  Since then I went through an extremely rough patch with a significant other (currently the relationship is not dead but it is on life support) and I have been diagnosed with anxiety.  My runs since that 10.1 have been terrible.  The most I've done is 3.6 miles.  I know it's all mental, but my brain honestly crashed earlier this month and I've slowly been building myself back up.I do not have a time goal for this half marathon any longer, my only goal is to run the entire time without walking.  Does anyone have advice that can help me mentally breakthrough? [info] None [info] 1380559336
viptenchou [info] Anxiety about permanent choices and getting fixed. In replying to another post, I finally realized something. I'm terrified of permanent choices, thus making me feel uncomfortable to get fixed despite it being what I really want to do. In fact, part of why I dont want kids is because it's a permanent choice that can't be undone so I know I'll never do it.I was quite sure about getting fixed, though. I was a little nervous at the thought of something I couldn't change, but when I thought about it logically it just made sense. I've never wanted kids, ever. I already declared at 14 vocally that I didn't. I feel awkward around kids and have a whole list of reasons why I don't want them. I'm passionate about my CF choice. I tell every man I've ever been involved with since after my first bf who argued about the subject with me that I WILL NOT have kids and I would tell them pretty much right away. I'm tokophobic as well and I have so much anxiety and many other illnesses that I wouldn't want to pass on. I also can't stand too much noise or being in places that have too much "energy". I like staying home, relaxing. I like my space. I've even discussed with my current bf that we need a room to share but also we need our own rooms so we have our own space when we live together. I am 99.9999999% positive I will never change my mind. So of course, I reasoned that even if it made me a bit nervous to do something permanent... It's the best choice for me. But when I told my mom, even though she 100% supports my decision, she didn't think it was a good idea because if I did change my mind, she would be heartbroken for me and that there are a lot of long term BC options I could use instead. Not getting my mom's support really shook me. She always supports me with everything in life; she's been my biggest support for everything. Even when I told her randomly one day that I wanted to go to school across the world in Japan. So having her say she didn't think it was a good idea totally broke me here and now I feel really worried about the idea of getting fixed.I still really want to. I still look it up and think to myself that I will. But I worry that I won't be able to go through with it, not even because of doctors but because of my fear of permanent things. Does anyone else have this issue? :/ Has anyone else had it and gotten fixed anyway? How did that go for you? How did you get over that fear? (btw, I am diagnosed with anxiety and have been since childhood). Any ideas on how to get over the fear? Clearly, I already know it's the logical choice... I'm just still anxious. :/ [info] 24/F/I want to travel the world, not the baby section of walmart [info] 1482568442
ih8xoxo [info] Is it normal to question if you love your s/o? My boyfriend and I are both in our first relationship. I’m 19, he’s 20, and we are each other’s first everything. We get along great. For a first relationship, I think I made an amazing choice of man - he is thoughtful, loving, gentle, cares about my sexual needs, and always supports me, but also gives me constructive criticism when needed. We’ve been together going on three years and I know we were young when we began dating but he really gave me no reason to want to break up. I honestly think we are becoming a better couple as life goes on because we’re so familiar with each other. I am scared of my own thoughts though. I do admit, I struggle with mental illnesses. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but I have many symptoms of borderline personality. I am a survivor of abuse and currently in therapy. My mental illness has caused tides in our relationship where it would flare up and I would be an emotional disaster, but he always helped me through it.  With healthy eating, therapy, and a great boyfriend, I’ve been doing better.  Onto the point. Sometimes I look at him and I ask myself, do I really love him, or am I just familiar with him? I never cheated or felt tempted to cheat, but I do admit I kind of like when guys compliment me at bars and hit on me, I feel attractive. I politely shut them down. Not once have I felt the need to do anything unfaithful. My boyfriend makes me feel attractive too but I do like attention from others. It makes me wonder if that means I don’t love him. I also look at him sometimes and question it randomly. I sometimes notice his personality flaws and get annoyed. Just little things like that make me doubt it occasionally, but the worst one is - although I never felt tempted to cheat, I definitely do wonder what it’s like to flirt and explore at this age... mind you, I’m terrified of emotional and sexual intimacy and it took a wrecking ball to get my walls down.This is where I get confused. Guys try to touch me at bars sometimes and I hate it. I just think, ‘no, that’s not him, it doesn’t feel right,’ so I go back to him after a bar night with friends, and hug him, and feel completely content. I like feeling attractive (compliments) but I hate when guys actually try to get physically. Even though he’s annoying sometimes, there is no where more safe than his arms. Not once have I felt threatened by him in almost three years. I really am confused. Why is it some days he annoys the shit out of me, but he is still the person I want to be around? Some days, I question if I love him, and other days all the love songs are about him. The fact I question if I love him scares me. I was told you if you question it you love someone, you don’t. I’m sure I love him, but maybe I’m not in love? I don’t get butterflies around him. I don’t feel magical when he touches me like people describe. It just feels natural. Our relationship has never felt magical. Not even in the honeymoon stage. It just felt right because he treated me well and that’s really all I pursued and now we’re together three years and I’m scared he’s not the one, even though he has all the perfect qualities, but I also can’t picture a life without him. We are planning to get an apartment by September and I’m so excited.TDLR: in a healthy three year relationship. First relationship ever. Some days he annoys me and I question if I’m in love, and others, all the love songs are about him. Sometimes I wonder what other guys are like (I’m 19) but at the same time, I don’t think I want to know because other guys aren’t him. (And no, I never felt the need to cheat, or cheated). Confused about what love is suppose to feel like or be. Am I suppose to doubt it sometimes? Or is that a clear sign I’m over it? I’m scared because I don’t want to lose him. [info] None [info] 1583990382
Obversa [info] Same here. Yes, I absolutely consider myself disabled.Not just because I'm autistic, but because I've been diagnosed with anxiety so bad at times that it *is* disabling. My diagnosing psychologist even wrote up a document for me to be excused from speech class due to said anxiety. [info] ASD Female [info] 1558801463
MikeStidham [info] THAT was what led me to go to the doctor in the first place, at which time I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.  Some 20 years after that, my wife decided to seek a divorce.  As bad as those first panic attacks were, going through the divorce was 30 times worse.  I'd get this odd sensation in my chest like I'd just drank boiling water, then a hot flash all over me, then my legs would turn to jelly.  It's the weirdest thing I'd ever experienced. [info] None [info] 1574057371
-Noelle- [info] I relate to this so much. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was around 9-10 years old, and have been having it all my life since then (on and off but it's always dormant if that makes sense?) and I'm in my 20's now. I totally understand what you mean when you say it seems like everyone around you is "effortlessly happy", but I can promise you that isn't the case. Literally everyone is struggling with something, it's just that most of the time hardly anybody knows about it. Some of the people I've known who seem the happiest have some of the darkest life stories.My ability to cope with mine has never been great, but I'm much better at it now than I was when I was a teenager. I'll still have those really bad days but I try to distract myself as best as I can and (most) of the time I'll feel some relief over the next day or two.I'm sorry to hear you're going through alot right now. I hope you can find some comfort in the fact that so many people can understand and relate to how you're feeling &lt;3 [info] None [info] 1487162884
annettag33 [info] Distraction Post I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder in  2012 and are all too familiar how it can take over your life. I know how scary and uncomfortable they can be. Once we start to learn how to use distractions and gain back mind control, it gets better. I just wanted to share what helps me calm down and sleep at night in hopes that it helps someone else.https://youtu.be/pDrh2D5efEM [info] None [info] 1580457199
Sam_theMan [info] My life is great. I have an above average IQ, great parents, grandparents who have offered to pay my way through college, and I live in a very nice area. Yet somehow I'm depressed. My psyche says it's biological. So it's not going away unless I take my meds. Except I've been taking medications for two years, and very little has changed. And the only reason I was diagnosed with anxiety and ASD is because I tried to kill myself. Common sense would have you believe my life is perfect. But apparently not.I feel trapped in my head. So to answer OP's question: Life is a lottery. But that doesn't mean everyone else loses. We all have to just try and survive. And I guess it's important that we all do our best to make the next generation of kids the happiest, healthiest, and safest of all time. [info] None [info] 1412220560
flozza89 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety so I guess it's not completely unfeasible. [info] None [info] 1492286101
high-valyrian [info] First post, need to vent. (Wall of Text) So I'm a long time lurker, comment a lot but this is my first ever post on Reddit.I've been addicted to opiates for five years now -- pills only. I was diagnosed with anxiety, BPD, and cervical kyphosis. I've tried a lot of drugs but pills are my love and downfall. About six months ago, my best friend urged me to try Subutex to break the ugly cycle. I was ready. I had a new job and a new home and amazing SO who also does the treatment as well. I jumped in head first and immediately was surprised. The Subutex gave me a moderate high but more, took away my withdraws and basically allowed me to stop doing pills altogether. I don't have a huge tolerance (I only weigh 100 lbs). My average usage vs tolerance is about 30-50 mg a day.On July 1st my state decided to get rid of Subutex altogether. My clinic denies me, nobody around here is selling them. Now I know I could do strips or methadone. Methadone is just too much for me, I don't like the way it makes me feel and it does nothing for my pain. Strips are ok but for me, my physical addiction is insufflation. I'm sure those of u who do can sympathize. So now I've fallen off the wagon and gone back to pills because I can't get my subutex anymore, nor can I find suboxone. Not only that but my area is extremely dry and I keep getting ripped off by middlemen. So now I'm broke, in pain, and withdrawing. I hate the place I live. I don't understand how lawmakers could just decide to get rid of something literally keeping me off the streets and out of jail. Unknowingly they've created a bad and ugly backlash around here. A lot of my friends were Also taking tex. And now they are going through the same. People who haven't ever had this burden just don't understand. I'm so tired of this. I'm tired and the only thing that makes me feel like life is worth living is pills. I'm supposed to be taking my anti depressants but I hate them. They make me feel like a zombie. Opiates give me drive, energy, and I feel like they make me a better person. I've been prescribed all kinds of things for my issues ... kpin, xanax, the old buspar bars, Prozac, wellbutrin, you wouldn't believe. But my PCP told me I'm "too young" for anyone to prescribe me opiates. Instead I was given gabapentin, which was terrible. I hate this state, this country's draconian views and refusal to see the truth. I hate doctors and the entire medical industry. I was on a fast track to medical school myself. I got a near perfect score on my ACT and had a full ride to college but between all the crazy benzodiazepines and SSRI and Gaba and lyrica I lost my drive and quit school. I now hate everything to do with the medical field and I will never ever want to be involved in a field where killing people for profit is ok. Sorry for the text but I just felt like I finally needed to get this off my chest.Editing this to add that I love this community. Ever since I found this subreddit I've been reading daily. I think what you guys do here is great. And I appreciate and love all of you! [info] None [info] 1437154717
ThrewTheDrew [info] I am, or rather was, EXACTLY like you.Meditation helps. In a couple of weeks/months you should see the improvement.I also began practicing Stoicism, which also helps me with my anxiety.I would also suggest that you see a therapist. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and a therapist might be of great help if you have any such disorders. [info] None [info] 1566195150
throwawayOT1994 [info] Where can I get help for Mental Health Issues in Sandy Hill? I was diagnosed with anxiety 2 years ago but never sought help because I thought I could handle it myself.I moved to Sandy Hill recently from another province and I realized I may need some help managing my anxiety.I currently am on probation at work and don't have access to an insurance plan. I do have an Ontario health card. [info] None [info] 1479308365
stebbiv [info] I had this issue constantly since the equivalent of junior high and I ended up dropping out of college. - Years later I was diagnosed with anxiety, that has been causing all sorts of serious issues.So yeah. Find a clynical psychologist to help you out. Maybe your school can help you out. I literally lost years because of this and now I'm 28 and just getting back on track. (Or so I think.) [info]  [info] 1411947844
alexandria94 [info] First time I tried amphetamines, I was 13 y.o. Occasionally I took amphetamines, sometimes coke. I stopped when I was 17 y.o.When I turned 21, I started doing coke once in a while, but recently I've been abusing all kinds of drugs.I used to have great memory, but now my short-term memory has worsen, I have trouble remembering simple stuff. I'm also depressed and need stimulants to feel something close to happiness. I'm also paranoid and a year ago I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I'm not saying it's all because of the drugs, but I'm pretty sure they've contributed a lot. [info] None [info] 1490526820
sarahs7896 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety around March of last year, and my husband has been awesome. I know I get on his nerves when I start incessantly worrying about something, because I stew on it for awhile in my own head, and snap at him when I shouldn’t. He knows it helps me end the loop (for lack of a better term) if I can just voice what I’m worried about. Sometimes I have to talk it out a couple times for it to work, but he listens patiently and just lets me get things out at my own pace without pushing me.  And he doesn’t offer advice or tell me to just not worry about it. He just listens, which he knows is what I need.  [info] None [info] 1515351047
vampirecafeinomane [info] I dont know what to do.. I posted it under venting but Id appreciate advices as well.I am 23, F, from quebec, canada. I've been diagnosed with anxiety 3 years ago and panic with agoraphobia about 2 years ago. I am currently medicated on citalopram 30mg and bupropil xl, as well as clonazepam for emergency ( i almost never use it). Im always up and down and I never know when a down can happen as I have absolutely no triggers for them. The only thing is that they always happen in the morning when I wake up. I've never had trouble sleeping ( exept because of anxiety but its been a while now) and I am a big sleeper, I cant get enough sleep. I honestly suspect hypersomnia. As I said i've been diagnosed about 3 years ago,, and ive been working on getting better since then. Heres what I have tried and/or im currently doing :-meditation-tarot, not as a divination tool but as food for thoughts.-sport-seeing a psychologist-seeing a few social worker-support groups-psychoeducation groups-regular routine and healty habits -taking concrete actions to fix what is bothering me.I have to admit that I am living a very good life : I have a loving boyfriend, a supportive family and friend circle, a nice job that I like, I study something that I love and that Im guarantee to have a job when im finished, I have pets that I also love...As I said, Ive seen a psychologist and a few social workers and they all say that I seem perfectly healty and dont understand what is going on. Ive had past traumas but I went over them with all of them and they all agree that they are indeed in the past and not the cause of my current anxiety and panic. My doctor has ruled out brain problems and my blood tests were perfect. I am currently laying in bed and I should be in school but i am so very tired and my head hurts. Ive been feeling very discouraged these past few days as I dont seem to find the end of it..Has anybody lived anything similar or has some advice for me ? [info] None [info] 1543508890
SignalCraft_ [info] What jobs are best for me given my situation? I've been looking for a job for the past year, I've applied for online shopping(Picking the groceries that someone chose online and bringing it out to their car) and merchandising positions mainly. I was diagnosed with anxiety and I don't do well around people so I want to avoid cashier jobs as much as possible.I am 17 years old and I've dropped out of highschool to help my father (He's 63 years old and has a severe form of lupus), So I'm not sure what is exactly open to me. I've applied at so many stores around me and haven't gotten a reply from anyoneI really need to find a Job before the end of summer because once I turn 18, my father will stop receiving a large chunk of benefits&amp;#x200B;(I live in Alberta, Canada) [info] None [info] 1587053829
another30yovirgin [info] I've seen maybe 5 different therapists over the years, and yes, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and they were trying to work on that with me. I haven't been hitting on tons of girls over and over, because uh, yeah, anxiety. But I've asked women out before. I've been on some dates. Not recently. I'm definitely not trying now, and for a long time I haven't been able to bring myself to do it. It's just awful trying to date. So if you want to blame it on me, go ahead. So there you go. I'm hopeless. [info] None [info] 1508552979
harperdarper [info] Helocopter parents afraid of adult child camping My parents are not really narcissists but more helocopter parents. But I'm getting sick of this constant worrying they push on me, telling me all the terrible things that could happen to me if I go out.So I'm 26 and my sibling is 21 and we're going camping tonight at a local state park. Mom is totally against this idea; worried about animals and other campers and asked me if we could just camp out in the backyard. Absolutely off the wagon she is. I told her look I'm almost 30 I don't know what you want me to do I can't just spend all my time at home. She's not happy but we're going, I'm tired of her always telling me I'm going to die or whatever everytime I leave the house. I finally started a good job with great pay so I'll be moving soon. They're trying to talk me out of that too but I need to live MY life without them always putting anxiety and their negative outlooks on me. They're not bad people, they've been great parents but I've been diagnosed with anxiety that my therapist has said stems from them telling me pretty much anytime I try to do anything something bad will happen to me. I'm working on being more spontaneous like camping so hopefully moving out will be great and finally get rid of this anxiety. Just needed to vent thanks for readingTLDR helocopter parents give me anxiety about doing anything [info] None [info] 1530640210
tink9995 [info] I've had similar issues!  I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was a teenager.  I was prescribed Paxil and became suicidal.  (This was before they realized kids under 18 shouldn't take this med)  Fast forward to my adult years and I'm still struggling with anxiety.  Despite me telling him the past history with Paxil he tries to prescribe it to me again- and brushes off my concern and blames it on my anxiety.  It makes you realize just how uncertain we are on dealing with the mind.  We can fix bones, blood pressure, nerves- but healing a problem in the mind is still an unknown area. [info] None [info] 1407787338
lawyer_or_actor [info] Me [35 M] with my GF [30F] of 5 years, broke up with her last night; she won't quit calling or texting. What do I do next? She has a lot of emotional issues stemming from abuse she had when she was a child. One of her main issues was that she was very angry with me all the time. Little stuff, big stuff, it didn't matter. She has a temper and I think I was her outlet for her anger. I finally had had enough and reached out to my parents who told me they think I had "battered woman" syndrome of sorts wherein she would emotionally abuse me but then flip it around to make it my fault. I was diagnosed with anxiety the past year, part of it stems from her treatment of me. Just to give you all and idea of the type of person I am dealing with.Anyway, it was a toxic relationship (I wasn't perfect either) but I do feel bad about calling it off. She's not all bad and I tried so hard to make it work. She has texted and called constantly saying she will change and finally go to therapy.Part of me wants to give her another chance but part of me knows I have to put my foot down. So what should I tell her? She's the type of person that will not quit calling or texting but I feel like I should probably say something to drive home the point that we are done so she will start to heal and move on. Should I call her? Text her? I already broke up with her should I just ignore everything? I'm at work right now and had to block her so I can try and keep it all together.Thank you so much for any help you can give.**TL;DR Broke up with my girlfriend last night. I love her but she has so many issues that just weren't good for me. She won't quit calling or texting me. What do I do next?** [info] None [info] 1532451366
jgardner [info] I think teenagers would need to see a list of things and where they fall on the spectrum according to common understanding. With enough examples, they would know what to do in the various cases *and* remain perfectly tolerant. (I had someone say "I'm getting an abortion" when we were teenagers. That shook me to my core. I wish I had known at the time there were people who would've wanted to talk to me about that like my parents and my bishop.)As a professional, you can tell them what "signs of abuse" are and how to properly report, as well as what kinds of things are kept confidential with the bishop, etc...Another thing I might add while I have your attention: One thing that blew my mind as an EQP was having my mom (earned a degree in psychology) explain what the various common disorders are, what their signs are, and most especially, *what it is like living with these things.* Understanding what it meant when someone says, "I am clinically depressed" or "I have been diagnosed with anxiety" really awoke me to a better understanding of these issues and my patience, tolerance, kindness and charity towards people who deal with these things grew infinitely. I think teens need to know because that's when some of these things start presenting and I understand a very large number of people develop their illnesses in their twenties and their peers can be the most help of anyone. [info] child of God (and so are you) [info] 1560376105
albob [info] It was something my psychiatrist told me back when I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.  A quick google search found this article with a link to the study at the bottom - https://adaa.org/living-with-anxiety/managing-anxiety/exercise-stress-and-anxiety [info] None [info] 1564863195
Synikul [info] I see, I can somewhat relate.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but it's more that I worry about everything to a ridiculous point instead of it affecting me socially (unless I let worrying make me stay home, which happens sometimes).  I'm sorry you had to go through all of that, but I'm glad it's getting better and it sounds like you have a pretty great boyfriend.  Some people really suck at committing to plans, and hey, some people might feel as anxious as you do about going to hang out.  There's been a few times where I've ducked plans for literally no reason other than I was feeling anxious.  Anyways, I hope you feel better about this whole thing and hopefully your friends are around more in the future! [info] None [info] 1453578077
CovertOpsCon [info] AITA for declining to go and see my girlfriend's extended family? I am on my winter break from work and have met and met up with many people (friends/family, including my gf's). I have not had a day where I spend time working on my own projects such as working on my music, reading on philosophy (a personal interest of mine) and working out. Today when I woke up I knew I had the whole day set aside for myself to do these things. At around 2:30pm today my girlfriend asked me if I could go see her extended family from out of town. Her parents are particularly notorious for making last minute plans, which my gf understands. So when asked I politely declined stating what was said above. She is now upset that I decided not to come. To be more specific, she called me an asshole with a raised voice and continued with her arguments:1) I have had the past week and a half to work on these things and I have chosen to "waste" it spending time with other people. I should have set aside time earlier.2) I am an asshole because I have the availability and I am refusing.I have spend lots of time with her over the past week and a half (I believe it has been 7-9 of the past 12 days) and the other days have been a mix of family and friends some from whom came from out of town. I would argue that the expectation of my attendance is rather rude and inconsiderate as the plans were made last minute. On another note, I have been diagnosed with anxiety (runs in the family). I get really worked up and worried when things like this happen. I love my girlfriend with all my heart and I hate that I have hurt her, however I am not sure if I am wrong here. AITA? [info] None [info] 1577663574
Dsg1116 [info] I’m 24 and have a bachelors in psychology. I have been diagnosed by a psychiatrist. Taken meds and seen counselors. I was diagnosed with anxiety and minor ptsd. I’ve contemplated borderline too but my dr said I had the symptoms and he said  there was not much need for the label. I guess cuz only a few were displayed. He said I was a bit histrionic. Medication didn’t work well, I dunno what to tell you all. I’m sounding like a monster. [info] None [info] 1562378449
anxietyriddennoodle [info] Me [21F] with my boyfriend [21M] of two years. His family make me uncomfortable and I don't know what to do. This is probably longer than it should be, but thank you to those who read. Firstly, my boyfriend and I were born and raised in the same country but our family cultures are completely different. I have European blood, my parents can both speak their mother tongues fluently and I was raised in a very Mediterranean household. My boyfriends family are Australian, his parents are well-off and are nice enough but I never feel welcome.I try my best to be polite and start conversations, I have never had trouble making friends with my friends parents before but for some reason I just don't feel like anybody likes me. I have been diagnosed with anxiety so I understand a lot of the nerves I feel stem from that, but it's getting ridiculous and I embarrass myself that I'm so anxious before anything has even happened just because of past situations.Here are some examples: * We were invited to his younger brothers [12M] birthday party. There were A LOT of people there, so many people that not even my boyfriend knew them so I doubt his brother even did. It was loud, everybody was drinking or drunk and I felt this was really inappropriate since such young children were around, including a toddler and his younger sister [7F]. It was incredibly overwhelming for me, to be introduced to so many people and have to awkwardly smile at the mention of his ex-girlfriend and when I was introduced as 'the new one' by his grandmother. We were already dating for a year at this time, so it hurt. I had a small panic attack and had to sit on his porch stairs alone for a while. * My boyfriends car broke down and he had to call his mother to ask her to come get us. She picked us up in her car, drove us to the pub where his father was so they could swap cars and we could take the mothers car. When we arrived everything was okay until his father came out. He was drunk and had a very intoxicated man with him who was shouting and stumbling around. Just before we said goodbyes, the man noticed me and shouted 'Who are you?' I could feel myself turn red and stumbled over my words, he asked me where I was from and I wasn't sure how to react. He made me so uncomfortable, I felt like a spotlight was on me and everybody was watching and mocking. I was so close to tears, but my boyfriend intercepted the conversation and we drove home. * We had dinner at his parents house since his mother made Paella. She asked me how to say it and I explained why the 'll's are not pronounced, my boyfriend backed me up after she didn't quite understand. His father said he thought it was a South American dish and said he would only eat it with aioli and hot sauce (gross, but fair enough), then his younger brother said he thought I was Mexican. I was so uncomfortable because throughout my whole life, people have used Mexican as an insult toward me. * During summer, my boyfriends little sister was wearing a swimsuit and her father said she was getting fat. She is 7. Though this wasn't directed towards me, I felt disgusted by his words. His father says a lot of sexist things, but to insult your own daughter is so destructive. * His father doesn't talk to me. I don't know what it is but he has never spoken to me. If he is offering people drinks he will ignore me. If I ask him how he's going, he pretends he doesn't hear. He doesn't like my boyfriend since he moved out and no longer obeys his every word, but I don't know why *I* am being treated like this. As I said, I know I have anxiety and a lot of my discomfort comes from that but I think it is becoming too much for me now. I am almost in tears and getting dizzy just from writing this, I have spoken to my boyfriend about how I feel and all he says is that he feels the same. I'm not sure what to do other than what I've already been doing, trying.   ---     **tl;dr**: My boyfriends family are very different to my own and make me uncomfortable, I feel like I cannot speak to them without being shamed. [info] None [info] 1475971259
Daide [info] I'm going to do my best to reply like you're a human being, a courtesy you didn't bother to attempt to offer me.I'm not excusing his behaviour entirely nor am I saying he has anxiety, social or otherwise. I don't know because we only know her side of the story that focuses around one event. Your advice immediately assumes the worst of him, calling him passive aggressive. **If** he does have anxiety, your advice sucks and she needs to recalibrate her expectations on introducing him to some new things and how she does so.As far as the ren faire, I'm going to do my best to try and explain why *I* might begin to shut down in such an environment: Well, for [our] anniversary, my wife wants to go to a ren faire. Okay, it's not something I've been around and I have no idea how to act but I'll go for her. I know she'll like it so I'll give it a try. Once we're there I'm being asked if I want to wear a costume. I'm *really* not comfortable with this. It's at this point where I actually start shutting down. I feel like, unjustifiably, people will be judging me. I'd feel stupid. Everyone here is having a blast doing weird things, people are talking in ways I don't know how to react to. Should I reply trying to do a bastardized version of what they're doing? Will people start judging me? If I don't do it, are they going to roll their eyes at how I'm not even trying to fit in....Everyone around here is having a blast. Why can't I? [My wife] really wants me to enjoy this thing but I'm starting to hit a really bad negative feedback loop. Oh great, she's now in costume and wants me to keep trying these different. Can't she see how much I'm really not having any fun? She keeps trying to involve me in these conversations but I'm really starting to freak out. I don't like it here. I don't like how unfamiliar it is and I don't like how I'm *still* being pushed out of my comfort zone.By this point, I'd likely be sitting by a tree and hoping that the night ends and that nobody even notices me. I don't want [my wife] to ask me what's wrong and I certainly don't want to talk about it. I don't want to drag her down in my own issues...but now she's angry...and the feedback loop keeps going. Do you see how this might really fucking suck **when you cannot control it**. I'm not choosing to do this and I would probably give up a limb in order to be 'normal' in large groups and new settings. It's not always like this, but when it happens, there's no "sucking it up and faking".&gt;Don't even try to make your wife feel special on your anniversary. Trying to take her to a ren faire, which she likes, is an attempt. Just because I suck in some social settings doesn't mean I don't have to try. I'm not excusing him, I'm just trying to offer *possible* reasons as to why th&gt;Since it's not easy for you, why bother?It's not like I decided to live in a hole and stop trying new things when I was diagnosed with anxiety... I'd hope that I could verbalize my issues and also how I perhaps needed to be given slightly different considerations when doing some new things. Anxiety isn't a free pass to just never do things a significant other wants to do, nor is it life ending...This is where adapting her expectations and her method of introducing him can make a pretty big difference. Like maybe going to a ren faire once to try it out. Not going overboard, not trying on costumes or pressuring him to try events if he isn't feeling up to it. Just getting to know it, trying some food and drink and seeing how it all works. [info] None [info] 1376876353
alkatori [info] Unexplained Chest Pain - Doctor's at a loss, any ideas? Hi I am (running down the list):31 Years OldMale5'10200 lbsWhiteComplaint lasting 5 years, last 2 (going on 3) fairly severe at times.Location: NH, USA Body: Upper Chest, usually on the left side. Along with arm, and sometimes back/jaw pain.Relevant Medical Issues:AnxietyGERDMedications:CitalopramOmeprazolXanaxPhysical Activity:I use a stepper for 45 minutes daily once I get home. I work up a good sweat but rarely get winded. On the flip side I spend most of my time in front of a computer at work.Family History:My grandfather died of a heart attack, as did his brothers in their late 60's and early 70's.Also I'm a non-smoker and overweight but slowly adopting a healthier diet. I just need to work on portion control.Basically I just went to the ER for the first time this year. Which really sucks, as I had been there previously about 7 months ago. I was there because of chest pains that didn't respond to my normal method of treatment.When my chest pain is bad I do the following:1) I try Ranitidine, if that doesn't work2) I try Advil, if that doesn't work3) I try Xanax, If that doesn't work4) I exercise.When my chest pain is light I usually start with Exercise, and feel relieved after 5 or 10 minutes. That was a recommendation from my therapist as I am diagnosed with anxiety. It generally lasts about as long as I exercise and comes back slightly worse after 10 or 15 minutes of rest. I spoke with a cardiologist that told me that indicates it's not a heart issue and all the normal tests they ran are clean (stress echo, echo, blood work, ekg, etc).In this particular case I did 45 minutes of cardio, and it didn't get worse or better. So I went to the ER and they diagnosed it as most likely skeletal or muscle pain. My primary care doc confirms, but he's also sending me to consult with the Cardiologist again as I get suddenly fatigued and dizzy on occasion. He said it could be cardio or it could just be stress.Anyway, my question is: If it's a muscle or skeleton problem, who the heck could I see to get some answers or relief? My primary care doc couldn't think of anybody and neither could the ER staff. At this point I don't even know what questions I should be asking.I don't really believe it's a heart issue, but I can't get it out of my mind that it might be. I've been told it's anxiety, GERD, Costochondritis but the patterns don't seem to quite fit. Either the medication they try doesn't have an effect (anxiety, GERD) or it's lasting far too long (Costochondritis).So any suggestions who to talk to next? Apart from a cardiologist, because although I don't think that's my issue. I still have an appointment coming up next week just to be safe. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1468864841
TabooWiseguy [info] My younger sister is stealing my stuff I've been diagnosed with anxiety 2 years ago. My parents know and try and help me but my younger sister doesn't seem to give a shit about it. With my anxiety I get very irritated very fast. I can hear her breathing or chewing while sitting next to me and I just want to slam her jaw shut. My sister has a record of stealing from our family too. She (on more than one occasion) has taken money, food, and jewelry from my mother, father and I. She has no self control and will take what she wants. She is constantly stealing food that my parents buy specifically for me (I don't eat breakfast so I get energy bars, she went through a 10 pack of chocolate cliff bars in one sitting.) I'm at my last straw right now.On Sunday I'm going with a few friends to go see a movie. I remember having $50 in my wallet because I keep every dollar gained and spent written down in a notebook, I don't want to run the risk of her stealing any of my money. But today I went to go look in my wallet and there was only $20. I got instantly pissed off.I went downstairs to talk to my dad and he said he can do nothing about it. I told her about my sister stealing money before and that if he can talk about it with her. He then told me that it's my responsibility to deal with my own money and possessions, which I agree with! But the fact that I had written down (with pen!) in my notebook that I had $45 and suddenly the other $10 is gone is *my fault?* I'm just sick and fucking tired of my sister getting away with this bullshit. [info] None [info] 1538163360
Kevlar23 [info] Thanks for posting this, it gives me hope that someone else was in this situation and it went away. I've been to the doctor, they shrug it off as "normal tremors" aggregated by stress, and tell me it will go over. 40 days later, and it hasn't. I'm not questioning doctors, but some of them have very little knowledge about illicit drugs, and since I'm diagnosed with anxiety, it's very easy for them to shrug it off. I've scheduled a new appointment with another doctor, and hopefully they'll take me seriously and let me do an MRI. Mentally I'm horrified I've done permanent damage to my nervous system, and it's been two really hard months. Hopefully I can get some clear answers soon, and hopefully it's not bad answers.  [info] None [info] 1466459360
roseandrelease [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD and I wonder this all the time. I ask my friends to be understanding without using my conditions as an excuse, but it can be hard. I'm not distracted and disorganised because I'm lazy. I really do put in a lot of effort. But it can be hard to differentiate my behaviour from the behaviour of someone who isn't trying. I think you have to understand that I am struggling with a condition, not a character trait. [info] None [info] 1441894326
brelizabeth [info] This made me feel great. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few days ago and it was nice to see people being supportive to David. I also really like that David genuinely does seem to be overcoming his anxiety, at least a little bit. When he is talking to Ken about losing the reward and how he craves pizza, he puts his head in his hands and you can see him working to change his thoughts. Then he looks up and smiles and makes an optimistic comment. Production can be heavy-handed with this stuff but, for me, the representation is nice.I changed my flair to David after the episode :) [info] David [info] 1480047613
Palonirya [info] This post actually made me tear up a little bit.I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2009, by actual doctors in an actual hospital and not just some internet forum, and even though I am so much better mentally than I was back then, there are still times when I will disassociate to the point where my own name doesn't feel as though it belongs to me.Knowing that there are people my age out there who will actively feign having anxiety and other mental illnesses and who think that having a mental illness means you literally have to talk about it all the time makes me sick. It is NOT so easy and so intriguing to talk about that you can write reams and reams on Tumblr about how your life is 'full of darkness' and how your body aches. A lot of the time you don't even want to talk about it because it can make you feel worse.The last thing I want to do when I'm having issues with my anxiety is turn it into a freaking poem for the internet to enjoy and praise me for. It is NOT worth my time. [info] None [info] 1471390836
carolinelizabeth__ [info] Anxiety and becoming a JAG Attorney Hello,I am a current undergraduate student at UW-Madison, and am looking into becoming a JAG attorney in the future. In regards to the mental health requirements, I was just diagnosed with anxiety (specifically test anxiety). Will this affect my chances in becoming a JAG attorney? I am actively trying to reduce my anxiety, and hopefully will have it resolved in a few months. Thank you! [info] None [info] 1565381179
annmarieg5 [info] I feel the same. I have allergy induced asthma (during the spring I find it really hard to breathe, or when exercising outside. I have an inhaler and it works fine.) But before I was diagnosed with anxiety I would just be sitting at home on my couch and suddenly it would get hard to breathe. Thought I was having an asthma attack and would get frustrated when my inhaler didn't help. Now I realize its a panic attack (so much better right?! lol) I just have to lay down and try my hardest the breathe in deeply and remind myself im not having an asthma attack and treat myself for the panic attack (talking to someone, breathing exercises, taking my emergency meds). Idk if this helped but yeah... [info] None [info] 1529839294
01394927371729391 [info] Anxiety or something else? Age: 19 Sex: Male Height: 5'11 Weight: 85 KG Race: Indian Duration: A few hours (6) Location :Canada, Hi, I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and I think I had a little panic attack, but I feel my heart beating wired and feel a little weak/lightheaded, this has been going on for about 2 hours, I am 19 and have also done an EKG test last month.I also felt little loss of sensation/ numbness in my feet when I walk and now feel like I am losing control, but my heart beat is not racing so I just want to know if this is a panic attack/Anxiety or not. Thanks in advance, I have been looking into CBT, but I dont know if that will cut it, can anyone chime in? [info] None [info] 1551497954
exscapegoat [info] At most places, technically no.  You either lie or give a vague "not feeling well" reason for not coming in.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and mild to moderate PTSD.  A few times a year, I may need an unscheduled day off (have never used up all of my sick days, btw).  I just say I'm not feeling well usually.  I have disclosed to my recent and current bosses that I have anxiety.  But I didn't go into the details of why.  I wish things were different, but there's a good chance I'm going to be judged negatively if I go into the details of why I'm missing work.  This is a news story about a woman who had a pretty understanding boss who rewarded her honesty.  This is the way it should be, but it's often not that way.http://www.cnn.com/2017/07/12/health/mental-health-response-from-company-ceo-trnd/index.html [info] None [info] 1510335793
sahariana [info] As others have said, get a doc evaluation. I struggled with this for years just thinking I was lazy or unmotivated. I was diagnosed with anxiety and while it’s not perfect, the meds are helping me get back on my feet. You’ve been in this mindset for so long it’s become normal. [info] None [info] 1573073845
wootwootclapclap [info] I was not even planning on getting an account on reddit, but after I read your post I knew I had to get one. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 16. I've always been anxious, I remember being a kid, around 8 years old, and overthinking things. I know how you feel, I've been there. Luckily, my anxiety has gotten better, I went from having panic attacks, everyday, to having panic attacks as little as three times a month. I went from having therapy sessions twice a week, to once a week, and now I'm going every two weeks. I no longer take antidepressants or xanax, and I've been going to a psychiatrist, for a little over a year and a half.Please, reach out for help, don't be afraid to tell people how you feel, I'm sure your family does not think of you that way, and if they do, they will stop thinking about you that way, when you speak up.  A counselour won't be able to give you the help you need. You need to see somehow that has been trained, and has the skills to treat you.Anxiety/fear, are common things, and fearing something has saved our lives, at times we don't do stupid things, because we fear the outcome,  because we know it would hurt us, or kill us, therefore, having a little bit of fear, it's ok, BUT, when you're in such an awful state of PANIC, when you can't even walk outside, cause you feel as if you're going to die, that's when anxiety needs to be treated in a different way.I'm far from being a professional, I'm speaking from my own experience.I don't know where you live, but there are special organizations that help people with mental illness.Please, don't be afraid to tell people about your feelings, and your worries. I know it's hard, and I know that at times, you might feel that it is embarrasing, but this is not a joke. These disorders are real, and you have the right to tell people how you feel.Sorry for my poor spelling, I'm not a native english speaker.I hope you can get through this. [info] None [info] 1416177517
Bigfthrowaway33 [info] I'm scared my girlfriend because my girlfriend came out as bisexual. My (22F) girlfriend (24F) came out as bi two months ago after identifying as a lesbian for 3 years and it's scaring me. She thought she was a lesbian when we got together 3 years ago due to her attraction to me but has recently told me she's bisexual and attracted to both men and women.I try not to mind as I know that harmful stereotypes about bi people being unfaithful are untrue and biphobic. I don't believe she's "straight and in denial," because bi people exist and their sexuality is real. Several important people in my life are bi, including one of my best friends and my roommate. I would never judge my girlfriend for her sexuality and accept this is who she is and am happy that she is comfortable under that label. Yet I still find myself getting worried wondering if she'd rather be with a man or if she's crushing on one of her friends (she's a tomboy and most of her friends are male.) I've been diagnosed with anxiety and know this is all on my head and trust she loves me and is faithful to me but the thoughts keep coming.I'm never going to tell her about any of this because I love her and don't want her to be ashamed of her sexuality but I'm just unjustly worried. [info] None [info] 1587643293
camohorse [info] Can I legally own a firearm in Colorado if I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder? [info] None [info] 1569666247
ODB247 [info] Female. The doc was male. It’s pretty typical for me to be diagnosed as having anxiety first and then I have to convince the doctor to test me for things. I was diagnosed with anxiety but it turned out to be cardiac issues -occasional arrhythmias. Same diagnosis when I lost my period for 9 months and then had bleeding for 6 months straight. That turned out to be a polyp. Same when I had insane dizziness for a few years. That one was actually a Chiari malformation. I don’t make up symptoms and I don’t present as panicking or looking for medication. I just want to know what is going on. I’m not sure if my symptoms are ignored because I’m female, because I look healthy, or maybe because the doctors are all just overworked snd pressed for time. It’s really frustrating. I rarely go to the doctor for anything because it sucks to be dismissed and told I’m making it up when I know something is wrong.  [info] None [info] 1536801216
SpatialJoinz [info] Checking my 2 day old's breathing constantly Hi Daddit, we had our little bundle of joy day before yesterday and it was a pretty smooth delivery. First child.  I was hoping to get some words of advice on anxiety.  I just spent 9 months worrying about the pregnancy and labor, now that it's over I've moved on to worrying about  him directly.  He was just on my tummy for awhile hanging out sleeping after feeding, all swaddled up and his breathing became so light I thought it stopped. Called my wife in, properly freaked her out, lifted him up and he was so sleepy he was limp at first, scared the ever living shit out of us.  He's fine, he is absolutely fine, but that freaked me out bad.Any advice?  Has anyone else experienced this.  I should also mention I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder but on a very good treatment plan and typically don't worry to this detail anymore.  I'm sure this breathing anxiety is common.  Thanks Daddit and I look forward to being part of the community! [info]  [info] 1485155877
refugefirstmate [info] First, call the number on the back of your insurance card to see whether you need a referral from your doctor or not.  Generally with psychiatric care, you don't.Next: County mental health center. Make an appointment.  They charge on a sliding scale, they take insurance, and there are lots of different practitioners in one place. And they have seen everything more than once, believe me, so don't feel weird about needing therapy at all.  IME the problem with goign to a private practitioner is that it's a crapshoot, and some of the therapists out there need help themselves.  (As I left an intial session with one after telling her we weren't a good fit, she sadly called out "But I *like* you!"  uh no)You'll have an intake interview to find out what your treatment goals are and the kind of therapist you think would be a good fit.  Then you'll get an appointment with a therapist.After a couple therapist meetings you'll see a psychiatrist, who reviews the therapist's notes and talks to you and makes a recommendation for what anxiety meds might be useful to you. You choose to take them, or not.Then you continue to see the therapist, learning new ways of thinking, usually once a week, and the psychiatrist after another month to see how the meds are working or if the type of dosage needs tweaking (it usually does).  Once you're on a satisfactory med schedule, you see the psychiatrist only every 3 months or so.  Your therapy can continue until you decide you've achieved what you want, which means it can be half a dozen sessions or a couple years.If you don't click with the first therapist, you can always discuss switching to another one so that your sessions will be more productive.Remember:  Therapy is only as good as you make it.  It's *hard work*. Don't just show up, unload or passively sit there, and then go back to your old thinking as soon as you leave.  Really make those sessions count.I was diagnosed with anxiety at age 50. Yeah, I waited that long.  Good on you for not being me.  Let me tell you, it is eminently fixable and boy when you do get a handle on things you feel like the king of the universe. [info] None [info] 1569701423
Mekchrious [info] A [rant] because not sleeping sucks I was diagnosed with anxiety about a month ago after close to a year of symptoms (specifically GAD).  The opinion of the professional was that meds could help, but doing as much natural remedies as I could before turning to them.  And I have; a healthy lifestyle is something I treasure, and probably keeps much of the feeling at bay, along with a dose of daily meditation.But this last week has really sucked.  I'm a person with very high situational awareness; I sit by fire exits for example.  I always have; being a perfectionist and a lover of the worst-case-scenario, I prepare for it.  But this manifests as bad paranoia when my anxiety hits.  It's not unusual for me not to sleep well; but this past week has been a string of four and five hour nights.  Naps and working out have kept me going, but it's been rough!So today  I ran even further than I usually do and hopefully exhausted myself enough that I will sleep better.I know I am probably a newbie at this compared to many of you and haven't been suffering as long, but I'm truly starting to see what many sufferers of anxiety go through, and it is no me gusta! [info]  [info] 1351663215
babygorilla90 [info] Thanks, makes sense since i am diagnosed with anxiety. Although i do have a very faint wheeze but it's getting better. [info] None [info] 1533587861
Morningglory1127 [info] Running on our adrenaline for 12 hours Hello everyone I'm new to this sub so I'm not even sure if I am in the right place. I was diagnosed with anxiety after a series of side effects started. Things like electric feeling jolts if my teeth hot together too hard...jolts that start in my finger tips and go into my chest. My GP prescribed clonazopam (?) and for a while that worked. However over the last few months I've had a major downturn. I was on an anti depressant for PTSD as well...called Vibrid I think... anyway I stopped taking that because I felt it was causing the downturn. I eased off of it over a period of several weeks and am currently on no antidepressants. Last night I felt the energy to work out for the first time home in quite a while. So I got to work...as soon as the workout was over about 45 minutes of high Endurance exercising...the adrenaline kept pumping. And I feel like it hasn't stopped...went to sleep at 2 woke up at 5 and my hands won't stop shaking. My head racing and I can't sit still Has anyone ever had this issue? I feel like I've been running all night even after a few hours of sleep.*My life has been rather up turned lately. Major marital problems, just found out I'll be traveling for the next 9-13 months due to my job. [info] None [info] 1470315423
what-it-do-bay-be [info] My ocd is ruining my life and I don’t know what to do anymore. My avoidance compulsion has grown stronger and stronger since 2011 when I was 15 and undiagnosed, now I’m a 23 year old university student who has been diagnosed with ocd (and other mental illnesses) and it’s become absolutely debilitating. I’ve tried a lot of SSRI’s since 2013 when I was diagnosed with anxiety and all of them made me worse off in the end, I’ve also done therapy and my home therapist was great. But once I moved away from home to go to university, I eventually met with the campus counselors and current “therapist”/counselor has made my ocd so much more unbearable. I feel like I’ve dug myself into an unescapable hole over the years and I’m now just becoming aware of it; it also doesn’t help at all that I’m broke as well on top of it all. I can’t afford a better therapist at the moment and my job fucking sucks so paying bills/rent has eaten my income. I don’t know how to adjust to this full-on adulthood, I’m severely alone because of my avoidance compulsions and my compulsive skin picking makes me want to hide from the world even more, I look and feel like a monster. Life is an absolute chore for me now and I don’t see the payoff to it anymore, especially after figuring out that my chances to going into higher education is slim to none since I can’t retain shit anymore because my brain can’t handle it.Edit: also the only person I have in my life besides my mom is my boyfriend(?) and he lives back in my hometown. I put the “?” there because I tried to break up with him a few days ago because I’m tired of being told how tiring I can be. We’ve been together for 6 years, but at this point I feel like I’m dead weight to him and his life would be way better off without me. So that’s why I’m trying to part ways, I’m not physically attracted to him anymore and I honestly am unsure with my sexuality at the moment. I bring no value to his life so it’s easier to take myself out of the picture and be absolutely alone.I also have unhealthily lost an extreme amount of weight due to the fear of possibly running out of money because I bought too much food, which makes me accidentally starve myself. So this as well makes schooling and preforming any task at hand ten times harder. [info] None [info] 1571955629
nanners297 [info] What is taking anxiety medication like? I was diagnosed with anxiety in college and talk therapy has been really helpful for me. But lately I have had a really hard time. I left work early on Friday because my heart was racing, I couldn't concentrate, and I had been on the verge of tears for like 3 days. I haven't had to miss work due to this in *years.* I was thinking of talking to my doctor about getting something to manage this, possibly only in the short-term until I get my shit together.What does anxiety medication do for you? Do you take it regularly/daily to manage your symptoms, or only when you really need it to get through work/a tough situation/whatever? What kind of side effects have you noticed? [info] None [info] 1566175688
kickedoutofbyui [info] It's not diagnosed. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was wayyy younger than I am now and it was pretty bad. The feeling I get when talking in front of a crowd is just like the feeling I had when I was a kid though. Pretty sure it's not just nervousness [info] None [info] 1542237073
reddit_login123456 [info] I have some, but little, doubt in the short term and with appropriate dosages it helps. I'm from Colorado I have more experience with pot culture than you can imagine. I've had more friends than I can count negatively effected by long term use in their formative years, many who self medicated.I've read more peer reviewed papers than you. I've been diagnosed with anxiety by both PhD and MDs. I literally never said it doesn't work for some people. Don't put words in my mouth. I don't need advice from un-educated, inexperienced crusaders on the internet.  [info] None [info] 1468273622
doesntmatter2ndac [info] I think giving up what others think of me would be really hard. I think I have really bad social anxiety. I'm not saying that as an excuse but I'm just stating that I think that is going to be a really obstacle for me to overcome but I don't know for sure I would be able to. I think I've had anxiety for a really long time because I remember back in elementary school in 7th I looked at my grades online and saw a health tab and It said I was diagnosed with anxiety. I think its going to be hard to rework how I've been thinking for past 3 years, maybe more because I might've has anxiety in elementary school and I can't remember. [info] None [info] 1551557984
ButReallyFolks [info] I feel you.  When I was in the process of the long road to my MS diagnosis, I was told upon arriving to the ER by the triage guy that I had anxiety. I didn't. But that night I was diagnosed with anxiety by the ER staff, as well. Brain fog and tingling arms and legs = anxiety.  Ever since then my doctors have labeled me with anxiety and major depressive disorder. I am circumstantially anxious - I strongly dislike doctors, and I have cried frequently at their offices because of how strongly I dislike visiting them and their disinterest in helping me. Apparently that makes me clinically anxious and depressed. Or I just want them to find out why I am having decreasing ability to breathe and immense lower back and hip pain. I was told it was anxiety and muscles. My MRI said a lot else. Go figure. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1574393164
MercuryBitt [info] This was a dream I had a few week ago, and it honestly fucked me up for a solid 2 weeks. It's in bits in pieces, but the first scene was a bunch of "people" in a foyer. Their bodies were decaying and exploding, blood pooling in the foyer up to about their ankles. Then they became like decayed skeletons. The next part I remember is a man putting bits and pieces of other bodies onto his own, to a point where he looked more like a walking mass of skin and tumors. He was standing down a hallway, gargling "I am hope" over and over again. It was almost like a flashback, cause then I would see a young boy running around this hallway saying the same thing. In my mind, I assumed the man was actually the boy at one point, but then he became my nightmare. I forced myself awake after that. Every night after that, I thought the man was standing in my room, saying the same thing and licking the back of my neck and stuff. I'm blaming it on the fact I'm in a Forensic Bio class, and I see a lot of dead  body pictures, and the fact I've been diagnosed with anxiety which gets worse at night. I love forensic bio and it doesn't bother me too much, except when it gets in my subconsciousness. tl;dr I am hope.  [info] None [info] 1456697500
DannyDerulo [info] Diagnosed with ADD on Saturday,... what now? Title says it. 20f, junior in college, was having a phone call with my psychiatrist (haven't been able to function studying from home so he was writing me a letter to give to my Dean of Students Office to request accommodations). I've been diagnosed with anxiety for a good while so that's what the convo was about at first.When I was talking about what it was like trying to study, he stopped me to ask if I thought had ADD. My brother has ADD and has always had trouble in school; I've always done well academically so I had never considered that.He asked me a lot of questions about how I study, get work done, function, all in the context of BEFORE quarantine and it waas honestly kinda freaky. He was essentially listing in detail a whole bunch of things I do that I've written off as quirks for ~~years~~ most of my life (starting major projects/essays 1-2 days before its due, remaining acutely aware of everything else going on around me while in a conversation, frequently forgetting about deadlines/meetings, etc. etc.)He (jokingly) said that I "passed" the test with "flying colors" and added ADD to my diagnosis.He says I have the option to go on meds, but I'm still thinking about it. Part of me wants to try to continue functioning the way I always have, but part of me recognizes that I've always had trouble being efficient in an academic environment and that being stuck at home (with 4 younger siblings between the ages of 10 and 18) has caused my ability to focus on schoolwork to take a nosedive. I literally haven't turned in a single assignment since I moved out of my dorm, not even the ones I had half-finished before quarantine.I'm wondering if anyone else has found themselves in this situation before? I don't really know how to deal with the diagnosis and I don't know what sort of lifestyle changes to make. What has helped you? [info] None [info] 1586204464
blueyedboy96 [info] Diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD... At the age of 14, I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD. 6 years later, I’m still struggling with my diagnosis. It didn’t get better for me.. the overwhelming amount of anxiety I feel on a daily basis paralysis me to do basic things. I have hard time connecting with people. Because of my mental illness, I live in an isolation of my own world. I try to hide my anxiety from my friends, because I am scared that it will scare them off. I hide behind a mask of pretending to be a normal teenager, but deep inside...I’m in agony. [info] None [info] 1574007528
azumatora [info] I didn't realize that drug testing had been implemented.So (and this is me trying to think out loud) if I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder and changed doctors after getting out of the hospital, I would have to be drug tested before I could get an anxiety med? Wow. (Or rather "any future", since this would be after the mental hospital's prescription ran out.)***If your next response is, "Yes, if anxiety meds are controlled substances."Then I'll jump in with, "Most are. I know of one that isn't (buspar), but it made my heart pound." [info] Grand Ledge [info] 1526833008
pigglesbaby [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ptsd. My doctor prescribed me .5mg of Xanax. I honestly don’t feel anything after taking it. I have to take 2 or 3 to actually calm down. I have general anxiety but I also have major panic attacks. I’m blowing through this prescription. [info] None [info] 1519571930
EqualsInfinity [info] I just don’t believe it So I have been having trouble recently... doing much of anything. I never saw myself as antisocial or someone who has anxiety but as if two days ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and minor depressive symptoms. I just really don’t know where to go from here, I find myself challenging most things I know about myself because of this recent diagnosis... [info] None [info] 1553911546
shibaewie [info] I didn't properly understand why I was hypersensitive until I was diagnosed with anxiety. As far as I and everybody else was concerned, I was just a crybaby who couldn't handle life. It's been quite the journey trying to come terms with such situations [info] None [info] 1548775954
sfair039 [info] "Turrets-like" muscle spasms during anxiety attacks First time posting here, so I supposed a quick break down of my issues would make sense.I was diagnosed with anxiety in first year university. I am the only member of my family who had, at that point, attended a post secondary education. So that put way more pressure on me than I feel like some other first year uni students may have been dealt. (I am not saying that my life or condition was overall worse than everyone else's, I am simply trying to paint a quick picture of my situation for you all).I knew something was wrong with me when waking up even 5 minutes later than I planned before a class would send me in a complete melt down. I am talking hyperventilating, spazzing, and getting sick, even before fully waking up. Another big sign that made my family take me for a doctor's appointment was how I started developing social anxieties which made me become a hermit. Considering this was first year uni, the time most people are at their busiest socially / most adventurous, I actually missed out on a lot of 'staples' of being a freshman. It really became noticeable when I would panic at the sheer thought of walking past the front door.I had been put on Zolof, I can't remember the dosage, but had to stop taking it after 4 months or so. The reason for that was because though I did find that it helped with the 'lows' (the frequency and severity of my panic attacks; which I sometimes refer to as 'episodes'), it made me unable to feel any 'highs' as well, putting me a mental state that I referred to as "robotic me".My doctor then put me on Cipralex, which I really liked and was on for about a year, until suddenly my ability to keep a regular pill taking routine became impossible. I started getting anxious about taking the pill, because it was rarely on time and I was worried more for the sickening side effects rather than the curing properties of my meds. I think it is also poignant to know that I have a very weak immune system, and since starting first year of uni (I am now in my fifth, and last, year of school), I have had two dozen or so instances when something as simple as a regular flu bug has knocked me over for weeks at a time, developing weird symptoms such as skin discoloration (my whole body turned into off purple, leopard-print like spots, which the doctors had zero explication for). During the times where I would be sick, I would be violently ill, lose massive amounts of weight at a time, and having to stop attending school (which if you can remember, was the first thing that started my anxiety attacks). So currently, I am off my meds, which I know will be bashed by a few of you, but I felt that if I could try and find non-medical alternatives to my anxiety, I would lead a happier/healthier life. And since having met and moving in with my boyfriend, I have found that I have made some good steps in living with anxiety without being dependent on medications. What I am hoping reddit can help me with today is in regards to my body's horrible affliction with muscles spasms during anxiety attacks. Today I have been really sick (stomach bug) which made me have to cancel a shift at work, adding to the stress of trying to get better. During my peaks of episodes, my body starts developing twitches and spasms that for anyone who didn't know me, would assume I had turrets. If my legs are pinned or unable to swing around, I become more anxious and actually have to fight for breath, making horrible grunting noises that again, parallel what sounds I have heard come out of turret's patients. None of these twitches affect any other part of my body besides my legs and breathing. I was hoping that some of you out there have experienced similar tendencies, and could offer some support for a fellow Redditor. I apologize for any spelling or grammar mistakes, as I am writing this in a bit of a hurry. Looking forward to hearing any/all responses. SF [info] None [info] 1373937547
Eddytonos [info] Confused and questioning myself I’m new to this subreddit, and wanted to release some tension, as I am uncomfortable asking certain questions with people in person. For a long time, I have always been sure of my sexuality. I have always had crushes on females, never showed any romantic or sexual interest in men. Unfortunately, this did not stop my adolescent mind from questioning my sexuality. I began constantly reassure myself, but it wasn’t and still isn’t enough. I began doing something that isn’t necessarily healthy and quite obsessive, but I began watching clips of gay porn to see if I got aroused. The first few times, I showed no signs of arousal. More recently, however, I began to feel a strange feeling in my throat, numbness in all parts of my body, and began to breathe heavily. I didn’t get an erection, but felt strange in all parts of my body. I’m now questioning whether or not these are symptoms of arousal, or if I am suffering from anxiety attacks. This would make sense, as I am diagnosed with anxiety. This entire situation has confused me, stressed me, and caused me to question my past. What’s even stranger is that I have always been capable of masturbating to lesbian porn, and outside of this questioning have never had or felt attraction to men. I guess the culmination of this entire post is a question as to whether other people have experienced a similar thing, and what it could possibly be. [info] None [info] 1556466678
orbitofnormal [info] BF (27m) and I (26f) don’t talk as much, I’m still VERY happy but also anxious Basically what it says in the title, but I can add more details. My BF and I met on an app in September, and have officially been a couple since mid-Dec. we both like the same things (same TV shows/movies, same sense of humor, weird science, cooking.....) and have the same general plans/values (wanting to be married SOMEDAY, kids IN THE FUTURE, hard working, close to our families). We see each other multiple times a week when our schedules work, at least one weeknight and one weekend thing, and text through the day. Lately, I’ve noticed that while we’re seeing each other in person more often, we seem to be talking less. In the big picture this doesn’t bother me, because it’s a big deal for me to want to be around someone without having to be “on” for them, if that makes sense. BF has become one of the few people I have where I’m happier having him around, even if we’re sitting on the couch together reading our own books or just cuddling watching GoT. I’d noticed a few mo the ago that he is definitely a bit more of a social person than me, with multiple large groups of friends that he’s always juggling his schedule around. We talked about it when I mentioned giggling a bit when he said something about how we “haven’t gone out in a while” when we’d gone our to dinner 3 days before and a friend’s party last week, and I realized he meant a “just us” thing. So I think our communication and expectations for each other are pretty darn healthy. But there’s a voice in the back of my head that is making me worry because I don’t think we’re talking as much, idk if that’s true overall or just in chunks. I remember when we first started dating that we could talk for 2+ hours without stopping, but then this week we went out to dinner and talked about our crazy work weeks, but I think over 50% of the time we were at the restaurant we were quiet. I was very happy to just with there with him and enjoy the beautiful weather and good food, but I’m also worried that this means something is wrong. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago, so I fully recognize this could just be that ugliness rearing its head. And my parents have been married for almost 30 years and can be exactly like this, so I know it’s not necessarily a death knell on the relationship. But this is my first real relationship (I identify as demisexual, I literally haven’t been close enough to someone to want a relationship with them until the current BF), so anything that seems “weird” also scares the pants off me because I don’t want to lose him. Uggghhhhh [info] None [info] 1561262124
leyjanz [info] Just when I feel I have my anxiety under control, it comes back stronger than before. Hey all! I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder about 4 years ago. I've experienced it since I was a child but was labeled the worrier/emotional kid. Since being diagnosed, I've felt empowered to take steps to cope with my anxiety, and the in last 6 months I've had less frequent attacks/episodes.I have noticed that when I do experience anxiety now, it comes out of nowhere, more intensely than ever. I wake up shaking, I sleep maybe 4 hours a night, and I completely disconnect from everyone around me because I'm afraid of being negative/that they will be mad at me. My husband is so supportive but I hate having to tell him that I am yet again dealing with my mental health. I wish I could just solve it and be done.What long term steps have you taken to cope? It feels like I am safe until I fall into this trap, slowly make my way out and I'm fine until the next round. Does anyone experience this like...relapse? Sorry for the negative rant!! Thank you in advance!EDIT : I feel like I should add that I have been exercising at least 3-4 times a week now which has been a huge help, but I'm finding that I start to spiral if I don't go to the gym. Anyone experience this? I love exercise but I don't want it to be a crutch. [info] None [info] 1579234813
ilivearoundtheblock [info] YTA.I was a regular smoker of cigarettes by 16.  (Ocassional drinking and marijuana also in high school but not much by comparison to my peers.)In my FORTIES I was diagnosed with anxiety.  Ohhhhhh.Nobody knew enough then to know I was "self-medicating."  But we sure know enough now, asshole. [info] None [info] 1573361078
nukesisgood [info] I would say yes, although it can often depend on what you're looking to do.  Working for a design team or in a maintenance crew or working on outages for a contractor?  Sure, I could see that being ok.  Trying to get a license to operate?  Then it might be a problem.&amp;#x200B;First off, I'd make sure you believe you can handle the responsibilities.  Especially if you want to be a licensed operator, you're going to be responsible for the health and safety of the public.  That's a big responsibility, and you should be sure you can handle it.  It might not be quite as big an issue if you just want to be an unlicensed operator.  But the NRC and your company's FFD personnel may take your condition into account when deciding whether to give you a license.  Operations training programs can also be pretty stressful so be prepared for that.  I was diagnosed with anxiety in the middle of my training program.  Might not be as big an issue as your condition (I don't know that much about major depressive disorder), but at least it gives me a little insight.  I just disclosed that I'd been prescribed medication, and they were fine with it.&amp;#x200B;As for advice on how to approach the hiring process, I don't think you'll have to disclose major depressive disorder when you're initially applying for the job.  But if you're hired, I'm sure you'll have to disclose that in your paperwork for getting access to the site.  Being honest is the best policy.  I've worked with people who've admitted to minor criminal records, health problems, even alcoholism.  As long as they were honest and disclosed their issues before it caused a problem, the company was fine with it and offered to help them with the problem.  If you lie and they catch you later, you're screwed.  And you probably won't get access to another nuke site for a long time if ever. [info] None [info] 1551830378
AncientPotential [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was a kid. I dont think my mom ever quite understood that I wasnt faking when I said I COULDNT go to school, and I'm not sure I ever explained to her what I was feeling. She even went as far as to tell me I should take a pregnancy test (at 13) when I would wake up every weekday morning dry heaving for an hour or 2. Years later, she tells me my step-father keeps thinking he is having a stroke or some other neurological issue (they had CAT scans done and everything) cause his face and hands keep going numb, and his heart will just start beating out of his chest. I told her to ask their doctor about anxiety and LO AND BEHOLD, thats exactly what he had. My mom felt really bad for all those mornings she yelled at me and made me go to class.Until you think your are legitimately dying because your body goes numb and you might ACTUALLY shit your pants, ya aint had the anxious. [info] None [info] 1559674899
mrtrollstein [info] I wouldn't go. Simple as that. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and I have asthma anyway so I couldn't be picked,  but even if I was, nope, cya, bye. I'm a scrawny anxiety filled woman whose coping mechanism is drawing cute fluffy pictures on myself while I hide behind my long hair, which I would not cut off for anything.I would rather be homeless in Canada than in the military. [info] Erin - 21 - MtF HRT 8/22/17 [info] 1505343206
SweetNothingss [info] Tell me your story. I am trying to understand anxiety better. Care to share? I was diagnosed with anxiety a while back. Trying to understand what this all means. (Sorry, I don't know how to do this very well.) ((Reddit noob)) [info] None [info] 1391850306
Colonel-Rosa [info] I was treated badly for mental illness in the UK. Some GPs are far better than others though. The first one I visited suggested I move 100 miles away to start a new job while knowing I was depressed. During that time away I almost committed suicide because I couldn't deal with the pressure of missing my family and work. Came back home, got a new GP and got referred to a counsellor where I was treated properly. I was diagnosed with anxiety problems and perfectionism in the end.PS. I am fully recovered now. [info] None [info] 1342682143
-kittrick [info] I have been having nightmares almost every night for 26 years... The nightmares range in levels of scariness... but I will often have more than one every night. I literally can't remember a night where I have not had a nightmare, but I am assuming that I must have had a nightmare free night at some point. My very earliest memory is of a terrifying nightmare when I was about 2 or 3. As I grew up, I used to pray for about an hour each night (I'm not even religious) and beg that God would keep me from nightmares for just one night. The nightmares are often recurring, but lately it seems that there are a handful of recurring themes rather than actual recurring dreams like I used to have. I sometimes have dreams too, but these tend to be about very mundane and "not-wacky" subjects, but I will always end up having a nightmare later on (or earlier) in the night. I can often wake up mid-nightmare and will fall back to sleep and fall straight back into the nightmare. I am a 26 year old caucasian female, living in England. I'm about 5'4'' and weigh about 9 stone. I've recently been diagnosed with anxiety (~ 1 year) and I'm currently on 20mg of Citalopram for that. However, I was a fit and healthy kid (obviously not on Citalopram back then!) and I've been suffering with these vivid nightmares since I was **at least** 3. I'm not really expecting this to go anywhere, as I have been trying to get help for this for years. As a kid, doctors would say "kids often have nightmares, she'll grow out of it". As a teen, doctors would say "hormonal changes often give teens nightmares, it'll pass". As a young adult, doctors just wouldn't take me seriously and would assume I was lying when I said that I don't smoke or drink excessively, that I don't watch TV or go on my phone at night, that I have perfect sleep hygiene habits. Then I was diagnosed with anxiety and they had the perfect excuse "vivid dreams and nightmares are a common issue in people with anxiety - get treatment for the anxiety and the nightmares will go away". When I began seeing a lot of progress on the treatment of the anxiety but still no change with the nightmares, the doctors would say "vivid dreams are a common side effect of the drugs you are on. Give it a few months". I just know that the next time I go back they will say something like "you're going through a stressful time - stress often causes nightmares". I want to scream and tear my hair out! DOES ANYONE ELSE SUFFER WITH THIS?? HELP! :( [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1493291507
JLeww69 [info] Earlier this year I was diagnosed with anxiety after a long conversation with my parents. After two therapy sessions I met with a doctor to discuss what my options were. I explained to her that a few of my friends have anxiety and that they've gone through a variety of different medications with no avail. They were finally prescribed gabapentin which worked the best out of all the medications they had tried. I told her that after researching all of my options I decided that gabapentin would be the best choice for me since I didn't want anything addicting like a benzo or a ssri because of the wd horror stories. She acted like she had never heard of gabapentin before and prescribed me propranolol which doesn't seem to work at all. Prop's main use is to reduce the physical symptoms of anxiety such as rapid heartbeat and sweating which I never even reported experiencing with my therapist prior to the meeting with the doctor... The whole spiel about my friends getting prescribed gabapentin was a lie but I truly did believe gabapentin would be the best option for me. Plus I knew it would be useful for the kratom addiction I had at the time. Oh well. I just had to get all of that off my chest.  [info] None [info] 1506879015
turtieari [info] Afraid of medication dependence. Vyvanse makes me extremely fatigued the morning after. Backstory:Okay. I'm gonna try to make this as short as possible. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD since I was 12. Parents refused medication and I learned to deal with it. Graduated high school. I taught myself ways to deal with my conditions and my parents never made any excuses for me and I didn't either. Started college majoring Human Bio 6hrs away. First two years I was great with getting to class and being on top if studying what not. Unfortunate events occured and my grades and overall behavior went unaffected. Then third year panic attacks, anxiety levels at peak always, unable to focus didn't make to class, first C in Biochem lab, Fall quarter. Got on adderall then I noticed changes but anxiety still peaked. Dr. Offered Anti anxiety meds I refused then next quarter failed Genetics, got on effexor. Next quarter failed genetics again because I was adjusting to the meds, had to go to the hospital due to a panic attack (I've gone to the hospital for the same reason before). Problem: Now I was changed from Adderall 30 mg a day to Vyvanse 70mg and stayed with Effexor 150mg. I have never had issues getting up, it was always easy with the built up energy I had in me. Now in the mornings I can't get out of bed for the life of me. AT ALL. I missed all week to class trying to find different ways to get out of bed. Temp. Solution:I finally found a solution but I don't like it. I set my alarm 2 hours before I need to get up and drink my vyvanse then set another alarm to wake me up at the time I want to. I can wake up,  Like magic or something. I don't like the feeling of dependence, feel as though I've lost my identity as a human and have taken on an artificial meds dependant freak. I'll see my doc this Friday and need to think of ways to cope until then other than my current method. Question:Did anyone of you guys feel like this? How did you cope? What are my options? What should I do? TL;DR:Changed from Adderall 30 to Vyvanse 70mg. Been on it for two weeks and last week couldn't get up for class which has never happened to me. Help? Ways to cope? [info] None [info] 1375662872
princesskeestrr [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2008 and now everything from acid reflux to asthma attacks are “probably due to my anxiety” and I have to push to get any actual tests. It took me a while to assert myself, but my specialist visit copay is $80 so it wasn’t hard to get pissed off that they weren’t wanting to help me and push back a bit. I’ve noticed that when I had a decent family doctor, who I saw regularly, everything was better. Then my insurance changed and now I see a different random moron every time I go in. I still have no idea what’s wrong with me beyond a vitamin d deficiency and probably an auto immune disease? [info] None [info] 1571360622
Mei_me [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety and depersonalization/derealization (emotional numbness, brain fog, detached from reality, very bad memory to name a few).Apart from that: being unable to make friends, depressed, very litle trust in people, afraid that everyone hates me. [info] None [info] 1530807410
FawkesLOL [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks my 3rd year of college.  My doctor believed it was brought on by living with someone (my father) who has horrible anxiety/PTSD.  It really interrupted my studies, my life and my relationship with other for the first few months.  I was given medication that turned me into a zombie for long lengths of time.  Eventually I was referred to a psychiatrist that was offering a new form of help known as Neurofeedback, it works through the measurement and training of ones brain through sound.  I don't know if it actually helped or was a placebo for me but it picked my life up dramatically and allowed me to improve myself and be more then I was even before anxiety.I HIGHLY recommend anyone suffering from anxiety look into it as a solution (long term).  It has since been a year since I suffered my first major attack and my grades have been the best they ever have and I have motivation.  And all it takes is like 30 minutes a week.http://kipn.org/I linked the website of the office I use and I am also going to post a link with some info about the treatment.http://www.eeginfo.com/what-is-neurofeedback.phpIn terms of things you can do to help I have quit drinking entirely, smoking, cut my intake of caffeine and regularly try to work out.  Also try finding a hobby that allows you to relax and think enjoy alone time/quiet.  I enjoy painting, guitar and reading for instance.  It is important to remember that anxiety usually cannot be completely cured but it can be managed and eventually you will be able to manage it when it begins to bother you.  Atleast this is what I learned from personal experience. [info] None [info] 1389664445
TheKatsMeow0_0 [info] Severe anxiety attack...,, Monday I was riding Bart and had anxiety attack. I couldn’t walk and requested emt. I ended up walking the stairs because the elevator wasn’t working. I feel so stupid in doing so as some don’t see it as a condition. It just happened out of nowhere and I fainted against the bike rack and got transported to kasier. I have taken a week off work to get my medication adjusted or prescribed a new one. I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2016 and ptsd in 2017. Things stemming from my past that I never dealt with came out. Im on 30mg of Celexa I went up a dose in Oct. I’m not sure what else I should be doing. I have enrolled in anxiety classes and have started working out. As well as meditating.....I’m dealing with my past issues it’s like what needs to be done so I can be myself and medication free.  Is it always going to be like this? I accepted my disorders.....I hate feeling this way. [info] None [info] 1552549698
sunnys1deups1dedown [info] If a woman smiles repeatedly, looks at you with interest, or strikes up a conversation, then you probably aren’t going to bother her but please don’t do a cold approach. I live in a big city and walk most places, so I end up being approached by men fairly often. I’ve been physically cornered, creepily leered at, and followed (among other unsettling experiences), so now I don’t want to talk to anyone on the street — like, ever. When someone approaches, my first instinct is “God, please no, leave me alone,” followed by “please ignore me, please ignore me, please ignore me.” Yes, I have been diagnosed with anxiety so maybe my reactions are more negative than others would have, but I don’t see why it’s necessary to insert yourself into someone else’s day just because you find them physically attractive. I always feel gross and objectified (and sometimes scared) when this happens, and I’ve never once enjoyed the experience or handed over my number. TL;DR: Only approach women who seem interested in you or who make contact first. Otherwise, just go about your day. [info] None [info] 1563770446
UnknownRen [info] No need to be downvoted for your own beliefs. I mentioned in the story that I know how the brain works and that I could be "forcing myself to see this things". It could very well be my anxiety because I was diagnosed with anxiety a while back. I just can't shake the feeling that it's more than that though, ya know? I will try that camera setup recommendation though. Thanks! [info] None [info] 1474302645
Karmagirl1 [info] You’re an amazing parent, screw the hatersMine are 5 and 7 and I call those days mental health days. Sometimes kids, like adults need a day to recollect themselves and especially if the day prior was a bad stressful day for them. My mom forced me to go when when I was diagnosed with anxiety. I don’t remember learning anything those days just remember the torment of having to be there. I promised I’d be kinder to my own children. And mine are model students that love school bc I let them take breathers when they truly need one. You’re not modeling laziness, you’re showing them that your love for their well-being is more important than an attendance record [info] None [info] 1572355434
TheRealMarkkkkk [info] Tell me about it. I'm told that I'm not ADHD and that I shouldn't need to go for a diagnosis because I concentrated during a assessment (IQ test and career guidance) and I do well in school and despite the fact I have no knowledge of time, inability to start basic tasks (showering and studying), terrible short term memory (compared to all other parts of the test), a habit of drifting off and losing focus (can't even get told where my dad is parked without losing interest and drifting off), no organization skills and constantly misplacing stuff and losing them. I forgot the rest thinking about the grammar of my previous point. Like they all just say 'You're brain thinks too much' and I was diagnosed with anxiety (which is an ADHD symptom). I don't want to take OPs thread I'm just kind of annoyed.  [info] None [info] 1473183337
neverwhere9 [info] That's pretty much how I did it...Didn't last long but it was a nice habit while it lasted. Sometimes it gave me bad anxiety. I'm diagnosed with anxiety as well so YMMV but I'd try breaking one in half to start at least. Good luck! [info] Bipolar 1 [info] 1543543831
Hoodwink [info] That doesn't sound like Anxiety.  The extreme weakness is probably damage to tissue along your small intestine.  (Take a massive B-complex vitamin that you can find in any Walgreens, btw, it will probably help a ton if it was similar to what I had).I suggest going to a doctor (a different doctor) immediately and tell them you think you have a bacterial infection or something in your gastrointestinal system and you would like some antibiotics.  Don't tell them about sweating and losing sleep.  And you don't need a fever for infections in your gut.  My guess is that you have a bunch of bacteria causing vascular/epithelial damage by their growth and then death.  There are strains of bacteria that can live in your system that when they die, they release contents that may harm your body after death (or while living).  Certain strains of e. coli or staph are two of the most common.  Both can be gotten rid of by macrolide antibiotics (penicillin, amoxicillin/clauvanate) or Zmax often.  Although, it could be harder to get rid of and you might something that isn't resistant.If you can't get a course of antibiotics because doctors can be a pain with a previous diagnose of anxiety, try to get some online.It sounds related to what I had.  I don't actually have anxiety, but I was diagnosed with anxiety immediately when I presented with diarhea (and heaving, but only vomiting once a month) and a whole host of symptoms like twitching and abdominal pain/twitching, extreme weakness, and more.  [I think I was diagnosed because I had such a long list.  Keep it short - and try to concentrate on only certain points like your pain, weakness, and vomiting.  If you experienced twitching, don't tell them that because that was blood finding new routes to get through my body.]  And it would come and go and got worse over time - and then suddenly plateau, and then continue.  My body has scar tissue all over and my liver and kidneys have some damage because I was like you - just suffering through.  If you were diagnosed in April with anxiety when you went to the doctor, I suggest a new doctor.  Especially if a stomach or colon problems weren't ruled out.  Technically, it could also be IBD/Crohn's - but do that after the anti-biotics. [info] None [info] 1502927790
cameroni5150 [info] Bad anxiety flare-up this week I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 6 years old. It wasn't that bad until I was 13 and had full-blown panic attacks (like blacking out, almost passing out, hyperventilating, etc. my first one was so bad I had to go to the ER) twice a month. My anxiety at this time was just about having more panic attacks, thus this whole thought process was a cycle. A couple of years later, when I was 15, my anxiety was-for the most part- *gone*. I didn't worry much. This past week (I'm 16 atm) has been a bad week for me, mentally. Anxiety has occurred for different reasons, though. I have never gotten anxiety about a crush in my life, but it started on Saturday (5 days ago I think). I don't know why I'm nervous about this, but I am. Today, I was so jittery and felt really lightheaded at one point at school and just couldn't calm myself down. I hope this anxiety doesn't get any worse!! Any tips/advice/comments? Please(I do go to a therapist and am currently taking a medicine for my anxiety) [info] None [info] 1478216510
wandering_minddd [info] I can't even go to the mall or to the groceries without being anxious My ex broke up with me a month ago and I can't bring myself to go to places with a lot of people. I was diagnosed with anxiety but I never had a problem going out. I used to love shopping alone. But ever since my ex broke up with me, I can't bring myself to go to the mall. Whenever I went, I start panicking, I start getting sweaty, nervous, my heart starts racing, and I can't seem to catch my breath. So I would start running back to my car and start crying. Now I'm sure the breakup caused this because I never had this problem before. But how can I manage to get over the fear of going out. It's such an irrational thing for me. I never thought this is something I'd go through. [info] None [info] 1489144268
lnologram [info] I only interact with my sister when it’s unavoidable (like when I go home for Christmas). She’s older than me and made my childhood a fucking hell. It got to the point where I could barely be in the same room as her without her screaming at me for something innocuous (like sitting too close to the tv, or humming along to the radio). She’s a major reason I was diagnosed with anxiety and eventually PTSD.I don’t regret avoiding her, even now that we’re both adults, she’ll snap at me for the smallest things (I accidentally misgendered her cat, to which she misgendered me in response). Having her out of my life is one of the best things I’ve ever done for my stress levels lol [info] None [info] 1563254712
EndlessInsight [info] I was pink-slipped into a mental health facility for a week when I was about 23 (I am 29 now) for paranoid delusions.  They were evaluating me for schizophrenia or other mental illnesses.  Most of my episodes have been drug induced, and going for multiple days with no sleep.  I have never followed through with full psychiatric treatment because my symptoms always subside after I come off of the drug, get some sleep, and realize my delusions are delusions.  As I said though, I do still have panic attacks thinking about the incidents.  I think I could be at risk for schizophrenia or some form of mental illness, but no I have no official clinical diagnosis.  They wanted me to do some outpatient therapy.  Whenever I do any sort of dissociative drug now though I definitely get the same paranoid symptoms, and as such I've had to avoid those types of drugs completely.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety before and have been on SSRI's before as well, but I took myself off of the meds not long after I started using them as I don't like traditional medication.  I'd definitely tell this guy to get checked out though if his symptoms persist.  It could just be a reaction to the LSD trip he had, or it could be  a disease that the LSD exasperated.  Either way if symptoms continue some evaluation/counseling is the best way to go.  They determined when I was pinkslipped in the hospital that my episode was most likely drug induced, but the PTSD I have from the incident still causes me to be paranoid that things are happening that actually aren't when my mind goes to that place and re-lives the episode.  If you aren't careful these sort of things can become life-long issues. [info] None [info] 1439469558
__Nevermore [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety, I think. I know I saw the word "anxiety" written on paper after seeing a psychiatrist/psychologist. [info] None [info] 1498002747
bambinoebella [info] Help! Lack of Motivation / Don't Want to Leave the House So some background...I was diagnosed with anxiety with depressive symptoms last years. I took medication for about 10 months before making the decision (with my doctor) to wean myself off of it. Recently I haven't been feeling intensely anxious (this time last year, I was having frequent panic attacks), but I am having trouble sleeping, I don't seem to take pleasure in normal activities, I don't want to leave the house, and I just want to be at home. It's almost like I haven't been able to focus on things around the house; the house is crazy messy. I keep telling myself I am going to do things, but then my motivation just isn't there. It's not that I feel sad or scared, it's like I feel nothing. Any advice on what may be happening or strategies to fix it?All of my go to strategies are crisis response strategies... [info] None [info] 1500846399
This_is_Evil [info] Health anxiety So  I had a huge panic attack last year because I thought I was dying, well not really it started with just me trying to sleep but I could hear my heartbeat increase  and somehow I made that connection. I went to the doctor he said it was a panic attack and that it's because I had stress and I was anxious, I guess that I was diagnosed with anxiety like that. After that everytime I get any kind of symptom, like a headache, being cold, heck even back pain worries me and it makes me panic. I had an anxiety attack because I conviced myself that I had an neurological problem and only after hearing stories of how people can't feel their limbs for days, while I can, made me realise that I'm just fine,. I'm almost 19 and this is taking my life away, can someone help? [info] None [info] 1549214359
Odysseus32 [info] Yes you absolutely would be screwed.I was talking to my boss the other day and he was telling me about the guy before me who would always have anxiety attacks.  and he said every couple of days they would flare up and he would need to go sit in his car for 20-30 minutes to calm down.  That made him a bad worker.I have been diagnosed with anxiety.  I have taken anti-depressants/anti-anxiety medicine and can't quite find the right one because the meds make my already terrible anxiety so bad before it starts working that I can't handle it.  I told them that anxiety was very real and that every once in a while I while have an attack during the day (most of mine are at night or when I'm sleeping) and they were like "oh he didnt really have anxiety he just wanted to not work" and I thought "how in the world could you possibly know that?"  If I have an attack it won't be apparent because I'm doing everything I can to control it until I can get somewhere private.US employers care about you showing up, and you working hard.  they don't care about anything else, unless you're with a local company with a very empathetic owner.  This is capitalist nation.  Get with the program or live under an overpass. [info] None [info] 1490662408
ThatGuyNoOneRemember [info] Vision problems Age: 20 Sex: Male Height: 5'9 Weight: 160 Ethnicity: Hispanic For a little context, this problem started about two weeks ago. I spent the past year (since last August) worrying, obsessing, fearing over my health. And just recently have I been able to finally accept that I don't have certain ailments that I convinced myself were overlooked or missed by my doctors. I've previously gone to my primary doctor(s) and hospital multiple times, done different tests--x-rays, blood tests, urine tests, ekg's--and it's always coming back negative, which includes blood pressure and blood sugar. I was diagnosed with anxiety and vitamin D deficiency. I thought for almost a year that I had diabetes, but after so much denial I come to terms that I don't have diabetes. Whenever I stand up it feels like my vision is going black and I'm about to pass out, I see these white floating stars and like a blue dot in the corner of my eye or a streak if I stare too long at a light source. Sometimes it feels like my heartbeat is nonexistent but when I calm down, stand up and feel my chest, my heart is beating like normal.My diet is poor. I just barely started eating again, and when I do it's usually a burger or chips. But I'm eating sandwiches now, and soup and drinking almond milk. I drink plenty of water, but I don't work out or exercise. Please help. [info] None [info] 1564632889
IRAQIHERO55 [info] TENSION HEADACHE. I have had IBS since I was 16, now I'm 26. I have been experiencing tension headache for the last 4 years especially when I eat certain foods. I was wondering if you have the same problem? btw I'm diagnosed with anxiety and take antidepressants. [info] None [info] 1572219489
jasmynxjoy [info] THC or CBD For the Treatment of Anxiety?  So, let's talk about this (be easy, this is my first post ever on reddit).I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder and PTSD as a child (thank you, foster care system) and medicated the first time when I was 11 years old. Got myself off of benzos about 2 years ago, started raw-dogging life. Well, I hit a point where I started struggling and decided to get my medical card. I did a TON of research while I waited for my card in the mail so I felt truly prepared to go to my first dispensary.A lot of the research I did points to CBD working more effectively for anxiety (compared to THC).What are your thoughts/experiences with using CBD or THC as a treatment for anxiety disorders? [info] None [info] 1583788552
HarmDeezy [info] Yup. I was diagnosed with anxiety but nowadays everyone has “anxiety” so if I were to ever mention it people would not think of it as an illness but as fake  [info] None [info] 1545194301
justhush1 [info] Hey, so I can’t respond to your original post, but i’m still trying to figure out if this was a personal attack or just an uneducated person trying to talk about mental health problems. I was diagnosed with anxiety from a super young age, and everyday it is going to be something that influences my life. For me instead of trying to find a way to “cure” or totally get rid of my anxiety, which is just not realistic, I instead focus on minimizing it. The missionaries told me often that the church would heal me. That’s just not how mental health works. I am successful in my life, and am truly happy. This is despite my mental health issues. So yes, I still have mental health problems, but everyday I see an improvement, and I’m pass a point in my life where they control me. [info] None [info] 1514570465
Sudd_b [info] How I handle my anxiety 🙃 So I was diagnosed with anxiety VERY YOUNG,Something I’ve always been embarrassed about and try anything and everything to control.Along with my anxiety I have relentless thoughts of doubts and what ifs that stress me to the point I can’t sleep and I’m constantly exhausted. Recently I have started using CBD and it truly helps but it relaxes me so much during the day that I need to take a nap on my break  or I won’t make it... so I have decided that taking a five hour energy or drinking a red bull along drinking my CBD tea together must work😅 Anyone else got any good ideas on how to mange anxiety at all hours of the day other than constantly drinking caffeine and relying on CBD(Don’t get me wrong love CBD it truly works! But it just works TOOO GOOD) [info] None [info] 1562970920
MollyMittens [info] I'm always anxious 24/7. I was diagnosed with anxiety in elementary school and it's only gotten worse as I've gotten more responsibilities. &amp;#x200B;I recommend therapy and talking to your doctor about medications. Ideally before you start having panic attacks and ulcers. &amp;#x200B;Also find some good coping mechanisms to help you when you're getting super anxious. If I can feel a panic attack coming on I can sometimes prevent them by listening to calming music and drinking water.  Also naps really help reset your emotions. But obviously this type of coping mechanism is more of a band-aid than a long term solution so definitely look into longer term solutions (like therapy and meds). [info] Anxious Mess [info] 1538962177
Cebibimon [info]  This. I was writing a wall of text saying the same thing, but my english sucks so i'd rather support your point. I've been diagnosed with anxiety problems, so i know where the poster stands, i've felt the same way, that everything is black, that everything is going to end bad, and that i'm lonely and there's anyone i can trust (even though there's plenty of people willing to help).  So here's the thing, i don't want to sound harsh, but try to not get caught in this pity party. If you feel there's anyone you can trust , then get new friends! (it's actually easier than what it sounds), and i'm pretty sure you're not as unlovable as you think, and it's just this depressing part of you talking.   I've been where you stand, and i really understand you, so please, if you think you don't have anyone to talk to, msg me or something (i don't know if you can actually do that on reddit, i just made an account). It gets better. [info] None [info] 1445229222
colleenshawkey [info] for all the people saying its a way of escaping reality, thats pathetic. The people that cut themselves 100% are doing it because they have nothing better to do, and they want people to feel sorry for them. The people who cut always say, " I need help", or " I hate myself, Im so messed up." Alright, if you really wanted help you would get free help, join support groups, call hotlines. Instead, these people post their slit wrists all over the internet. They try to make people feel bad for them. But the truth is, you just look irresponsible. Im praying for all of you with problems. trust me, I know what its like. I was diagnosed with anxiety. But i know how to fix my problems and help my situation.  [info] None [info] 1438998275
KannoProxy [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety problems. I was having dozens of mini-attacks every single day. After my doctor told me what it was, I had a really horrid panic attack. Now it's been a constant struggle ever since, just trying to manage it. Never thought I'd be someone to develop anxiety problems, but apparently it runs in my family, and I didn't know about it til I was diagnosed. It has a good grip on my mind and thought processes, so that definitely changed my entire outlook on everything. Probably forever. [info] None [info] 1447020347
dbfordateam [info] M(19) needing some advice So I'm a 19 year old male college student fairly active (sprinter on the track team), 175, 5'10" and I was diagnosed with anxiety. I was for a stint off of medication (sophomore-senior year of high school) but 2 1/2 months ago I resumed medication. A sleeping medication for insomnia and also lexapro for anxiety. The lexapro is 10mg. I recently visited my girlfriend for the weekend and it was really fun we went to the state fair and did a lot of just hanging out. One thing that bothered me was my sex drive was lower and I couldn't hold an erection and only was able to cum once and we had sex maybe 5 times. This has never happened to me before. I literally lost an erection inside of her. It was embarrassing. Do you think lexapro side affects will subside or should I talk to my doctor about alternatives or going cold turkey totally. I feel like a 19 year old should be able to have sex with out any problems and it just concerning me. Any advice so I can approach this with my personal doctor better? All is appreciated, thank you [info] None [info] 1508196592
PM-ME-YOUR-TUMMIES [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety this year. To be honest I'm over the moon happy about it. *Finally* having a 'name' for what's been going on with me for so long. I've been starting to get an inner-monologue going when I'm feeling very anxious and thinking '*This is your anxiety, this is what it does.*'    It's nice to be able to at the very least recognize some of the time when feelings of anxiety are present.  [info] None [info] 1512406949
AgitatedBrilliant [info] I'm not sure who I am anymore or how I got here but here I come So, a few days ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. Before that day I used to think a lot I had ADHD so I was wrote all the process regarding my chase for that diagnosis report in r/ADHD. Well, I was shocked to find out I was diagnosed with severe anxiety instead.https://www.reddit.com/r/ADHD/comments/a690nx/finally_got_my_diagnosis_well_im_quite/?utm_source=reddit-androidI used to like that sub a lot because everyone always seemed so grateful and kind hearted with people who would open their lives to them no matter what, but I found their response for my case in particular to be somewhat cold-blooded, also due to several downvotes that lead my thread buried into the oblivion.Except for one person who suggested I should repost here. I'm not going to, as I think I've described enough and the original link is there if someone wants to read my deepest thoughts about this.I'm seeking life advice. I'm lost, I don't know who I am, or how can I get over all this. I'm now truly anxious like I never expected I could be. [info] None [info] 1545062921
iwasnamedaftera-rock [info] How do I end things with my "boyfriend" with minimal hurt? I (15m) asked this guy (14m) on a date and he told his friends we were in a relationship before we even went out. I knew I didn't like him in that way after the first date was over but I didn't tell him because people were already celebrating (I wasn't sure why at the time). Keep in mind I have been diagnosed with anxiety which I know is not a valid excuse for not saying anything but it makes it harder. I don't do anything physical with him at all except for hugs and really struggle with hand holding because I just feel so terrible for leaving him on.I recently learned he has autism. It explains a lot but now it's an extra layer I don't know how to deal with. I know it was very very wrong of me to lead him on like this so please refrain from commenting on that, I'm here for advice on how to end things peacefully. Any advice? [info] None [info] 1575189729
TotallyNotSurtr [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, but in the context of this post it stems from me fucking up with tipping, since I always try to tip people in the service business; because in the country I'm currently living in they get a low base salary and mostly rely on tips. Also over-thinking it, now that I look back at that time, I guess. Did you ever experience something in the past that you feel really embarrassed about, even though it actually isn't something that terrible if you look at it objectively? Well, it's one of those moments for me.  [info] None [info] 1530044947
throwawayg7 [info] [Rant/Help] New here. My anxiety has been taking a huge toll on my life I was diagnosed with anxiety 7 months ago. At first it was a relief to know that what I was going through had a name and wasn't abnormal. I thought starting with that, things would get better. But they haven't. My family and I don't talk about personal matters, and none of them have ever experienced anxiety. I struggle to make and keep friends. I have one friend who I have relied on very heavily to support me through times of high anxiety, but he's not always able to be there for me. In those instances, the panic gets worse and I completely lose control. I have been seeing a therapist for 3 months. However, she will be leaving at the end of this month. I'm terrified to try to start over with someone new. And I'm just terrified, period. I feel like I'm losing control of everything, and I'm unable to effectively ease my anxiety. It just continues to get worse. I don't want it to rule my life, but I'm out of ideas, and I feel so alone with no one to talk to about it. That's why I'm posting here. My friend that I use as support might have a busy week this week, and I don't know how often I'll be able to speak with him. I'm so afraid of being completely consumed by anxiety during this time. I was anxious even about posting this, but I don't know where else to turn, or even exactly what I'm asking. I would love someone to talk to, some help, some words of encouragement. Anything. How is it even possible to live like this [info] None [info] 1406950730
sachal10 [info] Withdrawal symptoms of Olanzapine and Fluoxetine I have been diagnosed with anxiety and been taking the aforementioned meds under prescription. But unfortunately my parents have asked to give up meds and focus on religion for anxiety. I want to be prepared for what might come so please let know what withdrawal effects I should expect.&amp;#x200B;PS: I have been taking this medication for about 4 months [info] None [info] 1557486370
deadcrushsoda [info] My (22F) bf (23M) likes a ton of IG models &amp; it makes me uncomfortable I realize that the title of this post may giveaway a fact that I have already come to accept: yes, I am insecure. I have trust issues that I am truly trying to work on, and I am aware that I can be possessive.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD (not an excuse, but just an explanation as to why such a matter leads me to overthink).I need advice on whether my discomfort is due to me just being insecure, or if it is warranted. My boyfriend and I have been dating for a few months now, and although he is a great guy in general, I noticed he follows a ton of IG models. They all look pretty much the same - super curvy with big butts - and I look nothing like that (pretty flat chested &amp; thick-slim, not slim-thick lol). I brought this up to him and he unfollowed a majority of them out of his own will (I never explicitly asked him to unfollow them, but he caught on that it made me uneasy). I noticed a week or so after, however, that he followed accounts like that on his other social media and even a few on IG still. He continually likes pictures of these half-naked women, and when I see his name in their likes, it makes me feel inadequate, He would even go as far as following the same model's twitter accounts and ig accounts. I don't want to come off like I am 'spying' on him, but to be honest, with nothing to do all day, I find myself checking his activity (we do not live together). It just bothers me that he searches these women up, follows them and has these pictures at his disposal. I don't mind him watching porn because at least that's private. I don't know how to bring all of this up to him again. We are in a fairly new relationship, plus with the pandemic happening, my concerns just feel insignificant. Any advice?&amp;#x200B;TLDR; my bf used to follow a ton of ig models // i told him i dont like it // he unfollowed some but kept the others &amp; im still uncomfortable about it [info] None [info] 1587867674
MannyOmega [info] Got diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago. For me, it's more like my ego and pride can be very big. Thus, I tend to project a reckless bravado, so that I won't be hurt due to rejection or feel that I'm a burden on others. This bravado, a result of my ego, makes me a bit of a dickhead, even though I'm well liked. I'm trying to change who I am, but it's very hard. It's like a defense mechanism for me. Without it, I feel vulnerable. With it, most people I know carry an affection for me. Habits that are constantly positively reinforced are hard to break. I might be different than others in that I know how to socialize, and am quite good at it. I have my moments of awkwardness, but for the most part I am socially competent. My father, due to the nature of his job, put me into a lot of social situations that I dreaded when I was younger. Thanks to it, though, I've developed many social skills. My social anxiety manifests in that it makes me nervous to be around my closer friends. Small talk with strangers or an idle chat with an acquaintance is no problem. but I struggle to consistently interact with close friends because I feel that at any moment I could make a mistake that ruins the friendship. I'm afraid that they wouldn't really like my true self (if I even have one anymore, the bravado has blurred the lines) so I often pull away in fear. I was diagnosed with anxiety in general though, not specifically social anxiety. I have no idea if you can even be diagnosed with specifically social anxiety, and in my case I was simply told to continue meeting with my therapist for my anxiety. I simply know that social anxiety is a big part of the anxiety I can feel. Thus, all that I have written has not been scientifically tested, but rather the findings I've seen based on the result of my own introspection.Take what I say with a grain of salt, as my experiences do not reflect all who have anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1549039645
trexblue10 [info] Getting a job I am new to knowing what anxiety is or how to deal with it. I’ve had it my whole life and thought that’s just how people are. Until I was diagnosed with anxiety at the age of 20. I am now 22 and still learning. I have a really hard time with money troubles and always worrying I’ll never have enough to get by. Lately I find myself not being able to get a job and that has triggered me really badly. I can’t provide for me and my wife also while going to school and now it’s just going to school with no job because no matter how many places I apply or how many interviews I’ve been to. I never get a call back. Does anyone have advise for me? [info] None [info] 1571076808
snowcroc [info] Medicine making symptoms better but causing excessive burping. So here is the story.It started when I was conscripted into the army, I lost a ton of weight and became fitter and then the constipation started. It was bad.At first I went to GPs but they just gave me probiotics and laxatives, none of which really worked. So I went to a specialist who after a round of medicines that did not work sent me to get a colonoscopy and a endoscopy. Both came out clean.He then put me on some probiotics and tirmebutine malate. This did improve the symptoms somewhat, although not perfect, I do tend to have more regular and easier to pass bowel movement. Although it still feels like an incomplete evacuation.However, it feels like this is causing me excessive gas. Sometimes I do feel bloated, but even if I am not, I am constantly burping. I have this uncomfortable feeling of trapped air below my sternum and keep burping. Like 5 time a minute for the whole day. I am not exaggerating at all.Some things you may want to know.I generally have lousy sleep because I am a guard in the army and have to do four hour shifts round the clock.I eat healthy and maintain an active lifestyle.I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 17, but had no symptoms then. This started when I was 19. I am 20 now. [info] None [info] 1417375315
addychat [info] Chance me for 3.86 GPA? Hello! I have already posted my entire chance me in this subreddit before [click here ](https://www.reddit.com/r/chanceme/comments/g29a7b/chance_me_for_t20sindian_junior_girl/?utm_source=share&amp;utm_medium=ios_app&amp;utm_name=iossmf)I was just wondering if I could get into UC Berkeley and UCLA with a 3.77 UW GPA for UC’s? Also was wondering how USC, Carnegie Mellon, and other T20s would accept me based on a 3.86 UW GPA. I have only gotten 4 B’s throughout high school, and 3 of these B’s were in honors/AP classes. This was mainly due to a brief period where I was diagnosed with anxiety, but I have recovered. However, these 3 were in my soph yr, and I show a big upward trend.My EC’s are pretty strong, including my publishing of a biological research paper and I am on track of finishing my Gold Award for Girl scouts, the highest award a Girl Scout can achieve. I want to major in biology/neuro/psych/ anything bio related. I am really worried about my GPA, as it is not a 4.0 but my other test scores are high. Is there a solid chance I can get into the select UC’s/ T20s? [info] None [info] 1587158210
astarr14 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety once but I don’t think that’s it.  I think I got panic attacks because I was too tired to handle stress. Maybe I should pursue that more though.  [info] None [info] 1553798824
koteuni [info] Don't know if my symptoms are anxiety-related or something bigger... Hi all. I'll give you a very summarized version of background information before I cut into the nitty gritty. I'm a 20 y/o female. I am studying abroad in South Korea and my boyfriend is Korean. However, due to an unanticipated circumstance, he is unavailable to be contacted until next week. I had LASEK surgery done last Wednesday (it is now Sunday) and everything is a-okay with that. I was to wake up this morning to go get my contacts out. After that, I was taken home; I had been previously staying at my boyfriend's parents house for the last 4 or so days so that they could care for me. I woke up this morning at about 4am. I had some sort of nightmare that I can't remember, but I remember initially feeling panicked due to a pain in my chest. I woke up and immediately noticed that I started having hot and cold flashes, my chest had a soft discomfort that only came every once in awhile, and I felt sort of panicked. Of course, I did the absolute right thing and looked up what this chest pain could mean according to Google: heart attack. After freaking out about dying for a few minutes, I discovered that chest pain is common with panic attacks. I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder but my anxious periods are infrequent now as opposed to my childhood years and I have never suffered anything like this. Is this a panic attack? I can name a number of things I was nervous about for the near future, but I didn't expect that the symptoms could persist for nearly 12 hours. Jump to now. It's ~2pmish and my chest feels tight, it's sort of harder to breathe, and my heart rate resting fluctuates between 84-100bpm. The cold/hot sweats are over, I ate, I took a shower, and still. Is this some sort of persisting anxiety symptom? Or should I contact my boyfriend's mother and ask her to help me? I don't want to bother her but I don't know if this is a big deal or not...I could cry. I don't know what else to do. I tried breathing techniques, relaxation, anything. That only got me down to 84 bpm.  Please tell me I'm not going to die. [info] None [info] 1487479687
ChairModelLady [info] Need help for When talking to your doctor about anxiety goes south I have been diagnosed with anxiety and some OCD tendencies by both my current therapist and a doctor in a city I used to live in years ago. I took medication in college and the two medications I was on helped me SO MUCH! So much so I had my young, naive self convinced I no longer needed it. So I just (stupidly) stopped. Everything was fine. I thought. I just lived with it. Until it wasn't fine. Five years later. I've moved a few times since college, found a therapist and decided that medication would again be a good choice for me. My new doctor DID prescribe me medication, just two DIFFERENT ones than I was previously on. I had previously taken a very low dose of Klonopin and my new doctor said he does not prescribe medications of that type to anyone.To make a long story short, I returned to his office several months later for a regularly scheduled check-in. This time, I had some concerns about my OCD tendencies and a spike in anxiety. Rather than talk about changing my meds me told me "maybe you should take up running or something stupid like adult coloring books. Just think less." I left feeling like maybe this was all in my head. Maybe I'm dramatic and my anxiety isn't so bad. I didn't speak up. But in the weeks following, it's gotten so bad, I can't go to work without throwing up. I made another appointment with him for this coming week, but how do I ask for a referral to a psychiatrist? Especially after he was so judgey last time. [info] None [info] 1507409037
jimlas2016 [info] Thanks for the info, I was diagnosed with anxiety actually. [info] None [info] 1460461347
VictoriousssBIG23 [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety, borderline personality disorder, and PTSD. While I still struggle when I'm sober, I find that weed helps me be more in touch with the emotions of other people and how my actions affect theirs and vice versa. It also helps keep me calm because the BPD causes rapid mood swings including periods of intense anger or sadness, but stoned me is always happy and go-with-the-flow. It also helps me with PTSD related nightmares because I don't dream when I smoke before bed. I don't have the urge to self-injure when I smoke. However, I've been experiencing more anxiety and paranoia lately when I smoke. For years, it was the opposite. I was always relaxed and calm, but lately, my anxiety's gotten bad and idk what it is, really. I think part of it has to do with the legal status. It's not legal in my state yet so I get scared that someone in the hallway of my apartment building will smell it and report me for it or if I'm at home, I'm afraid that my parents will catch me with it. But I also experience anxiety sometimes even if there's good vibes around so idk. This didn't start happening until around this time last year so maybe my body chemistry changed? I still very much enjoy weed and the positive benefits I get from it. The anxiety is just an inconvenience at this point that I hope gets resolved.  [info] None [info] 1515398264
roxychick4327 [info] I am on the verge of making a big move myself (although not quite as far) as well as starting a new job. I also have a 7 year old who is making this move with me and I fear repercussions of it not working out so much. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I know the feeling. Every day the move draws nearer I need to talk myself out of talking myself out of it all. For every negative, anxiety filled thought I remind myself of something in my current life I want to be different and how this move is going to help me accomplish that. I never let myself dwell in fear too long if I can help it. Sometimes I fail, but sometimes I succeed. Make a list of pros. Refer back to it when you get scared. Immediately following every scared thought with a small positive is something I've tried to train myself to do. Honestly, sometimes it's the little things like I think about how my new apartment has a fireplace and I've always wanted a fireplace. It sounds so juvenile, but it works. Think about how no real reward comes without risk. The discomfort of the move is only temporary. Your new definition of normal will set in. All of us have the ability to adapt. I would hate to think that you or I didn't succeed just because we were too scared to try. [info] None [info] 1452932222
GCDD [info] I just turned 18 and I've noticed that I always enjoyed my alone time over going out with people one calls "friends". However, I must say that I did not do this because I was scared/afraid of them or of what may happen or whatnot, but because I lacked interest. Also, I didn't trust them. Anyways, this is also something I don't understand, and maybe you can help me define it better, but is anxiety having "fear" overall about something specific, or what is it? Quite surprisingly, I was diagnosed with anxiety, which I don't agree with because i do not fear society. One exception though is the fact that I experience panic symptoms during presentations. My voice breaks and I don't know why, no matter how hard I try. Maybe I unconsciously do have social anxiety. [info] None [info] 1512086597
aboy461 [info] I know exactly how you feel . I've been diagnosed with anxiety for 2 years and I'm only 21 . The worst part is that in a calm simple situation I know I should be calm but my body tells me otherwise and is stimulating some sort of fight or flight situation. It's like you know you need to be calm but can't do anything about it  [info] None [info] 1411572135
tehkaki [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and when I was still a lightweight I used to get really anxious sometimes when I smoked a lot. I rarely do anymore now that my tolerance has built up though. [info] None [info] 1325119683
imnotgrownupyet [info] It’s okay. I have had my resting HR around 140 without any drugs when I tried to donate blood (spoiler: I was diagnosed with anxiety 10 years later). It felt pretty bad but I was okay.My HR still frequently shoots up to 120+ just in daily life.Have a calming beverage - milk or decaf tea. Read a book if you can or watch your favorite comforting TV show. Snuggle in bed. Don’t force yourself to meditate or breathe a certain way if it doesn’t work for you.It will pass. [info] None [info] 1549592953
mynameisblisters [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was six, started having panic attacks when I was twelve, and barely survived postpartum anxiety/panic disorder at twenty-four. I've tried it all and I feel different techniques have helped me at different times. It's important to have as many options in your arsenal to fight your anxiety with as you can gather. Breathing exorcises, grounding exorcises, meditation, visualization, distraction, physical exorcise, whatever helps is golden and mixing it up is powerful. Don't be ashamed to take medication either. Celexa literally saved my life. There's nothing wrong with needing a little extra help. Having someone close to you in your personal life who you can talk to also makes a world of difference. Even if they don't know what it's like to live with anxiety, just having someone with a patient ear who wants to try and understand is so incredibly comforting. It's also crucial to learn to talk yourself down. It's hard to convince yourself that there's nothing to be afraid of when your brain and body are shooting off everything they've got to tell you something is wrong, but you have to at least try. It's an endless battle and there will never be a cure. That's something you just have to accept. It is possible to learn to cope, though, and sometimes that has to be your main goal in life. Just remember those times will pass and you will live. You'll rejoice in having survived. [info] None [info] 1440729622
GrayInNovember [info] What's my stacking and tritype? I found these questions online and decided to answer them. I'll be greatful for any opinions and help.*1. Do you tend to save money and are cautious about spending it?*Not really. I usually have a very vague idea about how much money I actually have and out of fear it's too little, I just rather don't check my bank account at all. I usually feel like I don't have enough, but then I never really know how much that is. I try to buy things that are necessary and don't spend money recklesly, because then I feel guilty about it. But I like to have the feeling that I can afford anything I want to and I like to buy something extra from time to time, because I like comfort and the idea of luxury.*2. Are you security oriented? Ready to protect yourself, those close to you and your resources?*Not at all is probably the right answer.*3. Are you fairly consistent? Like things known and regular? No big changes?*  I'm not consistent, I just like my comfort. I have rutines like coffee in the morning and 8 hours sleep that can't be changed, but other than that I actually love changes unless they touch my sense of well-being too much. I recently moved to a foregin country, where I don't know anyone at all, just because I love the thrill of it. I'm not very security oriented, I like to experience things more than fear them.*4. Do you dislike taking big risks unless it's a "sure" thing?*It depends. I'm not very physical person, when it comes to my own body and health, I'm not a risk taker, but when it comes to other things such as work, money, education, traveling, living etc... I love taking risks, because I want to feel free to explore what life can offer.*5. Are you fairly private? Not revealing too much to strangers?*Yes I think I'm quite private. I feel like I need to get to know the person, before revealing personal information. But then... I don't do it because of fear that they would hurt me. I do it because I assume that they are just not interested since they don't know me anyway. I also do it, because I feel like personal info should be something special that is a part of a deep emotional connection with someone.*6. Do you tend to be introverted?*Yes, I think I'm an introvert.*7. Do you understand money? Securities? Investments?*No and I honestly do not care. I wish those things wouldn't even exist.*8. Do you tend to plan for the future? Ready for emergencies?*I like to dream about the future rather than to plan it.*9. Are you concerned about health? Safety? Comfort? Home? Hearth?*I do care about my health, I like to eat healthy and I try to be resposnible when it comes to health related habits, but I often slip and become a slave of impulses and bad habits like somking and drinking.*10. Are you worried about what may go wrong? Tend to imagine worse case scenarios?*Yes! I often do this, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder so that's a part of being nuts. I had used to be the opposite of this, until recently when the illness begun.*1. Do you need or really like social validation?*I choose the groups of people carefully. I'm picky with people I assume are good enough for me, when it comes to their intellect, taste and hobbies. I think most people have terrible taste and lack intelligence. Once I decide that someone seems to be good enough to judge me, I'd do anything to win their respect.*2. Is social image important to you?*It used to be very important for me, when I was younger, but I'm not sure how much it means for me anymore. I still like to leave a good impression, to dress nicely and behave correctly, but I'm not perfect at this and I'm aware of it. Sometimes social norms just get me angry and I rebel against them, sometimes when I want to leave a good impression I just follow them to gain what I want.*3. Do you have desires/fantasies of being rewarded in a social or public arena?*That's the only arena I dream of. I feel like it's my calling and greatest desire. *4. Do you think about your affect on others, groups, organizations, and the world?*All the time, I think about how an individual can change the whole society, how this world could function better and how I and others could help this world to be a better place.*5. Is it very important to you to look good in public, groups, work, and the world? Is name recognition important, either yours or others?*Sometimes I try really hard to look good, other times I don't care that much. I mean I care most of the time, but it's not that big for me. I put on some make-up and well matching clothes, but I don't feel the need to be the hottest one everywhere I go. That's just too much work and I find it kind of shallow and impersonal too.I care about how others see me and I want to have good relationships with people, but I'm very personal. If I don't like someone or something, I let them know or simply ignore them. If I disagree with the whole group I reject the whole group, I don't really have an issue with it.When it comes to name recognition, yes...that one is very important. I'd like to be heard and recognized by other people. I want to win people's respect.*6. Are you upset if you don't get enough validation, reward for the hard and creative work you do in a social context or for a social cause? *Yes! Recognition in the area is truely quite important for me.*7. Are you involved in groups, organizations and team oriented activities?*I play in a band, but that's about it. I'm actually not a good team player, because I have issues with authorities and rules. I also dislike to be forced to do things I dislike.*8. Is belonging to special groups or being a leader of a group important to you?*I'm an individualist more than anything else. I'm not a follower and I'm not a leader either.*9. Are you strongly upset if you feel not included or rejected by a group or family or not invited to a social event?*I expect rejection before it comes. I long to be a part of groups, but then I just expect I wouldn't fit in anyway. I just fear... shame. It's actually a horror scenario for me not to be invted to a social event, but then...I haven't been inviated so many times, that I can't care anymore. I have my group of friends, I have people that I love and people who understand me, others can fuck off.*10. Do you make your money through your association with groups affecting a large number of people?*I'm still a student, so I don't make money...But one day, I'd love to do this. It's my only dream.*1. Do you define yourself through a romantic or close partnership? Is closeness with another person of paramount importance?*No, I do not define myself based on anything and anyone but my own individual self. Closeness is... complicated. I've been in relationships for the past 5 years with a few very brief single periods and it's... weird. I'm very proud, I can't imagine someone having emotional power over me, I can't imagine being weak for someone. But then when I'm not in a relationship, I feel empty and hopeless. I usually extremelly romantize relationships and then when everything becomes a stereotype, I just get bored. But then I'm too fearful of rejection to show signs of passion or discomfort so I just go with the flow anyway. I'm usually even a bit detached and cold, because I don't want to feel like I depend on my partner.*2. Do you like intense energy, particularly in relating to people? Are you energized when you have a revealing conversation or engagement with another, particularly a special other?*I'm not very intense, I mean... I am, but out of fear of appearing weird to others, I hide it. I have periods when I think I don't feel at all and periods when I think of myself as an intense person, but more internally than externally still.I love deep conversations and connections with other people! I long to establish them and nurture them with the special people. I like when others make me feel sepcial for them and I do the same for others.*3. Do you tend to focus more attention on close relationships than money?*I've never seen close relationships as something to focus on. They are a natural part of my life and who I am. Money however... I really could not care less. *4. Does money relate to how a partner will see you more than security for yourself?*Neither...what? wtf? this question is terrible*5. Are money and resources less for self and more to please an intimate other? *What...I don't know. They are not...idk...money sucks, I don't care.*6. Does your attention go more to how well you relate to a partner or potential partner than to other concerns?*Not really, I think being close to my partner is important but it's not the most important thing in my life.*7. Would others describe you as dramatic? Do you like to go deep with things?*I'm dramatic on the inside, I have vibrant emotions and feelings that I'm highly aware of, but my fear of appearing crazy or weird to other people, or simply being misunderstood holds me back for clearly expressing them.*8. Do you tend to be in the moment and not think as much about the future or your future security?*I have to admit, that sometimes I can be impulsive, but I generally like to think about my future and what comes next.*9. Do you have an urge to merge? Do you "lose yourself" with an important other at times?*I sometimes feel very deep connections that are fullfilling and make me feel warm inside, but I rarely lose a sense of my own self in them.*10. Do you like risk taking? New experiences? Tend to get bored without enough stimulation particularly in the area of relationships?*As I said before, I like to take risks because I want to feel like I can be free to explore what the world has to offer.I like new stimulation as well, I actually love it and seek it, but sometimes I also like to be in a quiet room and process everything in privacy.I get bored in a relationship quite easily if there's not enough passion and common ground. I need my partner to be active and inovative. [info] None [info] 1503083864
dnhjdnff [info] I gave a blowjob in high school and it still bothers me to this day Just wanted to get this off my chest.When I was 14, I was madly crushing on this football player who was a bit of a dick but I was too stupid to take that as a red flag. We had one class together and the same lunch period. He always ignored me and only talked to me when there wasn't anyone around or when we were around a very small group of shared friends. I was desperate for him. I had my friend ask him what he thought of me.  He said I was cute but could "do without the braids and Converse shoes." I ended up changing everything about myself just for him to like me, got a lot of slack from the girls in our grade for it, and he ultimately still ignored me.Then at the end of the year, he finally asked for my number from my friend and I swear it was the best day of my life at the time. I was so happy and literally thought my dreams were coming true. That night, I waited anxiously for him to text me but he didn't. Instead he waited until 4 am in the morning to text me, to which  I discovered he was a pretty boring texter and I found myself leaving him on read without even thinking about it.So a whole day goes by to which I didn't see him at school (because of some weird schedule for testing) and I didn't bother texting him back. Until I got home, in which I sent him a stupid text about some school celebration we were having because I still really wanted to talk to him. He ignored me.Then the next day, I see him in class but of course, he's ignoring me again. But then during a break, he texts me asks me to give him a blowjob after school.So now I'm super disappointed, and my best friend tells me to just invite him to go out with her and her boyfriend or leave him alone. But I was still SO desperate for this boy to like me that I tell him I just want to hang out and not do anything else.He agrees to this and we end up hanging out at a park. Or more like he walks to the park with his friends, tells me not to walk with him, and I wait there for him for 15 minutes. When he finally arrives, I didn't spot him in time and I texted him, 'where are you?' and he responded with, 'right in your face dumbass,' or something like that.When he finally gets there, its like he completely forgot that I just said I wanted to hang out and starts telling me to go to the bathroom. So I stupidly do so. He makes me go in first and then he comes in and I don't know why but I thought we were going to kiss like the movies or just be romantic.But nope.He just starts undoing his belt and when I stand there and just stare at him, he starts saying, 'are we gonna do this or what?' and a lot of other things that just didn't sit right with me. I can't even remember what he said anymore but I remember feeling really scared and having this constant thought running through my head that I didn't want to do it, but also too nervous to say no.I do remember I had a look on my face that must have said what I was thinking though because then he was like, 'why are you looking at me like that?' And the rest is kind of a blur. I just know I did do it and I kept stopping and moving to the other side of the bathroom and he'd say something and then I'd be doing it again. There was also a point where he started forcing me to deep throat and I kept trying to move away but it was like I couldn't and I felt this really bad crunch in my jaw, tried to move away, but I couldn't.Actually doing it is something I can only remember in little detail but I do remember afterwards, I was asking him tearfully if I was a slut now and he said he wasn't going to tell anyone.Afterwards, of course, he told everyone. He and his friends would laugh at me in the hall and random guys kept coming up to me asking if I knew him. I couldn't talk to guys without him randomly coming up and just either standing there listening or joining the conversation, and I grew severely paranoid of him and everyone around me. I ended up having a mental breakdown and pulled out of school, to which I was diagnosed with anxiety.For years, I was trying to understand what had happened. I know I was desperate and disgusting and clingy, so maybe nothing really happened. But it still bothers me a lot and every time a guy talks about sex, I feel so uncomfortable and I just want to flee because it reminds me of the texts he'd sent me asking for a blowjob.I struggle with feeling like all I'm good for is sex to the point where I have an ED trying to keep my body attractive. I feel like I deserve to be ignored because I'm gross and I find myself purposely going for guys who will treat me like I'm nothing than the ones who are genuinely interested.I'm 18 now but this still haunts me everyday along with some abuse I faced when I was younger. I've tried counseling but it won't go away. I know I probably deserved it, I was some annoying, crazy girl with a crush. I just wish I could go back to that year and change everything.tl;dr: I gave a blowjob before I had my first kiss, still feel really gross about it.[Remorse] I guess?EDIT : Honestly, starting to regret posting this. This is the first time I've ever told the story in full and its not as liberating as I thought it would be.EDIT 2 : Thank you guys for the comments! The good and the bad. And all the lovely encouraging messages.  It really "sobered" me up and helped me to realize how much I don't want to be this girl and have another moment like this. I don't consider it rape (though my therapist has called it 'sexual coercion' but I'm not even really sure about that either), just a moment where I felt very used. In a way, reading the comments made me realize I'm more angry and disgusted with myself for having such low self esteem. This has really inspired me to just let it go, including all the other moments I regret, and move forward. Continuously beating myself up for this is only stopping me from getting to know the strong-willed person I can become. I don't want to be a victim anymore.Also, some people were wondering his age. We were both around the same age and looking back, I realize he was just as insecure as I was and I'm honestly hoping he'll see worth in himself too. [info] None [info] 1510469329
devlwkyan [info] The voices in my head don't stop I don't know what to do, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, I've started taking medicines 4 months ago, however they're not working anymore. The voices in my head have come back and even with the sleep pills I can't sleep. Last night I've slept only for 3-4 hours, woke up and couldn't sleep. I try to write everything out but they say I wanna just attetion, they say I'm stupid, idiot, worthless, one of them defends me, but many others keeps talking and reminding moments that makes me feel bad. Now they say to me to cut myself with a razor (as I used to). I'm so tired. [info] None [info] 1536630795
YeahXynni [info] 19/M/EST (Up late nights) Looking to binge games/anime with someone :) &amp;#x200B;Hey everyone, I'm Drew and I live in Massachusetts. &amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B;I'm self-employed and intend to be for the rest of my life. A few years ago I streamed World of Warcraft full-time, and played semi-professionally in the eSports scene for WoW, Heroes of the Storm, Smash Brawl/Melee (Shiek Main) and Rocket League. After quitting streaming due to anxiety I spent a long time figuring out exactly what I wanted to do. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and currently medicated to great success. I started taking courses online for marketing analytics and I currently self-employ myself as a stock/currency trader. I'm very new to the process, but have seen great returns and aspire to do even better to help pay off my mothers' car and my grandparents' house.&amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B;I'm posting on Reddit because I'm lonely at times. As someone who lives with anxiety, it's not likely that I'll often go out of my way to meet people in the real world. The majority of the friends I've made throughout the years are from WoW. This is an issue because I finally decided to quit the game a few months ago after playing for nearly 15 years. My friends solely play WoW, so I won't be interacting with them as much. &amp;#x200B;I'm looking to find chill people who have time to hang out regularly. I'm a chill, outgoing person, but I have a dark sense of humor and I'm very honest and upfront with my thoughts. If you're the type to be offended by jokes or whatnot, I'm not your guy. Since I work from home and have diagnosed insomnia, I'm active A LOT. &amp;#x200B;I love to invest time into large projects with a person. Whether this be starting a new game from scratch and playing the entire thing out, or binge watching a Netflix/Anime series, etc.  &amp;#x200B;To explain what exactly I'm looking for in a **perfect world** :\-  Someone who has a generous amount of free time.\-  Someone who loves video games. \-  Someone who enjoys anime and/or watching shows and movies together. \-  Someone who doesn't get offended.\-  Someone who loves playing video games with a partner. \-  Someone who isn't picky on what type of game they play.\-  Someone who has a voice for themselves.\-  Someone who is outgoing. &amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B;Here's some random extra information about me :&amp;#x200B;\-  When I played WoW during a competitive raid season, I would be investing up to 18 hours a night. When I wasn't raiding, I was preparing other characters and grinding the game more.&amp;#x200B;\-  Because of how often I played WoW, I had little to no time to play anything else. This was an ongoing trend throughout my entire history of the game. Because of this, there are TONS of games that I haven't had the time to play up until recently quitting. From the span of 04' to 18', I never got the chance to play games such as Skyrim, Oblivion, The Witcher, Divinity, all of the Fallouts', etc. &amp;#x200B;\-  When it comes to playing video games, one of my primary goals is to fully complete the game. Side-quests, hidden shit, DLC, collectibles, etc. On top of this, I want to \*fully complete\* Every game on the steam Marketplace. I'm sure you can tell I have a lot of spare time.  &amp;#x200B;\- I'm clingy, but I can take a hint. (*Not retarded*)&amp;#x200B;\-  I have a pretty deep voice.\-  I've played with members of Midwinter, Method, TSM, Cloud9 and Limit.\-  I have a western terrier named Max, and two orange tabbies that hate each other.\-  Sometimes I prefer no beard, sometimes I prefer a beard.\-  I binge a lot of shit. Anime, random games, Netflix.&amp;#x200B;\-  I started watching anime on-and-off about a year ago, I've seen about a dozen series; the most basic recommended ones such as DB, Attack on Titan, SAO, but it gets boring watching em alone. I have a big list of anime I plan on watching.&amp;#x200B;\-  I have consoles, but I play on PC most of the time.\-  I play piano, guitar, bass, drums and used to sing in chorus. (bass/low bari)\-  I'm great with money, I keep numerous notepads on my financial analytics and track my growth. \-  One of my personal goals in life is to own every steam game / DLC on one account.\-  I want to be fully retired in a paid off estate before I'm 30.\-  I own contacts, but I prefer to wear glasses most times. Doesn't matter too much to what I use.\-  I'm currently grinding Black Ops 4, but I'm down to play whatever with people.\-  I would love to start a Baldur's Gate playthrough with someone.&amp;#x200B;\-  If you want to know what games I play, I'd be happy to share my library/steam accounts. I have a ton of games and wouldn't mind buying one to play with someone if I like the game.PM me if you're interested :D&amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B;\-Drew&amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B; [info] None [info] 1540438753
hdbaker009 [info] I seriously need help with my mental health. I feel my self declining with chronic worry and debilitating anxiety every other day. I can’t go on like this but I’m so broke and have awful health insurance. I was diagnosed with anxiety (GAD) a couple years ago. I was seeking counseling for it and benefited from it, when I had great insurance. Fast forward to now, husband got a new job and the insurance is shit. Utter shit. Not only that, but I called about three therapists in my area and none of them accepted my insurance. Each session is about $90 here and I simply cannot afford that. I would ask family for help, but we’ve already had to have help and am paying some family members back monthly, so I’m not doing that. I’m 26F but I worry chronically. It’s now become where I worry myself sick. Especially over health related issues, some that any normal person wouldn’t bat an eye at. I’m over sensitive to any “symptom” and not just in myself but my families, too. It’s not just occasionally that I worry, but about every other day. I’ll start to think about something, find one sign that it could be awful and I can’t for the love of Pete get my mind off of it. It’s affecting my mood, which effects my relationship with my family, and I’m afraid I’m going to lose control. I need help. I don’t know where to turn. I don’t like to burden friends with my problems and even if we was just talking about it lightly, that’s all I would ever talk about because there is always something weighing very heavy on my mind. [info] None [info] 1568686083
Kannazhaga [info] I have a little Texas on my wrist and "We're all mad here" on my calf. My Texas, well clearly I'm from Texas. And I think tattoos are an opportunity to outwardly show parts of our personalities that matter to us. Then my quote, I was diagnosed with anxiety in college and for some reason had trouble dealing with it -- I thought I was crazy and stuff. Talking to my mom about it, she said that we're all crazy in some way or another. I realize I should have known that, but it was important to me to remember that, so I put the Alice in Wonderland quote on my calf. And I love both of them and wouldn't change them for the world. [info] None [info] 1532277315
94639throwaway [info] I (24F) don't know whether I'm reading into something too much or if it is a genuine red flag Ok so I don't know this guy very well, he's my friends older brother and recently he's started messaging me and I've agreed to go out with him this weekend. He seems nice, shy and maybe a little dorky but that's all fine. Whilst deciding on a date there, he's just told me he wants to avoid a local town because of a woman. Obviously I asked right away even though he said he'd let me know in person and basically he's told me that he did a job recently (he's a tradesman) and this woman has gone to a solicitor to seek legal action over an issue over his work but I don't know if he's lying or not? I mean he didn't have to tell me but how about if it's something sexual and he's not being truthful? I am diagnosed with anxiety so it's like me to presume the worst and jump to conclusions but how about if I'm wrong and this is a genuine red flag?? [info] None [info] 1566604215
tacoenthusiast91 [info] By a thread I've been dating my boyfriend for two years and we have lived together for about 18 months in 3 different apartments with various combinations of friends as room mates. In those two years I have noticed that he has a tendency to pick up other people's habits if he spends long periods of time with them aka room mates. Unfortunately in those two years he also picked up quite a few of my bad habits that he did not have a problem with when we met. I'll explain.When I met my boyfriend we were both in a place in our lives where we were taking a break from college, living it up and partying quite a bit. We still lived in the town of our college and it's hard to escape that life. Over the last two years he has been by my side through thick and thin. I have lied and hurt him in many ways but we always found a way to make it work. He had many issues when we met that led him to quitting school. As time has gone on I have made many more steps towards finishing my degree than he has. And I think whatever is going on with him stems from his own self hatred but it seems like the more progress I make as a person and in my life, the more he resents me for not being what he wants me to be and the same goes in reverse. He used to be this joyful, forgiving, creative, smart, kind person. He was an angel. I fear that during our darkest times as individuals, while I was learning from him, he was not learning from me. Not good things anyway. I'm a very strong person. I'm organized, I have goals. I'm not even close to perfect but I know my flaws, I know my weaknesses and I work on them everyday. About a year ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. Since I have matured in the last few years my party days are behind me and I have found that I have been performing better in every area of my life. Somewhere along the way in our relationship being there for me caused damage in him that I know will take time to heal. But now I feel like he is going through something bigger than he ever has before. His tipping point (mine was 10 months ago) where he is going through the worst of whatever his mid twenties have to teach him. I want so badly to pull him through it and save him years of pain like I went through. Regret, self loathing, confusion over what type of person you are or wanna be. It seems like all he wants to do is have fun, have everything in life be easy, never change and never grow up. We're moving soon, away from this college town. To finish school, be closer to friends and family but most importantly because we both need better opportunities in life to fulfill us.What I'm specifically here to ask about is this. I know it will be a process, whatever he is going through. But he is much harsher, less compassionate, much more egotistical and really fucking lazy at anything other than his job, sports and loading more bong bowls.Don't get me wrong, we all smoke weed where I live (it's legal). But for him it's to escape the feelings of knowing that the world isn't the sugar coated bubble he always thought it was or would be. He never thought he would end up where he is and he is having such a hard time letting that go and he's turning to blaming others for his current problems, to lashing out, talking over me, being stubborn, over reacting, being defensive right off the bat.... I can't tell him anything he does that upsets me or he will turn it around on me. He has such a hard time being wrong or acknowledging his flaws and shortcomings. It's not my job to mother or fix him but everyone else seems to think it is.How can I better myself as a person while still being his rock and not wanting to slam the door in his face every time he leaves the chores for me to do, complains, talks over me, corrects me (all the time, because he thinks he's "always wrong" and the little wins make him feel better? More like a man? Idk) I hope he goes to therapy like he said he would. But I need to know what I can do in the mean time to get through this wall he has up. He's never been so distant with me and now he's distant with everyone. He talks, he's there. But all the real stuff stays in his head. I'm so lost. [info] None [info] 1484357697
obladi- [info] To completely simplify the whole situation and get down to the basics: you should never be with someone who doesn’t want you to feel your absolute best at all times.I was diagnosed with anxiety long before I started dating my boyfriend. He doesn’t suffer from any mental health issues whatsoever and sometimes has difficulty in understanding how I’m feeling when I’m at my worst, but he is ALWAYS supportive and does anything he can to be present and sympathetic when I need him. Everybody deserves that. You deserve that, OP. If you’re struggling and there’s an option for you that could potentially improve your health and quality of life, fuck whoever wants to keep you from going down that path.  [info] None [info] 1533360579
Os07 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and ocdSucks! [info] None [info] 1472301497
lauraarualvh [info] After years of letting fear rule my life... I have been diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder since i was 18. I am now 32, and made a big step overcoming my fears.I live in a small village, i have no car, my financial situation isnt too well. So i often feel stuck there.For years i've been wanting to move to this small town nearby. But because i've lived in this village for so long, i was so scared to do it. As i am writing this, i'm spending my first night in my new house in the town i wanted to live in for so long!  I'm scared and overwhelmed, but also excited and proud i faced my fears and did it! It really feels like a chapter in my new life. And wanted to share my story with all of you! [info] None [info] 1557433063
squamuglia [info] Not a metaphysical distinction, a causative one. When I was in college, I was diagnosed with anxiety mediated reflux. My GI Doctor basically told me there was nothing he could do for me and to seek out therapy. That was a very really somatic pain I was experiencing (vomiting daily for a year) and the correct intervention was psychological. I think this debate is a partially based out of a misunderstanding because you're referring to chronic pain like fibromyalgia, but there are lots of instances where perceptual pain should not be treated with narcotics because it would be treating the symptoms with a very real cost to the patient. As in the case of my hypochondriac friend who needs CBT for her anxiety, not an analgesic. [info] None [info] 1463335825
whileandout [info] Help? Since I was diagnosed with anxiety I got put on buspar. But this has only increased the occurrence in anxiety attacks alongside with them becoming more intense as they come with even the smallest of things. Should I consider talking to my doctor about these side effect? Because all though my anxiety attacks have worsened other uses have been very effective such as less restless nights and more comfort in social situations. I’m caught at a middle ground and am curious if anyone else has had a similar situation. [info] None [info] 1540917419
BekahBooBooBooBoo [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety by my psychiatrist. Its been quite a battle. I know the reasoning behind my actions and feelings, but somehow it never seems to help me change my actions. My life has be plagued with suicide attempts. Some days I am ok, some days I am not. My friend made my life a lot better because he would talk me through things, and he really seemed to know how I was feeling. I think that was what made this all so hard. I felt so close to him, bit once I had slept with him everything had changed and I felt like a dirty whore.  [info] None [info] 1503205684
BassinForever [info] I understand that so much! Paranoia and anxiety are the only downfalls to smoking for me. I get very worried at times, but I'm diagnosed with anxiety, it's not caused by cannabis  [info]  [info] 1359145819
thespookykids [info] Agreed, when I was starting in university and came out to my parents with the fact I have been diagnosed with anxiety they couldn't understand it and accused me of "wanting attention".Four years and a very rough family situation later my mom finally came back to me and admitted she didn't understand at the time but now experiencing anxiety symptoms can understand fully what I was and still am going through  [info] None [info] 1524771646
deeathbeforedeecaf [info] Okay so I can fully relate. I'm diagnosed with anxiety but I fucking love scary movies and serial killer podcasts. Also love paranormal shit. It definitely became a research hobby of mine and I became obsessed. Turns out super negative scary shit can really mess you up. I've went from having my anxiety under control to having full blown panic attacks because I heard a noise. The best advice is to have him cut it all off for an extended amount of time. And when he's ready slowly reintroduce it, if this is truly something he likes. And if the anxiety comes back just cut it out completely. The panic attacks and anxiety are not worth the spooky shit. Try to get him to explore other hobbies of his. Or get him to try new ones. This could simply be an outlet for him and doesn't really realize the toll it's taking on him.  [info] None [info] 1475234125
midget9 [info] Thanks for the reply1) Just had an MRI, waiting on results2) Each one varies slightly, but I'll walk you through the worst one I can remember.  I was driving when I felt it coming on, so I pulled off to a state park to go for a run and try to relax.  After running for about 10 or 20 minutes, I stop and am overlooking some water with my phone in my hand trying to take a picture.  Then I snapped my phone in half, threw it in the water, ran to my car, and drove till I was in the next state over.  My memory of it is spotty, but I do remember coming out of it about 4 hours away from home, and I turn around and a second wave hit me as I was driving back.  The only thoughts I had were "I want this to stop" and I ended up driving to my mother's house in hopes of her being able to talk me down, but as always no luck, so I drove to a hospital, checked myself in, and they put me in a room where I sat on the ground shaking for about 2 hours until the doctor comes in and diagnoses me with anxiety, injects me with something they say is stronger than xanax(I do now know what it is), and send me on my way. I guess the closest thing I could relate one of these at the peak of its severity is the incredible Hulk, as frustration/anger can bring it on, and I can't really stop it when it's going and sometimes I am filled with pure rage.  I remember having many thoughts and strong pulls to drive my car into oncoming, to stab myself, and pretty much any other opportunity I saw to end my life, which is not characteristic of me at all outside of these episodes.  I do have enough sense in these to resist these urges, however, as I am smart enough to realize that it will pass.  I apologize for the disorganized story, I'm not the best at formatting.3) I have not. The one I am in now has been spent in bed.4) I have been diagnosed with anxiety, mayo clinic diagnosed me with constipation, one therapist considered a weird form of schitzophrenia, other doctors have attempted to diagnose me with ADD, ADHD, Bipolar Disorder,  and currently epilepsy.  5) I usually smoked whatever strain I could get my hands on, but the best I remember was called Blue Dream. Others included Black Widow, Pineapple, and Purple Diesel.  Again, thank you for taking the time to read/reply to my post. [info] None [info] 1417557247
Morphiadz [info] Sleep apnea or anxiety? I am female and I am 19 years old. I am not diagnosed with sleep apnea. The doctor sent me for a sleep study which is happening in November or December, or possibly January.I am diagnosed with anxiety. Here is the issue. I am not anxious about anything anymore. My anxiety is pretty much entirely gone. My doctor passes off all symptoms as anxiety. I continue to explain I literally have no anxiety, and I am very happy and calm.My symptoms are as follows:- dry mouth, especially in the morning- very very bad fatigue, all day long- cannot focus, cannot get anything done, just too tired to push myself- bad vision, somewhat blurry vision- sometimes waking with sore throats, quite bad- palpitations (never had them even when I had bad anxiety years ago)I am reluctant to try a medication because I don't want to be on a medication for anxiety when I honestly do not think this is anxiety. I could just try it and see, but it is a long process (takes a month or more to kick in) and the first few weeks are always full of horrible symptoms until your body gets used to it. I don't want to go through this at a time when I need to be focusing (I am a student). I don't feel any anxiety. I don't know what to do about how fatigued I am constantly. Also, I have hypothyroidism and I am on a medication. I don't believe this is related to that as my TSH is under 1. [info] None [info] 1505248781
AggravatingCupcake0 [info] I've definitely experienced some of the same issues as your wife. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and my PCP and I suspect I may have ADD although my psychiatrist refused to formally diagnose me with it for stupid reasons. What happens is, you have a task or two to do. Then one day you don't get anything done because you went on a trip into the city, or had a day out with friends, etc. Then the task or two has doubled and now you suddenly have four tasks. Ok, so you try to tackle the four tasks in a day, but you only manage to get one done. The next day comes, now you have five tasks. And very quickly, it reaches a point where you have so much to do that it's overwhelming and through flawed logic you figure it's better to do nothing at all than try to plow your way through this mountain of tasks that lie before you because you'll never finish them anyway. I suspect that maybe your wife is going through this as well? So, on to solutions: I went to a therapist for a while, and while I don't do this all the time it does help when I do - he told me to schedule out my days in advance. As in, make an hour-by-hour list of things to do, and give a finite amount of time to each task. For example, your wife can say "Ok, tomorrow I'm going to pack my Etsy sales for two hours. At the end of two hours, that's it. I move on to the next task that I have scheduled." This way, she gets stuff done - it may not be as much as she hoped, but it's something, and makes things more manageable and less daunting than going "Ok, I have to get ALL these Etsy items packed TODAY" and feeling exhausted and defeated after four hours of packing and having gotten nothing else done. It also puts pressure on her to finish her tasks in a timely manner. Perhaps you guys can work out a schedule for her like this? I know that when I employ this method I'm like "Oh shit, I got five things done in two hours instead of the one thing I would have normally gotten done."  [info] None [info] 1543320419
elleeemo [info] Thanks for the link. And yes, I am aware of the phenomenon... and may even have it myself. My doubt is more to the point that it's a subset of anxiety disorder rather than being it's own specific thing.I've been diagnosed with anxiety. So I just assume a lot of my nagging (often irrational) thoughts are due to my brain miss/over-interperating cues. However, my current post is about feelings arising from an actual poor quality of work rather than some imagined state. Or at least that's what I think it is. [info] None [info] 1538957243
Williusthegreat [info] Damn this resonates with me a lot. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I can relate to so many of those stories in there. Anxiety often gets overlooked when people discuss mental health. Thanks for sharing. It's great that these types of stories are being told.  [info] None [info] 1476346555
ReturnedAndReported [info] I did this for 20 years. In 4th grade, I would go to bed at 9 and get to sleep around 12:00. My mom wouldn't let me get out of bed, so I would literally lay there for 3 hours, silent, and horrified I wasn't going to get any sleep.Fast forward to my 30's and I was diagnosed with anxiety. I take a pill once a day and I can sleep like a baby. Oh, and I take ambien on Sunday nights so I can adjust my sleep schedule from late weekends nights to early mornings in the week. [info] None [info] 1483205606
killercherry99 [info] CBD and me. A tale of anxiety. About me- I'm 34, married, 4 kids, 2 dogs, 2 cats. In 2011 I was diagnosed with anxiety, it was manageable then but slowly got worse until it took over my life. 2015 and 2016 were my worst years. I was turning into a terrible mother because I was afraid to go outside. I would finally go outside and drive to the grocery store only to cry in the parking lot and give up and go back home. If I did go in, more than once I'd have a panic attack and just leave the cart in the aisle and go home. I would sit in my house all day long convinced I was dying, it was always a heart attack and I was losing control of my panic attacks over it. I was too scared to even go to the Dr because I was sure they'd tell me I was dying. I was keeping my life together to outsiders, but I was a shell of a person. I declined every invitation and made it sound like I was doing something else so everyone always thought I was so busy. I had zero friends here on purpose- my husband is military so I only have friends and family back home and I could fake phone calls. In 2016 we bought a new home. To keep my kids in their previous schools meant a half hour drive on the freeway each way. I had to get my shit together. My sister told me about CBD and I did alot of research (mostly here!) before I took the plunge,  and I now literally have my life back. It's been about 7 months and the only regret is the years I lost suffering. I have friends, people like me and invite me places- I'm actually busy all the time and not scared to go anywhere! I will be my daughter's Girl Scout leader next year and I'm running for secretary of the school PTA.  Brands I like- Bluebird Classic 6x, I take this in the evening as it's more relaxing. Cbdistillery- I use this as needed if I feel anxiety coming mid regular dose. Just about 2 drops. And my newest I like is Receptra Elite. I take this every morning. My dosage is about 20mg both morning and night. I live in CA and while they have passed laws to legalize marijuana, there are no stores as of yet but I am looking forward to trying THC when I can. My town has a few bids to bring in grow operations and I would love nothing more than to find work there as I feel like I'm a huge testimony to how it can help mental health. [info] None [info] 1495294679
wonderpanther_k [info] How do you discipline yourself without beating yourself up? I was diagnosed with anxiety a couple years ago and have been medicated since (celexa/citalopram) I’m going to therapy and trying to really work on myself now that I’ve gotten out of the hole of “just make it through today”. I am trying to build healthy habits and reflect more, but it is so hard to stay on track. My inner ‘discipline’ voice is only ever negative. Example: I make a misstep of some kind, my inner voice tells me how stupid I am for making said misstep, I remember I’m supposed to be nice to myself, I cut myself some slack but then that feels like I’m okay with not making progress? I know that self-work takes time (and is never truly done) but I was wondering if anyone else has struggled this way. [info] None [info] 1580838233
lechoro [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety in my teens. I've gone off medication a couple times (with doctor's supervision) and been miserable each time. I had to go off the medication I was on once I became pregnant. I was not happy, I was panicking all the time and just had that awful gnawing feeling of anxiety in my stomach all the time. I'm now on a low dose of Zoloft and while things aren't perfect, I can at least function. I'm in a better place mentally and physically, which to me is worth it. I want to be as emotionally healthy as possible for the baby. So from personal experience medication hasn't been a cure but it's helped immensely.  [info] Team Blue! 3/11/17 [info] 1477446373
lovesadventures32 [info] Hi sorry for not clarifying.... yeah I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I just wondered if this was part of it [info] None [info] 1575132195
mar736 [info] I don’t think it does, honestly. I am currently 28 weeks pregnant. I have worried since the day I find out. Before every ultrasound, every appointment. I kept telling myself that I wouldn’t be anxious anymore after x milestone (like reaching 12 weeks, or the anatomy scan, etc). However, I will say the anxiety has at least lessened. Now that I can feel my baby move a lot, I am at least reassured that he’s okay. Whereas before, there was just no way to know until my next appointment. I was diagnosed with anxiety before pregnancy, so definitely something that I was expecting to have to deal with. I think some of it is that and the other part is the expected being a worried mom. Therapy helps. What helped me a lot and still does is reminding myself that right now, at this moment in time, there is no reason to believe that my baby/pregnancy is not healthy. More likely than not it’ll stay that way. ALSO. Stay off of google. Google made me so much anxious than I already was. [info] None [info] 1569361583
xrked [info] How do you deal with RSD? I’ve recently been learning more about RSD and how it’s affected me since I was a young child. To put a background on it- I had such severe anxiety about rejection and social situations even though I was extroverted that I was diagnosed with anxiety.Looking back I think the symptom could have been treated better by understanding it was a side effect of ADHD.I’m now an adult and really looking for other ways to help myself realize that my brain is hypersensitive to these issues [info] None [info] 1553002247
TheGapeKing [info] I thought about that.  But he told me on the phone when I called him back about doing that that he looked over the fence because "we heard your wifes voice so we knew someone was home"My wife said she heard them say "We know you're here".At that point she had no idea who they were.  That is not okay... freaked her out she called me hysterical because she didn't know what the hell was going on.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and this nearly sent me into a full blown panic attack and I couldnt drive until I calmed down because I dont want to risk an accident. [info] None [info] 1501616097
Mega-Mew [info] The issue is that she insists on going like an hour away to eat something and I kinda have to work on other things too. XD And she has like a ton of homework. She's worse than me with procrastinating. Then again I have been diagnosed with anxiety so yeah. That might have something to do with it.  [info] 4485-2366-6045 || May (Y, X, ΩR) || 3768, 2041, 0908 [info] 1466754878
shinsoo [info] Nofap and keto are two giant anxiety hacks. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders when I was younger. Keto stabilized the anxiety. Nofap gave me the testosterone, confidence and stoic nerves. Time to take ur manhood into ur hands and leave the anxiety for the chicks waiting for u to call. [info] None [info] 1551483067
holding_on_to_you [info] While in elementary school as we walked down the halls in lines, if we passed another line of kids, I'd take a look at each one and try and figure out if I could picture them with a gun. Now that I've been diagnosed with anxiety...it makes more sense. Who knew this weird habbit is probably something more kids do now than back in the day.  [info] None [info] 1551417467
SenorVolf [info] I'm a firm believer in the paranormal, but this seems like your average, every day anxiety. I remember when I was accepted into college after deciding to transfer schools, and I got my notice of acceptance only a week before classes began, the exact same thing happened to me when I saw my boss at work. Overwhelming fear, feelings of dread. I was diagnosed with anxiety years before this ever happened, and never felt a thing like this until I had my first panic attack. I was so concerned with my feelings from that day that I had to see my doctor about it. It's really amazing how simple nervousness can manifest itself.Edit:  I read this again and noticed you said you were specifically afraid of the man, not the situation. It still sounds like an anxiety issue to me. It can manifest differently for every person and every attack is different. I've had more than a few where I've been afraid of one person in particular. I had one, once, where I had an overwhelming fear that I was going to kill myself. I didn't want to kill myself, I had never been suicidal, but I was still so scared that I was going to be compelled to kill myself that I put all the knives in our pantry and went for a walk, just to get away from them.I'm not saying that something paranormal didn't happen to you, 'cause I obviously wasn't there. But if it were me, I would honestly just chalk it up to anxiety. [info] None [info] 1520715536
WayfaringWarrior [info] No feedback but I scrolled back because I love ludovico. Fun fact, I was diagnosed with anxiety and I stumbled across drawing as a way to cope. Whenever I’m really stressed out, I’ll pair ludovico’s Divenire album and my sketch book to create some space or take a mental break. I think it’s helped me more than most things [info] None [info] 1551269154
harry_thotter21 [info] How do I (27F) stop being a yes person when it gives me anxiety to say no? I started typing out this whole long drawn out explanation of my current situation is, but overall synopsis is: I inexplicably cannot say no to people. As a result I am working 2 jobs (one full time), while being in a post-graduate medical based program for school, and have become a shell of a human. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD almost 6 years ago, and for the first time ever,  I can visibly see my anxiety manifesting in a physical way (lack of sleep, rapid weight loss, etc). I don't know how to even start taking things off my plate because I don't know how to say no to people. I've been trying to leave my full time job and focus on school for almost 3 months now and can never fully psych myself up to do it without sending myself into a spiral about letting people down and feeling like they will hate me after. Does anyone have advice on how to go about quitting your job when you can't say no to people?&amp;#x200B;TL;DR i need to quit my job and my anxiety has made me put it off for 3 months. [info] None [info] 1549375767
Sheehan7 [info] I feel like a failure who has no job future I'm 20, going into my 3rd year of community college as a business administration major, and honestly I need some guidance. Tbh I'm not very good at school, never have been, and my GPA is a 2.6 (graduated HS with a 1.8). I want to work in the automotive or mental health field, maybe fashion but probably not, but outside of that I have no idea what I want to do. I took a full time IT internship this summer at an office and hated it, hated it so much that I had a mental breakdown two months in one day at the office and left forever. Since then I've been diagnosed with anxiety, put on medication, and I'm seeing a therapist this month. That whole situation has made me think I will never be able to work a full time office job and I feel like a failure. I do, however, work retail at a clothing store part time, and I've been there for 9 months. While I'm there I feel very calm, I'm apparently one of the best associates, always on time, good sales, friendly, etc. but I can't work retail forever, $10/hour is no livable wage. This again makes me feel like a failure. I have no idea what to do. I don't understand why my anxiety was terrible at the cushy office job but it's fine at the high stress retail job. I thought of dropping out of college to go to mechanic school, but what if I go through that and find out being a mechanic makes me just as unhappy as the office job did? Then I could drop out of college for a while but that will just land me in the retail world and then I'll feel like a failure. I also don't want to get a degree if It will just end up like the internship all over again. What do I do? I'm so lost. [info] None [info] 1473038505
I_Cry_myself_to_die [info] Can you re-enlist with minor ADHD? I want to go to ROTC and eventually reserves after college. What I'm worrying about is that I have recently been tested for ADHD and I don't have the results back yet. If it comes back as a positive for it, would that prevent me from joining or would I need a waiver? For reference l, I'm prior military that was medically separated for scoliosis, but was told I can join again by my 1st SGT that all I would need is a waiver. I have been diagnosed with anxiety after service as well, but I haven't taken medication for it in a while. [info] None [info] 1565981711
Legna23 [info] I don't know if I my advice will help, but I suggest music, just constantly listen to music. Um, if you want to form bonds with people try talking to the select few you can talk to, till your boands are stronger and you can rely on them when you start panicking. If you're panicking with no one around, exuse yourself to the restroom, go into the stalls and breath. Stay in there for as long as you want, don't worry about the teachers or classes. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I graduated highschool, I just had to find my cope and abuse it. Mine was music and busy things like writing essays, I still do it outside of highschool. Let me know what you think.I can relate, literally cuz everything you wrote about I felt to. So, I hope I can help. [info] None [info] 1542669617
shitsintents [info] Over 5 years ago I noticed whenever my chest was underwater when swimming it would feel like it wasn't strong enough to resist the pressure of the water and I couldn't take a full breath. Then a few years after that I realized I couldn't do slow diaphragmatic nose breathing comfortably. I feel like I can't breathe in enough air through my nose. With my mouth I feel like it's more than enough. Previous to these sensations I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1460748558
ashweeeeeeee [info] Is it anxiety? PTSD? Autism? Something else entirely? I have always been shy. When I was a kid, I didn't talk to anyone I didn't know for the first almost 10 years of my life. I was too terrified of it.This of course led to problems and even when I NEEDED to talk to someone, even if I knew them (friends/family/etc), I simply could not do it.I remember going to church and I was in Sunday school. I really had to pee, but I was so afraid of talking to anyone that I couldn't. I ended up hiding behind a chair and peeing on the carpet because I couldn't hold it anymore. I couldn't have been older than 5.My "parents" were not the greatest and have done many things throughout the course of my life that have probably made me much worse.My "dad" molested me, manipulated me and physically abused me. My "mom" manipulated me constantly. She is constantly gaslighting. She has told me to kill myself numerous times and denies it. She is physically abusive and mentally abusive. She held me by my throat over a staircase. She neglected me and refused to feed me or bring me to the hospital when I needed to go. She even threatened to kill herself when I disagreed with her.In school, I didn't talk. I had very few friends and most of those "friends" were my friends because they decided to be and in almost all those situations, they ended up using me.I HATED highschool. I had the same problem with people. Constant bullying and people pretending to be my friend so they could use me.I am now out of school and struggle much more to go about my day.I find no interest in being friends with people and I'm happier when people don't try to be my friend.I think that I often dissociate. I haven't talked to a doctor, but from the research I've done, it sounds like what I feel.I often feel nothing at all and have a very weak sense of self.I have no idea how to explain how I feel.I have a hard time thinking. I feel as though I rarely have "actual thoughts". I don't know how else to describe this. I struggle to make eye contact. It makes me feel extremely uncomfortable and I never know what is enough or too little so I settle for too little. I don't really care about this. People who know me aren't bothered.I have a TERRIBLE memory. I can be having a conversation with my boyfriend and then completely forget the whole thing happened halfway through a sentence.Simple tasks are so hard for me. I honestly cannot understand how other people can do them and not have to take a whole day or more off from everything else just to cope from the energy I have to put out just to do things.I am almost constantly stimming but I'm not sure if it's just from anxiety. I did it as a child and my mom would scream at me for "being psychotic" and so I stopped until more recently again (I'm assuming this is because I recently moved out and my boyfriend is very supportive of my many "quirks").I struggle to sleep. Sometimes I can't get to sleep. Sometimes I can't stay asleep. When I do sleep, my dreams are often very stressful.I have multiple anxiety attacks a day and often shut down afterwards. I'm not able to communicate and if I'm out, I can wander for hours before I realise that I'm lost and I have no idea how I got where I did.I think I may have some anger issues. Something minor can happen and, of course, that means that something has to be thrown. I often have the same anger towards dropping my charger out of reach as I do when I'm arguing with someone.I often shut down for hours or even days when things get too much. "Too much" can be walking by a crying child in a supermarket some days or even just hearing a light buzzing or other small, constant sound on other days. Other days, I am fine with short outings as long as I don't go out often.I can't leave the house often. When I do leave the house, it's with my boyfriend and I am easily overwhelmed by noise, lights and movement.I have days when talking is too much energy and days where everything just hurts. I have read that these could be caused by anxiety.I constantly feel like maybe I'm completely healthy, that this is just how people live and that I just like to complain.Anxiety, autism and ptsd are just what I've found to line up the most...if you have anymore suggestions, I'd love to hear them.I am diagnosed with anxiety so far. So if it's just anxiety, I'm so sorry to other anxious people who go through this and feel like this.I am on meds for anxiety. I went to therapy. Like I said, I just moved so I'll have to find a new doctor and therapist.I just feel like this can't be all. I feel like I struggle too much for there to not be more.Sorry that this post was so long. Thank you for reading it. [info] None [info] 1572990651
barelyonhere [info] It would depend on the severity of their disorders. I was diagnosed with anxiety (by a real doctor) and have mostly just learned to live with it. I have days where it's a but much, but I don't do medication.Fun fact: every medication the military gives you for anxiety apparently makes sex *really* hard, and not in the good way.   [info] None [info] 1466953515
Chirikyat [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders, and telling close friends this has managed to drive some away. Many people do not understand how it works, therefore do not know how to sympathise.As we cannot explain it, they cannit understand it. [info] None [info] 1386412316
misshobbit [info] Are you me? I swear we are the same person. Get a second opinion. While some anxiety symptoms can mimic ADHD, as others have already said, they often go together. u/titsmcfly explained it very well. I was diagnosed with anxiety while waiting to be tested for ADHD. I have both, and I'm pretty sure the ADHD is a major factor in the anxiety. The right anxiety meds can help, but they won't do anything for the ADHD obviously. I will say that having the anxiety under control does help me manage my ADHD better. Go a head and see the anxiety specialist, but find someone else for a second opinion on the ADHD.  [info] None [info] 1365647440
SayoSC2 [info] Former Starcraft 2 player, I used to and I still have issues playing ranked.  One of the biggest issues as to why I have problems is the lack of confidence in personal skill to get better or be at the level I'm supposed to play at.  Like SC2 pre-LotV, I recently this year made a new account to smurf and play to fuck around and not give too much shit on ranked.  Needless to say, it still didn't help out at the same time.What I find with ranked anxiety is really to just being confident with yourself.  There has been many times when I feel like I can or can't win, but it also depends on the mindset if you want to try to win or just give up and move on.  With the former, you're investing a lot into tryharding, which can be either a satisfying, or morale-crushing feeling to experience.  The latter is where you just don't give a shit and just keep playing so you don't care about the small shit pissing you off.I think last issue is really the person/player him/herself.  A while ago, I was diagnosed with anxiety so it makes me stress from a lot of external things, whether it was league or social matters.  It's kind of been weird especially since playing has caused my jaw to just tense up significantly (I once actually had my jaw pop, which was painful ;_;).tl;dr - just don't stress too much, work on things that makes you have fun, and just be confident.  and most importantly, fight hard. [info] Gold IV [info] 1476675326
LitteWing93 [info] She called me and I apologized because of using the word seriously. I agree I should have thought about it longer I felt I didnt have much time because i wanted her to get the message a.s.a.p before Kelly had the chance to see it. I was diagnosed with anxiety which Is why I'm seeking to see if maybe i over reacted. Thank you for your input. [info] None [info] 1574628066
hatedheadspace [info] I don't mind posting here as opposed to in boxing you. I was diagnosed with anxiety and BPD back when I was a teenager. (I'm 30 now). I also suffer from chronic migraines. I started smoking because of the migraines after my doctor tried everything else for them and I would have adverse reactions from the meds. I lived in FL at the time and my doctor was like "if this was a medical state we'd try that route..." So I ended up trying out on my own with help from a friend. It helped with the migraines, I hadn't been expecting it to help with the anxiety, which was apparent almost immediately for me. I was able to wean myself off of the medications I was on ( my doctor knew I was doing as such). I don't smoke to get high (and until I pop out my kid and stop breastfeeding I'm not at all currently). But I when I did I would catch a small buzz and it's like getting on an even level for me. I don't tremble, stutter, feel like I'm going to go into panic attacks, and the world doesn't seem "fake" to me anymore. I become less reclusive and able to hold conversations without feeling like everything I say is going to be judged harshly. It helps me go with the flow of things and just be. Without the worry things will blowup in my face. It helps calm me when my other coping methods don't work.  [info] None [info] 1439832150
mark983 [info] Yes I've been diagnosed with anxiety, with IBS and with migraine.Their not exactly hard things to identify.I will ask Doctor for IBS diagnosis.None of these supplements are bad anyway they will do more good than harm I think. [info] None [info] 1514766737
gukzluv [info] I'm scared to start dieting again but now I'm 17 stone. So at 14 to around 16, I was anorexic, going from 16 stone to 7 in a year. I was very unhappy. I eventually went to the hospital and was treated for a month and was left to just go to therapy.Over the last few years I've been terrified of dieting because it could mean going back to being anorexic, since I ruined my life that way ( not getting good grades, losing friends, etc.)But now it's gotten too far, I'm 18 years old and weigh 17 stone. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and 80% of my anxiety stems from my appearance, and I've stopped leaving the house.So how do I get rid of this dieting anxiety so I can start being healthy? [info] None [info] 1578535711
EKaffine [info] Try to keep this long post short.  Do you guys just get nauseous? Or do you also get that tight feeling in the back of your throat that you get right before you throw up?  I get the throat thing, been happening since I was 12, I'm 20 now.  It happens every single time that I eat, but its worse when eating in public, especially sit down restaurants.  I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD.  I went without eating for about a month when I was 12 when it started because I had no clue how to handle it.  The anxiety makes me afraid of getting sick in front of people, the OCD makes it happen every time I eat.  The more stressed I am, the more severe it is, and when I'm in anxious situations (such as my boyfriend coming back from Afghanistan) I just can't eat.   [info] None [info] 1324851566
Horny_Hipst3r [info] As far as my experience with leading groups comes from, I've been involved as the main organizer of some smaller\-scale political demonstrations. Also I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and keep having panic attacks time to time. I would like to say that being in any leadership position, you are not doing the most work, but you can delegate and rely on others to do it for you, while you just have to be sure how what they are doing  fits into the bigger picture, and sometimes you are expected to speak on their behalf when you are representing your group \(in your case, I'd imagine it would be you who'd end up writing articles about your club's activities to the student paper/blog/social media etc.\). Good way to negate your anxiety is to get to know people who you're about to get involved with \(other club members etc.\) \- try to find time to talk to them a little in person, such as joking around, making small talk etc. getting comfortable so you'll feel less anxious about your situation, and feel their support. Saying this because it absolutely sucks when you can't trust people you're working with, only adds to the stress and anxiety. You say you are passionate about french language and the minor you're studying, I think that's about all that you need right now. Remember, it's a student club at a university, you are not some high\-level executive at a corporation, so you are more expected to be enthusiastic and reasonably proactive, not to crunch numbers or fuss over business management models. Don't worry, you'll do an amazing job :\) [info] GAD/Panic Disorder [info] 1525759943
big_diction4ry [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and tbh im in complete denial of it like I talk easily and openly to others and find conversation comes fluidly HOWEVER omg group situations are scary omg no omg everyone hates me [info] 16 [info] 1511467855
merpytaco [info] Hey there, I wish I could tell you there's a magical cure for your dad but there isn't. I grew up in a situation very similar to yours, heck, I'm still living in it. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year when I finally dragged myself to a psychologist. I was jumpy, hyper vigilant, always too aware of my surroundings and people's actions. The therapist described it as having ptsd as a result of growing up in a domestic violence situation. The problem isn't you. You were never an awful kid. Your father likely has anger issues due to his own unresolved traumas. But, that is no excuse for him to act this way and to harm you or your family.I hope, hope, hope you seek some counseling. If you can please get your mother to see a therapist as well. And if your dad can see one, even better. If not, please talk to and confine in friends. Don't live in fear for your life. Protect yourself first. I know it's not the best advise, but from one gal with an emotionally unstable dad to the other, I know you love him, but he's **not** allowed to hurt you. And you have to make yourself believe that because it is *true.* [info] None [info] 1501485866
alosar7 [info] Ok to clarify what the psychiatrist said after his evaluation: He is AWARE that I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but he does not think that what I am dealing with is related to it. I have no family history of mental illness or somatic disorders. The anxiety diagnosis was from around 12 years ago and I have been managing it since then. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1571023097
quiet156 [info] I’m actually far more cautious about dating now. I don’t worry about myself getting hurt, but I often find myself worrying about if I date someone, will they abuse or kill my bunny if they turn out to be abusive? What are the warning signs of someone like that? I have this tiny creature I love and want to protect, and you just never know what’s going on in someone else’s mind. It’s made me leery of online dating, or really dating much at all.All that said, I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was a kid, as I have a distinct tendency to worry about and expect the absolute worst things that could happen. But I’m in therapy, and have been since before I got into true crime. I think reading all this has simply given me actual situations to stress over. It’s why I do my best to avoid any and all stories with animals getting hurt, especially rabbits. I don’t need those thoughts and images in my brain. I make up enough on my own. [info] None [info] 1512200369
WeAreTheCrazyMakers [info] I'm feeling really out of it on new anti-anxiety meds. Like a lot of us, I've got more than one thing going wrong for me: ADHD and anxiety. I was diagnosed with anxiety first, so I'm on Lexapro already. I met with a psych, and he's STILL not sure if I have ADHD even though a specialist diagnosed me. I feel like he did the right thing by upping my Lexapro dosage though. I'm usually afraid or uncomfortable with most things, but now, I feel really out of it. Instead of wanting to crawl out of my skin, I stare off and ramble to myself. It's as if everything is out of focus. I'm a bit more hyper. I have a meeting with my psych this week, so hopefully he'll give me some thing for the inattentiveness. [info] None [info] 1446575727
Ukiyo-Ikigai [info] I quit my job.I worked at an education dept at the time so I had a job where I was looking after a team of 9 senior peoples diaries, booking meetings and organising 40 different courses all at once. I was dubbed as the 'headless chicken' by my department because I was running around everywhere. Obviously I was stressed being the only person doing this for my team. When I asked for support my team especially my manager became vindictive and started micromanaging me (to the point I had to tell them when I was going to the toilet - no joke). It was the straw that broke the camel's back. I quit my job and went to my doctor for some support because I didn't wanna go to work anymore, was crying every day and then some - I was diagnosed with anxiety and low mood and went to therapy for a period of time. Eventually I found a part time job that was less stressful and was luckily in a team that was so supportive, they were the best team I've had to date. However, I still deal with anxiety over how I was treated in my previous role but learnt coping techniques from therapy which helps me be calm and put things into perspective. Lesson learned: never will I bend over backwards and stress myself out over work, it's not worth it. [info] None [info] 1569661466
fidget4ever [info] Gotta tell ya from the perspective of a 50+ professional woman who wasn’t diagnosed and medicated until I was 40, I made it through and so can you.  Before ADHD diagnosis, I was diagnosed with anxiety.  I had to bustMy butt through college and early career. All I can tell you is be ready to show a doctor the facts. There are certain things doctors look for, the most important being that you have some proof that you have had Symptoms since childhood. They are sometimes different for girls than boys, but not always. If you have a Parent, sibling or teacher who can vouch for your symptoms as a child, that will also go a long way. [info] None [info] 1568684185
cooliorama [info] Yeah I originally got addicted my junior year of high school when I was diagnosed with anxiety and I began self medicating a lot. Now I have medical marijuana for my anxiety! Got it prescribed like 2 weeks ago. Now I've been back in school and soon I'm moving to my own place again, I'm ready for it all.  [info] None [info] 1532712026
RaymonM18 [info] Anxiety Chest Pain Hey, i wanted some thoughts from anyone who bothers to reply, I was diagnosed with anxiety about 2 months ago when i made multiple trips to the ER because of chest pain I was having(tightness in chest, shortness of breathe, sweaty hands, etc) and ive done multiple tests such as EKG, x-ray, ct scan and bloodwork and everything has come back fine but every day i experience chest pain but they always tell me its anxiety but i feel as if my chest pain manifest my anxious thoughts not the other way around so i was just wondering if anyone has gone through anything like this [info] None [info] 1567247055
dysflogtional [info] 18 [F4M] Intimacy, equality, commitment, balance, and the ultimate sign of trust. # 𝓱𝓮𝓵𝓵𝓸!**Let's keep this simple. After all, this is a personal ad, not a master's thesis.** Dominance and submission is a representation of intimacy, equality, balance, and the ultimate sign of trust. If you do not agree with that statement on a fundamental level, *please click away now.***What I'm looking for:*** First and foremost, *I'm seeking a friend— a companion*. Someone who I can build an emotionally intimate relationship with full of trust and balance.* I'm seeking my equal. Not my twin or doppelganger, my equal, but opposite. Someone who compliments my strengths and vice versa, someone who lifts me in moments of weakness so I can turn around and do the same for them. I desire a relationship where they and I can both learn from each other and become better people through our journey together — *equality through balance, not through similarities.** They should be *strong-willed, but open-minded*. While attraction isn't the most important thing, I'm incredibly drawn to people with a sense of importance and determination.* My partner, and I cannot stress this enough, must be *an excellent communicator*. Yes, I mean open and honest conversations— of course, that's important— but I also mean using words to express their thoughts, ideas, opinions, etc. clearly, so that there is no questioning what they mean. In a relationship that will inevitably take place predominately over text, there will be misunderstandings; I'd like to avoid as many of those as possible.* This is simple: I need frequent praise and verbal affirmations.**Some things to put on the table:*** *I need more than text*. As I said above, misunderstandings will occur, which is why I much prefer getting to know someone over long, late-night (or day time) phone conversations. I, of course, won't push comfort levels, though. That can come a little later.* I am a very needy person. That is who I am, and it will not change. What does that mean? *I need daily, and consistent communication*, along with a general understanding that I do not expect the same from you.* I would much prefer if you were located in the continental U.S., I do not place much value in where you reside, but would appreciate if we shared the same mindset regarding progression, and how we should proceed with our relationship (much, much farther down the line).* I am a *monogamous* person. Threesomes and group sex are something entirely different. I can't participate in an open or polyamorous relationship because I'm too insecure and jealous. Honestly, good for you if you can; I envy that. *Please be single entering this relationship.***Who am I?*** You can call me "I." I'm eighteen and am still in high school. Currently, I find refuge in rural Idaho as a Southern California transplant. But, in 411 days, I will be moving back to my hometown for educational purposes. I enjoy anything and everything involving creativity— art, music, writing, cosmetology, interior design... you name it, I'm probably slightly above average.* Physically, I'm 5'6 and 175lbs, working on getting it to 130. Here are some (NSFW) [pictures](https://imgur.com/a/c3oQhc3) for reference. Mutual attraction on a physical level, for me, is less critical than an appeal on an intellectual level, but it still holds weight.* In regards to my mental health: I have issues which prevent me from being quite as outgoing and confident as I aspire to be. Currently, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and major depressive disorder, however, my psychiatrist is exploring the possibility of BPD (borderline personality disorder), which isn't as scary as it sounds. Despite this, I am an individualistic, spontaneous, tempestuous and energetic young lady. \*What does this mean for you?\*  Well, extra patience and understanding. I have regular panic attacks and sometimes make mole-hills into mountains. Slowly, I'm learning how to better cope with these emotions and how kink can fit into my personal brain chemistry in a non-destructive way. * I'm choosing not to share my specific kinks at this time. Here's why: I view a relationship much like I do a great novel. Within a book, an author has skillfully and carefully chosen words to create the narrative he wants to tell. If a different author wrote a story with the same plot, the words would not be identical, nor would the details of the plot. Similarly, if these two writers collaborated, the story may take words and phrases from each account, or they would write new prose to create something even more magnificent. And yet, these great tales must be written in the same language. My language of preference has to do with the perpetuation of power-dynamics.**What do I have to offer in return?*** My everything. I, often to a fault, am overly committed, loyal and attached to anyone who gains my affection. We talked for three days, and I like you? I'll jump in front of a bullet for you. Online partnerships are a dangerous game when you're heart works like that, but I'm willing to play it in hopes of meeting the right person.**In conclusion:** Quirky, intelligent girl who values consistency, compatibility, communication, and sustainability puts herself out there in hopes of finding someone. *If this resonated with you, drop me a line. In your first message, please include what you're looking for, why my post resonated with you, what you look like, and other basic information. Any 1-2 line messages will be ignored, purely from lack of effort.*  ^(Any edits made are formatting only.) [info] None [info] 1557387621
LAthrowaway519940 [info] Not yet, but if I don’t get any traction I’ll go for one next year. Or maybe a non US school. Not really anything I’d talk about in an interview, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and didn’t get my correct med dosage till last year so my abysmal freshman year GPA carried over :(Thanks so much! It’s my one shot lol [info] None [info] 1539536070
sammij [info] Advice was given to me when I was diagnosed with anxiety: if it is impacting your life or others lives in a significant way, you should seek help. Is he seeing anyone about his mental health? He needs other tools to use when he feels anxious. [info] None [info] 1555314707
beesbeme [info] Hello! I am not a doctor, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety for most of my life now. What you are describing sounds like a panic attack. You don't necessarily need a specific trigger to have a panic attack. Sometimes it's just the expulsion of pent-up stress, or maybe you do have a trigger but you haven't noticed it. Panic attacks always happen for a reason, but sometimes that reason isn't very clear. Try to remember how you were feeling, what you were doing, and where you were before and during each panic attack. If there are any similarities between each situation then that might be the cause!In my experience, some of my panic attacks come from not breathing enough and having lots of tension, which is something that I've only realized very recently. When I'm stressed or concentrating very hard I tend to take slow and short breaths. The body goes 'woah, that's not enough oxygen,' so it makes you panic. So, whenever I feel a panic attack coming on, I force myself to take a step back from what I'm doing and breathe. A great and easy to remember breathing exercise is to breath in as much as you can, hold for a second, before breathing out slowly. It works 9/10, if I catch it fast enough. Of course, all of that is my personal experience and there's no telling if it will work for you. The best advice I cam give you is to talk to a psychiatrist. Seriously, they will help a lot, even if this is a rare thing. Panic attacks are scary enough without having a support structure. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1536995447
lifeofern [info] Anyone feel like they're always subconsciously anxious? Hey guys, so a year and a half ago I had anxiety issues that would leave me exhausted multiple times per week, during the worst of it, panic attacks would happen on the daily which really affected my social life and studying, rendering me helpless for a couple of hours before I could recover and go about my day.Through the year I've "weeded" out the things that I knew weren't good for me, mental health-wise. I've also made changes to my lifestyle, sorted my crap out, started going to the gym almost on the daily, and even started boxing recently. My new views/interests brought me to get up off my ass more, and compared to last year I'm in a MUCH better place, like a lot better.However, for some reason, I still catch myself panicking over the silliest things, and it pisses me off knowing that it's very likely nothing to worry about. The tiniest things will randomly stress me out and trigger a tiny amount of panic in me. For example, sometimes I'll get a sore throat and I'll automatically overreact and jump to a conclusion that I'm really sick or what not. I feel as if I'm plagued with a bunch of "what ifs" and that I should always be expecting the worst to happen to me. Nowadays I'm not even actively thinking about whatever, but one thing leads to another and my mind seems to be put in a little panic state.Sorry for the ramble, I thought I'd just get a little bit out there. I'm looking for any advice to dealing with this kind of "subconscious" anxiety,  even before I was diagnosed with anxiety I've been a worrisome person, and so I don't know where to draw the line between anxiety and simply just worrying.TL;DR - How can I reduce my general and/or subconscious anxiety, even when I'm not feeling anxious? (if that makes sense)&amp;#x200B; [info] None [info] 1547966365
PetrichorPrints [info] Girls vs. Boys Memes Hi teenagers! I hope everyone's having a good day. I wanted to make a post about a certain type of meme that I've been seeing a lot, especially on this subreddit. I'd really like it if you read my post completely, but I'll put the three main points in a TL;DR at the end! So, I've been seeing lots of memes that are sort of stereotyping women, especially teenage girls. Before you comment, could you let me explain? These memes are painting teenage girls as overdramatic, boring, and vain. (I'm talking about like the 14 year old girl who listens to Billie Eilish and the Boys vs. Girls locker room memes) Also, even though I don't personally listen to Billie Eilish, it kind of sucks to see people attacked for liking things that resonate with them.Also, this isn't pardoning rude or "fake deep" girls. Trust me,I've met some real snakes. This is just asking you to reconsider your thoughts on boys and girls as a whole!I think that the point of those memes is to make the guys seem better than girls, but it doesn't really accomplish that. All it does is reinforce stereotypes (for guys and girls), and makes the poster seem insecure. Like, for example, a little boy refusing to wear pink because he doesn't want to look like a girl. That stereotype is awful! It demeans the very real emotional experiences that women and girls go through. I'm sure you dudes have faced the same thing, with the stereotype that all men are aggressive and emotionless. Both those stereotypes harm us, because they refuse to acknowledge the depth and variety of the experiences that everyone goes through! For example: I've been having problems with my mental health for a while, and I'm diagnosed with anxiety. It took me ages to get help, because I thought I was just being over-dramatic, and that girls don't have *true* mental health problems. So, I think you can get the point of what I'm trying to say. Anyways, this isn't an ask for you to stop posting that meme. It'd be like asking a river to change course. All I want is for you to be a little more conscious about stuff like this. Girls, we're *so much more* a set up. Boys, you are *so much more* than a punch line. TL;DR\-You shouldn't attack people for liking things that resonate with them, even if you don't feel it yourself. \-Stereotypes for men and women (Especially portrayed in the memes I mentioned) demean and oversimplify the real emotions we face, and the experiences we feel. \-Girls are more than a setup to an insecure meme. Boys are more than a shallow joke. Have a good day everyone! Make sure to drink water and eat a good breakfast this morning. [info] None [info] 1579538487
meerkatmeow [info] Any suggestions on how I can make myself feel more “bridal”? I’ve typed this out a few times and haven’t been able to make it flow, so I apologize if it doesn’t make sense. I went wedding dress shopping over the weekend and have felt very down since. I had to go alone, as I currently live in South Carolina and my family and friends are in Massachusetts. What I always thought would be a magical experience left me exhausted and feeling pathetic. I found myself angry and envious of the other brides who were having a great time with their loved ones. I realized after my 10th dress that I only felt like some ugly loser playing dress up and not like a bride. On Monday I told my coworkers that I had gone dress shopping, hoping maybe they’d be excited, but they didn’t respond too well. Granted, I work with all dudes and shouldn’t have expected much excitement, but it still hurt a bit. I’ve also heard through my best friend who’s helping plan my bachelorette party that most of our friends are less than enthusiastic about attending. They all have a million excuses and two of them straight up didn’t respond to the invite. We even changed the location from Napa Valley where I want to go, to somewhere closer to home in hopes they’ll attend. I’m still excited, but it’s frustrating that they have such little interest in celebrating with me. I’ve also found it difficult being so far from our families while wedding planning. We only hear their excitement through the phone and text, but not hearing in person makes it feel less genuine. Of course they’re all excited, the distance just mutes it. We are moving back home in March, which should help ease my worries, but it’s currently adding another layer of stress to wedding planning. We have to find an apartment, I have to find a job, and moving is just super stressful. This turned more into a rant than a question. I guess I would ask - how do you all make yourselves feel bridal? When did you start feeling it? Are my feelings normal? I should also add that I was diagnosed with anxiety in August. My doctor suggested two therapists to speak with, however they never returned my calls. I know I should see someone, but it may have to wait until the move. If you made it this far, thank you. I appreciate it more than you know. TLDR: I’m stressed and anxious looking for advice on how to relax and start feeling like a bride. [info] None [info] 1548258726
Guywholovesmonhun [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety before and I’ve been pretty sure it’s related for a while, but I’ve tried at least 7 or 8 medications at this point (lost count) and I only get the side effects. Not even a tiny benefit. However I’m considering trying meds again anyways because it sounds like the logical answer. Do you have any other recommendations? Maybe a weird med I wouldn’t have heard of before or some other thing? [info] None [info] 1568376887
okaygosh [info] Ah, that makes sense, thank you (and for the slenderman sounding static, that's exactly what I heard). Although I don't have ADHD, I was diagnosed with anxiety recently (I've had it for years, actually around the time I stopped having nightmares is when I developed it but I just thought that I was just shy) and so maybe it could have be linked to that?I haven't experienced anything like that since, but I certainly hope I don't because I had this weird feeling of "this isn't right." [info] None [info] 1393815877
burrr1017 [info] Poop Sweat Hi Reddit! I've been a lurker for awhile but can't deal with this anymore :(. For about 3 years now whenever i sweat, it smells like feces (shit). I have been made fun of by peers and it is really taken its toll on my self confidence. I find myself not wanting to go out into public or doing anything that makes me sweat. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and hypoglycemia but i don't think he hypoglycemia makes sweat smell like poop. I know i sweat much earlier and more than others. Some people (my parents and counselor) say it's in my head but i have had people confront me and tell me to shower and use deodorant. I use anti bacterial soap, drysol(apply to skin and stops sweat), and clinical strength deodorant, but i still smell. I poop once every day or 2. I do remember having bloating problems about 6 years ago but thought they were normal. I am a white male, 5ft 8in, 160lbs and currently taking neurotin for anxiety. Do i have an intestine or rectum problem?? Should i see a Gastroenterologist? I don't think the hypoglycemia causes a fecal smell when sweating and the anxiety makes it worse by causing me to sweat more. Please help. Thank you Edit: Oh i exercise regularly and have a pretty healthy diet. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1425689985
djunknownjunkie [info] Please help me . Ok so let's just get this out of the way I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I feel it's interfering with my musical making abilities. I can never seem to be able to be able to finish anything or i get frustrated with the smallest of things . Like today for example i found a nice vocal sample That i wanted to use and warped it on ableton . It sounded in time with the metronome but i felt it just didn't sound right and i even checked it on other programs like the Fl Studio demo or mixed in key  .It made me feel disheartend and just close ableton and stop trying to fix it  . I don't know, i even  try to force my self but i can't  do anything with my music , I set deadlines i don't reach them, I take breaks it dosn't work .  Making music is the only thing that makes me happy in my life and it kills me knowing i can't try to finish anything or do little things like warping samples or whatever . [info]  [info] 1447981108
ivapeNyQuil [info] Interesting, I was diagnosed with anxiety and didn’t fall into the “poster child” levels of ADHD but was close. Called it anxiety and told me to read a book and see somebody. It’s been about a year now and I feel like it’s time to revisit that diag:/ thank you for sharing :) [info] None [info] 1528402915
thelibrarina [info] For about a year after I was diagnosed with anxiety, I slept on the sofa in the family room. I think it was because the bedroom felt too "closed off," and the family room was open to the rest of the house (it had a broad doorway instead of a door). It didn't do me any harm, and after a while I went back to sleeping in a bed.I talked with my counselor about it, and she basically said--sleep wherever you feel comfortable. It's much better than no sleep at all. :) [info] None [info] 1469062344
brokenjasper [info] I'm used to staying up to 5 or 6 am. Also I happen to feel tired but I have an appointment at 10:30am and it is stressing me out how the time I have left to sleep is ticking away and is getting less and less. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders. Already tried laying in bed. About to try again, but I'll probably not be able to sleep. It is common for me to either get no sleep or very little sleep when I have to be up in the morning. I'd probably sleep with no trouble if the appointment was somehow cancled. [info] None [info] 1566548544
xLockdown [info] Anxiety and panic attack 100%. You are experiencing irrational fear caused by anxiety. Trust me , I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder 5 years ago and I know what is feels like when you thinking about stuffs like that . I remeber , few months ago I almost had frontal  car crash accident at speed of 100 km/h and thanks to God I avoided it somehow , I still dont know how but weeks later , I had question in my head -" what if Im really dead now and I didnt avoid that car crash" . Don't let to those thoughts to control your life . When you are in car , play your favorite music, concentrate to road , think positive and enjoy the ride . You'll be fine ;) [info] None [info] 1484998512
space_boat [info] This is true but I've been diagnosed with anxiety. Smoking probably doesn't help at all. [info] None [info] 1339640011
ThePlantSoileditself [info] I need some help with a funny problem I've never really been on this subreddit before, but I figured this was the only thing I could do besides from posting a question on Yahoo answers.I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was in ninth grade, and it's basically just shown up as the usual stuff.It wasn't until this year when I started to notice an odd symptom.Every time I'm anxious, (Which happens to be in a quiet classroom doing a test), my stomach starts making incredibly loud noises.They sound like normal "hunger" noises, but Dear Lord, they are loud.No, it's not hunger. I could eat an entire Chinese free-for-all buffet and my stomach would still grumble.It's anxiety. And it sucks.It sort of propels itself, since the noises are obviously heard by EVERYBODY else in the room, and even though they don't say anything, I know they heard it.Of course, because of that, the noises only get louder, and louder. This is just awful and I don't know what to do.Filling my lungs with air to sort of compress my stomach used to help, but now they seem to retaliate and just end up being louder.I know I need to learn how to calm myself down, and hopefully they'll go away, but I'm just so scared.I'm in grade 12, I guess I'm still an insecure teenager.The real problem:We have exams on Tuesday. This means I'll be writing a difficult test with high stakes, in a class room of nearly 100 people, completely quiet.Usually I'll take a water bottle so I can sort of fill my stomach if they start acting up, but water bottles or snacks are no longer allowed. We will be in the class for about 2 hours, meaning there is absolutely NOTHING I can do.I guess I could excuse myself to the bathroom, but there's a new rule where a teacher has to personally ESCORT us, and...ew. No thank you.I've tried to talking to my friends about it, and they (understandably) laugh it off and can't relate.I really need help, I am begging ANYONE.I know this sounds like a stupid issue, which it totally is, but I'm scared. I am so scared. I need help.What do I do?! [info] None [info] 1462652965
tearfulfearful [info] I want to learn to drive. I'm in my 30s and I can't drive. I've only been behind the wheel twice and those times were just moving the car a few feet in my driveway. I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 10. My family never pressured me to drive because they knew it was one of the things that scared me. To make everything worse, I was in a car accident as passenger the year I took driver's ed. I injured my hip and I couldn't drive. It was almost a relief. It traumatizes me to this day.  My mom was in a bad accident a few years ago and now every time she leaves the house I demand she calls me when she gets to where she's going and when she leaves. I feel like life is literally driving past me and I'm tired of it. My family takes me everywhere. They don't mind but I want to be independent and I feel like they shouldn't have to do this anymore. Not driving is embarrassing. I want more for myself and I can't get it because I'm scared to go out and do it on my own. I can never leave the house alone. I can't go to work without help. I don't have any friends. I don't date. I've looked for driving schools near me but there aren't any. Even if it was, I still don't know if I would do it. I need some help. I'm going to my doctor Wednesday to talk about my anxiety in general. This is one of the things I want to finally admit. One thing I really need is for someone to tell me I'm not crazy. If I knew how to drive, I'd have so many opportunities to live a better life. Please share your experiences. I need to find some motivation to change for good. Thanks. [info] None [info] 1558683692
cmunk13 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety first, because that's a more prominent issue in my life and obvious in my personality. It does way better with established routine, and consistency and preparation. However, it never really worked for me. It always made my grades WORSE, I was disorganized, and just unable to relax. Now, I know that that's the ADHD bit. So I have to compromise. A planned ahead schedule, so it changes per day but planned. Consistent windows for some things that are hard to schedule- meals, study times. Knowing when it's ok to blow things off and just do something weird, while not shirking my responsibilities or using it as an avoidance technique.  [info] None [info] 1523236237
sh225406 [info] Those are mine too! I was just diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago after multiple panic attacks (first time knowing it was abnormal). I just though thats how people felt when stressedd or under pressure. [info] None [info] 1551046977
somegrump [info] I haven't. I don't actually know all that much about ADHD, to be honest. My older sister has been diagnosed with it, but we didn't grow up much in the same house. My house has always been very "its a flesh wound, walk it off," so I have never actually wondered for reasons as to why my memory is crap and I require checklists to survive, haha. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ocd (which was the least surprising thing in the world, after a lifetime of trying to ignore it) recently, but I didn't bring up adhd and neither did my doc.  [info] None [info] 1473902733
Adaptasap123 [info] I’m simply implying that I’m not upping dosages or feel the need to at all. I’m implying that this specific drug is doing its job correctly. I did a little research and benzos have such a bad rep because people on the street love to use them recreationally. Take it under supervision (as I do prescribed by a doctor) and you’ll be fine. Exactly the same goes for any other drug and alcohol. I’m implying that what you’re saying is incorrect to MY PERSONAL EXPERIENCE and not “facts”. It’s easy because I don’t have that addictive personality.Your question is basically the same scenario as if I broke an arm and a doctor insisted I take morphine and I for a bit refuse to because it’s easy to resist the pain all because I have a high pain tolerance or don’t want to take it then you asking if it’s so easy to resist, why get the doctor to give you some? How stupid? I was diagnosed with anxiety officially and the drug manufactured (benzos) for anxiety, is working. It doesn’t automatically mean I HAVE to take it daily either. Some people are prescribed benzos as a every now and then prescription. Stop being ignorant. [info] None [info] 1507040561
sissyanxiityy [info] Weird cause I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder as a kid I just dont see how that could create this and how anxiety could potentially change ur sexual orientation [info] None [info] 1533159021
Trlov1918 [info] Getting my boss to understand my anxiety Hi guys! I was diagnosed with anxiety about 6 years ago and I have worked hard to recognizing my triggers to prevent attacks, but lately I’ve been getting them because of my boss and I’m not sure what to do. For the most part I loved my job, until recently when one of my supervisors took over as the head supervisor and started changing things. One of the new thinks he is implementing is a seat change, which happens sometimes and I normally wouldn’t have a problem. Except this time, he has put me in a seat that causes me a lot of anxiety. When he told us, it was in a small meeting and I asked if he could please put me somewhere else, even if it’s just one seat over. I tried to explain I wasn’t just being petty but he refused because he didn’t understand and he started basically making fun of my anxiety. We both started going back and forth, which wasn’t the best idea but I started panicking. I ended up leaving the meeting in tears and we haven’t spoken since. The worst part is I know that if I had said something to him in private he would have been cool with moving me, but because he hates giving in in front of other people. Instead he has now made it clear to everyone that seating is nonnegotiable, so I will never be able to get it changed. We haven’t even changed seats and it’s already causing me problems.What’s happening now is this has started to trigger other anxieties that I though I had under control. It’s no longer just about the seat, it’s now affecting everything and I’m having daily attacks. Any ideas on what I can do about my boss and getting this under control before I explode? [info] None [info] 1545494946
CarnivorousGinger5 [info] My anxiety tanks grades which cause more anxiety Possible tiggers: school, gradesI am in a down ward spiral at the moment. I am a college student and procrastinate when my anxiety is acting up which sometimes worsens to the point I don't turn in assignments. Then the bad grades cause my anxiety to act up more and the cycle repeats.Then occasionally I get super upset with myself that I'm ruining my own life and do all my assignments for like a week and feel good about myself only to justify slacking on something and then feeling bad and starting all over.I'm failing all of my classes this semester and I don't know if I can bring the grades up by may. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder by the college councilor my freshman year. [info] None [info] 1585453699
Lcarre02 [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety. Thank you [info] None [info] 1558952306
Zonda71 [info] The aftermath It's been just over 2 years.  I was diagnosed with anxiety several months before he passed, at the time we were about 3 years into dealing with his illness. My anxiety has been significantly worse lately and I've been feeling like life is quite beyond my control. Yesterday I was diagnosed with PTSD. Apparently still thinking often about all of the graphic, gruesome details of the last month of his life, and having the constant internal monologue of "if he was still here..." and "if he was still alive..." isn't good.  My doctor said that they refer to it as being "stuck".  So, new meds,  Cognitive behavioral therapy (CBT), and more counseling for me.  &lt;sigh&gt; [info] None [info] 1575611711
Figgles86 [info] I had two panic attacks caused by chest pains after never having any anxiety before.  I was diagnosed with anxiety and I feel like my recurring chest/side pains are written off by my Doctor.After never having anxiety, I suddenly worry about my health and that I have some underlying condition will worsen until it kills me. In a way, I feel like being diagnosed with anxiety made it develop. [info] None [info] 1443902585
KatillacGirl [info] Thank you, I was diagnosed with anxiety at the same age as you, and this feels very different.  I do know that anxiety can morph itself to latch on to you too though!  I am really glad that I finally have a doctor who takes my concerns seriously and checks for things now.  My initial doctor would literally tell me EVERYTHING was anxiety.  I am very thin, (in fact underweight), but I have never been a super active person, so sometimes I think I'm just very out of shape.  But then I see other people who are wayyy more out of shape than I am, and they can still do things MUCH more easily, without feeling like they are going to die. :/I've noticed for me, that I push myself too hard when I feel good, because I actually hate sitting still, and then I am tuckered out for days at times.   I need about 10 hours of sleep a night, any less = Pain.  Too much = Pain + Anxiety.  I don't know why that is.  I'm still feeling super skeptical about whether I have fibro or not.  I feel like I might almost doubt it if my doctor tells me I have it, even though I relate so so much to the condition. [info] None [info] 1528903029
Amykazaam [info] Hey! I’m also a third semester BSN student. I highly recommend therapy if you are noticing exacerbations regarding your trichotillomania.Not only can therapy assist with preventing bald spots, it can help address the cause— stress. Stress is interesting because (as you might already know) it can be broken down in two general subdivisions— distress and eustress. It sounds to me that’s you’re currently enduring distress.This is important because sustained levels of stress have been correlated with an overall decrease in your ability to actively and efficiently learn and retain information the first time you are exposed to it. In turn, you end up needing to spend more time to studying, partially due to the reduction in active classroom learning. So seek out therapy, yes it will take time, and yes I understand how little time you have. However, it can actually end up saving you time in the long run! It can also help foster better nurse-patient relationships and decrease the likeliness of you experiencing nurse burnout! Also, what works for me (I am diagnosed with anxiety) the app Headspace. It has free little mindfulness therapy exercises and you can choose how much (or how little) time you want to put aside for mindfulness, which can be as short as 5 minutes. There’s such a need at my school, they provide free therapy for nursing students. You are not alone with this and there’s nothing wrong with seeking help.I’m really glad that you do already practice self-care. That’s huge, a lot of people don’t engage in proper self-care, and I’m really proud of you for doing so. Here are some links you might find interesting: https://www.headspace.com/blog/2017/05/31/a-day-with-trichotillomania/(Headspace article about mindfulness and trichotillomania— it’s totally subjective, but I thought you might be able to relate to it)https://www.americannursetoday.com/mindful-nurse/(Article from the ANA about mindfulness and nursing) https://www.nature.com/articles/npjscilearn201611(Research article that demonstrates the impact of stress on learning and memory, centered around educational and academic environment and exposure) http://www.apa.org/helpcenter/stress-kinds.aspx(American Psychological Association article regarding different types of stress, it might be a good read if you aren’t already familiar with the different categories of stress!) [info] None [info] 1536216726
waterrun20 [info] How to overcome my fear of accidentally offending people? I have this fear of accidentally offending people. Like I used to sometimes say things which are misinterpreted as offensive. For example, I may ask questions which are interpreted as nosey by the other person and then I ask these questions too much so the other person will somewhat dislike me.I am diagnosed with anxiety and my psychiatrist said I have "some traits of an Aspie". She said that my fear of accidentally offending people is not "what most people think like" and this constant fear may be off-putting to some people.I don't know... I also sometimes feel like I can't trust anyone with my secrets. I know that some of the teachers at my school have hinted that I have an anxiety disorder out of concern but I can't help but stay secretive about everything due to the fear of being blacklisted and betrayed. Even now, I am scared that someone will find this thread and identify who I am despite that I know that this is statistically improbable. [info]  [info] 1521352016
Tylerr_7 [info] I've always been alone.. and I don't even know what's been happening.. I want to say around 4 years ago tons of things happened.. I know that I was diagnosed with anxiety, but that's it.. My memories of that time are all but gone.Recently.. just so much bad shit's happened. and my mental state has been plummeting. Panic attacks, constant stress and so much more.. I don't even know how to express it. More recently, everything's been worse. and I don't know how to stop these thoughts either, talking to people has helped remove that pain, but the second i'm alone I have a panic attack, or that I see they're not talking to me.. My brain rushes to ideas that I'm being ignored, but then I remember that I'm not worth there time.. and I just begin to have a panic attack.. I sit there still, and I feel this wave of sadness rush over me.. And I can't stop it because I've basically taken my friends and used them so I don't hurt.. but I made them into almost an addiction.. and I hate that I'm using them for it. They always say its fine but I hate the idea that I'll never be able to do what they do for me.. I'll never be an equal.There really is no point in me living my life. It serves no purpose, I'm only wasting the time of those around me in all honesty. [info] None [info] 1544768967
TayTay2997 [info] My daddy dominant disconnected the video call when I was crying and about to have an anxiety attack. Sorry in advance if this is not the most clear post in the world, I am still trying to "calm myself down". I have had a daddy dominant for about a year now, we are in different parts of the world however we make it work and we talk regularly on vidchat. So basically today several events took place which triggered my anxiety (I have been diagnosed with anxiety). So much so that the thought of leaving my house scared me. I currently locking myself in a room and crying as I write this. I told my dominant about the main event but left the financial issues out as I did not want to make it seem like I was asking for financial aid. I told my dominant that I really wanted to video chat today as I need his comfort and I want him to put me in little space. He agreed. Throughout the first 50 minutes of the video call I am quite distant, not playful and flirty like I usually am, I am a little whiney and keep drifting in and out of little space. My dominant is playing his favorite video game and talking about it whilst I whimper for attention and I even ask for his full attention but he says he can multi task. He is a pretty awkward guy so I think he uses the video games to calm himself down or something when he is talking to me or to create conversation. I feel anxious and in a smoll voice I ask if he could help me go into little space to which he responds "Aren't you already in little space?" So 50 minutes into the call I start crying due to anxiety and prior to this I had mentioned that I feel like I am going to have an anxiety attack. I had even mentioned how I feel life is not worthwhile. He tries to calm me down with a breathing technique and some confusing advice a therapist gave him. Whilst he is advising me I am trying to vent but he keeps talking over me. The whole anxiety crying thing had lasted 5 minutes and he starts saying that he needs to go as he needs to sleep I just look at him sadly as he tries telling me something about his parents and how he really needs his sleep and how hes an insominac and so on. Bearing in mind its like 11pm where he is and his class is at like 2pm. Of course I do not want to feel like an inconvenience so I do not protest. After we say our good byes I feel dizzy and get a temparature I just cry for a good hour thinking about how insignificant I must be for him. Its just I would be willing to stay awake all night for him. I have let him vent to me before and when he does so I try my best to give him my full attention. I just want someone elses perspective on this situation. If there are any dominants/daddy/mommy dominants out there how would you react in this scenario. Just to clarify I am his sub but we mostly do ddlg so hes my Daddy dom and I am his little kitten. [info] None [info] 1540944085
StuckInBed4Ever [info] I had my Gall Bladder removed when I was 12 after two or so years of chest pains. A few months later I had the same pains.I was diagnosed with anxiety 3 years after my surgery. [info] None [info] 1571428483
IsolaOw [info] For me it was when I was diagnosed with anxiety, nothings been the same since and I don’t know if it ever will be again. I hope though, but for anyone who’s just been diagnosed or in the early years, trust me, it does get better &lt;3 [info] None [info] 1549625315
Verifiedvenuz [info] Is it possible to have a panic attack without a pain in your chest? I've been diagnosed with anxiety and have had things that seemed like panic attacks but no chest pain. [info] None [info] 1549350509
incompletesentenc_ [info] Looking back at it, I had them since I was a very young kid. It wasn’t until 2 years ago (when I was 18) that I was diagnosed with anxiety and I identified them as panic attacks rather than my ~mental breakdowns~ as I called them.  [info] None [info] 1551963004
Lalaloey [info] I'm terrified. I never thought, I would have to post something like this. First up, I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I have never thought of school as a good place, but honestly, now, it's not hatred, it's fear. I am afraid to go back to damn school. That's something, that really shows what are earth is coming too. Of May 2018, there was 23 fucking school shootings. I honestly, have a genuine fear, someone will burst into my school, aim a gun and shoot. Sure, I've never been the most full of life and all, but this is not how i would want to go. There hasn't been a school shooting in my state....yet. 21 weeks into 2018, and on average there would be 1 school shooting a week. My only question, is what is the president doing about this? Oh, no sorry. NOTHING. Should I be scared for my life going to a place where I am supposedly supposed to learn and grow? Honestly, If a school shooting does happen, and someone I care about, dies because our fucking government isn't doing anything, I'm not sure i'll be able to live anymore. I'm so scared...and honestly, August, 26th, yes so recently, there was a mass shooting in florida, what the hell is america coming too? I might be dead before, I even get to college, or sooner. [info] None [info] 1535353080
DirtpickuptruckNL [info] Music One of the biggest problems with Minecraft is that it doesn't play music the entire time. So I turn it off and listen to 10 hours versions of the music. The music calms me down so much that I've begun to listen to it when I'm on the bike or just doing something elsewhere. I've been diagnosed with anxiety for almost 2 years  so needless to say the music has really helped me exponentially. [info] None [info] 1566724669
xprincessmuffin [info] I don't know if you can offer any insight... but I'm frustrated beyond explanation with my dreams.I lucid dream naturally, always have, as does my twin sister. When we were very young, we shared reoccurring nightmares... but it passed, and we always assumed it was just a phase little kids go through - the constant nightmares. It happened again at around 8, and passed again... But in case it happened again, together, she and I devised ways to control our dreams, and we both engage in these practices to this day. Certain things are walled off, never to be dreamed of. I don't know how to explain what we're doing... but they're locked away. The locks fail sometimes, always during periods of high stress, and once they're broken, they have to be rebuilt -bc it's always a horrible nightmare when they make it into dreams.This process lead me to believe our lucidity is a sort of defense mechanism.It is my default to dream negatively. It's not always a nightmare... but my dreams aren't "safe." Part of my dreaming brain actively twists good things into bad, so when it goes too far, being lucid allows me to quit the dream (everything goes black or white), change it, or just wake myself up. My lucidity takes a form of simply being aware I'm dreaming, and I often state so aloud, knowing none of the events or people are real... and yet, I obey "rules" in the dream. So... I can for instance change a thing, but only so long as I comply with rules A,B, but not C -none of which make sense. It's not full consciousness...Fast forward to now.I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder 6 months ago and began taking medication to help. They're ok... but my dreams changed. I am still lucid, but everything is bright, vivid, happy, and yet, it's also a multitude of nightmares. Lucid and carefree, I quit nightmare after nightmare after nightmare, every night. I eventually wake up, that dreaded feeling of having been in a horrible situation, but I never cared in the dreams. I'm more bothered by the lingering mood of the nightmares themselves after waking, despite having been happy through them. And the more I try to remember the lucid nightmares, the more I forget. I can only remember my non-lucid nightmares. I barely know how to explain these lucid happy nightmares, and I have no understanding of how or why they're happening.So, I guess... my TLDR is my questions: 1. Have you ever found that lucid dreaming is a defensive reaction?? And if so, 2. Could the fact that Im lucid in my dreams be the reason for the nightmares? Like, have you ever found the brain to attempt to basically reject the consciousness when it shouldn't be present?Im not afraid to sleep. I know im dreaming as they happen, after all. Im just pissed when I wake up that I can't figure it out or seem to stop it, and it's been months. This is my first time to not be able to control them. [info] None [info] 1557461940
The_Zoinkster [info] I’m at the lowest point of my life right now because of this virus. Please read this whole thing to really understand how I’m feeling right now.I’ve never been so scared in my life honestly. I know darn well that I am probably the most likely to be fine in my family, but I still have that feeling of “what if i Don’t?” I also worry so much about my family. I don’t think I could ever move on if I lost someone in my family. We don’t have many people in our family that really care about us except my parents, my brother, and my grandparents. Everyone else in my family is a piece of shit to us. I don’t want to lose them.This whole thing is scary. I’m 18 and have never seen anything like this. Places are shutting down, roads are empty, finding food is hard, we’re barely surviving on the toilet paper that we have. I’m tired of being in this house quarantined. I don’t want to be trapped in here for a few months. It feels like a fucking apocalypse. I never saw anything like this with Ebola or other diseases. The number of cases just keep getting bigger and bigger. My state so far has 200 or so cases last I checked, and I’m afraid it’s not going to stop. What if the virus mutates and becomes more deadly? What if emit kills everyone else that I love? I’ve had such bad anxiety attacks. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorders when I was younger and had meds and I’ve been off them for about 3 years now, but I need them again. But I don’t want to go out there in any buildings other than my own house. I have just broken down and cried a couple times this week because of everything that’s been going on. I barely get any sleep over this 5 hours a night if I’m lucky. I can’t even enjoy the things I love doing most like video games right now.I’m terrified, I don’t know what to do, I’m at the lowest point that I have ever been in life right now and I need help. [info] None [info] 1584682356
hemmmlock [info] You know, I never made the connection between my dizziness and anxiety before. I went to a nurse practitioner for dizziness a couple of years before I was diagnosed with anxiety but nothing came of it. This makes much more sense now .... [info] None [info] 1380077915
dammit_daniel [info] I can definitely relate to this OP. I am 23 I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ADD and have been on ritalin previously. I have just had a sleep study and hope something comes of it. [info] None [info] 1470868363
newguyheresure [info] Intestinal problems, can I do MRI instead colonoscopy? Hi.I have a problem of intestines bloating and cramps, mostly on right side.As more i am eating, dull ache feeling is like raising from lower right side abdomen, to under the rib abdomen up, feels dull, not any hard pain, but like a cramp pain, or a itchy ache in muscles.After eating, if I am laying, i can see bowel movement on right down abdomen, on place where little intestine meets big one i guess, yeah, there is something like worm moving after eating if I lay, I don't know if its normal condition, but I noticed it also, makes like a cramp move under skin, and than passes, than again new, and than passes etc. for few minutes.I visited internist, endoscopist last week, which asked me to do full blood test, ekg heart, and to come to him for ultrasound.As all test i mentioned were good, doctor asked me how often i have a stool, i said every second day, despite its unusually bigger, and more formed than before.Than he asked if i noticed blood in stool, i said no as i never did indeed.Its every second day.My doctor came to conclusion its some functional problem, as iritable colon, food intolerance etc.He told me we could do colonoscopy, but we ll just find functional problems.But, i am still worried, as for life my stool was not really formed like this time. I have feeling its more fat, its gathering much in intestines, and i am still in worry for some malign illness.Thats why i came here with question, with such stool every second day, good blood, clear ultrasound, do i have still reason to be worry that could be something dangerous?And, i am 30y old male, 187cm, 68kg.Can I do MRi scan instead a colonoscopy, can MRi screening find polyps, cancer or any other bigger intestinal/colon problems?     I just want to rule out serious ilness, because I am diagnosed with anxiety, I barely can remove my thoughts. [info] None [info] 1522100228
CityLights8 [info] I appreciate your suggestion; thank you.  I am diagnosed with anxiety disorders, panic attacks, and PTSD, so during some of the time that I have not worked or have had very part-time or low-responsibility types of work over the past several years, it might help if I explain to them that that's the reason why I was not working harder. [info] None [info] 1574990377
civilvillage1419 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder ( Obssesive Compulsive Disorder) [info] None [info] 1569385758
HarukaDxD [info] I got denied life insurance, what next? Im not sure if this is the right place to post this but ive seen similar things posted here. My fiance and I recently applied for life insurance since we just had our firstborn. The Insurance company denied me because i have been diagnosed with anxiety, which according to them make me mentally unstable and a suicide risk. I was diagnosed with anxiety when i was 13(currently 20, almost 21) and ive never been even close to suicide and there's no evidence to suggest I was or am. Im also on Medication for it and have only progressed out of my anxiety. As far as im aware all insurance company's have virtually the same requirements for life insurance so what do i do now? [info] None [info] 1552952095
cosmiicsloth [info] Scared to seek therapy My mental health has been deteriorating for the past few years. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and struggled with an eating disorder for some time quite a while ago and now I'm falling into self-destructive behaviours again, this time only it's very different and I'm not sure what's happening. I don't know how to explain because I keep feeling like it's all just me overreacting or simply being lazy, but I can barely get anything done in my daily life, my relationships are deteriorating and can't find the motivation to study or take care of my health anymore. It's really driving me on edge. Even the thought of seeking help makes me feel guilty because my problem seems so superficial, something I should be able to fix with just a bit of motivation. And then there's the fear of telling my parents. They went through hell when I was struggling before and I really don't want to worry them again, even though I'm an adult now and would be getting therapy of my own volition. I just don't know if I should, if I deserve - if this all is just me seeking validation or being unmotivated to take care of stuff like school and relationships, but I don't want to be like this and I'm growing desperate. [info] None [info] 1575733601
royalfae [info] Anxiety spikes horribly at night and I'm not sure how to handle it. I know this is going to be suggested but I can't afford to see a therapist or medication. I'm 20 and I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 18.So for some reason, at night my anxiety just gets horrible. It can start at 6pm or at 8pm, it can last until around midnight-2am. It's been like this for about a month or so, starting when my doorbell malfunctioned and I accidentally pulled an all-nighter because I thought someone was going to come in and kill me. It rings occasionally for no reason and I have to replace it still, but it doesn't scare me anymore. HOWEVER I still feel scared at night.I get lots of intrusive thoughts and my mind just thinks of horrible things. I can't fall asleep at a decent time, I just watch netflix until I'm too tired to focus. It's not EVERY night, but about 9/10 times I get this way. I lock my windows &amp; doors and I huddle under my blankets until the thoughts go away and my anxiety subsides enough for me to go to sleep.It's screwing up my sleep schedule and I'm not getting good rests or even sleeping much at all. I don't know what to do and it's frustrating. [info] GAD/Depression/ED [info] 1463681026
savorycinnamon [info] At what point should I admit defeat and quit my high pressure job? I got a great first job after getting my license, immediately becoming a director at a small healthcare facility. This was July 2019, and I've been trying to settle in to my new position ever since. I've had a few good weeks here and there, but I'm an anxious person, and I have lost a lot of sleep over small mistakes and demanding projects. We also changed CEO's, and the new one has made extreme changes I don't agree with and continues to do so without considering current staff. I was awake and panicking at 2 am yesterday and I've been awake since 1:45 am today because I'm stressing about a conversation with my boss from 2 days ago and a big event today. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and recently started with a new therapist. I've told her about my job, but we haven't gotten too far yet and I only see her every 2 weeks.I guess I'm just struggling to know how much I should push myself. It's been a long time coming, and I'm finally happy with where I am in my career. I have over $100,000 in student loans and a strong desire to buy a house, so I'm fairly pleased with my income and know I will not make as much elsewhere right now. But the stress is really overwhelming, partially due to my job and exacerbated by my anxiety.I'm fairly young and early in my career, and I could really use some perspective... and a vacation. Thank you for reading. [info] None [info] 1583484750
Unnamed-Visitor [info] "Fantastic. Back to square one." This was my response to finding out how many mental issues I haven't been diagnosed with but very potentially could have.I found out a few years ago that I have an interest in mental disorders, so I would read up on any I happen to find, and keep a close eye on ones that I find interesting. The problem lies in the fact that when reading the symptoms and effects that these disorders have, I've come to realize just how many of these symptoms and issues I've accepted as normal everyday occurrences. I used to think my social struggles and strange habits were just me being me, but now I'm pretty sure it's not just me. I have enough social difficulties and struggles that I could be put on the autism spectrum (though that says very little due to the massive ground covered by the spectrum) or even have Asperger's. Either way, it's terrifying for me, someone who's struggling to just find a job that I can comfortably work at, to think that there could be a dozen mental disorders I don't even know I have.And right now, I think that's what keeps dragging me into my depressive hole again; not knowing. If I knew what was wrong with me, maybe I'd be able to handle it better. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months back, and since then I've been working it into regression, despite not getting to see any therapist or psychologist about any treatment options. All that happened when I asked my parents about getting help was I went to see my doctor, I was diagnosed with anxiety, and told to seek help resources, then nothing else. Don't get me wrong, knowing helped me get a little boost, but after that I wasn't sure what to do. I'm not sure what it is, but I feel absolutely helpless without some sort of support from someone I consider a superior. I'm terrified of living alone because the times I've been away from those people, my anxiety flares up and I go into full panic mode. I'm otherwise unsure where to start on the gigantic puzzle of my brain.If I figure out what to do, I feel like it's not gonna be enough to fix all of this nonsensical bullshit with my brain, but I gotta try, at least so I can one day tell everyone that I tried. [info] None [info] 1574708556
Bestinfluence327 [info] I am not ready to lose my cat. I've had him for eight years. I already worry about him like crazy regardless of this incident. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and when I think he's sick when he isn't I know I look crazy. I found blood in the litter box cleaning it yesterday and made an appointment with the vet. Took my poor scared boy in where he had lots of pets and a good check up. I am thankful for my dad taking me but he kept interrupting me Everytime I tried to talk to the vet directly. I just hope what she gave me to give him daily will help. I am so nervous he's not long for this world. He's everything to me. My best friend and I couldn't even imagine losing him. I just hope this passes and he is healthy for a few more years. My mom's cat lived till she was 16 I just hope he can live a life that long. He's my first pet. Yes we had moonshadow most of my life but she hated me and she was more my mom's cat. George is mine and I just don't want to even think about him passing with me not having any ability to help him.. I'm just not ready to lose my best furry friend. I just hope he's really okay and I'm just to nervous for my own good. I didn't know where else to turn with this. I just hope he feels better and has many more years on this planet. [info] None [info] 1576702054
SjdMcG [info] Need advice about obsessive ruminating/anger Hi I was diagnosed with anxiety about 4 years ago. The medication I took made it worse and I went through a horrible psychosis and then depersonalization which I still suffer from now but it's about 1/10 of what it was. I actually can't believe I escaped the hell I went through. It took a tremendous amount of energy and I experimented with fitness/nutrition/meditation/job satisfaction. And quitting caffeine and booze.Anyway during the worse period of my psychosis and anxiety I developed some bad mental habits that have really taken so much from me and made life an excruciatingly fruitless experience. When I wake up in the morning I immediately start thinking about negative things. It could be a person I had an argument with years ago, a toxic family member. A bad relationship or sometimes it could be something I read in the news. An example would be lets say, if I see some injustice in the world and something triggers me like a word or an image or a news headline, I get extremely obsessive about it that I start having arguments in my head with people or I pretend that I am someone of importance lecturing somebody else. This can happen at anytime and all of a sudden I just realize that 10 minutes has passed and I have been pacing up and down my bedroom stuck in this loop. I'd feel intense outrage and trying to let it go is tough. I have to breath and tell myself to quit it. I have these episodes about 10 times a day sometimes more and it's always intense. It gets in the way of the things I want to do. I wake up early on my day off to go to the gym and I will hang around apartment getting angry and obsessing for about 2 hours before I leave. If I fight this I just sit there feeling empty. Sometimes even when I'm working out in the gym I can still be obsessing.Any chance I get I'll seek out conflict by turning on my computer and finding something to feed my outrage. Even when I don't do that it's still there. I can always hear some argument in my head. Even i'f i'm reading a book on philosophy i'll stop and start arguing with myself. I really don't know what to do. The only time In the last 4 years I've been free from this is when I stayed at a retreat in the woods for a few days. It took a while to settle and when I came back I felt completely relaxed.I know this can be cured and I know my behaviour needs to change but with the residual symptoms of anxiety I have it can be difficult to know how to stay in a straight line. I'm actually an active person. Full time job and lots of hobbies. Nice place to live. I do feel quite lonely though. If anybody here has some advice on some books or methods that could help me please share, I would be sincerely grateful. [info] None [info] 1469613269
smokeypanda [info] Seconded! I am diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder and was put on the usual drugs which ended up turning me into a zombie. I weened myself off and now smoke Indica strains daily due to the higher amounts of CBD and it's anxiolytic effects. I'm better than I have ever been and I have no need for those nasty pills. Now.. to get medicinal Cannabis legalized in Australia damnit! [info] None [info] 1284431281
Anxiousattny [info] Finally want to get help but fear the consequences For context, I was diagnosed with anxiety in graduate school and given some type of medication after I started having regular panic attacks. I hated it, hated my doctor, and didn't like the stigma so I stopped taking it and never went back. Somehow those records appear to have gotten lost, they are no longer part of my medical history.Now, years later, I am unemployed and struggling. At the end of my old job (which I had to leave when I moved) I was really struggling with anxiety and could not focus. Everything felt so hard, despite being the same work I had done for years, and tgen I constantly stressed about how slow I was. At first quitting was a big relief and I thought of it as a mental vacation. Now I've been unemployed for months, feel awful way more often, and have had increasingly more frequent panic attacks with no triggers - which is new to me, they used to always have an obvious trigger. I want to go to a doctor. But I'm afraid for two reason. While I do have insurance I am afraid that seeking therapy now could hurt my job search. There are issues of "fitness" with my profession and I've already had questions on applications about mental health for government applications. The ACLU is currently pursuing a lawsuit about discriminating against a candidate for anxiety but that could take years for courts to figure out. I initially thought I'd wait until I have a job but it's been a lot longer than I expected. So I'm not sure what to do, but I don't want to risk an opportunity. My second concern is more long term. If officially diagnosed with anxiety (again) will this be considered a preexisting condition? I live in the US and our health care system is kind of on the brink right now, it's not really clear what will happen in the long run. I don't want to risk paying thousands over my lifetime just because I'm having a bad period now, when I was able to manage it on my own for so many years. I'm not really sure what advice I'm looking for here. I guess my biggest question is whether it is worth the risks to seek treatment. Is there really a magic pill that can make me feel better without turning me into a zombie? [info] None [info] 1508337023
Alemoulia [info] My experience with SU "Keeping it together" and my psychological disorders tl:dr Steven Universe may affect you unconsciously So, I should probably start by saying two things1-	This is my first post, and it’s a very personal story, you can disagree with me, and I won’t mind and keep going the way I’m doing, because that’s how it works for me and me only maybe2-	I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders and agoraphobia, and also ‘m on treatment with both a psychiatrist and a psychologist, and I’m also on medications, but I watched SU from way before this whole thing startedIt all started when I convinced a friend to watch SU, you know how I felt probably through the struggle to make her get to the episode Mirror Gem, when things start to get actually serious, she loved the show luckily for me and the fact that I was a fan made her more exited to get on schedule I marked her episodes that I thought were pretty good (Like “On the Run”, “Alone Together”, “Lars and the cool kids”, etc.), and how Amethyst is my favorite gem.When we reached season two, I couldn’t help it but to tell her that “Keeping it together” always made me have nightmares, so I tried to avoid it, I always thought it was because of the shard fusions in there were more terrifying than on “Nightmare Hospital”, so, we watched the episode together and then again, I had nightmares. So, I decided to talk to my psychologist about it (luckily for me he had some knowledge about the show, so it made some things easier to explain), we reached to the conclusion that all those episodes touched the theme of identity in some form and since the source of my diagnosis is an inferiority complex and an identity crisis, it made sense for him that I found those episodes appealing and others that touched the topic in a way I didn’t feel entirely comfortable about, I didn’t find them that “attractive” (sorry, I’m short on adjectives today)We talked deeply about “Keeping it together”, I brought a clip of the part where the mutant fusion emerges, and I don’t regret it (What I mean, I found it easier to explain some media by bringing the media so that the doctor has a clean view of it too aside from my narration). Well, after talking a lot about it we discovered that I projected myself on the mutant gem, since I’m a man with “no identity” or “multiple identities depending on which social circle I am” (please don’t mistake it as multiple personalities, nor with the way you behave around your different circles), like if unconsciously (or preconsciously) I felt the pain of the gem trying to take form, to take identity, and when I described him the nightmares I had, I could hear the same scream of pain as the mutant gem when it is trying to take shape. We also talked about Amethyst, and “On the Run”, and again it went all revolving around my inferiority complex and identity crisis.At that point on the session I had to ask him if it was good for me to keep watching SU, so I was hoping for a doubtful yes, yet my Doctor said that of course I should keep doing it, and everything I enjoy as long as I keep within the treatment, then he said that maybe unconsciously SU was undermining the façade I had created of myself, helping me to get into the crisis (the anxiety and agoraphobia) but he said all of it in a good sense, so I could get a healthy psyche. [info] None [info] 1505768039
CoolJoey99 [info] I thought as much. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but I didn't connect this paranoia with that.Unfortunately, I have no one to talk to at the moment. My family doesn't believe in mental health and I'm home for the vacation so no therapist or doc anytime soon. [info] None [info] 1559406374
bakedgoodslover [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and agoraphobia years ago. I'm doing much better now but still have some places I avoid going. The worst one was restaurant, I didn't eat outside for almost three years, the few times I tried I left the place before I finished my food, sometimes right after giving the order. Thankfully I overcame it, now the worst one is traffic on a busy day. Just last week I almost threw up in a taxi and got dizzy when we got stuck in traffic on a highroad. [info] None [info] 1450189889
FizBii [info] I have no real good advice but just letting you know I’m in the same sort of situation. I tried quitting last year and went through a tough month trying to push through and then had some bad things happen and straight back to smoking. Right now I’m on 9 days quit and had a couple of the hardest days Ive had in a while. Before I started smoking at 14 (I’m now 21), I was diagnosed with anxiety that came with depressive episodes and being the lost kid that I was I took up smoking to fit in and then became dependant on the smokes to ‘treat’ the anxiety. When I quit last year my mental health just went down hill almost instantly (I was also going through a stressful time of not knowing what career I wanted to pursue which is something anxiety didn’t help with) and my psychiatrist told me previously smoking was only masking the problem. I’m now going through the same head f*ck again and my psychiatrist has actually suggested going back to smoking and quitting at a ‘less stressful and eventful’ time in my life not realising that I also have asthma (I know I’m an idiot) and I only recently quit because it’s almost put me 6 foot under. Sorry for no good advice but it helps me a bit hearing other people’s stories so I hope this helps you out too and just know I can totally emphasise with you and you’re not alone. Keep pushing, I’m sure in the end it will be worth it and I have heard that ex-smokers are a lot less stressed than when they were smoking. [info] None [info] 1521375858
mahimahi86 [info] How I am beating anxiety daily Hi everyone, I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and have had few panic attacks, mind racing, feeling like my heart will explode, terrified of flying, diseases, get nervous alot etc typical symptoms. I realized this at a point that I felt I could still change the course. I have few things that I do now every day and I am getting better every day.1. Try to be a better version of the yesterday you. This is actually really easy, doesn't feel too overwhelming and gives your mind a goal to focus on instead of dwelling in the negative feelings. This technique is suggested by Jordan Peterson and I suggest to listening his other thoughts about self-improvement also.2. Cut off activities that increase anxiety (gambling, video games, etc) and increase activities that decrease anxiety (reading, meditating, stretching, deep-breathing). When reading, start from easy books that dont feel overwhelming to finish. In the beginning your mind will be racing like hell but as you start to focus on the book, at least for me the anxiety started to go away.3. Eat healthy, exrecise and make sure you prepare yourself for a good night sleep. 1-2 hours before going to bed, stop using aby gadgets.4. Stop googling different diseases, scary scenarios etc. This is not something you cannot stop doing. You can stop it. Whenever you have this urge, breathe deep in your nose and hold the breath for awhile and then let it out, repeat this as many timea as you have to.5. You will need to develop alot of discipline because anxiety loves it when you lose your control, it's just waiting for that moment. Make it your enemy that you are going to beat by taking control of your life.I will never let anxiety control my life anymore, I am not taking any medication and I am getting better everyday. I know that  some of you are in very deep waters with this but hopefully someone found some help from this. [info] None [info] 1531775753
jamison1325 [info] Hands down good, consistent supervision with your supervisor.Being able to keep work at work and not bring it home with you.Boundaries with work and personal life.Therapy! It’s great to vent to someone who isn’t part of your family and friends circle.Taking time away/off from work.Not to take away from your post, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I don’t take medication, but I’m able to manage my anxiety from going into overload especially in this field of work. I actually switched jobs over the summer because my anxiety at my old organization was spinning out of control without a present supervisor, stagnant conditions, low morale, and stress everywhere. Without consistent supervision and a supportive supervisor/director, I started to question my decision to become a social worker. Since my switch, I feel completely supported with weekly supervision and a wonderful supervisor! [info] LGSW, Treatment Foster Care [info] 1543193043
Throw_Up_Away [info] Good question. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder, for which I am medicated, and various therapists have referred to this as a phobia. I suppose I am not officially, medically documented as "Emetophobic", but honestly, if I wanted that diagnosis, I am positive I could get it. It is an irrational fear that effects my daily life and is painfully hard to control, and this accurately matches the definition of a phobia. [info] None [info] 1323368172
CatNamedJava [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I can't stand people touching me. Do I get a free seat too? If a fat person sat next to me and thier body cross over to my seat I'll probably have a panic attack. Could I have a fat peoson kicked off the flight for my comfort?  [info] None [info] 1402901319
kwg88ss [info] Ha.  Deja Vu...I graduated college at 26.  Went right out of high-school and was booted for coming up with a .5 GPA after my freshman year. No need to adjust the resolution, I really said .511 years later?  top 3% of income, about to complete my masters from a top 40 university and yeah, I was diagnosed with anxiety, ADHD, learning disabilities, and the like.  I remember quite clearly my guidance counselor telling both my mother &amp; I that I would become nothing and go nowhere.  I've already mailed one college diploma her way, hope she's ready for dessert.I have an undergrad in psychology.  I do absolutely nothing at all with anything related to the field and there's no reason why you need to do anything with information security if you don't want to.  Right now you need small victories.  Graduate, get a job doing something and figure out quickly what it is you WANT to do.  When you figure out what it is you want from life, start getting credentials in whatever that field is.  Don't become a nurse because you heard it was easy, become a nurse because it's your passion.  If it isn't, look for something else.Most importantly.  Don't be a victim.  Everyone has their story but at the end of the day nobody gives a shit if you've had a tough life, got diagnosed with this or that or blablabla.  Wake up, punch life in the mouth.People's only roadblocks in life are themselves and they're the only ones that can break through.Get to work. [info] None [info] 1515373044
hurricane-jordy [info] Feeling very out of it, weak, tired, dizzy, sensitive, and nauseous Okay I am a 15 year old 5”4 female, white, about 107 pounds. Now recently for the past few days I’ve been feeling dizzy and out of it like nothing’s to important and everything is just kind of blank if that makes sense, like I feel like very neutral emotion wise, and it’s terrible, however whenever any one talks to me i get extremely mad to the point of wanting to cry and it’s with every little thing. I guess easily annoyed?? But for no reason like just someone asking me to do something. I’ve recently started back at school and I go most days but some days getting out of bed is too hard physically. I should probably add that I do take Vyvanse  (I think that’s how it’s spelt) everyday for ADD which decreases my appetite all together and does make my personality flat, however not like this, and even when I do not take them which is weekends I feel pretty much the same just without vyvanse feelings. so I eat some days in the morning but then won’t eat till around 8-10 at night, but I’ve never noticed any symptoms like this before and I’ve been on them for a over a year. The thing that scared me was in class we had to move desks and replace them with new ones, and I was lifting it with someone else (not very heavy) but it made my arms extremely weak and sore and I was shaking bc my arms were actually that exhausted, they still hurt today, and I only moved 1 desk. Also standing up or walking is physically tiring like I get light headed when standing up. My sleep is okay but some Times I get very little like 2 hours, but the average is 5-6. And Ive also been living off buttered toast because the thought of eating anything else makes me sick to my stomach. Also I’ve been getting cramps a lot in the mornings, but it’s not period cramps I know that, and I also know for a fact I’m not pregnant. I’ve been feeling extremely dizzy almost like im on some kind of downer like weed. My ears ring quite frequently and I also get ear aches A LOT, and I’ve been running a fever, and my eyes are always heavy and vision is almost foggy I guess?? Concentrating is a hard thing, but I’ve always been like that, just not at every single moment like it is now, and the vyvanse doesn’t even seem to be working like AT ALL anymore it used to give me like mad energy, life isn’t necessarily bad right now it’s pretty okay so It’s not like I’m sad all the time? I’ve also noticed my eyes have sunken in very far like you can my cheek bones and that’s not normal for me. I don’t know I’m kind of scared, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I know there are similar symptoms but this is not a normal thing for me. I’m just worried there’s something wrong, I’m afraid I am dying which doesn’t help the anxiety. I just do not feel like myself. I’m sorry if this seems overdramatized, and if it doesn’t make a lot of sense. I just need advice. [info] None [info] 1537917045
ScaryLikeTerry [info] How do I reclaim my memory from anxiety? So I went to an on-campus therapist and I was diagnosed with anxiety. I mentioned my failing memory and she said a lot of people with anxiety tend to have bad memory because of stress and overthinking.  I’m no longer seeing that therapist, but I need some advice. Is there anyway to fix my memory? It’s really bad and I have to write down nearly everything to remember it. [info] None [info] 1569263274
Hotde [info] I recognise some aspergers in there. When you have true anxiety it's racing thoughts in your head that lead to some kind of panic attack. You describe the anxious feelings as more of a meltdown approach. Eye contact, pre-meltdown symptoms at crowds, no empathy, all sounds familiar!See, I had this whole like year of my life where I was convinced I was having anxiety and panic attacks and the mental health professionals agreed with me and diagnosed me that way while somehow ignoring all the aspergers I was describing... until I was seeking an ADHD diagnosis and the psychiatrist noticed aspergers. They can seem so similar. My "panic attacks" were actually meltdowns.No one here can diagnose you, only a doctor/psych/specialist who considers you their patient can make this kind of diagnosis. If you feel that your mental health problems are causing an impact on your life, it's time to see a doctor. If you do, make sure to describe your experiences exactly as YOU experience them, not as how you read them to be online. I think this may be why I was diagnosed with anxiety for so long, I made that mistake.I get sarcasm just fine too. I do remember having it explained to me and it took a while for me to get but then it became part of my normal vocabulary and I ended up using it a lot through my whole life so it's second nature. It's a spectrum disorder so you get a mixed bag of symptoms. Some not all! [info] None [info] 1485563434
CPledger [info] I have this problem a lot. Convinced myself for a decade that it was just expedient to be faster before all the symptoms piled up and I was diagnosed with anxiety. Funny how we can convince ourselves to gloss over things and justify them as normal. Odd thing is walking slow now makes me anxious. [info] None [info] 1515303530
steveosbacktat [info] The idea of going to bed is filling me with anxiety and dread. I came down with a stomach bug on Monday and was unable to sleep properly for at least three days.  I might have slept eight hours in 72.  I was so nervous from being sick that I literally could not sleep, and I know that didn't help me out at all.  After I went to the doctor, got a diagnosis and some medicine, it helped settle me down a lot and I was even able to sleep.  I made up around 24 hours that I'd missed.I was diagnosed with anxiety and persistent depressive disorder in 2013 .  I've not been diagnosed with anything else, mental or physical.  I take 40mg of Celexa and normally it helps keep everything under control.  Sometimes I take Omeprazole for acid reflux.But right now, even though I've been keeping stuff down and able to take my Celexa, I can feel an overwhelming tingle in my hands and feet and they start feeling cold (my peculiar signal that anxiety's coming).  I'm scared to go to sleep because I know I'm gonna wake up feeling like shit again.  I hate throwing up to a nearly phobic degree.I feel as if this has been going on for much longer than just when I caught this bug, though.  But I know if I don't sleep, I'll just feel like crap for a lot longer than what's necessary.  I know if I go to bed being nervous about sleeping, I'll wake up and within minutes that tingling feeling overcomes me and it starts all over again.  But I say that I think this has been going on longer than I might think because I started having weird feelings about sleep a couple weeks ago before I got sick.My mom died in her sleep in 2014.  I guess maybe the trauma of that is finally starting to catch up with me.  But I don't know.  I wish I did, but I don't.I've never been so nervous to go to bed in my entire life.  I just wish I could get over it because sleep is important.  I want to be able to come to the decision to go to bed comfortably, not force myself to stay awake until I'm about to pass out and just don't care.  Please help me come to some kind of conclusion.  I want to be able to overcome this. :(  I'm sorry if this post is just one big jumbled mess. [info] None [info] 1457188232
i-want-to-bloom [info] scared to drive so I am 17. I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was 15. I lived with my grandparents since I was 7 then an altercation happened and i now live with my dad. my grandparents had been planning on getting me into drivers ed at the same time as my brother (twins) but I was busy at the time and now, living with my dad, we dont have the funds. I've realized now I used being busy as an excuse since I am incredibly scared of driving and car accidents and not having money for a car or insurance for that car etc etc. I keep telling people I'm just going to study and wait until I'm 18 to get a license but I dont know if I'm actually going to or want to do that. anyway, the point of this would be to I guess ask what things I could do to maybe get over this fear or help quell the anxieties I get even thinking about me driving. it's a big issue in my life since I am a relatively busy person but trying to find someone to drive me places when I need to is tiring for me and I feel like I'm bothering anyone I ask so yeah. I would really like some advice and/or tips :). [info] None [info] 1556759692
PhasmaUrbomach [info] Same. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and I'm almost 50. I only have two streaks of grey at the temples. At this rate, I will still have dark hair by 60. My dad also had dark hair until he was quite old. So I think it's a lot to do with genetics. If stress were the primary factor, I'm sure I'd have a head of greys. [info] None [info] 1564803004
unknowncm [info] Thanks for the reply, a long time ago I was diagnosed with anxiety but since then I’ve learned how to cope with it and I wouldn’t say I’m an anxious person In fact I’m confident most of the time. Thanks for the advice and reply I will try what you’ve said. [info] None [info] 1573597294
rootgrog [info] Hey, about a year ago I had the EXACT symptoms you are describing. I had no history of anxiety at the time so had no idea what was going on. I went to all kinds of doctors before I was diagnosed with anxiety. It was extremely scary as I didn't know what was wrong. This fed into my worries and made the dizziness and tingly hands worse. Once I realized that the symptoms were simply anxiety, I was able to control them. It took quite a while for it to stop though (probably six months on low levels of medication). What helped me most though was the peace of mind from knowing that there was nothing physically wrong with me. A year later and it doesn't happen at all anymore. Get your doctors to confirm, but if you're struggling with the same thing that I was, it's certainly a treatable problem. Feel better soon. :) [info] None [info] 1377381263
alb92xoxo [info] Who are you because of Nexplanon’s side effects? For anyone who’s been on Nexplanon for years: How do you know who you really are, if you’ve been on birth control for so long?Think about it. Imagine the day you take out the implant, for whatever reason, how would your life be different? Would you be the same person?I’ve been on implanon/nexplanon for 6 Years. After getting it, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder/ panic attacks, major depressive disorder and on the verge of cyclothimia. Sure, I’ve lost 65 pounds (yey?) but I’m also on my period every day of my life (maybe a 3 months out of the year I’m in the clear?) my hair thinned out and lost so much volume. All from the Nexplanon side effects. So I think to myself. Shit. Imagine a life without anxiety! Imagine a life with a regular period! But what if I gain back all my weight? What if...But who I’ve been for these past few years is “the girl with anxiety and depressive disorders” how do I know who I could’ve been or what things I would have done differently if I didn’t have anxiety . [info] None [info] 1519794741
thelostandthefound [info] Probably my smile. I still smile but my mum tells me that I used to have a beautiful smile as a kid but when I turned 12 it disappeared. It was also around the time I was diagnosed with anxiety and that year the endless school yard bullying caught up to me.  [info] None [info] 1502150258
massdystopia [info] IAMA 24 year old male with anxiety and panic disorder. Hi there,I know this is a very common thing around the globe... we all have our own stories and perhaps there is something to learn from others who are in my boat....I am diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder, i take medication (citalopram 40mg's - just upped today) and I truly feel that my life is ruined because of my anxiety.Some  background: I was always an overly anxious person, from childhood to present... but it wasn't until grade 7 that I truly began to experience the nausea/vomiting/shaking/dizzy/heart palpitations etc symptoms that are associated with anxiety. I am in a situation where I cannot complete schooling because of my anxiety and i cant work and make money because of my anxiety.I'm not agoraphobic (fear of leaving my home) - in fact if you saw me on the streets you cannot tell I suffer from anything - however internally i'm looking for the nearest escape route so that no one sees me for who i truly am.I have tried seeing a therapist, etc.. but I did not find them useful and i must have spend &gt; 2000 dollars on sessions that I have literally gained nothing from.I recently upped my dose due to a bad experience which rendered me literally useless, convulsing in my bed wanting to slowly drift away and die.SHOCKINGLY, i do not consider myself to be depressed, nor does my doctor... because im in high spirits most of the time, but I feel that  I have no purpose in life as a result of my issues.Ask me anything. [info] None [info] 1310185265
doom2286 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and adhd at 8 I am now 19 and no med for 8 years can I join the military? [info] None [info] 1492896629
EvilAbed1 [info] How could an infection in my jaw bone be affecting my overall health? Hey, I'm 25 years old and male. 5 years ago a dentist told me I had an tooth abscess. I was broke and it didn't hurt so I did nothing. I went back today and will have the abscess treated in 2 weeks. They said it spread into my jaw bone. My question is how could this abscess have affected my overall health. I feel that you guys might be able to answer that better then the dentists reddit page. Over the last 2 years I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and chronic fatigue syndrome. Which I thought was stress related and it happened around the time I went sober. I read on the Internet that these infections can make people feel uneasy. I have also had super terrible sinus infections especially this year. The doctor today said that treating the abscess will help that clear up. Through out the day I have energy then I quickly become exhausted and then I'll get a burst of energy. Is that something that could be caused by a 5+ year old infection?Thank you [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1429134423
Honey_Letumknow [info] Am I being irrational about visitation after birth? My husband and I seem to have conflicting viewpoints about when people can come see us after the birth of our son this June. He has made it clear that he thinks I’m being irrational. My hope is to post here and get your input as third party folks who can be honest with me about my rationality. I am a first time mom who is scared of giving birth. I have a lot of complicated feelings about my body, my personal safety, and vulnerability due to two different traumatic events that both, unfortunately, occurred in the spring of different years.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD, but I have made huge growth before becoming pregnant. I no longer take medication, but I do still see a therapist regularly. Because of this complicated set of issues, I have expressed to my husband in the past that I have serious reservations about anyone besides him (and medical staff) being present at the birth of our child.  He seems to be okay with that. I have also mentioned that I feel very protective and anxious about the time immediately following giving birth. I want us three to be able to bond as a family before a parade of visitors comes to see us. The idea of a bunch of people coming to see us right at this huge life transition makes me feel very overwhelmed. I just want us to settle in a bit, think about what our boundaries are, and have a little time to establish our own ways of doing things before people come and give their opinions, asked for or not. This came up a few weeks ago because my mother (who lives in Ohio) told me she had already taken some time off of work and was asking if it would be okay to come down to visit us in North Carolina after our child is born. Reluctantly I agreed to my mom coming to visit, but said nothing to her about coming to the hospital. I also told my husband that I was considering not telling my mom right away when I am in labor so I don’t have any unexpected visitors while I’m still trying to push out this child. He told me that he thought it was silly to withhold information from my mother about going into labor, but I let it go. Today my husband told me that he told his dad that he could come visit us at the hospital when the baby was born. I was disappointed because he didn’t talk to me first before making this promise, and because I don’t know that I want visitors the day that the baby is born. I’ve never given birth before, I don’t know how I’m going to feel when it’s over, and I don’t know that I’m really interested in seeing anyone right after I perform this super challenging task that scares the willies out of me.  My husband seemed frustrated by my response, so I tried to explain to him how I felt while still explicitly stating that I’m not “putting my foot down” about this because I want him to look forward to the birth of our baby too. His general response was that we can’t control who drives from Ohio, Pennsylvania, or Florida to the hospital and sits in the waiting room. Neither does he think that we have the right to say to our parents that they can’t visit us and see their first grandchild.I responded by saying that I’m not trying to prevent anyone from see our child, but that having even 24 hours after giving birth before we see any visitors feels like a huge relief to me as compared to seeing people that same day. I don’t feel like it’s outside of my rights to say “No, we’re not having visitors.” I, of course, would tell people my plan for no visitors on any particular dates ahead of time and ask them to call before planning a trip.  He feels like people shouldn’t be turned away because they all live multiple states away and would be taking time off of work to come see our baby. He also thinks it might be better to have people come to the hospital where their time with us is more limited when compared with visiting us at home where they might feel free to stay as long as they want. I guess this could all be summed up in atl;dr I don’t want any hospital visitors at all for 24 hours after giving birth. I also want to reserve the right to say that I’m not up to having visitors at any point after that also. My husband thinks people should be allowed to come see us whenever they have the time and means to do so, as they all live multiple states away and are very excited about this baby. [info]  [info] 1520622033
Endless_Daydreaming [info] I have terrible anxiety about school. I was diagnosed with anxiety officially this year, over the summer, but I've struggled with it my entire life.For example, in fourth grade, I was asked to do a math problem on the spot and, I knew the answer, but my mind went totally blank and I had an anxiety attack.In middle school, (my district has only 7th and 8th grade in the middle school), I was having panic attacks very frequently. I was always tired, I didn't wanna get out of bed, I dreaded doing so much work, I hated being around people all the time. There were, and still are, so many expectations for kids/teenagers, and my anxiety, and the way the education system seems to work, if you're not perfect, then you're failing.So, this year, (I'm 14, I just started my freshman year), it's only been the first two weeks of school. They're already talking about finals, we're already doing pre-assessments, there's tons of work, I constantly feel crowded.It's gotten to a point, where I've had three panic attacks last week, even though I was on the medication I started about a week before school started.I would literally collapse on the kitchen floor and hyperventilate until my mom told me I could stay home. I would only calm down after that.I don't know what to do. I'm constantly panicking about school, when I don't really need to be. I know it's not smart to be thinking about so many expectations and things at once, but they expect us to know all these things, and it's overwhelming.The only thing that gets me through it is my dogs. They cuddle up to me, and they've been constantly helpful when I get overly anxious about things like this, but it doesn't help when I actually go to school because obviously I can't just bring my dogs to school.I don't know what to do, my mom wants to see if she can get me into night school and see if that would help, but they typically only do it if you're behind in credits. Other than that, I've got nothing. It's getting to a point where I don't even want to get out of bed, I don't wanna shower, wash my face, eat, or even live at this point. I get migraines because of my anxiety.It has a huge impact on me and it's hurting me constantly.Does anyone have any suggestions or advice? Tips to manage stress? I'm truly lost. [info] None [info] 1566866357
saikoyuno [info] I can't stand who I am anymore Thank you for reading as this is rather long.I was diagnosed with anxiety almost two years ago although I've suffered from it for as long as I can remember. I suffer from panic disorder as well as generalized anxiety disorder and obsessive thinking. My anxiety has greatly influenced my latest relationship as I find myself always worrying about the well being of my now ex boyfriend.I fell in love deeply with this guy and for some time it seemed like he did too, until he got into a car accident and had to be hospitalized for about a week. I wasn't allowed to see him and his parents kicked me out of the hospital. My anxiety soared to all new highs after this incident. I was always worried whenever he was on the road compulsively checking the time and for any texts he might have sent. I saw my therapist about this and she helped me worked through it. Although my anxiety regarding this subject has greatly reduced, I find myself hating who my anxiety turns me into.My ex boyfriend (we are still on speaking terms, there has been no closure) doesn't really understand anxiety, he thinks it is something i do not work had enough to get rid of. I constantly think I am crazy. I constantly think I am in the wrong for everything. I feel like a clingy b*tch because I constantly want to talk to him. I second guess myself every time I text him. I am constantly reluctant about what to say.I hate who my anxiety makes me. I hate the fact that I have to live with this disgusting version of myself for the rest of my life. No matter how hard I try and no matter how much better I get there's always that anxious part of me that will manage to ruin EVERYTHING.I don't know how to live with myself when I can't even stand myself. I can't accept who I am anymore. I can't accept my anxiety anymore. I can't accept not being normal not being able to stay away from my phone longing for attention and love a man doesn't even want to give me. I can't stand the part of me that has to overthink every goddamn thing that happens throughout the day.I HATE MYSELF. I am in therapy. What else can I do to be more accepting of who I am? [info] None [info] 1448043687
Ctcountrygurl [info] Going back to A Downward Spiral- Abandonment issues and new relationship Hi All, I've been a lurker on here, reading about so many experiences that are similar to mine. I've been diagnosed with anxiety ever since I was 9... Started with sleep anxiety and has developed to general anxiety through the years. I'm on 3 different medications just to be "normal" and go to a therapist on a weekly basis. Late last year I had the worst time of my life. I was having anxiety attacks every day and barely felt like I had any control over my life. I live by myself, but my sister is 30 minutes away. With changing my meds and then going to weekly therapy, I have improved greatly to the point where I'm starting to feel like I can enjoy life. Which leads to now... I decided to start dating and met someone through a credible (not Tinder) online dating service. Things really hit off and admittedly went a little fast. We've been together almost every day, enjoy each others company and really have been riding that "honeymoon" period of the relationship. Then drama struck...A couple of days ago, I stopped hearing from my boyfriend. I tried calling but all calls went to voicemail. Texting didn't get any response either. Eventually I heard from him and he said he had deeply troubling news the day before and didn't want to talk to anyone. This is an issue that he's mentioned before (what the troubling news was concerning) so I took it as him going through something extremely personal. But the sudden cut in contact has sent me back to extremely anxiety, awakening my abandonment anxiety fiercely. I'm trying to give him space but I feel like I'm dying inside. I keep resorting to the belief that this is something permanent and that he's leaving me just like those before him. I haven't heard from him for 3 days and I'm going back and forth as to view this as the end of the relationship or me over-reacting... Any helpful insight/ reassurance is much appreciated.TL:DR- Boyfriend is having family drama and has cut all contact. Abandonment anxiety is in full force and not sure if it is rational or not. [info] None [info] 1492654205
Williampram23 [info] Push through and feel normal once more I’m mostly talking to drinkers and smokers here. It’s been almost a month since my last smoke and half a year since my last drink and I feel absolutely amazing. The driving for me to quit alcohol was my performance in university had gone down significantly and as a result I failed and had to start all over again, not only that I felt my body getting weaker and weaker and my skin looking disgusting every morning. As for cigarettes, I could easily smoke a pack a day. Cigarette was a huge part of my life, so much so that I started bumming them off people, picking them up from the ground, and rolling up old tobacco from cigarette butts, it was embarrassing. Every night when I sleep I had to sit up straight to breathe properly and it got so bad that my entire body would go numb and tingly.I was the extreme example of addiction I guess you could say, I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD which made the quit even harder, but I made it in the end. It was shocking how amazing I felt even after a couple days. It was like I was living a new, healthier life. This wasn’t because of Jesus, muhammad, moses, buddha or vishnu, it was my own decision to quit and my own dedication to the quit which made it happen.How did I do it? Avoid smokers, meditate, exercise, jacking off, having sex, playing games, focusing on your hobbies. These are the things which got me through this.Good luck everyone. [info] None [info] 1557710524
alexaclmn [info] Im pretty bad at keeping and landing jobs... Do anyone have any tips for me landing a job? I'm 20 years old and i believe I've already messed up my work history a tad bit. I'll like to say that I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and so certain things are harder for me. I had two jobs in 2014 and 2017, both jobs were at the same place. Both jobs were very short term- One job lasted two months, the other lasted 3 weeks. I was forced to resigned due to an altercation for my first job and my 2nd job I decided to quit. Now I don't know know what else can I do to further my chances of landing a job... I'm sure if my job was somewhere other than a call center, I have a higher chance of staying there. What should I do reddit? [info] None [info] 1499782012
TheDrunkPrincess [info] The "this isn't right" feeling. Am I alone? I'm diagnosed with anxiety but my anxiety ranges a lot of issues I don't think others deal with. I obsessively shower (anywhere from 2-8 times a day) cause I feel dirty. I am a tragically picky eater and have many times looked at food and if my my tells me "this isn't right, something bad is gonna happen if I eat it" and the feeling doesn't go away even if I'm starving. If interaction with others goes on for a bit too long I get very irritated and feel panicked until I can be comfortably alone.I can't explain why it's so intense or why I quickly feel uncomfortable to the point of digging my nails into my arm or ripping out bits of hair. It's so illogical and I have no clue how to deal. I've never met anyone who has felt the same kind of unease and stress as I have.Am I alone in this experience? Am I crazy? Could it be more than just genera anxiety?I appreciate any feedback. [info] None [info] 1522564260
Dropman0541 [info] I'm [19 M] concerned about a possible turn in my relationship with SO [20 M] Posting this on a new account. Apologies if I'm not familiar with etiquette on this sub.I've been in a relationship with my SO for about a year or so, but things got really weird around this July. Everything was going completely fine until we were at a friends house, who mentioned offhand a previous boyfriend I had about 2 years ago (there was no overlap between relationships).Ever since then, my SO has been making me very uncomfortable occasionally with some of the things he asks and does. To mention a few, he constantly asks about my old boyfriend and what he's doing even though I don't keep any tabs on him whatsoever. This escalated to him taking my phone without my knowledge to check if I had any recent conversations with him.I've also noticed that he's apparently been asking my friends if I'm meeting other people he doesn't know about. A good friend of mine let me know this is happening, but every time I try to bring this up to my SO, he calls me a liar or says I'm being "hysterical".There's been other things too, like finding that my PC has been clearly messed with (pages open that I didn't ever go to, file explorer randomly opened, Outlook check times are times when I'm not in the house). The one I'm very concerned about was when a cousin of mine who knows him from HS mentioning that he saw him at the mall at the exact same time I was there, so I thought maybe we went to the same place at the same time without knowing. When I brought this up to my SO he got extremely angry and started saying that I was trying to "say something".I really need advice on this. I don't really know what's going on, and I feel like I'm just seeing problems where there's nothing and that I'm being overly worried about the state of my relationship. I was diagnosed with anxiety recently, so I'm not sure if that's related.**tl;dr**: Think SO has been acting strange since learning of past relationship, but also concerned that I might be seeing problem where none exists due to anxiety, or just being hysterical. [info] None [info] 1506029080
Rynyl [info] I just submitted my thesis to my committee For the past 2 years, I've been driven to the ground because of this thesis. During this time period, I was diagnosed with anxiety, put on meds, and have been seeing a counselor. I just submitted it today. I'm looking forward to a peaceful weekend. [info] GAD [info] 1469248983
HorrorSorbet [info] I was afraid I would swallow my tongue. That was my biggest fear. I had so many fears at a kid, but that was my biggest. Years later I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.  [info] None [info] 1550173235
floodimoo123 [info] I developed early and when I was 12, I had 18-20 year old guys screaming and yelling at me every time I was out. It wasn't funny then and it's even less funny now. I've been diagnosed with anxiety since then with loud and/or sudden noises as my trigger. Rude guys acting like animals isn't funny, has never been funny, and will never be funny. I feel you, OP. These people need to learn how to act like decent human beings. [info] None [info] 1405976252
pesh527 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety. So I'm not using the term loosely... I'm using it to describe what actually happened to me. Where did you get the idea that I don't actually have anxiety?Also, it's my employer's responsibility to protect me from sexual harassment. I shouldn't have to do something I'm uncomfortable with, and I don't have the authority to ban this customer from the store. [info] None [info] 1459569596
Raiz3r74 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past and take a beta blocker for that and a mitral valve prolapse that I have. I don't smoke or drink. But I'm over weight. Eat like shit and dont exercise. And I'm 44 yrs old. Sigh... 6ft 245lbs. Like to get down to 180.  [info] None [info] 1548381063
layer11 [info] How old are you and what country do you reside in?I'd press it.  I was diagnosed with anxiety and given some stuff and my quality of life has increased dramatically. [info] None [info] 1534294395
mechanon05 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was in middle school.  It's a struggle but you'll get better and better at dealing with it.  I highly recommend reading Growth Mindset by Carol Dweck.  It really reduced my anxiety levels in a host of different situations.  Good luck, man.  [info] None [info] 1403221251
flyawayfromzayn [info] Am I okay? Is it bad that I will feel like actual physical pain before doing something, such as going to work? Like I have been laying in bed all day and i have been slowly getting ready to go to work and I know I should like go and eat food soon but I don't want to. I was just telling myself "okay in 5 minutes I'm gonna go make food and then smoke a cigarette." And then my stomach turned and my chest hurts and I want to cry. I have been diagnosed with anxiety (i went off my meds bc they made me super dizzy, and now I can't afford to get something else) , and this has been happening forever, but it usually isn't over things that I actually want to do. I have also realized that I may also have adhd. Does anyone else go through anything like this? Has it ever been called anything? [info] None [info] 1562357677
bbem1993 [info] I feel understood I came across information on ROCD through obsessive googling. Probably the one good thing that has come out of doing it. I finally feel like the thoughts and feelings I was having about my relationship are understood. I was in a relationship for about 6 months and everything was going great. But I couldn’t shake this feeling that my feelings for him weren’t strong enough. It overcame me, I couldn’t sleep, I would google for hours, trying to find something to give me an answer one way or another. Every article was saying that if you aren’t head over heels in love, it’s time to end it. That “when you know, you know”. I would read until I would break down crying because I didn’t want to break up but felt I had no choice. I finally couldn’t take it any more and broke things off, and I was miserable. We agreed to talk a week later and I opened up about my all my insecurities and we agreed to take things slow from there but start dating again. I haven’t been able to get rid of the thoughts, but I am beginning feel that they are a product of my mental health and not my relationship. I was diagnosed with anxiety and have been on Zoloft for about 5 years. I have always suffered from obsessive thoughts but never much about a romantic relationship before. I will continue to wonder if it really is ROCD or just the wrong person. But I found a therapist recently that I liked, and I hope that by working through it, I can gain some clarity on that. I just wanted to say that I never felt like I clicked more than with what people are saying on this sub. [info] None [info] 1581905433
PMmeyournewts [info] My last few weeks... [TW] Well, at the start of the summer, I got a job working as a counsellor at a summer camp around a 3h drive from my house. It started off ok, until I started having panic attacks while working and I would put way too much pressure on myself to do things the right way, so every time I felt like I did anything wrong it would happen. At the end of the first week working, I had the worst episode yet, and tried to hang myself in the bathroom. Obviously, it didn't work, and I woke up on the floor. After spending an hour trying to collect myself I worked up the courage to talk to my supervisor, who then took me to the emergency room. This was 2 weeks ago, and I only just got out of the hospital now. I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on antidepressants. I just wanted to vent I guess, and make sure that anyone reading this realizes that suicide is NOT a good idea, and hopefully you don't have to learn that the hard way, like I did. [info] 16/M/Canada [info] 1437665512
SinLives [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder and agoraphobia but I gotta say I agree with you 100%. I can't take any anxiety medication like benzos cause I am on other meds they would interact with. So I don't have a fast acting pill I can pop to just make everything OK. There are plenty of breathing exercises and pre planning things you can do. If I'm nervous about something I have to NOT overthink it. That is the basis for a lot of people's problems. I just make up my mind if something has to be done then I'm gonna do it. I'm not gonna let a diagnosis hold me back or make me prisoner in my own home. And as far as the lady pushing cop she should be charged with assault. There are laws in place for a reason. Do you excuse people for rape because their feelings made them do it? I'm sure people won't like my opinion but people with anxiety need to actively take steps to work thru it. Medications can help, therapy can help, but ultimately it comes down to that person working on it not hiding behind it. I understand it's different for everyone but it can't be used as an excuse for everything.  [info] None [info] 1547059068
highestbird [info] Double vision occurs after pushups, during sex, morning Age: 30Sex: MHeight:  5'10''Weight:  148lbsRace: WhiteDuration:  1 yearMy health:  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks.  I used anti-anxiety medicine in the past but haven't for the past 5 years.  I remember 7 years ago I had weird blurry vision problems that wouldn't go away.  The blurry vision went away on its own.  I also had weird "circulation" issues in my legs, arms but apparently not a vascular problem.  It went away too 7 years ago.  I do sometimes feel chest pain which has been an on-going thing since I was 13.  I went to the ER a few times 5 years ago because of the chest pain, they did some tests, all normal.Symptoms: Double visionStory:I started drinking coffee regularly last year. Maybe about 2-3 cups a day for a month last Oct.  Mind you, I never was a coffee drinker before this.  After one month, I was sitting at my computer and all of a sudden I got double vision out of no where.  I immediately stopped drinking caffeine and it got better.  BUT, throughout the year, I would have a drink that has caffeine in it, and after 2 days the double vision would come back. I would stop again and it would go away.  Did this maybe 4-5 times last year and the same thing would happen.In Sept '15 there was a wedding I went to and had soda with caffeine in it along with alcohol. Since then I have been having double vision whenever I workout/push ups and even during sex.  Seems to happen when I do something strenuous.  After the double vision happens I usually have a headache afterwards.  My face/head feels really warm with pressure.  I'm already seeing a doctor and had my blood tested along with a CT scan.  Apparently they were all normal.Still trying to figure out what is wrong with me.Edit:  I don't smoke and I rarely drink alcohol.  I have been clean from caffeine for a month. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1447080286
LogOutOfLife [info] Idk man, you can think what you want. I cant really stop you. You're right, I do have deeper problems. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and adhd. My therapist thinks I may have some ptsd as well. I was just describing a time when I did not have meds. It's not roleplaying, maybe it's just the mix of all these thing together that gives me those symptoms. Idk how to convince you. [info] None [info] 1544835000
MoosesMom7 [info] I had no idea that it wasn't just me. I've been a lurker for a while now, and I didn't realize just how many people had similar stories to my own. I could probably write a book about the crap I had to deal with growing up. I think it's important to share stories, and see commonalities, so here's mine. &amp;#x200B;My Mother is a narcissist. As a little girl, I was her baby doll, being dressed up in the cutest dresses and being constantly doted on. Once I started talking, that's when everything went down hill. I would be yelled at, hit, called every name in the book, and was basically her slave. If she wasn't giving me a verbal beatdown, she was ordering me around, "take out the trash", "make me food", &amp; and so many others. She went so far as to encourage me to commit suicide, and had I actually been suicidal at the time, I can't say that I wouldn't have followed through with it. There were a few times in high school when she didn't allow me to shower because it would, "raise the light bill".  My aunts and uncle, were always her sisters and brother, she never spoke of them in relation to me. No matter what happened, it was never her fault. She got arrested once, and it was the cop's fault. My dad was a bastard, in her mind, when he gave me stuff and not her. &amp;#x200B;When I was 14, I was hit by a car and taken to the hospital with a dislocated knee. Rather than ask me if I was alright, she got into the room, waited until the doctors and nurses were gone, and told me I was going to get so much money from this. Yep, you read that right. I was just hit by a car, and she was looking forward to the settlement money that I would eventually get. I did get a pretty decent settlement from the accident though, about $9500. Thankfully, my dad was smart and got me a lawyer, and I set up a meeting with her to ask her to hold on to the check until I turned 18. I picked up the check shortly after my 18th birthday, and opened a savings account in my name. Boy was she pissed that she wasn't on the account, she needed the money "to raise me". She conned me out of $4000 dollars, which she used to pay off her credit cards, and told me she would pay back... that was over five years ago and I still haven't seen a penny. &amp;#x200B;Sometimes, I'd lose things, like any normal person would. When I'd ask her if she'd seen it, she would say that I was accusing her of stealing it. One time, she swiped a five dollar bill out of my pants and I asked her if she had seen it, as I thought I may have left it on a counter or something, again, I was the bitch for accusing her of stealing. Yet, after I took the dog out to cool off, she called me into my room, lifted a pillow, and lo and behold, there was my money. All nice and flat underneath the pillow. It's kind of hard to believe that she didn't put it there, considering it was crumpled up in my pocket the day before. &amp;#x200B;About a month before I graduated high school, she kicked me out for going to the bathroom before getting ready for school, because it "went against routine". I was a "backwards ass", which angered me and things escalated to the point where she said, "your 18, you're on your own, get the fuck out of my house". I was so upset that when my dad picked me up, I was sitting on the front porch crying. I called off from school that day, I was 18, so I could excuse myself. She got a call saying that I wasn't in class, and reported me skipping. This would have barred me from walking at graduation, and I told her as much. So she got to call the attendance office and excuse the absence so I could walk. Thankfully, she was willing to let me spend the weekend at my father's house, like she did unless she was pissed at him for some stupid reason, and I stuffed my duffel bag as full as I could get it and didn't come home after the weekend. The following Monday, I went to the school counselor and changed my address to my dad's and explained what happened. She was beyond kind and understanding and told me exactly what I had to do. &amp;#x200B;Of course, there were complications, she wouldn't let me have my things or my dog. For about two years, I had to steal from myself just so I could have clothes. She let her crackhead friends sleep in my room, do drugs in there (I once found a makeshift pipe) and take whatever clothes and jewelry they wanted. I was furious when I found my class ring missing, and she got pissed when I confronted her and told her I had reported it stolen, and given the police her friend's names and contact info. &amp;#x200B;It took nearly two years for me to get my dog back, and when I did he was skin and bones, with wounds from a fight with another dog. It took me three days to get him to eat, and he was just barely beginning to gain weight when my mother brought the cops to my house after I refused to give him back to her. She wanted to take him back to the same house, where the dog that attacked him lived, and out of concern for his safety, I said no. Unfortunately, because everything pertaining to him was in her name, I was forced to give him back to her. I told her to never speak to me again. She called me the same damn day and told me to come get him because he'd been hurt again. I was livid. My dad and I were sharing a car at the time, so I didn't have the car until the following monday, and when I went to get him, I was infuriated. She had left him in his kennel the entire weekend, not even letting him out to go to the bathroom. His kennel was soaked in urine, and he was bonier than before, as if he hadn't eaten. I took him home, gave him a bath, fed him, washed out his kennel, set up an appointment with a vet I knew, and got him registered in our county. My baby ate like he was starved. He cleaned the bowl in less than 10 minutes. I would be damned if she took him from me again, as she clearly demonstrated that she wasn't capable of taking care of him. She tried again about six months later, and failed. My Moose has been living with me for about three years now, although he's still got some trust issues surrounding women, he knows that I'll do anything to make sure he has what he needs. He doesn't get hit, he doesn't get yelled at (unless he's doing the yelling), and he doesn't get locked in the kennel unless we have to leave for more than a couple hours (he gets bored and destroys the apartment).&amp;#x200B;My mother has more recently convinced my family that I'm nothing but a liar and a thief. None of my maternal family members speak to me, especially after I cut my mother out of my life a couple years ago. I only have one cousin who talks to me because he's lived with her. He knows what she's like, and he saw the way she treated me. He's the only one who believed me. &amp;#x200B;One of her favorite abuse techniques is telephone harassment. She used to call me upwards of 40 times a day, calling me every name in the book, detailing how she was going to get me fired, making threats on my life, things like that. Eventually, she got my work phone number, and started harassing me at work. So, my boss got involved, and called a couple friends of his at the local police department (he had retired from there several years earlier). I spoke to an officer, and explained what was happening, let her listen to the voicemails that she left. And she said that she would tell her to cut it out, but, if she did that, I couldn't reach out to her. This was because, if I wanted to press telephone harassment charges, the DA wouldn't take the case if I'd reached out and contacted her. I agreed not to contact her. Little did I know, I had just made the best decision of my life. &amp;#x200B;About a year after she threw me out, I was diagnosed with anxiety, likely caused by the abuse from my mother. It took over a year of therapy, and daily SSRI's, but I'm doing really well. Cutting her out of my life was one of the best things I ever did, and I don't regret it in the slightest. I have a wonderful Fiance, a nice apartment, Moose is spoiled rotten, and things are looking great for me. It's possible to overcome the lifetimes of abuse we all suffer. It's not easy, but it's doable. No contact has been a great thing for me, and I have no reason or desire to make contact with her. And I'm determined to not raise my children the way she raised me. I refuse to be that kind of mother. Our family's cycle of abuse stops with me. [info] None [info] 1536052407
thetruthisoutthere [info] So true. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a year ago and I was so embarrassed when people at work asked me why I was off work for so long (about 3 weeks). People with bad backs or whatever don't feel the shame. [info] None [info] 1249581381
hehehepingers [info] Offered shrooms, but I have anxiety. Should I take them? A couple of friends have offered to give me some shrooms tonight and trip together. This is my first time taking shrooms, but not my first time taking psychadelics, I've had LSD, 2CB and 2CI before.However, I was diagnosed with anxiety a couple of months ago. I really want to trip, and while I am feeling fine today I am worried about how they will affect me. Any advice? [info] None [info] 1416552160
disillusionwander [info] This might be drifting off a bit, because it doesn't answer why advil doesn't work for mental pain, but I think it is interesting. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I think the difference comes down to being able to relate. If I break my leg, you have a leg, too (probably). You can probably relate (in some way) the amount of pain that breaking it could result it. It's much different for mental diseases. I can't really explain, as well as I'd like, why leaving shampoo/conditioner/body wash bottles on the floor of the shower bothers me to the point where it makes me deeply upset and uncomfortable. [info] None [info] 1448670231
landsharkkidd [info] I have anxiety, and so two years ago during my final year of high school (when I was diagnosed with anxiety) whenever I'd get a panic attack at school I'd sit in the stairwell during class and breathe and think happy thoughts, or watch youtube videos and laugh at funny videos, or try to have a friend with me to talk to me about things. I never had intense anxiety that it'd stop me from learning, but I hope maybe that helps? Though I figure a lot of people do the same thing as me but I hope you get better, and it sucks that you're experiencing this much anxiety that it stops you from learning.  [info] None [info] 1424312636
Theprofil3er [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder, ADHD, and touerrets (I'm not sure if that's spelt right) syndrome. [info] None [info] 1389930489
kenzieCenzie [info] AITA: I just gave one of my Bridesmaids an ultimate Background: I'm 8 months pregnant. Baby is due August 23rd and my Wedding is Sep 29thI've been friends with Stephanie (not real name) since Pre-K (I'm 27 now). we were in different school districts so didn't get to see each other every day. She became friends with this girl Becca (not real name) in middle school. Me and Becca would always argue about who was Stephanie's best friend. We went our seperate ways for college. After I graduated, I happened to move near Stephanie and we hung out more (going out at night or going to a play). We became closer but our friendship was still based on our history and not a strong connection. *I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 11 and Stephanie never really 'got it' or supported me. We went out to dinner one night and she said the EXACT wrong thing and triggered a massive panic attack (she knows my triggers and has known for 20 years, but she just \*forgot\*). Stephanie blamed me.*I told Stephanie that I was getting married on 9/29/19- turns out that Becca is getting married the day before my wedding in upstate NY.I've been trying to work with Stephanie to help her figure out how she could do both weddings but she refuses to make a plan. I offered to pay for her ticket to fly her back down to DC but she isn't really considering it.She refuses to leave Becca's reception "early" or take a late /early flight. She is considering having her parents drive 2 hours north to pick her up and then drive 6 hours south to get to the wedding (6 hours with no stops or traffic). I think that Stephanie could easily leave the reception around 10 ( most people will be gone and the bride will care more about her new husband) go to bed and leave on an early flight in the morning. But she refuses to leave Becca's party early.I honestly feel that she is going to be at Becca's wedding for the ENTIRE thing - from the beginning prep to the end of the reception- but she is missing the prep time for my wedding. She says she could be there at 11 to get her hair done but she is ALWAYS late to everything (which is why her parents are offering to drive an extra 4 hours to pick her up- they know their daughter). I am 70% sure she would end up being there at 2 pm and my wedding starts at 3:15 pm.I told her that if she cannot guarantee that she can be at my wedding at 11 for hair and makeup (I won't be happy that she missed getting nails done) that she will no longer be a bridesmaid. I still want her there as a guest. I'll refund her dress purchase and anything else she bought for the wedding. I just don't want to be thinking about her missing out on my wedding prep or being late on my wedding day - I'll already be under enough stress.TLDR: "I'm-her-best-friend" fight comes to a climax when the 2 friends have their weddings in the same weekend and hundreds of miles apart. I, one of my friends, give my long term (distant) friend (and bridesmaid) an ultimatum- give me a solid plan or get demoted to a normal guest.UPDATE- I have decided to demote her to a normal guest. I think it's better for everyone involved and makes me less stressed on my wedding day. [info] None [info] 1562036616
atomsofttech [info] Ugh I know exactly how you feel. I've been through points in my life where I stood home for months just barely surviving. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Been living about 10 years with it and it does get managable but still if fucking horrible to have. I'm sorry to hear about relationship issue too. I left my ex wife about 3 years ago. Had 2 kids with her.. they are now 12 and 7. Boy and girl.Jumped right into another relationship right after and have a 5month old now. (Girl).Every single day I feel like something is bad is going to happen. Some how I'm not happy even tho I love her and don't want to leave her at all. I feel she doesn't understand me tho. Feels like I'm always doing something wrong. Feels like she hates my previous marriage kids and knows she doesn't trust me.I think about death but not in anyway wanting to die.. more of the opposite.. like ugh I don't want to die at all. I want to keep going.Life is freaking complex. Life isn't perfect and I fear it never will be but always remember.. it's your life. If you don't like it you have so much time to change things. If you fail.... Who cares.. your alive and have more time to try other things. Move... Start new relationships. One day you will cope better and will find someone who will treat you great or maybe you will make the mistake of cheating again and have to start over, but that's ur life. Do what ever you can to enjoy it.Try not to let the anxiety control you too much. Learn some breathing techniques and find a lil hobby or habbit.. like .. I choose music or reading or tapping my knee.. all help manage my anxiety.To be honest. I know u will hate hearing this like I do but just try and relax lol the world is full of people you can talk to if you need to. Sorry if this makes no sense but ugh.. anxiety makes it hard think.. also so does having 2 kids over for the weekend. :) [info] None [info] 1558200589
NitretGaming [info] This doesn't help for everyone but I just simply smile and I taught myself not to care about the simple things. If I lost 50 bucks I would be so stressed 2 years ago but I've learned money isn't everything and that I care more about being happy than worrying about money. I know that stressing WILL NOT HELP AT ALL.  For anxiety I just smile and think positive. Whenever I'm in a large group I try to just smile it out and "act cool." This somehow brings my anxiety down + I've listed to common phrases that "good speakers" have used and used them myself in a conversation to act like I know what I'm doing even though I don't and I'm really nervous.  If it's social anxiety we're talking about this one helps A LOT. Learn to not be embarrassed. Even if you did the stupidest thing just laugh it off. (It's no big deal when you look at the bigger picture.) For example singing the wrong lyric to a song out loud and then on top of that, being called out for it. I just say "oh shit what is it then" and laugh it off. Even if I'm internally crying. (BTW if you have any friends that shit on you for getting a song lyric wrong don't be friends w/ them please)  Just try your best to learn to overcome it, kinda like a fear. Just smile and remember in the end, fuck it, just be happy.  (Note: I've been diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety)  GOOD LUCK I BELIEVE IN YOU :D [info] None [info] 1551669465
throwaway31202200 [info] Seeking help? I think I'm in the middle of a pretty serious breakdown.  I have known somehow that the end of my life was coming up since some time in about 2014.  Every six months to a year, I would be renewed provided I didn't step out of line.  I feel as though I haven't stepped out of line too much, in the sense that all I've been trying to do was build a future for myself that I could live a life of relative comfort.  Started going back to school, the works.  I quit my job because of the anxiety that I experienced while at work. Unable to leave of my own accord and if they wanted me out, I wouldn't be anywhere else.  It has all come to a head in the past couple of days.  I feel as though I have to die to preserve the lives of others. I don't know what to do.  I don't know if I'm experiencing delusions, or what's happening.  I was diagnosed with anxiety, but nothing more.  I guess I wanted to share my story to see if it fits schizophrenia. [info] None [info] 1525741059
pequenamorena [info] Honestly I haven’t decided, I’m very indecisive which I guess means I’m not an 8 despite my matching up with almost everything else. I find it hard to just flat out describe myself so I found this questionnaire on a thread (There are two parts):• How old are you? What's your gender? Give us a general description of yourself.I am a 24 year old female from the U.S. • Is there a medical diagnosis that may impact your mental stability somehow?I have been diagnosed with anxiety but it’s under control/pretty much obsolete right now (probably due to a change in living situation)• Describe your upbringing. Did it have any kind of religious or structured influence? How did you respond to it?I was raised loosely in an Episcopal church, we fluctuated in attending church regularly and only for Christmas/Easter. In middle school my family began attending a Methodist church and I was active in youth group activities and mission trips which I loved but didn’t like going to church. If this had any influence on me it was probably just my fondness for helping people. It didn’t bother me to attend but my whole family grew out of it. (When I was 16 or 17 I got a cross tattoo on my foot/ankle, I don’t regret it but I’m not religious anymore plus I probably thought I was more religious than I actually was back then)• What do you do as a job or as a career (if you have one)? Do you like it? Why or why not?I’m 2 years post grad (public health major). In my first year post grad, I taught math in a middle school. Now I live in Spain and teach English. It’s okay for now because I like it but I go back and forth on it this is what I want for my life. I am constantly researching nursing school, medical school, MPH programs, psychology masters programs....I guess you could say I’m still figuring it all out. • If you had to spend an entire weekend by yourself, how would you feel? Would you feel lonely or refreshed?Probably very lonely. In my lowest times, I felt like I was going crazy if I was left alone. I get really bored and would probably need to go to the mall or a restaurant just to shake the feeling (speaking from experience). • What kinds of activities do you prefer? Do you like, and are you good at sports? Do you enjoy any other outdoor or indoor activities?I was good at sports, played rugby in college. I coached middle school basketball. I’ve developed a new fondness for working out, but I need structure. (I found that in a new fitness program I am doing). I also enjoy group fitness classes. • How curious are you? Do you have more ideas then you can execute? What are your curiosities about?I’m super curious and can be obsessively curious about things. Researching and spending a lot of time and energy on new things. I often spend more time researching than executing. • Would you enjoy taking on a leadership position? Do you think you would be good at it? What would your leadership style be?I would enjoy a leadership position; better yet I would prefer it. In my experiences as in a leadership position I have done well. I think my leadership style is strong and dedicated. I can be bossy and bad at delegating (if you want something done right do it yourself). • Are you coordinated? Why do you feel as if you are or are not? Do you enjoy working with your hands in some form? Describe your activity.I’m not sure if I’m coordinated. But sometimes I like working with my hands. I enjoyed building my own headboard, compost bin, working on remodeling or painting the house with my dad. I used to love ceramics/pottery. I’m terrible at art otherwise and I don’t really care for it. • Are you artistic? If yes, describe your art? If you are not particular artistic but can appreciate art please likewise describe what forums of art you enjoy. Please explain your answer.I am not artistic and would consider myself avert to art in general. I hate going to museums and think a lot of famous paintings are overrated. • What's your opinion about the past, present, and future? How do you deal with them?I often hold grudges from the past. I am also not very sentimental other than a small amount of random things so I don’t know if that’s telling about my thoughts on the past. I spend a lot of the present considering the future rather than actually doing things. Im not 100% content with the present.  [info] None [info] 1550686081
HellaUwU [info] Heart palpitations after exercising on 0 calorie intake for 2 days? Hi there, 19F, 100kg, non smoker, non drinker, only medications I take are inhalers for asthma.Hi there, I've eaten absolutely nothing for the past 2 days, I've only drank fizzy flavoured water. After doing some very mild exercise (40 squats and 30 sit ups) I started to get really bad heart palpitations, it lasted for about 3 minutes and then calmed down. I have had palpitations before as I'm diagnosed with anxiety. Is me being overweight having too much strain on my heart? Will this go away when I lose weight? Should I just power through the palpitations? Should I wait until the palpitations pass then carry on? Do I need to stop altogether?Just to be clear, I am aware that eating nothing for days at a time isnt great, but I am currently in a position where I can't eat. Any help is greatly appreciated :) [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1586078478
_Classic_Rando_ [info] Good for you OP! I was diagnosed with anxiety for ages before ADHD even came into my radar.After starting treatment, my anxiety got way better, but I still feel that general dread/snowballing thing now and then. I still want to get re-evaluated but I think my diagnosis of ADHD and generalised anxiety is more or less right. I'd say my brain's tomfoolery is 80% ADHD and 20% anxiety... But my suffering/ shitty life quality was definitely 80% down to anxiety. I felt so lost when I became so much more productive and functional, but still couldn't be happy... Anxiety is a thief of joy, for real. Only now, a year after diagnosis, am I learning ways to cope with life from the inside out. Onward and upward! [info] ADHD &amp; SO [info] 1509994537
calon_lan [info] Do I have IBS? Please help! Hi all, I was wondering if anyone can help me here?I am in my mid 20's, average height and weight. I lead an active lifestyle as a student nurse on a busy ward.For about 1.5-2 years, I have had VERY uncomfortable gas (where I will bloat on shift, feel as if I need to pass gas, and then have an uncomfortable and embarrassing gurgle in my lower left abdomen, just next to the belly button), I feel as if I need to go to the toilet to pass gas/have a bowel movement NOW and then I will have a mushy, mousse like stool, type 5-6 which is light tan in colour and usually floats on top of the water(I'm sorry to be so graphic)Now this may be:-Due to my hectic job. I work 12.5hrs, x3 a week. On break (If I get one!) I will usually eat a salad, some pieces of fruit, pears, apples, blueberries, dark chocolate and wholemeal bread and butter to dip into soup (i haven't eaten white bread in about 5 years). I drink mostly water but I will occasionally treat myself to de caff coffee with semi skimmed milk, though after this luxury, I pay the price DEARLY as my gas and bloating will become so bad, I look as if I am 6 months pregnant and I'm almost in tears!!Due to stress- I have had this job for almost 3 years and have recently lost my father due to a short, unexpected illness. Shortly after his passing, I was diagnosed with anxiety.What is strange is, If I have a few days off work. My stools return to normal and my bloating becomes almost non existent. Sometimes it swings the opposite way and I will have constipation, sometimes for 4/5 days! (although I have not had this problem for a few months because I've upped my water intake).I have no previous medical history of gastro problems, nor does my immediate family.So what do you think guys? IBS? Coeliac? Lactose intolerance? Or just nervous, jittery tummy brought on by a mad work schedule and terrible eating/sleeping patterns on shift? I would really appreciate some in sight before I go to my GP.Thank you! :) [info] None [info] 1456435381
cannabivore_9 [info] Start-up agency, sleepless nights, anxiety &amp; cannabis. Hi guys! I’m not here to promote the use of cannabis. I just wanna share experiences with anxiety that leads me to sleepless night, the state of mind and cannabis as a friend. I’m running a 2 mos. start-up brand marketing agency and I’m 23. My mentor decided to take the chance and build a start-up with me since anything that involves brands is always our passion.But running a start-up isn’t that easy. I had to find potential clients, build a service pitch deck and pitching to potential clients. Too much to think lately, until I reach to self-doubt and overthinking. I was diagnosed with anxiety 2 years ago and fighting it was a journey. These past few days, I realised that I think it’s coming back, I missed appetites, sleepless nights and sudden crying due to overthinking. I had open this up to my dad, thankful I have a good relationship with my dad, cause everything was so heavy.I had to take time, toke some, relax and think. Focus on what’s needed to be done.  Today, I’ll start doing self-medication and self-therapy with music, talks, and cannabis. And would be more open to my family and friends.Would love to document my journey here and let everything out, one step at a time. Thank you! [info] None [info] 1562129119
KingBaby87 [info] Hello and welcome!Anxiety can feel like it is overwhelming and taking control of your life. Your job is to remind it that you are in charge.When I was diagnosed with anxiety, the first thing I did was read a book called DARE, by Barry McDonagh. It really calmed me down AND helped me better understand what anxiety is. It's an easy read, I finished it in one evening.I'd start there and see how you feel!  [info] None [info] 1524462918
ithinkimadragon [info] Just a genuine question So, this is a legitimate question I've had. Some may thing im trolling but im not. Why had god let almost everyone in my life abuse me (from a young age, 6/7, mainly verbal but some physical from friends and grandma, and eventually a girlfriend) and break me down mentally to the point where at 10 i was having thoughts of hurting myself and at 13 being put on antidepressants/now moodstablizers? If god loves me so much, why is he letting me suffer and why is he letting others do this to me? Litterally, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and (pretty much) BPD due to people being abusive to me. [info] None [info] 1580799954
RxWest [info] Can anxiety lower your IQ? Or does it just lower your test-taking abilities? Throughout my childhood, I was diagnosed with anxiety, and anxiety induced panic attacks. Heavily depressed, I was always in and out of psychologists’ offices. One day, when I was about 16, they had me take an IQ test. I scored a 108. I pretty much averaged a C grade average throughout school, except for math. In mathematics, I always had an F-D grade average.Anyways, I have been free of panic attacks for almost half a year now. I went back to my neuro-psych’s office and retook the test. I scored a 130. Note, this was not the exact same test, but it was of similar variety. Ever since my anxiety has gone away, I’ve been able to grasp concepts much easier than before.  I’m in 3x accelerated calc courses, and even have a 3.7 gpa majoring in Computer Science...I know that your IQ score can’t really increase. So, I’m puzzled as to why the big jump occurred.TL;DRHad anxiety. Scored low on IQ test. No more anxiety, excelling in school, and now scored a 130 IQ. [info] None [info] 1561089117
DeathZombi [info] I keep thinking I have brain cancer even though I'm also pretty sure it's anxiety I've been having ice pick headaches as of late. This already got the anxiety going about why it's hurting. I've also had trouble with my memory, though this only started soon after I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder.The thing that sent me into total panic was when I was pouring milk in a jug into a glass cup. I went to put the milk jug away, but as I was about to open the refrigerator I snapped and realized that I was about to put the glass cup into the fridge, not the milk jug. It's probably because I was just kind of dazed and not paying attention, but now I'm totally convinced I have some sort of brain disease and that I'm slowly dying and doing nothing about it. I'm seeing a doctor in a few days, I just need some comfort so I can wait without worrying about it too much. [info] None [info] 1528424037
Mmjnewengland [info] I was the same way in school when I hit the 6th grade. Kids growing up, becoming clicky, and puberty was awkward af. I'd have morning panic attacks and have crying fits over going to school, but my mother made me go. Later on in life, around the age of 16 [I'm 32 now) I was diagnosed with anxiety and overactive anxiety disorder. In my later years (now looking back) I showed the signes very early, but my parents only though I was nervous all the time, turned out to be a major untreated mental illness. Could you possibly get a doctors appointment to talk with a doctor about this? Therapy and medication has helped me out so much. I just don't want someone to have to figure this out 16 years down the road.  I wish you the best of luck. Listen to music and maybe use some breathing exercises to clam yourself, it helps a little. [info] None [info] 1479790103
woundedbearhair [info] ADD/ADHD can be misdiagnosed as having anxiety and that tends to be alleviated by the medication. I was diagnosed with anxiety a long time ago by a doctor who had no real clue how to test for ADD/ADHD since it was pretty common for people to think that it went away as you got older. Shocker! It doesn't! [info] None [info] 1556135829
SeaBeeDecodesLife [info] You’re absolutely not over-thinking it. She wants you to handle your child’s aggression and control issues by aggressively shoving him in the shower and showing him that you can overpower him. It just makes me sad that people act like children that young have no feelings, and the only way to get through to them is by physically overpowering them and proving that you’re the boss. But in reality, whatever your son’s dealing with is an emotional issue, and he’s throwing tantrums because he’s unable to verbally express what he’s going through and he’s frustrated. If there was an adult who started crying because they were in the middle of an argument and they were unable to express their feelings accurately, would we presume they were just trying to be difficult and grab them and shove them in the shower? No. Kids have feelings too, and deserve to be emotionally validated and have time to learn how to express what’s going on inside of them, not be physically overpowered. God, I’m sorry. You’re a wonderful mother though, and she shouldn’t have tried to target you like that in a vulnerable time. In all reality, she might’ve genuinely thought she was being helpful, but you just *don’t* handle a child that way when they’re struggling emotionally.Hell, I remember throwing tons of tantrums when I was four just because I was so frustrated. I was witnessing things kids shouldn’t have had to witness, and I didn’t know how to verbally express what was happening or what I was feeling, so I just cried and screamed to get the anger and frustration and grief out whenever something triggered me. I was diagnosed with anxiety that same year, when everyone else had been telling my mother to whoop my ass. I can’t imagine how horrifically traumatised id be if she really had done that, or shoved me in a cold shower, when I was struggling like that—because I *remember* what I was feeling. Anyway, I’m rambling, but I hope I gave you another perspective so you feel a tad more valid in your response. [info] None [info] 1548311486
noobpsych [info] I went through something similar several years ago, where out of the blue, I was paranoid about food and contamination.  I ate very little during the day and would not eat after about 3 pm, otherwise I would be in the bathroom with *various maladies* all night.  In my case, this problem was accompanied by other symptoms, such as inability to relax and enjoy life and panic attacks (though I didn't know them as such at the time).  Eventually, I was diagnosed with anxiety and prescribed an antidepressant and anti-anxiety medication.  The meds helped almost immediately and I stopped taking them a short time after.  Insight into this problem didn't come until much later.  I think the anxiety was a delayed reaction to uprooting my entire life (at age 18) about six months prior to the onset of symptoms.  During the initial transition period I had to hold my shit together (just married, moved cross-country, started college, a new job).  I think that all the stress/fear etc. that I could not afford to experience at the time, came out later and masked as the funky obsessions and fears.    So my questions to you are: 1) are you experiencing any other symptoms? and 2) have you recently gone through a stressful event? [info] None [info] 1430428719
couerdepirate [info] just a thought, and maybe i'm overstepping here, but do you have any, even minor, issues with anxiety? whether it be about school itself or just in general?I only ask because for a couple years in high school, I COULD NOT eat breakfast. I would feel so sick, but like you be famished by lunch. Once I was diagnosed with anxiety problems and realized I was subconsciously anxious about school, I was able to eat breakfast. Now I love getting up and having a big breakfast before I start my day!  [info] None [info] 1380329385
Inpalethis21 [info] Speaking from personal experience, I knew I liked the feeling of being high but I never knew why it made me feel the way I did. A couple of months later I was diagnosed with anxiety and the doctor explained that it is normal for people with anxiety to experience a feeling of impending doom, which is exactly what I felt when I haven't smoked in about 3 days.For people who don't know they have a disorder which can be treated with marijuana, it is easy to say they are addicted but don't have the knowledge as to why it is addicting.People like to call it addiction, I like to call it medicine because it relaxes my nerves from jumping around and calms my heart race down.  [info] None [info] 1447252565
OldieMarsie [info] I've been getting really upset/anxious lately at the idea that I might have several diseases. Hi guys, well for a little background... I was diagnosed with anxiety at 12 years old (I'll be 22 this thursday) and after years of therapy and hard work it has gotten better and most of the time life is really good. But lately I've been really upset because I've been convincing myself I have several serious diseases and even sometimes can feel some symptoms (which I know must of them are caused by the anxiety itself), and even though I know I'm healthy there's always this thought of "what if it is true and I'm going to die?" I'm scared and as time goes by it gets more difficult to control my thoughts. Which also makes me sad because I've worked really hard on my mental health and hate to feel that I'm going backwards. I know I should visit my therapist, I just wanted to feel a little support because sometimes this kind of situations can make me feel very lonely. Thanks for reading. [info] None [info] 1566268362
hp007 [info] Does anyone else obsess over going to the bathroom? Okay, I’m posting this just because I’m curious. I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD in 2013 and the main way it manifests is going to the bathroom. I am always afraid that I’m basically about to pee on myself. I’m afraid of going on long car rides, I research new places I’m going to to make sure they have a bathroom there, if I see a bathroom I’m stopping to pee. I’ve been driving and had to find a store and literally ran so fast into the bathroom with my heart pounding that I was about to have an accident, only to sit down and barely have anything in me. Lately it’s progressed a little bit to pooping as well. I’m always afraid something I’ve eaten is going to upset my stomach and I’m going to have an accident. I have never heard of anyone with this compulsion, and I was curious if any of you have faced it. I’m feeling excited because I just finished breastfeeding and am about to go back on medication. I’m really hoping it will help me. I’m in a wedding in several months and I really don’t want to be standing up there just worried about having an accident so I really hope I find a good medical solution soon! Thanks for reading all about my weird OCD! [info] None [info] 1581206678
CanadianKid955 [info] Quitting Before It's too Late Just thought Id come on here to rant a little. I had a huge eye opening incident yesterday. Me and my friend each bought 3gs of weed in hopes that it would last for a few day at the least. However, I somehow managed to smoke all 3gs in one damn day. After realizing this, I began to feel like absolute shit. Just a little background info on myself: I'm a 19 year old University student who has been smoking weed pretty heavily for the past 8 months. I finished my first year with a 73 average, which isn't all that awful for first year. I was working out about 5 times a week and my body had never felt in better condition. In a way, the gym became a place where I could go to get away from everyone for a while. I had a great group of friends who I could turn to for anything and I was generally well liked by I people I met. I had tons of female friends and had no problem carrying on conversations with them.  I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 15, but it had never really effected me that much. Once I started smoking weed, everything changed...My marks are complete shit and now all I can think about in the morning is smoking more weed. I stopped working out completely because of a lack of motivation. I've also isolated myself and stopped texting most of my friends. Ive spent all my money on weed and have no job. My anxiety is through the roof and I've started having depressing thoughts more often. Today is the day that I stop. I really want to get back to the times when I didn't have to rely on weed to feel normal. I realize that im only 19 and still have a chance to get a degree and get my life back on track. If anyone has any tips they could share on how to avoid relapsing, it would be greatly appreciated! [info] None [info] 1417981432
KitKatThePirate [info] "it's really nothing to worry about, it's just practice. It's not a tournament or anything. So just stop worrying!"My dad said this to me. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1549031707
Hybernative [info] Thanks for the welcome! I was diagnosed with anxiety last week or so, I've been suffering all these years because I didn't even know anxiety was a thing that could be treated; people usually just drink alcohol here (the UK) to temporarily get over it. I'm totally in the dark about what medications there are available out there that can help. My doc has given me amitriptyline, but I also use it as a sleep aid, so you can imagine taking a sleeping tablet in the middle of the day, isn't the most conducive thing to productivity...  [info] None [info] 1456741113
ChadleyDooRight [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 13. Originally it was just major life changing events like my parents divorce that induced it. Then graduating high school. Then starting college. It’s not the job itself, but the things going on within my own life and I’d like to focus on bettering my anxiety coping skills  and slowly ease into testing them and not start at a disadvantage. I love the job, super friendly people (employees and customers) and I can talk all day about computers.  [info] Computer Sales Associate [info] 1544228840
Deadmanjustice [info] I'm extremely stressed out from many things this week, and something as fragile as CFW is not something I should be touching right now. I mean I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder, unmedicated, and very stressed from  multitude of very serious things.When I calm down in a week or two I plan to update my CFW to A9LH+Luma, but for now I just wanna know if it's safe to update my emunand so I can play Dragon Quest. [info] None [info] 1473815799
Loveoutloud22 [info] How do I stop crying? If I think I’ve done something to offend, inconvenience, or hurt someone, I sob. I can not handle even the smallest conflict without breaking down into tears. If my boyfriend sounds annoyed with me I start bawling. I have made such huge progress in my self esteem the past few years but I can’t seem to break this weird emotional response. * Update to address some reoccurring comments/questions: I’m 27 years old, I am diagnosed with anxiety and taking medication for it, and I have had trauma in my past. Thank you for the amazing comments so far! This is an amazing community ❤️ [info] None [info] 1549936805
Faithyxox [info] Yeah I have a diagnosis for Asperger’s, Anxiety, and ADD. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 14, and then Asperger’s and ADD at 17. I am living away from halls this year, meaning I choose who I live with. I’m with some random people I met on Facebook this year as my flatmates ditched me (I’m living with a couple which I didn’t know about at first which is gonna be GREAT /s) so it will be a bit quieter, but hopefully I make some better friends. [info] None [info] 1563851970
JimmyDThing [info] I am in no way saying that you do not have these things.  But I have to say... these thigns are over-diagnosed by doctors who don't really have the authority on the subject to do this diagnosing.I've been "diagnosed" with things that are utter bullshit.  I was diagnosed with anxiety caused by slight OCD for a little while, and was given pills.  I didn't need them... those are just normal human feelings that you get once in a while and they went away with time.  I never took the pills, I am fine.  I really think that your general physician should be directing you to a specialist, not giving you pills that are for a specific disorder.  That could definitely be the way things went for you, but if the SAME doctor is diagnosing you with all of these problems, I'd go see a specialist to see what they have to say.EDIT: I accidentally a word and spelling/grammar. [info] None [info] 1314793021
Leah8329 [info] There is a chance she isn't crazy and projecting and abusive, she might have a form of anxiety. I found myself convinced that my wonderful SO was cheating, along with various other incredibly paranoid things when I was diagnosed with anxiety. Either way, counselling and lots of it.Edit: wording [info] None [info] 1444837129
chilindrina7 [info] Job searching dilemma So I'm a part time college student and have been for a while. I've taken longer than some people to graduate school because of some past hospitalizations and now I'm in therapy trying to get a hold of my life back. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and a few other disorders but because I am a college student, I'd eventually like to take some more courses which would end up making me a full time student. Well it's been recommended to me by my therapist that I should get a job to get out of the house but I don't know what to do. I'd like to get a job where I work no more than 15 hours but most of the jobs that have that type of flexibility don't really suit me. They're mostly in tutoring, retail, or food places. I've read about bookstores or libraries being a good place to start too but there are no job openings for those type of jobs around me. I've read that some of the flexible jobs in terms of hours are Starbucks and Bestbuy. I always kind of knew that retail and food places pretty much give that flexibility but my anxiety makes me so scared to work at those places. I've already worked in retail and on the second day I almost threw up from anxiety because of the pressure and how many times I kept messing up. At some food places I've noticed that there are some places that aren't really busy but when I hear a store like Starbucks it makes me anxious too. They're not always busy but sometimes I see the long lines at drive thru and it makes me think of the pressure too. I've read about being an assistant at an art gallery or tutoring but I'm not tech savvy and I don't really have an area of expertise that I could teach for someone else to learn. I've read about catering and it sounds great but the openings that I've seen require me to own a car, which I don't own. Basically I feel fucked and I feel stuck. I have no idea what job would suit me and I've mostly have worked as a clerical assistant and at schools in the past. I've done well with those jobs but they mostly require at least 25 hours a week, which won't give me time to take more classes. I just need a job with flexible hours that would be no more than 15 hours and doesn't sound nerve-wracking for my anxiety. Any suggestions and help would be gladly appreciated. [info] None [info] 1564345435
SariaLon [info] Paradoxical Thoughts and Fear of Impermanence: What To do? Hi. A quick background: As a child I was always quiet and looked sad and I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder at a really young age. I was put on paxil at around the age of 8. I quit paxil at 22, but then a year later when on zoloft. Then this year I went off zoloft. This is because I have never liked the side effects of these medications (and the withdrawal symptoms are really scary), and also I don't like being dependent on it. So I've been without medication for around 6 months now, and I would like suggestions on how to deal with my anxiety. The past two weeks have been really bad. I can't go a day without thinking about so many things: Death, the past, the future, regrets, am I doing enough, my identity, etc. I'm basically freaking out about every single thing someone can freak out about, and it happens every moment of every day. I struggle with paradoxical thoughts: I want to be with my boyfriend, but I also don't. I want to be extroverted and do many things, but I also don't. I want to move out, but I also don't. It's driving me crazy. Constant thoughts of impermanence, death, what to do with life, racing in my mind every day, I can't catch a break and I can't slow down. I also dissociate a lot and I panic a lot. I don't want to do this to myself or my boyfriend (we've broken up because I couldn't make up my mind). We're both going crazy!I know this is life and it's my fault for going off medication, but is there any way to try to deal with this without medication? I'm not sure what I need. Psychotherapy? Regular therapy? I'm determined to gain control over my thoughts again, and to feel "normal". I've tried regular therapy sessions before and honestly they never helped. It was just "positive thinking", etc. but I want something that will help me get to the root of why I'm having these thoughts?Any suggestions or comments will be appreciated. Thank you. [info] None [info] 1502415161
Hexacorpus [info] [Help] Struggling with Anxiety &amp; Phobias I am 19 years old. I was diagnosed with anxiety in late 2013, Asperger's in September 2014, and have gone through therapy for Emetophobia (which caused frequent anxiety/panic attacks and still affects me on a smaller scale after therapy).I'm due to see my therapist soon about Thanatophobia (fear of death) / Chronophobia (fear of the future - I don't think there's a better term?) / health anxiety.My therapist unofficially diagnosed me with health anxiety during my last therapy sessions, along with official diagnosis for social and GAD. My anxieties are contributing to and drawing from my Thanatophobia, Chronophobia, Emetophobia and God knows what.Since this is my first post, I thought I'd sort of introduce myself, because I'm not coping, at all, and I want to know if there are others with these phobias and mix of anxiety disorders.Does it get better? Are you struggling with any of it too? [info] None [info] 1429216823
cassidyysagee [info] me too, I was diagnosed with anxiety on it. None of the ones I’ve been on have made any sort of difference and I’m kinda done with the whole thing at this point [info] None [info] 1561234136
arizonaicedgreentea [info] I am an exotic dancer/stripper diagnosed with autism. AMA! Thought I'd do an AMA to pass the time :)I'm 21 years old, been dancing since 19. I've worked at 4 different clubs in New England since I started. At a young age I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD and then later on, Aspergers Syndrome.Feel free to ask me anything about my work, future plans, my life, interests, or whatever else you'd like, be respectful though please! [info] None [info] 1560494801
dna12453 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder last year. I’ve improved a lot, but initially i did have a lot of problems and before I knew it was anxiety i mostly j took a shot before or something. I saw a therapist for a few weeks and that helped. Pretty close to normal now. [info] None [info] 1545064737
eddie90100 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I'm unsure whether to start treatment [info] None [info] 1534151744
wyldepixie [info] I've had a really hard time getting a diagnosis.  All my paperwork says, "Severe Anxiety Disorder".  I was diagnosed with ADHD very young but then it was overturned by the time I was seven.  Then I was diagnosed with anxiety and night terrors.  I would hide, constantly, in closets and cabinets, anywhere dark and quiet.  My psycho upbringing had my parents and church believing I was being targeted by demons.  (That reeeeaaaalllly helped).  Then I was told I had a "sensory processing disorder" but no treatments were offered.  I was sixteen or so by then.  I didn't seek any help from then into adulthood until a car accident.  I'd built up my own coping mechanisms and was mostly okay.  After that and multiple surgeries I got worse and couldn't cope.  My SO asked me to get help.  I tried.  I did rounds of doctors, therapists, and neurologists (but no neuropsychologists to my knowledge).  MRI show "structural abnormalities" but they said it didn't necessarily account for my migraines which is why they kept scanning me.  I was put on every SSRI in existence, which did nothing.  They couldn't diagnose a specific anxiety disorder because I have symptoms of each major anxiety disorder.  It's been trying to say the least. [info] None [info] 1482696344
lKnown2Bl [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and Bipolar disorder and weed honestly makes me really calm. When I'm sober people think I'm on uppers, I'm always moving, trembling hands, fidgety, and have the potential to become easily agitated which leads to rage. I'd recommend smoking Indica for a chill relaxing high. No jitters, no moving, just stuck in a euphoric bliss. It would also be a good idea to do this in a safe environment because smoking can cause paranoia in people and that added with agoraphobia can't be a good combination.  [info] None [info] 1320752894
weldmeup [info] Sorry for the shortsided reply. I look for certain strains that the distalate is made out of. Sativa dominant if not a full on sativa for me. I have had ADD since I was a young kid and I was diagnosed with anxiety. Typically stimulants are used to treat for ADD. However after using marijuana for a while I find the stimulating high that a sativa brings to do a far better job than any medication I tried as a kid and teenager and even now as a young adult. Sorry to burden you with details I am just simply outlining the point that it all depends on what you are looking to do. [info] None [info] 1549225241
bluechupathing2 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and borderline personality disorder, so it that wouldn't be stretch. As for more details, we don't really ever fight, and when we do, we try to talk about it after some space. We spend most nights and weekends together. We're both homebodies, but there haven't been any moments of having a wandering eye, or thinking about how bored I am, which, if I had experienced anything like that, then I could rationally address those, but it was just this wave of fixation on these worries  [info] None [info] 1518554405
antuerpia [info] Moving across the country Hey, folks, first time posting here, so bear with me.   I currently live in Brazil and recently received a job offer that would require me to permanently move across the country (I assume most of you are not familiar with brazilian geography, but the distance is similar to moving from NY to LA). It will be my first actual job and the salary is pretty decent for a first job (I'm 25).  I'm super excited for this opportunity, since I will be working in the field in which I want to invest my career (Research in Petroleum Engineering) and, as I mentioned before, it would be my first proper job and the money is not bad. I'm currently in the final year of my master's degree, which I still plan to finish, although with some delay.  At the same time, since I got the job offer a couple days ago, I have been, of course, very excited, but also feeling this sort of fear mixed with anguish, to the point that I have to hide in the bathroom to cry (happened twice). This feeling I have is mostly triggered whenever I think of having to leave my grandmother and my girlfriend here. I have been living only with grandmother since I was 6 and my parents divorced. My grandfather passed away a long time ago, so I have been keeping her company for all these years. She's 78 and her health is not great, and this has been a big concern for me. As for my girlfriend, we have been together for "only" 3 years, but we are really tight and have been considering marriage. However, her financial situation and her job prevent her from moving with me for the near future.  The feeling I previously described has occured to me every time I started a new chapter in my life: starting high school and college, when I went to the USA for a year as a exchange student (shoutout KU), etc. It feels like I'm in a dangerous place and cannot find anyone that could help me. I am diagnosed with anxiety and have been on medicine and therapy for almost a year and it has worked for the most part, but this situation has got me a bit shaken.  Every one I tell about the job is very happy and supportive, and this has been my main tool to try to defuse these bad feelings. I'm also taking solace in the fact that I can always take a plane and visit home during holidays.  I imagine some of you have been through similar experiences. How do you folks coped with it? What were the main takeways from these situations for you? Sorry if this is too long/silly, but the simple act of writing this post has me feeling a bit better about the whole thing, Thanks for keeping up this awesome place where we can help each other out.  TL;DR: I am moving across the country for work and also kinda freaking out about it. [info] None [info] 1536199157
KarebearMom [info] My SS had a different tic when he was younger (maybe 9 or 10) he would blink and twitch his eye. His doctor told BM to just ignore it and he would grow out of it it. He did.Now, take this with a grain of salt because I'm diagnosed with anxiety. But I would ask DH to take him to the doctor, or if BM is always the one who takes SS to the doctor ask DH to have BM take him, just to be sure. As long as your copay is reasonable it's worth it to me to get a medical opinion. [info] SS 17, SS 15, DS 7, DS 5 [info] 1541301066
m0nstr0city [info] I need help falling asleep. So it all started when I decided to stay awake all night 2 days ago. It went okay and generally fine. When I went to sleep at the correct time though, I started being conscious of my breathing and manually doing so. I could not fall asleep for the life of me. So I decided to give up and stay awake all night again. I felt so tired in the morning that I just went to sleep in the morning, and it went flawlessly. Now, as you might guess, my sleep schedule is getting messed up. I'm going on vacation to Russia in 2 days and if I don't fix my sleeping problems, I'll have a very bad trip. This issue has been going on ever since and I just can't fall asleep, to a point where I tear up because I just want a peaceful night's sleep to have a good vacation. If it helps, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and am not taking any medication. I just want help because this is seriously destroying me. [info] None [info] 1564179218
DavidSmithies [info] Does anyone else not quite believe its anxiety? So, I've been diagnosed with anxiety. Specifically health anxiety. I've had it for 21 years now, since I was 15.It changes over time. I've gone from being scared of being sick in front of people, to thinking I had bowel cancer to heart attacks, to obviously, now Covid and specifically having breathing problems. I know I'm a naturally anxious person, and always think I'm ill.But there's an odd thing I struggle with. Like I said, I know I'm a naturally anxious person but I have a hard time accepting that all my problems are down to anxiety.I don't get panic attacks. I don't hyperventilate. I'm quite a confident person at work. I can give speeches. I'm not scared of large groups. I don't shake, go pale or faint. I don't have OCD, or come across as a worrier, to other people.I guess I'm not a stereotypical anxiety sufferer.My symptoms are also subtle, and they change daily. One day I could have chest tightness, the next I'll have sweats and shivers. I don't have a known trigger. It can literally come out of nowhere, for no apparent reason.It makes me think that the symptoms must be because of a genuine physical reason. The doctors have checked me and can't find anything.I guess, in summary, my biggest struggle is - how can this be anxiety when I get random symptoms at times of low anxiety!!Does anyone else have trouble identifying a trigger, or have problems fully accepting it is anxiety? [info] None [info] 1586466574
phoenixink [info] On the other side of the coin, being pregnant and struggling to give up that last one or half cigarette a day is fucking hard. I had anxiety in the first place, add in no support and no way to calm myself down, yeah I'd take part of an organic cigarette over me wailing locked in the bathroom for an hour. Next go-around though, now that I've been diagnosed with anxiety ill seek out a different alternative. But yeah until you've been in that position it's really hard to speak for everyone else.Edit: in response to the whole organic cigarette bit...this was my reply: &gt;"Yeah, it's still a cigarette. I am not nor was I under the delusion that because it was organic that it was somehow totally fine. But yeah, if I'm gonna smoke tobacco, I'm gonna make sure it's of the highest quality I can find." [info] None [info] 1431539785
evileine [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder in the past, and I'm being treated for PTSD, but my therapist is leaning towards C-PTSD. She can't diagnose it if it isn't in the DSM; maybe it will make it into the next edition. [info] None [info] 1472656810
ItsJustLittleOldMe [info] I have felt the same as you and I understand your fear but you are probably NOT about to die. (I am not a doctor, but you were just examined by one who said the same.)   :)   I know exactly what you mean about the "before people die" thing. I cannot tell you how many times I have been afraid I was about to die. Trust me, it was a LOT but I didn't die any of those times.You, like me, have anxiety issues that sound like they are health-related. Hypochondria sucks. Anxiety sucks. Panic attacks suck. I know my friend. Look forward to that doctor appointment. I'm hoping it's with a mental health professional. They can help you.In the mean time, distract yourself when you start to worry. Count to yourself in threes, or say the alphabet backward. Mentally describe in detail something very mundane, like the car that's parked next to you, or the flower. YOU can actually experience panic symptoms without letting the fear take control. Don't be afraid of fear. I know it sounds crazy. You can experience the fear and let it pass by, reminding yourself that "this is just panic" and it will pass.The best type of mental health treatment for anxiety seems to be cognitive behavioral therapy and sometimes we need meds too. There is hope. I have seen people recover from just CBT. I have seen people recover from just meds. Sometimes it's a combination of both. Sometimes things get better and then bug us again from time to time and you need a little help from time to time. There is hope.Again, I am not a doctor but I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder over 20 years ago.I hope others will reply as well so you really know you are not alone. There are so many tips and things to try to put yourself at ease when you feel anxious.Stay well. You can do it!   :) [info] None [info] 1439760892
CherryBlossom490 [info] Horrible, untrue thoughts pop into my head I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was very young. I had some challenges with it throughout my life. However, this has got to be my most anxiety inducing experiences yet. And I hadn’t told ANYONE until now.At random, I would get these horrible thoughts about me doing, saying, or being something I would ever DARE do/say/be. These thoughts want me to be very cruel to my friends or do something highly unethical and illegal. I want to be a kind and gentle person, not a cruel and nasty bitch! These thought seem to be trying to make me go against my very nature at heart.I always try to fight back with thoughts that say the opposite of what the bad thoughts tell me. And it’s getting harder and harder each time. Sometimes the anxiety is so bad that I feel like I can’t walk. Other times my head hurts from the stress.This has been going on for, I think, a few months now. And this is without telling anyone due to the fear of accidentally conveying the wrong message and damaging a lot of my relationships and my reputation. I’m sick of fighting this. I just want peace! [info] None [info] 1580901787
gullwinggirl [info] Yep, that's exactly what I was thinking, because I have issues with catastrophic thinking myself. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and it's a nasty aspect of mine. You get an idle thought in your head, like "what if we got pulled over right now?" Then you run through what might happen, except it's always, *always* the worst endings. In the pulled over example, it ended with me being arrested and put in jail. That example happened tonight, on the way to dinner. The difference between me and OP's FMIL is I *know* this is just my brain being goofy and I can shut it down. I don't think FMIL knows it.  [info] None [info] 1436671422
TheWallTheVeil [info] In 2012 I was diagnosed with anxiety. I was a heavy pot smoker back then and because of the anxiety I started having horrible panic attacks when I smoked it. My friend suggested synthetic to help me quit. I tried one and it was ok, went to buy more from another shop and all they had was something a little more harsh than what I was getting used to. I got home and smoked it while cooking dinner and when I stepped back into the house when I turned my head it was like my mind took a picture each time. My heart rate was through the roof and I was sure I was about to die. My son, who was 7 at the time, was the only one there while I quickly called 911,then called my mom to come over. They sent the cops because they thought I was doing hard drugs and then when they realized it was synthetic weed they all laughed at me. The ambulance bill was 500 dollars to take a trip to emergency and it probably took them less than a minute to drive down the street, because that's how far the hospital was. It was all a huge nightmare. Later I started to hear people were actually dying because they were smoking it. The paramedic read the bag and he's like "it literally says not for human consumption on the bag" apparently that includes smoking it. [info] None [info] 1510987519
Lizardkitty2 [info] [tenant - CA] Can I complain about a loud child? Edit: for clarification, the child is now about 2 years old My husband and I have been in out apartment for about 2.5 years now. Our landlord has hardly raised our rent citing that we are model tenants. When we moved in, it was mentioned that there was a pregnant woman in the small complex. I didn't realize it was above and one apartment over. She gave birth about 4 months after we moved in. The child is extremely loud and it has gotten progressively worse as it's gotten older: screaming, crying, and probably what bothers me most, running around so much/hard that my walls  shake. I've taken down my artwork thinking that would help but it hasn't. I work a stressful job and coming home to a screaming kid is starting to really get to me that I'm considering breaking my lease to move to get away from it (and to be able to get a cat to help with my stress/anxiety and she has told me pets are not allowed even after I said I could get a doctors note since I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder). Most people that visit me comment on it. If it was a dog I would be able to complain, but since it's a kid am I just out of luck? If I can complain - any suggestions on how to do it? There is one slight complication though I got a noise complaint for music on a Monday afternoon a month or so back (it was my house cleaners and I have resolved that issue by firing them) and I'm pretty sure it came from her so I'm worried it's going to look like I'm retaliating. [info] None [info] 1534238632
janet_snakehole01 [info] Thank you! I have been diagnosed with anxiety and acid reflux issues, and am being treated for those. But it just doesn’t seem to help. I think I need a meal plan and to make myself stick to it. Best of luck to you!  [info] None [info] 1547487428
Atypical-life [info] That's 90% of my interactions with the public every day &amp; the reason I'm diagnosed with anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1425619599
saffronshor [info] recently diagnosed I was diagnosed with anxiety less than two weeks ago. It’s a pretty long story so to cut it down, I’m a 17 y/o female and what triggered my anxiety was when (yes i’m aware this was a very bad idea) i took an extremely high dose of 2C-B roughly mid february and had a very very bad experience - tripped that i was dead - and ever since, i’ve had panic attacks convincing myself that i’m either having a heart attack or a stroke. I’ve even had panic attacks thinking i’m back in the trip and since taking it ive had a few hallucinogenic episodes that lasted about 20-30 seconds. It’s that bad that i can’t even think of the trip without getting into a state. I was prescribed 10mg propranolol 3 times a day, and to begin with, they helped a lot but now i’m building a tolerance and they don’t really do anything at all. I’m going to make another appointment with my GP and explain this and hopefully get prescribed something else. Does anyone know any ways to deal with this and if anyone could help me suggest what else it could be besides anxiety because i really don’t think it’s just that. [info] None [info] 1523196327
canam_ [info] Testing Anxiety Hey bros,&amp;#x200B;Been wanting to take control of my sexual health as I'm going into my freshman year of college soon. Used an online service to have a doctor order me labs to prescribe PrEP, I'm just having a lot of anxiety relating to getting tested. I've only slept with four guys, and have used protection every single time without exception. Logically the chances of me testing positive are extremely low, but what if there's a chance? Idk. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders so that's most likely where this fear is coming from, but would really appreciate some encouragement to go have my labs completed. Already been ordered so  can go as soon as I'm comfortable. Many thanks :) [info] None [info] 1563846737
WailersOnTheMoon [info] First cycle TTC and already feeling super hopeless (long) I haven't even done my first POAS and already feeling like it's just not going to happen for me. There's just too much bad going on down there.I went off BCP in late December before a cone biopsy. Got the call saying there was no cancer, and they got all the dysplasia. I was told by my gyno that this wouldn't have any huge effect on my fertility and we could start trying as soon as I came off pelvic rest.Well, my periods since then have been insane. There was the withdrawl bleed, which happened right on time, and a period that seemed to come when expected. Then another period two weeks later.Went to my gynocologist who said that I didn't fit the profile for endometrial or uterine cancer, and the odds of ovarian cancer at my age were something like 1 in 100,000. (My primary care doctor said he'd be surprised if they were that high.) Then three or four weeks later (wasn't really keeping a close eye yet) got a terrible period that started with huge clots and flooding that soaked a pad completely, saturated most of my underwear, went through my pajama pants, and left a circle of watery blood on the sheets. The rest of the period was more normal, but had some more clotting. That period was pretty long, over a week.At about cycle day 7 (??? Who the fuck knows anymore) I started Clearblue Advanced Ovulation. The first day I got Low Fertility--which I expected--but the second day it read High. Had a few days of that, then hit Peak, which I thought was a good sign. Tried to BD our hearts out. Got what I thougt was some ovulation bleeding. But then a few days after that, I had some spotting, and started thinking "Great, my luteal phase is a whole five days long." That went away for a little bit, but yesterday when I got out of the shower I noticed there was pink on the tile, and followed droplets of watery blood up my leg. I was spotting pretty badly, but not a full bleed. On my lunch hour, I went to get some raspberry tea and some B6. I'm already taking EPO and green tea until O, but read B6 and raspberry leaf tea can help with luteal defects. After taking them, the blood dried up immediately, which made me think I was doing the right thing.This afternoon, however, I've had light spotting again! And then it went away again! I was diagnosed with fibroids a few years back while on BCP, and have no idea if that could be the culprit here. If so, based on the clots I'm sometimes having, I imagine they're massive. When I asked my gyno about PCOS, she said it couldn't be ruled out, but my bloodwork both before and after coming off BCP hasn't indicated this either time I asked them to test for it (though my mom did have non-PCOS ovarian cysts.) I also am not showing any sort of insulin resistance. I also don't think it could be my thyroid--I already KNOW I have a thyroid problem, and have been tested twice in the last six months, both normal. Which should mean my medication is doing its job to treat it.Basically, I am a mix of hopeless and terrified right now. I know I should probably go back to my doctor, but after being very sure I had cervical cancer for two months based on what my gyno was seeing on each progressive test, I am just sure they're going to look in there and see a hot mess of baby impossibility at best, and horrible cancer at worst. (Yes, I've been diagnosed with anxiety. Yes, I'm now in therapy for it. Yes, I take meds for it ... the dosage of which has been upped twice since all this health business started.)I'm only 33, but as I am staring down the rabbit hole of all these problems I am terrified. I saw my brother and sister in law go through round after round of surgery, egg harvesting, and IVF only to lose their final chance just before the start of her third trimester. It nearly destroyed them. (Hell, it destroyed me a little just watching them go through it.) Luckily they were able to adopt a Native American baby fairly quickly and easily because she's part Native American and all three are incredibly happy now. (I am 0% Native American. And my husband has indicated he'd REALLY rather have a bio child anyway.)I don't know if I'm looking for support, or just need to vent, or am looking for help, or what. I always said after what my siblings went through TTC that I'd never get too attached to the idea of having a child, but waiting for each set of biopsy results and thinking about the very real possibility that I'd wind up being sterile made me realize how badly I really do want them. And now, it's seeming like a lot of things--fibroids, possible PCOS/cysts, my post-op cervix, time itself--might be working against me. And that the relief I felt when I got the call saying there was no cancer and I could still have a family might have been false hope this entire time. [info] 33, TTC#1, cycle 1, fibroids, cone biopsy Jan. '16 [info] 1459893715
Cont4x [info] Long distance relationships are hard. When it's with a pwBPD it's even harder. My ex lived in the US and me in Australia. We were together for just over 4 years and we got to be together physically a total of 4 months. Last year was the hardest year of my life. My ex started showing symptoms of a serious ailment that scared the crap out of both of us. This occurred only weeks after she had left my home for her own. Essentially for over 6 months of last year, we thought she was going to die. There was a lot of complications, screw ups by doctors, insurance being a bitch and some other issues I won't go into. It wasn't until the middle of August that she was given the all clear of any terminal illnesses. However the stress had taken it's toll on our relationship. Alongside all this stress of trying to support her the best I could from a distance, I had to continue my studies in my last year of my degree. My grandmother's health was also failing, work was getting quite hard and as it turns out, I've been battling a serious mental illness for most of my life (I was diagnosed with anxiety depressive disorder after the breakup).This would of been really hard for anyone to go through and I have to say I got through it, albeit not unscathed. She hasn't been officially diagnosed with BPD, I haven't even heard of it until a couple of months after the breakup. As I started researching the disorder, I started to see patterns emerge. I was heavily sceptical that she had it, I even laughed at my therapist when he suggested that she probably has it. Now I see all of her behaviour as just not normal, that it really does match up to someone with BPD. She had a incredibly rough childhood, her father was abusive and turned out he does indeed have BPD. One minute he would be kind to her, the next a demon. When I first met her, I thought it strange how strongly she was coming onto me, clinging to me incredibly tightly. I was coming out of another relationship at the time that really broke me, so the attention was certainly boosting me. Eventually I did fall for her and to this day I still love her. I made plenty of mistakes last year, I wasn't the perfect person to her. I understand now that being perfect is impossible, but I did try my hardest to be the best I could. I do indeed take responsibility for my share in our failed relationship, but I no longer take the view, like I once did, that I was the prime reason for our breakup. She piled all the blame onto me and I accepted it. Now after being on anti-depressants for some time, have to say that a relationship is a two way street. The behaviour that made me believe very firmly that she probably has BPD, is after the breakup. She still was very attached to me, but no longer in a romantic way. She resented me for my behaviour to her last year, feeling like I had let her down in her 'time of need.' So it fell into that "Hate you, don't leave me scenario." I didn't cut off contact with her until last month, when I didn't want to experience the same thing over again in Jan. Basically she met someone only a few weeks after me and was dating him a month later. Turned out he had BPD and the relationship didn't last. However she would tell me intimate details of the relationship, show me pictures and even go a little bit into the sexual details as well "I'm so proud of myself, he's even bigger than you and I didn't even gag". Other things include Me: "What was that noise, your orgasm noise?" (skype call) her: "HA, like you would know what that sounds like." She would countlessly tell me she was struggling to refrain herself from telling me everything, under the guise that she was used to 'telling me everything.'Honestly that excuse is a cop out. Anyway that relationship shortly imploded and she was becoming more and more irrational. It was obvious to me and as it turns out, obvious to her BFF, that she was becoming wildly destructive. When she started talking to me about another guy in her life, was when I decided to just go NC. I ignored all her messages and she did not like that one bit at all. She was becoming worried to the point she contacted my mother. A month passes after I told her to back off and give me space that she messages me again. This time asking why all my friends and family had unfriended her and blocked her on FB. I did indeed ask a few of them to unfriend her, but not block her. However it was their own decision to do so and most of them had already done so before my asking. Even though it was somewhat my fault, she blamed me for turning them against her. That I had somehow demonised her to my family and friends. Most saw the state that I was in after she left me and I don't think she won any fans on those days. I told her that I had done no such thing and told me that saying nothing is just as bad as saying bad things. I tried to keep the conversation positive without any kind of aggression. I told her I was saddened to hear her decision to unfriend me on FB and that I hope that one day we may meet again. Out of that whole positive message she focused on the one word in it that was accusatory to her. I had simply said she had abandoned me, which wasn't a lie, but the fact that I placed a little blame onto her was enough for her to explode.In the coming weeks I saw some posts on her blog that were just massive posts of describing various reasons why she hated me. At one point she stated that I was just as bad as her father, a man that has done horrible things. Even though I've tried my hardest to create space and to walk my path of healing and self discovery. She has taken every opportunity to drag me down, to hurt me when I was starting to walk away. I know she did indeed love me, but I don't think she ever loved me like I loved her. My favourite line she used to always say was "I love you more". I posted this on my blog (She reacted in a massive rage) 'I’d always say, “I love you more” and even though you’d always say, “Not a chance,” I was right all along' I don't hate her, I don't envy her and I don't wish her ill will. I really hope she gets the help she needs, that she finds the balance and peace within herself. That she finds love for herself, rather than trying to obtain it through relationships. I still miss her dearly and my feelings for her haven't changed. But I feel like I'm a used rag that's been tossed aside, because I was no longer useful anymore. I think that's what hurts the most [info] None [info] 1530285420
Throwaway61777 [info] I don’t know what this is or how to go about handling it, need some advice. I don’t know how to start this, I’m pretty bad at articulating my thoughts in this medium so I’ll try my best. I have issues, I just don’t know what they are and how to go about solving them. A little bit of backstory, I’m a first year University student. I’m overweight which I attribute to my “issues” mostly but not fully. Essentially what happens is that normally I’m a very upbeat person, I’ll say hey what’s up have a good day to strangers, I’ll be like that prototypical teenager in the movies when speaking to their parents “Haha funny jokes here sarcasm woo” and with my friends I’m very much a dad in that while I enjoy having fun I also want everyone to live to see another day.While a lot of things make me happy such as music or driving or video games, I have bad mood swings triggered from the smallest things, I’ll see that I’m looking more bloated than usual, or peers from HS that are out at parties or dorming (I’m not dorming currently) I’ll see some of my best friends with relationships. And all of it kinda packs on and for about a year I’ll spend the end of the night upset and sad and wishing I didn’t exist, I would never end my life, but I’ve actively personally wished it never occurred in the first place. I have been diagnosed with anxiety for a couple years now which culminates in panic attacks and dizziness, and my general mood swings can be pretty rash, I don’t know what exactly my problem is, or how to go about handling it, but I’m hoping I can get some advice here, thanks :) (If y’all need to ask some more questions to give a better answer don’t hesitate to ask) [info] None [info] 1547495717
theSuperCyberCat [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety at the same time as adhd. I'm only on medication for my adhd but my anxiety has improved a lot just from the adhd meds. You might not be the same, but it's something to consider. I don't know how taking both anxiety and adhd meds works but if your adhd is properly managed you might have less anxiety and be able to not take a second medication. This is something that you will have to work out with your doctor/prescriber. Having a therapist who is knowledgable in both these areas would also be helpful. [info] ADHD-C [info] 1558146393
GaugeH [info] Script help?  This might be a stupid question, but how tf do you get a script. I know I need it or at least some sort of pain med; and benzos work best cuz opiates cause more urinary problems. I am diagnosed with anxiety but previous drug addict and I think that is on my PCP's transcripts lol that I was a speed user at least       Anyways, I got prostate issues, balls swollen, shit sux ok. I need pain meds but US docs are A-holes about narcotics rn. I've been doing like 4 day a week, sometimes 5, trying to keep wd to minimal. I have contacted several docs, and they always tell me ibuprofen and blahblahblah. I do make the mistake of often saying I need medication? Should I avoid mentioning it at all? Bcz self tapering and medicating sux balls bro, nothing like WDing at work on a weekend after school -,- I just want someone to manage my fucking drugs god damnit [info] None [info] 1493748871
lillyccs [info] Nothing wrong! I’m the same exact way. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, however. I do find it easier to talk to people online rather than in person, so you may just have slight social anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1535062550
moni_bk [info] The crack-down on opioids can be really unfair to those who legitimately suffer from chronic pain. My mom has suffered with trigeminal neuralgia, has had ovarian cancer, and has fibromyalgia. She has a hell of a time getting medication to treat her debilitating pain. The pain is so bad sometimes she throws up. She's tried everything natural, acupuncture, holistic medicine, and just about every medication possible. She's seen dozens of doctors and had numerous different treatment therapies. The only thing that helps is pain meds. Which she has been addicted to and has gotten clean many times over the course of my life. If she hadn't been able to get pain meds I am certain she would have killed herself a long time ago. It's a shame that something that exists to help people is restricted so much that even people that need it have extreme difficulty getting it. I understand that it's over-prescribed and that we have an opioid epidemic, but people who really need it end up suffering because of this crack-down. I don't know what the answer is really. This is also happening with anti-anxiety meds as well. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and take Xanax on occasion to help. I probably only use 30 pills every six months because I actually don't like taking it. I hate feeling spacey and sleepy. However, just knowing I have a prescription cuts down my anxiety in general. I have a terrible time getting this prescribed. Years ago my anxiety got so bad I ended up in the hospital legitimately thinking I was going to have a heart attack. Obvious disclaimer, this in no way suggests that killing people to get meds is ok. [info] None [info] 1501521923
replay1912 [info] I need advice regarding my family situation, it's been killing me. My family currently entrusted me to take care of my grandfather because: one, I am the youngest (I am 17) so it's my sole duty to follow their every order and two, I currently don't have school until next month and three, my grandfather currently stays in the same room as ours. Mostly I just have to accompany him in the bathroom when he needs to pee, which is no sweat. But my biggest gripe with him is that he is very impatient, whenever the aircon's temperature isn't adjusted to his liking immediately he throws a temper, and also constantly adjusting the aircon can lead it to break because that happened when we did that last time. he always wants to be in control, he always eats the same macaroni salad even when it is unhealthy for him and he hogs the tv. But my biggest problem with him is that he and my mom argue a lot. You see, I don't have my own room, my mom and I share a room. And now that my grandfather is staying here as well, my mom tends to go against his orders, especially with the aircon and they tend to fight and argue in the middle of the night.This is very bad for me because now I've been diagnosed with anxiety and my doctor advises me to sleep immediately in order to stop my anxious thoughts. She gave me sleeping pills to help me but I don't want to become too dependent on the medicine to sleep. And because of their arguing, I end up being waken up and after that I can't sleep anymore.My only escape plan right now is to go back to my dorm in Manila. But I currently don't have a valid reason to do so. And also we can't really move to another room because all of the rooms in our house are filled up and also we can't move out to another place because we don't have enough money to do so. I've tried telling my aunt to ask someone else to do the job of taking care of my grandfather, but they keep telling me the whole concept of "utang na loob" and that whole "we wouldn't be here today without him" I also quite resent him because he was a big jerk to me when I was younger. So I don't really think the concept of utang na loob would apply to me.Do you guys have any ideas on how to help me out? [info] None [info] 1469263587
IntrovertIdentity [info] I think what touch my nerve (although I didn’t post anything because today wasn’t my day for it) is that too often, I’ve been taught that “mental illness is simply unconfessed sin.”Too often, the solution to any mental health situation is more prayer or the likes and it neglects what is actually going on.Anxiety is more than just “everyday stress” or “DSM diagnosed psychological stress,” because it can be physiological as well. For example, my internist is my primary care physician. He once prescribed Paxil SR because I had anxiety. As a result, I see anxiety as a medical issue even though most folks see it as psychological.So, when there’s a post that reads “anxiety is contemplating your future without putting God in it” seems overly simplistic at best and dangerous at the worst.And while I was diagnosed with anxiety, I was an active church goer. So, then, what was the basis of my anxiety? Not contemplating God?If you’re trying to make a Successory poster like statement, what you said was fine. But, it really glosses over what anxiety actually is.And when we factor in the immanence and transcendence of God, our relationship with God when we are not feeling our best only gets more complicated. [info] John 12:32 [info] 1550004855
pupbrat [info] I need help coping with anxiety attacks Okay, so I've been diagnosed with anxiety and ever since I was young I've had these anxiety attacks where it just feels like my throat is slowly closing and it scares me, I once described it to my mom when I was small like "it feels like I can't get enough air". They usually happen at night when I can't sleep, and I start to get anxious and I get that feeling in my throat, I usually don't hyperventilate or anything unless it lasts a while because I get worried. I woke my boyfriend up one night and I even had him look down my throat to make sure it wasn't swelling. I don't know how to calm myself down when this happens, it seems impossible because my mind is just a constant " what if it's actually swelling up and you can't breath", Im just looking for like a way to relax when this happens, anything to try maybe. Anything is appreciated and helpful &lt;3 Summary: I have anxiety attacks where it feels as if my throat is closing and I'm looking for some tips or coping mechanisms to calm myself down when this happens. [info] None [info] 1565499570
Lowbacca1977 [info] Heck, I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and it still crosses my mind every time that it's a made up excuse. [info] None [info] 1390559148
mountainsprouts [info] I'm so glad you did that for her!When I told my friends I was diagnosed with anxiety they all said they thought I already knew I had it. Kinda funny now that I think about it. [info] None [info] 1482640041
ahanna5291 [info] This sounds a lot like something I went through a few years ago. It was really intense. I was diagnosed with anxiety and went through some trial and error with medications but ultimately decided to deal with it without the meds. Some of the things I experienced struck me on such a deep level that I'm still looking for rational answers today.  [info] None [info] 1537674253
NYCParis7 [info] Hi I've been through the same. Just a quick intro, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, agoraphobia and obsessive compulsive disorder when I was 16. I stayed home a lot, had 0 friends and felt unhappy and low all the time. And yes I totally understand how you are feeling now. First off, try considering medication for your anxiety. Because for me, my doctor told me that I have too much receptor cell in one of the parts of my brain, so I get super anxious over even the small stuff. So yea, the medication can calm you down and help u in your work and daily life.Next, your living situation. It seems to bother u a lot. So, start to work on it. Try to post more ads online on local forums, Craigslist, uni forum, etc. Maybe work extra hours or get an extra job. Further to that, start saving up. Yes I know u barely have enough to live by now, but just make sacrifices and save up a little every month. Why? For college/ emergency. It's already a good start that you want to go to college. 😃👍🏻 I know people say that degree is not the only way, but in many times, degree is the easier and safer way. Next, your job. But first let me tell you about my fear which caused my OCD, anxiety and agoraphobia. I was afraid of using the public bathroom. I fear people will judge me for doing number 2. I fear people will think that I'm abnormal and dirty. My main problem was MY FEAR OF HOW PEOPLE WILL THINK OF ME. In short, I gave too much sh** (lol nice pun). So yea bak to ur workplace, don't care so much. People do not think of u as much as u think they do, for real! Like kuroky said 'don't give a f**k!' If u really dislike ur existing job, it's time to look for a new one. Stay up, play less dota, and start looking for jobs. Try to attend as many interview as u can. You never know which job has the best opportunities for u until u get to compare them. Finally, I'm not sure if u have been through this. But for me, I do a lot of self-pity. I looked at my situation and started comparing myself against my friends who are doing better, then I start to feel very down and feel pitiful for myself. That same cycle happens so often, I didn't get to my problem and solve it, instead I was just there gloating and getting all sad about my problem. BUT I HAVE GOTTEN THROUGH AND OVER ALL THESE NOW. 7 years later, which is now, I'm 24, graduated, have a full time job, have a gf (which helped me alot in my shitty 😂 Problem). As my father always tells me, 'son, you just need a breakthrough, and things will change'. And it did! You can do it my friend, I wish u all the best. Nothing comes free in life. Treasure ur family members and friends. Help while you can, because u never know when u need the same. All the best, looking forward to seeing you overcome all these and make a post of your victorious breakthrough on DOTA 2 REDDIT. Best regards,Samuel.  [info]  [info] 1537316884
throwaway8329384 [info] This was some powerful advice. Thank you for that. Much better than my therapist could ever do haha.I had quite a few traumatic events that happened that caused people to push me away due to my new found bad reputation.In December, I was sexually harassed by my boyfriend and I's mutual friend's boyfriend (if that makes sense). I asked my boyfriend not to say anything about it since I didn't want to start unnecessary drama but he felt like he needed to say something to our friend's boyfriend about it since he found it disrespectful. Of course, it only came to backfire and all of our friends were coming up to me about it, insisting I talk about it or treating me like a victim. When I refused to talk about it, they assumed I was lying and stopped inviting me to things with them.I had an abortion back in January which caused me to distance myself from some friends since I didn't really feel comfortable talking about it at the time, especially before I had it. I felt kind of like an outsider knowing I was a pregnant college kid. My boyfriend and some friends from high school (who I only see a few times a year now) were the only ones that knew and were supportive of me. This still somewhat haunts me though.I also had a brain bleed in March (not from abuse or anything, I fell off the top bunk of a bed), which again, caused people to treat me like a victim or a terminally-ill patient. I was honestly fine, it was very minor, but the way people treated me upset me. They stopped treating me like an adult and started treating me like some kid they were babysitting. However, my boyfriend was by my side the entire time in the emergency room and ICU. It honestly wouldn't have felt like a traumatic experience if people hadn't treated it like one.Finally, the rest of my friends dropped off after I was arrested in April. It was a drunk in public, so a minor charge. People started not talking to me at all anymore after this. I mean, is a college kid getting a drunk in public really that unheard of? It caused me to lose my friends who I was supposed to live with, leaving me scrambling to find a place. I see how this caused people to push away but so many of them ended up in the hospital from being drunk, I don't see how going to jail for 8 hours was much worse. I even got one of my closest friends out of getting arrested, but she sort of dropped off once I refused to by weed for her anymore.After this, I was diagnosed with anxiety and lost about 15-20 pounds in the matter of a few months. Most of my so-called "friends" look at me like I'm crazy or something is wrong with me now when really I just had a series of bad events in one year. I'm afraid to open up to people and make new friends in fear that they find out all of this and walk out of my life. I somewhat understand where everyone was coming from, they didn't want to be associated with the girl who was a mess.Anyways, enough of my sob story about my traumatic year. I think maybe the reason it's so hard for me to leave my boyfriend is because he was the only one who didn't leave my side throughout this. Other than my family, I have no support system at all and they don't even know about half of these things. I think maybe I just got comfortable knowing I had someone to turn to no matter what happened. Part of me also fears for future relationships I may have. Like you said, I think it would take me a lot to heal the damage that's been done, if I ever can.Edit: One other thing I felt I should add, his friends paint me out to be the bad guy in our relationship. They go around telling people he needs to break up with me and are trying to set rules on how often I can go over to their apartment. They say I'm bad for him because he spends a lot of his time with me and we often party together. They really don't know about the cheating or anything, they just think I'm insecure about myself. Before all this happened, I was one of the most confident people there was. But all of this, along with his friend's comments, really brought my confidence from 100 to 0. [info] None [info] 1566181044
Micropod104326 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety but I can't say that I have it anymore.If you have Clinical Depression, then it could be a result of different physical reactions in your brain. There is a theory called Determinism which I think states that every action and thought is merely a result or reactions between particles in your brain.So that might explain a lot of mental illnesses and other things. [info] None [info] 1498039427
ravenclawspirit567 [info] I'm a hypochondriac: Does anyone have any tips that can help me conquer my fear of doctors? My hypochondria started three years ago (I was about 19). I had a really bad experience with not one, but two doctors in the same week. It was also the same week I was diagnosed with anxiety (by far my worst panic attack ever). It scared me so bad to the point where blood pressure monitors, stethoscopes or anything circulatory system related sets me in an uncontrollable panic. Naturally, when I panic, the doctors can tell and that only makes it worse. Recently, I've considered that I should make an appointment with my doctor and have a routine checkup. However, I can't have the courage to do so. I hate my fear so much, I wish I could go to the doctors like everyone else and not feel like I am walking to my doom. I am currently looking for a therapist who can help me with my problems but until then, what can I do to help myself overcome this fear? If there's anyone whose overcame this fear, please give me some advice. [info] None [info] 1485120227
ImActuallyTrying [info] Should I change my current psychologist I have been his patient for 2 years now. I'm 22 years old and I have been diagnosed with anxiety. The thing is that I don't know if she is doing things right.While I did improve my situation, I still feel stuck, and I don't know if I'm actually moving foward.The things that I don't feel like she is behaving professionally are that first of all, she was my father psychologist for years prior treating me. I feel like she had her mind set about my mother before I even started being treated. And with my father as well.Since my father is the one that is paying my sessions, and knew her, he asked her about me sometimes, and while she didn't got into specifics about me, she still talked with him. And sometimes, he goes with her as her patient.She uses herself and her daughters a lot as examples of what could be done or whats a correct aproach to certain matter.Sometimes I feel like she is a little "aggressive" (not in a violent way) when I do something that I shouldn't have done, or when I could have done things in a different and better way. For example, the other day I got frustrated with my dad over whatsapp and got annoying by his questions about my plans for this year (got frustrated because 1 week prior, we talked that when he came back from his vacation, we will meet and talk stuff). I responded to him saying that he was annoying me. Well, when I tell my psychologist about this, knowing that I didn't handle things the best way, she said something like "Oh come on...!" (it was in spanish so I don't know the correct translation to the expression so I go with something similar). And we procceeded to "disucuss" what should I have answered, me disagreeing with her because I felt like she was asking me to be perfect. I feel like instead of "teaching" me what to answer, she should ask me why did I answer like that, and stuff like that.Other times she starts talking about stuff that I don't really care, giving me examples about stuff that are not completely related to what my problems, and given how I am, I don't feel like cutting her off.Other thing is that I have been pretty much isolated in my house for like 4 years. Lots of times I feel really depressed, and I do not receive a diagnose from her part. The only thing that she diagnosed is me having anxiety, and she mostly says it like it's just fear.Do you think that I should change pychologist? I always felt like there are some big no no in the way she works.Thanks.Edit: oh, and one of my problems is how I feel about my image and my weight. I'm pretty skinny, and one of my goals is to gain weight and become not huge, but "big", going to the gym and so. Well, she was pretty discouraging, saying that given my type of body, I wll never achieve being "big". This is a lie and I always get annoyed by that, because she talks from ignorance. [info] None [info] 1548008920
3Dbabble [info] Same here. I was diagnosed with anxiety, ADD, and DepressionBut nothing explained the intrusive thoughts or my anger at things that shouldn't upset me or my constant need for someone to acknowledge what I have done no matter what it is.It affected and is affecting my relationships and I had no idea what could cause it. Come to find out none of the previous diagnoses had much merit and it was OCD the whole time.It's like a terrible Scooby Doo episode. [info] None [info] 1543547437
ChromeColonoscopy [info] I'm "depressed" Half of my family has told me I'm depressed. I don't disagree with them, however I don't agree.After this summer break, I'm returning to Hell for two more years of it. I feel like I can't do it anymore. I'm fine with school, but the people at mine in particular make it unbearable. Ever since the third grade, I've been bullied. But it wasn't like a gradual thing, it was more like "Congratulations! You're done with 2nd grade! Now kill yourself, you fucking worthless faggot."That's kind of how I've been treated.I'm constantly called fat, gay (because I have long hair), a girl, stupid, pathetic and worthless. I know these are all just whatever insults, but after NINE fucking years of it, it builds up. I'm done. I can't do it. I have begged my family to let me switch schools, but they won't listen to me. I've asked them for online classes, and they say it "doesn't exist." I've openly told them I stress-smoke, and they tell me they're "upset" but it's my choice. They've noticed my cuts, but never explicitly talked about it to me. I've come home from school crying several times in the past two years. I checked out over 30 times in one semester because people give me stomach aches. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, social anxiety and anxiety-induced stomach ulcers. But that doesn't matter. I just have to tough it out. I've considered suicide four times in the past year. I would've done it by now, if I weren't so much of a pussy.With only about a month and a half of summer left, I'm terrified. I need to get out of here. What can I do? I don't want to go to therapy. I feel like it wouldn't help. I can't tell my parents I've considered suicide. I'm stuck. [info] None [info] 1405503551
aitagiantdogonaplane [info] WIBTA for getting my dog certified as an ESA even though I don't need any emotional support? I am planning an intercontinental move in a few months with my 70lb greyhound. I already have a space for him in cargo on a direct flight that is leaving in the evening so it won't be hot. It'll be about 7 hours in the air. The thing is that my dog has really bad anxiety, and I honestly worry that he will not fare well in the cargo hold. I read about another greyhound that was flying and got rabdomyelosis and almost died. Not to mention all the dogs that do die on flights every year. I'm really nervous about something happening to him even though I've tried to plan as best I can. I am thinking about getting an ESA certification from a therapist. I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD a long time ago, but I really don't think I am any worse than the average person. I definitely don't need an ESA to fly, but I am concerned about the safety of my dog.  I suppose I should also note that he is well-behaved. He doesn't bark, wouldn't pee on the floor, and he's mostly afraid of people. If I do it, my plan would be to maybe buy a second seat so the dog has more room and wouldn't be in anyone's way. Or does that make me even more of an asshole? Thanks! [info] None [info] 1556567511
RedditCanBeAScumbag [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorders after suffering for at least fifteen years. And I've decided to lose some weight too. [info] None [info] 1419635382
AOEUIsaac [info] Bignoknow’s content is great (also his dad’s channel Dr. Paul Thomas). He’s also the one who made me convinced me that there is a strong connection between good mental health and healthy testosterone levels. I was diagnosed with anxiety before being diagnosed with low T. It was because of my anxiety that I went to my doctor to get my hormones check.  [info] None [info] 1545253881
EllaCOfficial [info] The first step in losing weight is accepting that it is *your* fault. It was hard for me to do. I was diagnosed with anxiety and it made it very hard for me to find my fault in how I got so big. I blamed my anxiety, I blamed the abusive relationship, I blamed everyone but myself, and it really was my fault. I over ate, my anxiety did not make me, it was something I chose to do. [info] F22 | 5'3" | SW: 174.0 CW: 119.9 GW: 109.0/sexy af 💥 [info] 1489275300
Shelbstill [info] I wouldn't try to self diagnose yourself. I was diagnosed with anxiety last year. There's a lot more that goes into it than just being afraid of the dark, for me.  [info] None [info] 1446640669
89ish [info] Think I’m experiencing sensorimotor OVD or extreme anxiety?? About a year ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and it seemed to be under control up until 2 months ago where I suddenly became aware of my breathing and began to focus on it, was even aware of it when I was carrying out activities, it was there in the background. Well a couple of days ago I went for reiki and got this strange sensation in my throat and now I’m focusing on swallowing. It’s literally all I think about and I can’t stop. Has anyone been through this before?? How did you get it to stop?? [info] None [info] 1546601346
TheSauceSupplier [info] Crippling anxiety on reading section. I need advice... During the reading section of the exam i freeze up and start shaking. I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorders but I'm scared to apply for extra time because of how colleges may see it. This only happens during the reading section of the exam and it really decreases my english score. I have a 600 English and an 800 math. I only have one month to study since I am senior. I will take any advice [info] 1400 [info] 1571448449
BabySchizo [info] Prozac Birth Defect Question Hello.16/f.My mother was on Prozac when she had me to treat her "post-partum" from my older sibling. She stopped when she knew she was pregnant with me, but since I was not planned she didn't know. I am now on the verge of being diagnosed with schizophrenia. I have been diagnosed with anxiety. My mother told me about this Prozac situation yesterday, and told me that is why my entire life I have never been able to show emotion. I was in a car accident when I was 4 and that's when my schizophrenic symptoms started. I know schizophrenia has a hand in emotional processing.I can only experience sadness and anger. My parents have tried to make me happy their entire life. Did my mother taking Prozac cause my inability to experience emotion? Or has my most likely life long schizophrenia been the hand of it?I believe Prozac is an anti-depressant. If it is not, I'm sorry. I tried to google this question several times but nothing came up. That is why I made an account to ask this question. Thank you. My therapists need to know. They do not specialize in schizophrenia or psychosis. [info] None [info] 1572218148
teepee128 [info] I've been prescribed medication and it terrifies me. Hi guys. I was diagnosed with anxiety about 6 months ago, but from talking with my therapist it may go back beyond 10 years. It has gotten a lot worse recently after the breakdown of a relationship and stress at work. I've been doing CBT for a few months now, and also doing some meditation at home. However, after the last couple of weeks I called my doctor and he has recommended some medication  (Citalopram). The thing is,  this terrifies me. Like it confirms I have something wrong and I clearly can't handle it/fix it alone. It feels like a last resort, and if it helps then I'll be on it forever. I'm also worried that I'll never know if it does work because my issues stem so far back in my life. Anyone else have these feelings? Any advice from like minded individuals....Edit: I've been reading the responses and thinking somewhat. I think some of my nerves around the medication is because I feel like I don't fit the mould of anxiety with a lot of those out there. I don't have trouble leaving the house or doing things etc, but all of my anxiety is locked up inside myself and I let none of it out. I think because of this my Doctor hasn't been brilliant and when he suggested medication he was far from convincing that this is the best course of action. Obviously I'm having trouble admitting that I have a problem at all, even though it's been confirmed by doctor and therapist, and I think that's why I feel medication is finally confirming this.Anyway, I feel like I'm going in circles. So, guys, thank you. Seriously. All the time you've all taken to respond has not gone unnoticed. I've done my best to respond to each of you and offer my thanks. I'll be re-reading and using all of your advice over the coming weeks as I take on this next step in sorting myself out. [info] None [info] 1484051690
edmazing [info] I've been lurking a little. Is it just me who starts to blush and feel a little anxiety reading the posts in this sub. I mean I totally relate to so many of these things. I've been diagnosed with anxiety so it is a thing for me but I consider it kinda weird just reading things would make me kinda cringe and feel sympathy pains.  Ordering a pizza and they end the call with "Enjoy" and you just reply "You too." And you end up thinking about it for the rest of the night and every time you see the pizza box. One love triangle and it ended in disaster of no one ever being friends again, it still haunts me... why's life so scary sometimes?   [info] None [info] 1464220474
tay_getsfit [info] Should I take lexapro again? Around the same time last year I was diagnosed with anxiety and prescribed lexapro 10mg, the initial start up was horrible but I ended up really thriving off it. I stuck with it for around 7-8 months and then tapered off as I felt it was no longer necessary. Fast forward some months and the anxiety is back, although it doesn’t seem as bad this time, I am able to manage better and don’t have panic attacks like I did last time. I’m wondering should I start lexapro again or should I just try and power through it ? I’m just sick of the random moods of anxiety that can last a few days at a time...I just hated feeling dependent on medication [info] None [info] 1566467215
weakandbroken [info] What are the odds of having a PE (or anything else for that matter) that doesn't show up on EKG? 20 year old male, 240 pounds, 6 foot 2. I've been having breathing problems and chest pain for the last 24 hours give or take a few. I don't drink and I only smoke once a year at the very most but I do get a lot of secondhand exposure.. No diagnosed medical conditions, and the only things I take for medication are lorazepam (rarely, as needed) and CoQ10 (OTC, not by recommendation or anything). I called the ambulance around 4 AM yesterday, they did a 4 lead EKG, and everything showed up fine so I went home. Symptoms persisted so I went to the walk-in clinic around 11 AM later that day, and they did a 12 lead and everything showed up fine. There must have been some sort of argument between the doctor I saw or someone else because he was really adamant that I go up to the ER to get bloodwork done, but then the other nurse came in and told me since the EKG was fine (save for low T-wave in V6 and sinus arrhythmia, but this was just what the machine automatically detected, not the technician). I got home and got in the shower and came *very* close to fainting, and symptoms got worse so I got up to the ER and because I already had an EKG done, they just took my vitals then discharged me. Around 5 this morning the symptoms were even worse, called the ambulance, they did another 4 lead, and everything showed up fine. Now I'm lying in bed and my symptoms are the worst they've ever been. I would go up to the ER again but chances are they won't believe me, since I have been diagnosed with anxiety and have had a few false alarms (even though I know for a fact it's not anxiety.) Anyway I am really concerned about PE. I have been fairly immobile for a whole week up until Tuesday, and for that whole week my diet was "lacking" to say the least.Sorry if I'm rambling at this point. But my question is whether or not PE can be ruled out by EKG alone, and if it can't, how do I go about them testing for troponin or whatever else? [info] None [info] 1530211538
Trueidentity08 [info] Me? I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD. That’s it lmao [info] None [info] 1559883446
pixelated_dreamer [info] Vain Vicky and Controlling Charlie in: How To Set Your Kid Up For Failure Hi all, it's finals season for this sad college gay and that brought up an old memory. Vain Vicky and Controlling Charlie are my very JNParents who are obsessed with appearances and enjoy controlling me, respectively. I have a bad habit of not asking for help when I need it. This has a slight tendency to blow up in my face and lead to screaming fits from CC. During one of them, CC screamed "Why do you always have to be so independent?!" So I decided to do an investigative trip down memory lane.I suck at math. It just isn't my strong suit; anything beyond the basic makes my head spin. So in high school I would do kind of poorly in math classes. CC and VV were having none of this. They're both engineers. They were told they'd make smart babies, dammit! So they set to work "fixing" me.They forced me to stay after school with the math teacher every day for extra help. Really I'd just put my headphones on and do my homework. It was an exercise in futility, but I didn't complain too much because she gave out candy. So whatever, kept me out of that hell house and got me free candy. But ot wasn't enough. I didn't miraculously get straight A+'s in math, so CC decided to do more. He would go online and print out hundreds of extra problems and hover over my shoulder as I did them, screaming at me for every mistake. Fun fact, I have been diagnosed with anxiety. So you can imagine this just made me mess up more, which made him yell more.... it was a vicious cycle. If I recall I made it through that year somewhere in the B range (no thanks to CC's "help"). So CC, deciding to get ahead of things that summer, bought me some math book FOR GIRLS! (because everything needs to be excessively gendered for CC... I want to say it was called "Girls Love Curves!" or something equally vom worthy) And instructed me to spend my summer studying it. Needless to say I did not.This lovely cycle would repeat itself ad infinitum until I finished math classes. I now HATE math. Can't stand it. And I think we've arrived at the answer to CC's screamed question! When you use something as punishment, your damn kid will not actively seek it out! Thanks for deeply breaking me, guys. Real useful in my life. [info] None [info] 1557129920
Forester15 [info] Anyone else have an issue after a significant loss? I was diagnosed with anxiety as a sophomore in high school. Went to a doctor to get medication but he wouldn't prescribe me anything and instead referred me to a psychiatrist. I didn't find his techniques helpful and was able to control it through my own methods, quite successfully until mid-sophomore year of college when a friend of mine who I was close to passed away. This was back on Christmas. Ever since I have found that my anxiety is worse than ever. It used to be that I only got anxious in large crowds/groups but now I can't stand to be in a car with people unless I'm driving, I don't want to interact with others, I feel trapped all the time, and I have a constant worry that my SO will leave me because of these issues among other things. Please help! Please tell me that I'm not the only one to have experienced this. Tips would be great to help set me on the path to some sense of normality.TLDR: I've had anxiety for years. Got it under control then my best friend died and now my anxiety is far worse than it ever was. [info] None [info] 1373930723
goodfriendfc [info] There’s science behind diet and exercise affecting ones mental health. A lot of mental health is tied to the flora in your gut and people feel improvement in their lives changing small habits and developing a better, healthier routine. Please stop buying the story billion dollar industries are trying to sell you. I have been diagnosed with ADD and put on adderal at 12, I was diagnosed with anxiety as a teenager and prescribed Xanax and then klonopin, I know prescription medicine and the affects. I also understand what exercise and a healthy lifestyle feels like.  [info] None [info] 1522770306
roselove122 [info] Initially I was diagnosed with anxiety, which she did help with. I felt a lot better when I went. I pretty much had a mental break down and could barely function. I was then diagnosed with ptsd, or cptsd. Which perhaps is not something she's able to help me with as the sessions kept getting worse and worse. I would come home and need to sleep for hours to relieve them. I also started getting more depressed and getting worse thoughts. I did bring it up with her, but in our last session I felt like she's turned it around on me saying that I didn't practise the coping skills enough which is why I'm unable to help myself. I honestly don't know if she's right or not. But my gut feeling just said no. Because of some events that happened to me when I was really young, I had really big issues with telling people how I feel. Sometimes I just shut down and nothing comes out. Like my response is just to freeze instead of flight or fight. That's one of the reasons why I'm feeling like I need a break from therapy as I've never really talked to anyone about most of the stuff from my childhood and bringing it up is making my adult life worse as I feel like I can't function.  [info] None [info] 1511236291
katama96 [info] I'm right there with you. I've had such bad anxiety for the last two days after not drinking. I have been diagnosed with anxiety since I was a teenagers so about 7 years ago in the winter time. Lately it has been flaring up so bad after drinking, worse than normally and its to the point where I want to take a long break from drinking. [info] None [info] 1569885600
sundaygrrrl [info] One of the questions asked by my doctor when I was diagnosed with anxiety was "do you tend to get angry quickly?" which was a huge YES for me. I've been on Zoloft for 3 months &amp; have noticed a tremendous difference in that. [info] None [info] 1481309972
PossibleAssHat [info] Okay, well now you have an angle to approach him, really. And I don't mean in a hostile way at all. Do you think you could have a conversation with him reasonably and express your concerns? I'm sure he's probably worried about what will happen when his parents pass anyway.His parents ARE enabling his behavior, and that's shitty. Probably not out of lack of love but just because they don't know what else to do. You said you don't speak to him much? Is he a complete jerk? I'm asking because if he's not, he might really need a friend.It's nice to know when someone cares. I had a good friend that was patient with me, but also helped me out of my shell, really. She is one of the best people I have ever met and I will always hold her in very high regard. Woman changed my life.That being said, don't do anything for this guy that would be a drain on you, but maybe he does really need a friend. It does sound familiar. It sounds very familiar to me. Not exactly the same circumstances, but I felt a bit like I was reading about myself and I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders. I could relate to what you described. [info] None [info] 1430412962
heath9821 [info] I don’t know what to do anymore. Hello everyone. I have only heard about this reddit thread recently, so I decided to share my story. Bare with me, I’m a mobile user and I’m currently crying and panicking while writing this.I’m the oldest of three, me being 21, my sister 17, and my brother 14. I currently live with my family after quitting college. I have been going to therapy and last year I have been diagnosed with anxiety and severe social anxiety. I will tell you, one of the main source (maybe THE main  source) of my anxiety and panic attacks is my father. I found out that my ather was emotionally abusive in early high school, when I joined and became a leader of an anti-bullying program in my school. Being a lesbian with Asperger’s in a conservative town, I felt motivated to help and educate people how to stop bullying, how to speak out against it, and how to get help. In middle school, all I learned about abuse was sexual and physical abuse. I started to learn about emotional abuse while I was in the anti-bullying group.A little bit more about my dad. He sells artifacts, like arrowheads and antiques. He also worked as a manager at a gas station, so he could be charismatic when he wanted to. Not so much at home. He constantly yells at not only me, but my siblings and my mother, which in turn made yelling the only way to communicate problems with each other. Like I said, I have Asperger’s, so sudden noise like yelling freaks me out, especially since when I get home I want to feel safe.He also likes to do stuff for us, only “to pay him in return.” For example, he would make us dinner or gives us money to do stuff, like pay someone else gas money (I don’t drive, it gives me anxiety), he will say things like, “I do shit for you, why don’t you repay me in return?” or “I made you dinner, now you have to do the *insert chore here* because you have to repay me now.” Shit like that.He is also a fan of gaslighting. Whenever he is mad at one of us, he is mad at all of us. He will blame my mom for doing things around the house, even though he makes my siblings and I do the chores while he sits in his room, and my mom is the only source of income. After he stops yelling at her, he will come up to yell at us over something. Like I said, I’m in therapy so I have been more open to tell how I feel in the moment. When I tell him, “Hey you yelling is making me start to panic” or “Hey can you leave me alone? You are scaring me” he simply blames me for being yelled at and lists off the things I have done, like dropping out of college, so he is “justified” for yelling at me. He also tells me stuff like I would be helpless and homeless without him.This year, after talking to my therapist a little while, I have realized that I have repressed some of my memories when I was a kid. I will tell you guys the two that still really scare me to this day.1.) It was winter and me and my brother were out sledding outside. We were going up back the hill to sled back down. Being a shitty middle schooler, when he stepped on the sled to sit and ride on the sled up, I would pull the sled from under his feet and he would fall into the snow. I know it was shitty of me to do, but I made sure he wasn’t near rocks when I did it. Only snow covered places. I thought it was the funniest shit. I was laughing so hard that I didn’t see my dad tackle me, shoved my face in the snow, and pulled me back into the house by my hair. He then made write not one, but two letters TO HIM, not my brother, about what I did and to apologize to my DAD. 2.) Again a middle schooler, I was in the laundry, having a fight with my dad about something. I don’t remember what, but it was probably about school. He then pushed me against the wall and put his hand over my throat (he only can use one, because his other arm was paralyzed in a car crash when he was in high school), yelling at me. I can still feel his hand on my throat.Now, I’m stuck. I have been trying to learn how to drive a car and get a job, but honestly, I feel I’m not mentally ready for it. Not only with me trying to cope with my anxiety, but the fact that his words, no matter that I know he is emotionally abusing me, still affect me. I also don’t want to leave my mother and my siblings behind, because I honestly think that my siblings have anxiety too, coming from the same upbringing as me. I feel so trapped. [info] None [info] 1561407711
amie0401 [info] Did I have a panic attack? So basically, I am currently in my last year of high school and completing my trial exams. I was sitting in one of my exams and reading over the essay question so that I could plan it out and begin writing, when suddenly my heart started beating extremely fast, I began to sweat, felt light-headed, dry throat, restless and sick in my stomach. I had to sit still for about 5 minutes in order to stead my breathing, regain my composure and continue the exam. The restlessness and dry throat might've just been from my ADD meds, and I assumed the other symptoms were also because of them. Looking back to it I'm wondering if I could've potentially been having a panic attack as I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past. However, I didn't have any feelings of 'choking' or feeling like I was 'going to die' as I've heard are usually symptoms of panic attacks, so I was wondering if anyone with experience in panic attacks could tell me if I had one or if it was just regular exam stress? Are there typically varying levels of the severity of panic attacks? Thanks in advance! [info] None [info] 1565511482
vanilla_ice22 [info] I love my dog, but she gives me so much anxiety [Vent] Granted, I am diagnosed with anxiety so I get anxiety with everything. I got this dog to be an emotional support animal for my anxiety and so far I only feel worse. Every single bit of my life now is focused on how she feels, and making her feel better. I spend so much time trying to help her overcome her rough past and feel happy in my home. All the while I am so anxious and don’t know what to do with myself. I just feel so much anxiety building up over time I just want to escape. What human in their right mind wants to escape from their dog? It drives me crazy being with her alone in my apartment all day and all night, because she looks to me for guidance. If I don’t give her the right amount of attention, or I yell at her, she is sad and depressed the whole day. When I see her sad and depressed it makes me sad and depressed because I feel like I’m not doing enough or I’m a bad mommy. I just CANT do enough and still feel okay.Along with being anxious all the time I also feel like I’ve completely lost my identity. All I ever talk about is this dog, I don’t even know who I am anymore. Anytime I go out with my dog, I just start to realize how irrelevant I am compared to my dog. No one wants to talk to me anymore they want to talk to my dog. All the focus is on her and I suddenly feel like I am more overlooked than ever before. She is an angel and I do want her to be my pride and joy, but it has taken so much from me I want to cry. I don’t know what to do and everyone in my life has put so much pressure on me to never give this dog up, but no one acknowledges the fact that I am giving up on myself. Everyone just cares about the dog but I am still just as unwell if not more than I was before. [info] None [info] 1546752039
QuillPenMonster [info] Bad things keep happening to me, and I feel trapped Last week, my cat had an odd growth that he somehow removed. I took the tissue sample to the vet, and the news came back today that it was cancerous. There are talks of chemo, a special cream, or surgery (but this is the least likely due to the growth being on the chin).Today I fucked up and got into a car accident, my own damn fault. The chances are high that the car is totaled.I work at a shitty job that doesn't give me enough hours, and my boss hates me. I was ironically on my way to an employment office when I got into the car accident. I'm still kicking myself for it.A prior medical bill bounced back, and the insurance isn't able to cover it. I now have to call them back, and I have phone phobia.My mother has been financially supporting me out of the goodness of her own heart, especially after I was diagnosed with anxiety. I'm still in school, trying to get my thesis done. I feel like such an inconvenience for my mom, being 26 right now, and it feels like my chest is going to explode with everything that's happening. I messed up way too much, and now I wonder if I'll ever amount to anything.Thanks for reading this. I needed to get this off my chest. [info] None [info] 1560197359
helpagirlout223 [info] No, I’ve never experienced any trauma, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety and when I’m overloaded with stress, my medical health is usually my target. Like I’ll immediately think there’s something wrong with me (whether it be related to my downstairs or not) and it will take over my thoughts for a while until I get over/through what I’m stressed about. I guess that’s not too healthy either.  [info] None [info] 1547559579
-thebritishempire- [info] Yes, I am diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1426532675
tejastaco [info] [Rant] I feel like I'm going insane and my anxiety is creeping up on me again, but faster than ever Sorry if this is inappropriate. I've never posted here before, but I just came out of an anxiety attack and I feel like something is really wrong with me but I have no one to talk to about it. You know how when the tide goes in and out it has a slow rhythm? I feel like my anxiety was going in and out at a slow, low tide, but over the past five weeks it has been out of control. It will sweep in as a flash flood and I'll find myself crying on my living room floor wishing I was dead, then the next day I'm fine. Then it happens again. And again. I just spent the last hour in my bathtub crying and over-analyzing everything that happened to me today. I've always had anxiety and through working on everything myself I was able to get much better. The crying stopped, the anxiety attacks stopped and I felt better about myself. High school was my worst period, when I had to take medical leave because I passed out in the school bathroom during an anxiety attack. I'm terrified that I will go back to that point. I don't have health insurance, so I can't get medical help. When I start thinking about that I just get even more anxious. This morning my tired popped and I missed my first class and I started crying so hard that I couldn't even pick up my phone. I've always been a crier and I HATE it. I feel so weak all the time. I was diagnosed with anxiety as a kid and I just feel like there have been periods of my life where it dictated everything I did and now I'm at that point again. Until recently I could "just breath" and everything would get better. But now it's not. I've been having constant attacks that have lasted longer than what I used to have and I'm really scared. I just don't know what to do anymore. I have exams over the next two weeks, internship campaigns to finish, things to do for work. I can't seem to get anything done. Every time I get a good rhythm down I just freak out. The smallest things will trigger me and I don't know what happened to make me be like this again so suddenly. Really sorry for the wall of text. I think I just needed to write this down. I have no one to talk to about what happening to me and I feel so alone.  Edit -- if you have an SO that understands your condition, how did you exaplin it to them? I feel like I need to take time away from my SO b/c I don't want him to feel resopnsible if anything happens to me or I end up in the hospital because of my anxiety. I lean on him so much and he has become my crutch. I feellike he would think it was his fault if something bad happened to me, but he is making it hard for me to explain to him that we need to be apart for a while until I get better. How do I explain this to him? [info] None [info] 1412739154
min_diesel [info] Having anxiety about my headaches... any suggestions? I was diagnosed with anxiety about three weeks ago, and it seems to be triggered by health issues. My doctor put me on buspar and one of the side effects are headaches. I've also had migraines my entire life. I was wondering if anyone had tips on how I could overcome this anxiety because I feel like my headaches are a lot less worse than my anxiety makes them feel, and I'm really scared I have a tumor.I talked to my doctor about headaches when she diagnosed me with anxiety and she didn't see a medical reason for me to get a brain scan, and my parents won't pay for me to get one. [info] None [info] 1493000943
Prostitwat [info] I went through this when I was 11, it turned out to be anxiety related although at the time I didn’t know what I was experiencing was anxiety. It would usually happen at night that I would wake up with bad anxiety or in the midst of a panic attack and go get my parents. I was diagnosed with anxiety soon after. Just a factor to consider.  [info] None [info] 1548946745
dontspitonyourwaiter [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. I used to take medication for both, but now only for the anxiety as the OCD has lessened. Thanks for your concern about my medical life. [info] None [info] 1398189753
ThanosisKing [info] Employer will not listen to complaints, affecting my health I have had a job in the vision center of my local Wal-Mart for about 16 months now. Our old manager moved on in April of last year and we got a new manager in September of last year. Almost immediately he began creating rules and making schedules so that I'm working alone during peak hours. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and Asperger's and get panic attacks whenever things get real busy and I'm all by myself. All of this is documented by several doctors and has been turned into my employee file. I've tried pointing out what the manager is doing but my complaints are falling on deaf ears. Nobody is taking my health seriously. I complained to HR, to the store manager, to the market manager, but nothing is getting done. They are not listening to my complaints, which I think could fall under the ADA.Any info or help you could give me? Thanks. [info] None [info] 1525954846
Throw_IBS [info] I have IBS and your doctor is an idiot. I went to see my new doctor today and even she said that IBS is a diagnosis of exclusion,  meaning that they have to run tests to see if you're deficient in anything or if you have an autoimmune  problem. I'd suggest, if you can afford it, finding a new doctor. I had to do so because my doctor saw that I was diagnosed with anxiety and immediately assumed that my symptoms were in my head and didn't refer me to a hospital.  [info] None [info] 1476733882
saderdfsdfsd [info] Is it anxiety causing me to be lazy? seems like i have a clue on what I should do to stop being anxious/sad but i dont do it? any advice on what i should do? should i take medication? (Kinda not on one topic but I just need advice on what i should do?) So I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year and a half ago, I'm pretty sure Ive had it all my life. I went to 4 sessions  of therapy, she recommended that I see the Psychiatrist and get meds and that the way I feel doesn't have to be the way and meds can really help. I told her I didn't want meds, I was kind of weary because I know my dad committed suicide while taking Zoloft 15 years ago. But I guess I was feeling a bit better and felt like my sadness/anxiety was just a phase and if I do the things I learned in therapy or I researched to combat my anxiety I will be just fine.I have social anxiety as well as just anxiety about everything, I just worry too much. I've bought  books on how to manage my social anxiety, I try to go by the books on information I find helpful but for some reason I never stick to it. I know if I want to make friends the best way is to join groups and clubs, I go to them I get overly anxious and barely talk to anyone, I feel sad once I get home and realize I didnt even talk to anyone once I go. I been wanting for a job for the experience and just to get out of my house and of course the little pay, even though my mom takes care of me and I used to make money online, nothing major maybe $300 a month enough for me to get extra things. I think I kind of lie to myself and tell myself that part time jobs are a waste of time and I don't want to work a job thats $9 an hour and not related to my degree. When infact I know I need a job because its more than just money that I could learn when being there.( I've had 2 in the past, just were seasonal) When really I think I'm afraid of interviewing, being rejected (like I was last job interview) but at the same time I know I want to because I want to overcome and get rid of this anxietyI don't have any friends. I have 1 real friend but shes older and alot busy. Also girls in my neighborhood where I grew up in are my friends but were distant.  Didnt make a single friend through elementary-high school. I was shy and quiet. Started college and I just met people who  are temporary and they end up just leaving as they please.  No real connections like I ant. I had a friend who I thought was real, knew her for about 2 months we went out almost like 3 days a week, always talked on the phone, even went to Miami together and out of no where she just stopped talking to me. I think it was because I didn't want to her little truth or dare gathering when she was clearly setting me up to be with one of her guy friends when she knew I had a boyfriend. Despite telling her sometimes that he wasnt the best of the boyfriend when I rant she thought that meant I follow her schedule and cheat on my boyfriend when she sees fit. So they are both out of my life now, bf and i broke up but still friends. he's is trying to get my back and telling me the way he treated me was immaturity on his part.After realizing I have really no one to lean and I'm alone I've just been laying in bed all day barely doing anything. cant realize if I'm being lazy and just dont want to get my life in order or maybe there is something stopping meSorry this post is so scatter brained and over the place, but the point I'm trying to make is that its so much more thats just not going ideal in my life and I think I am ready to try medication because I feel like I have nothing to lose? But I dont want to if it is just because I am lazy and I can fix my life on my own, what do you guys think?I'm 20 by the way [info] None [info] 1512334693
NanoIsFam [info] Stomach and chest Issues BIG annoying Hi guys. I’m a 14 year old teenage male and..Two days ago, I began to have a pain in the bottom middle of under my breast area (I’m a boy)It feels like there’s a bubble going to pop there, that’s what it feels like. Likes that area is going to erupt.Then the same feeling appears throughout my entire stomach, but it’s mostly in that area in my chest.I have been farting and burping quite a lot.The pain has not gone away and I have been feeling it every second of the day.I was diagnosed with anxiety two months ago, but my symptoms have started to disappear, so I don’t think it’s that. I’m being told it could be gas or heartburn but really this far? This much pain. I’m 14 years old. Now it’s not so much that I’m dying but it’s annoyed me all day and at some points. I lost hope due to it,Any tips? I took an Xray for my chest and the doctor said my heart and lungs look perfectly healthy.Is it gas? Is it Gerd? Idk.. I can’t tell. Nothing in my throat hurts. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1578538913
ImConfused3 [info] I just don't know what I need... It's a long story but I will try to make it as short as possible, please read I need your help.I've been diagnosed with anxiety 5 years ago (I'm 17). For the first 4 years after that, I managed to live with it. I took some medication and I got help from different people and things were working fine for me. Last year, things started to go really bad. My anxiety started to become extremely severe (for multiple reasons). I couldn't go to school anymore. I decided to go home schooled for my last year and a half of high school. I still have 6 months to go before the equivalent of college in my country. But lately I don't feel good at all. I always try to make people think that I feel good at all times even when I don't. I hide my emotions all the time. I don't like doing that, but I can't stop doing it. I feel like if people really knew what I feel they wouldn't like me anymore. I've been sad and I felt anxiety all of my life basically but nobody knows about it except my family and a couple of close friends. Anyways, I always loved to be around people. I had two really great friends but I always had a lot of people with me at all times. I'm not good looking at all but I always tried to compensate for that with my sense of humour. But since last year, I'm alone at home all the time. The two people that I previously thought were my close friends had stopped talking to me. For about 9-10 months I felt really lonely, because I was. I though seeing people again would be best for me. I worked hard for almost a year and I manage to see some of my friends again 5 or 6 times in the last two months. Problem is, I get even more depressed after I see them. I don't know why. Every time I see them they always say stuff like "I will call you soon, we need to do something" etc... Of course they don't call me and every time I try to see them again they never can. It's like seeing people makes me feel even more lonely... I don't want to kill myself, I love life (not all the time but still...). But I always feel like something's missing in my life. Like something really important that I don't know about. I don't know what it is or even how to describe it but I'm missing something. I'm doing something wrong with my life right now, things are not working for me. I clearly need to change things but I don't know what I need to change.It just feels good to write about it, but did any of you ever felt that way? What did you do?If people that I know ever read this they're going to probably recognize me but at this point I don't even care... [info] None [info] 1368068018
ohmygoditsbeautiful [info] Nausea/Vomiting? Anyone else experience this? Hello everybodyI was diagnosed with anxiety recently (should have been a lottttttttt earlier, but anyway) and some of the worst symptoms are nausea, induced vomiting, and decreased appetite. Together, these are so not fun and fairly chronic. The nausea/vomiting usually happens before anxiety attacks and, at this point, after a lot of meals (big or small, even snacks sometimes). Does anyone have any advice to help with these symptoms? I throw up between 3-5 times a week, feel nauseous way more than that and it is a real struggle to finish any food. It is really starting to negatively affect my health :( [info] None [info] 1571095118
misspurple99 [info] I need help 20 (F). My ex boyfriend broke up with me a month and a half ago. He said I was manipulating him. What I apparently did to manipulate him was I was feeling low one night and I asked if he could come see me and he said no, which was okay and I respected that. Then my friend messaged him being all concerned with how low I was feeling and he said I was being manipulative. He then ignored me for 12 hours and then called me the next morning to break up with me, saying he couldn't do it anymore. In the past he said I was being very manipulative and examples of me apparently doing this is me saying "I'm sorry you don't understand what I'm saying, I'll explain it better". Also another way I apparently manipulated him was he made me very upset as he said a condition I have was fake and I was making up excuses and it made me cry, so I asked if I could go to his to talk about it and he said yeah and I was like "thank you. I'll be over soon, I just need to clean up" because I had been crying and he was like you can't say that, that is very manipulative and if you ever say things like that again I'll break up with you, so at that point I really struggled to open up to him, it made me feel like s*** and it made me feel like I had to watch everything I had to say to him. When we broke up I found out that he cheated on me at the start and i confronted him about it on Instagram direct message and he said I was just making up excuses to blame him and I was apparently trying to make him out to be the bad one when it's apparently me. He's being telling everyone I was abusing him mentally, saying I was manipulative and gaslighting him. I now have no confidence in myself and I am beginning to wonder if its me or not, I really struggle to see positive in my self and I have been diagnosed with anxiety recently because of the way he's treated me and made me feel. I went to move out my flat yesterday and move back home with parents because college is closed and I then went to my exes to pick my stuff and he had wrote me letter telling me how he hopes I get the help I apparently need from being manipulative and he says that I apparently never loved him and apparently I was just an overall bad person and I'm lying to myself. It's made me feel so bad because I'm now questioning whether I'm the bad person or not. He made me feel so low when we broke up that I tried to take my own life. I am just really struggling atm. [info] None [info] 1587586597
squirrlythebish [info] I am at a loss... To preface my tale, I should mention that I have been diagnosed with anxiety. A friend and I stayed at a hotel last weekend. We put our stuff down (I had a small suitcase, which was standing upright on the floor), and we went to dinner. When we got back, we got into bed. Right away, she noticed some (3) bugs. They varied in size, but they resembled bed bugs. Either way, we weren't risking it. We immediately got out of there. We stayed at a nearby hotel for the night, and then, we headed to her home the next day. First thing we did when we got home was wash and dry on high heat our clothes.Didn't notice anything, but I now can't stop panicking. I've been obsessively Googling things, reading this sub, etc. I constantly feel itchy on random parts of my body, and now, I can't sleep.Tonight, I felt something crawling on me, and I freaked. My husband looked at it, and he said it looked like a stink bug. We had found a similar one the other day on our bedroom ceiling.Still, though, I don't know what to do. Am I going crazy? [info] None [info] 1507529532
dontknowhowtotalk [info] I don't know how to interact with people... Sorry if this doesn't go here, I just needed a safe place to vent without feeling like I'm being judged. As the title says, I have an extremely difficult time interacting with people. It feels like I need to see an example of how every conversation, correspondence, or interaction should go in order to know what to say or do. I find myself freezing in social situations and I feel like a total alien. If I can't google how I'm supposed to say or do something and I haven't done it before, I am basically screwed.I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but this feels like so much more than that. Even around my friends(who are very few) and family, I have always felt like this. If it's a conversation or situation I've been in before, I find myself having to reference back to that in order to be able to get through it. I will mimic what I've seen other people say and do. Otherwise I feel lost. This makes interactions at work very difficult. It makes basically any new situation very difficult, and I am unable to do anything I want to do out of this paralyzing fear and inability to do things like other people do. It also feels like none of my interactions are genuine because it doesn't feel like anything I say or do is coming from me, if that even makes sense. It seems like everyone else is able to just relax and "be themselves" and for me there is no such thing.I have no idea what to do and this is making me more and more depressed, to the point where I'm having difficulty doing daily things. Can anyone relate or offer me any advice, please? Or point me somewhere where I can get that advice, preferably SRS-friendly? Thank you for reading. [info] None [info] 1358442937
Cumberblep [info] Just remember you're not alone and not to be ashamed to get help. I spent a lot of angst filled time in my teens and twenties feeling ashamed and helpless. I've posted some more information below. Everyone always thinks of binge purge or not eating at all as an eating disorder. Sometimes you just binge. There are also a lot of connections between eating disorders and OCD.https://iocdf.org/expert-opinions/expert-opinion-eating-disorders-and-ocd/https://www.nationaleatingdisorders.org/learn/by-eating-disorder/bedI've been diagnosed with anxiety by previous physicians but none of them tied it to OCD. So I have some OCD behaviors related to finishing things. For example, I would stay at work for 36 hours straight to finish basic work. I would not sleep during  finals week of college because I was so worried I wasn't ready because I didn't know every bit of everything. So like 4 days, no sleep. So lots of sleepless nights. Lots of worrying about things not being  done. So if started eating something I couldn't stop until it was finished. Sometimes to the point where it made me physically Ill. I would wait until I didn't feel bad and then eat some more.  It's hard to explain now. Especially now that the meds and counseling have me disconnected from those feelings. I also became emotionally connected to food. Like good times called for some crazy over eating and then bad times called for the same. Binge eating disorder (BED) is a severe, life-threatening, and treatable eating disorder characterized by recurrent episodes of eating large quantities of food (often very quickly and to the point of discomfort); a feeling of a loss of control during the binge; experiencing shame, distress or guilt afterwards; and not regularly using unhealthy compensatory measures (e.g., purging) to counter the binge eating. It is the most common eating disorder in the United States.Numerous studies have now shown that those with eating disorders have statistically higher rates of OCD (11% – 69%), and vice versa (10% – 17%). As recently as 2004, Kaye, et al., reported that 64% of individuals with eating disorders also possess at least one anxiety disorder, and 41% of these individuals have OCD in particular.   [info] None [info] 1551631741
taft-attack [info] I spent years paying psychologists, psychiatrists, and therapists to tell me I was troubled and give me advice and prescriptions. I was diagnosed with anxiety, OCD, and panic disorder. I totally depended on these people to justify my feelings, positive or negative... It's a really unhealthy thing to do to your mind, in my opinion. If you think you can work through it on your own, please try. Doctors and therapists will give you diagnoses and prescriptions, but if you help yourself or depend on friends (feel free to PM me if you want) you'll end up much healthier, more confident, and self-sufficient. I was a super hypochondriac and it landed me in the ER for a panic attack that I was convinced was really an episode of diabetic shock. (I don't even have diabetes, or anyone in my family for that matter) After that I realized the diagnoses and meds were just band-aids to a problem only I could fix. Sorry to ramble but i feel like you may be in a similar situation and I'd like to help you avoid doing what I did.  [info] None [info] 1461422053
pokemaniacems [info] Transition: Confidence Issues and Anxiety So I've been on HRT for 13 months now and from what I can tell and what everyone else tells me I'm passing flawlessly. Sometimes I feel ugly and manly though. People tell me that I sound crazy or say I'm prettier then them or etc... I've only been full time for about six months now. It's been really hard for me to feel confident about myself despite all of the affirming interactions and compliments. I see something I don't like about myself and I can't go out for the day. Someone glances at me in the grocery store and it makes me nervous.   I know people can't tell but I often find myself wondering whether or not they could, looking for every little sign I can. I don't find any signs that they do but my brain tells me otherwise. It tells me everyone is just being nice to me because there's no way anyone looks at what I've seen in my mirror and thinks woman... Sometimes I don't feel that way or see it at all... but lately I have more then usual.I try to remind myself that I have nothing to worry about but it's so hard from me. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder years before transitioning.My friend thinks it's just because I haven't been full\-time very long and she's probably right. I just moved to a new town and I'm trying to be more confident now that I'm away from those who treated me badly in my hometown and I am doing a bit better but I still want to be more confident.I'm wondering if anyone else has felt this way. If so, how did you cope with it and what can I do to make myself realize that I'm able to just be a woman now??? Is this something that just goes away over time? Any advice would be appreciated.  Thanks\~Emmy [info] None [info] 1528686313
dankodogi [info] He [M, 15] likes other people. I'm [F, 15] He just said he has feelings for someone else and I'm stressed. I feel like complete and total shit and don't know what to do. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and this isn't helping it. Please help [info] None [info] 1506229972
roseweather [info] I made an account just for this, but it always makes me cry thinking of this. I'll start as to WHY I became a bully, and what made me change later on. When I was in elementary, I used to have friends who would always tease me. I had really bushy eyebrows and had the darkest skin in every class I was in. They'd call me a monkey, a boy, and just things that 7 year old me didn't like. At 8, I was at recess when I began to play with a group of boys, and they suddenly decided to restrain my arms and hold my legs apart. I thought we were playing, but one boy went under me and decided to "tickle" me. My teacher just told me that it was my fault for deciding to play with boys. I went through more shit in elementary, but that's another story for another time. &amp;#x200B;Now, let's flash through my years in middle school. &amp;#x200B;Mentally, I had put a wall around my mind so that I could be able to shut out every negative thing done to me. Soon, I made friends with someone, and I'll call her Dom for this. Dom and I were really inseparable, and she was truly the first friend that cared about me like a sister. But my mental conditioning to the things that was done to me in elementary made me feel as if something was bound to happen to our friendship. That one day she'd get tired of me, and I wasn't going to allow me to go through that. I pushed her away, called her names, and just made new friends to spite her. She was so confused, but it was my defense mechanism. Soon, those new friends went under the same thing. (I truly do not know why they didn't leave me sooner, but they ended up being my friends 'till now. Some of them, at least.) I fought with them, made sure they were vulnerable in our relationship, and ensured that they could be replaced any time I wanted.&amp;#x200B;My turning point was freshman year of high school. I just noticed that my friends... hated me. They truly could not stand me, but they were too afraid to speak up. I didn't realize I was becoming toxic, but I kept having my walls up and behaving like this cold-hearted bitch so that they couldn't hurt me any time soon. But, I began to act like this at home as well. My parents hadn't taught me this behavior, so they were also quite frustrated; they quickly landed me in a session with a therapist. My defense mechanism had gotten so bad that even ***I*** couldn't stand me sometimes. Sure enough, I was diagnosed with anxiety and had a 12 month plan to resolve my anger issues with the therapist.&amp;#x200B;I think I'm better now. That 12 month plan turned to 6 months due to the amazing improvement I was doing. See, I've been pushing people out of my life so that *they* couldn't hurt me. Ironically, having someone to talk to and explain myself seemed to be the thing I needed. I'm a senior now, and the friends I was horrible to saw the emotional improvements I was making. I cried so hard one day because it was the first time I ***physically*** felt my walls come down, and it was so scary without it. But I no longer make my friends cry, and I feel so comfortable around them. I hate the way I was, and I wish someone just could've noticed and said, "Hey, why are you acting this way. No really, *why?"* Honestly, it was a series of events that became my turning point. The therapy, the realization, and just finally removing that stupid mental wall. But I'm glad I did manage to have a turning point.  [info] None [info] 1551076738
AlexZZappia [info] Opinions on my chances of getting in - any feedback is great! I recently applied for a job in the Australian Army. These were my preferences I listed:1. Rifleman (I'm also quite keen on Cav Scout too)2. Airfield defence guard (Air Force) 3. ArtillerymanHere's the problem - I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 9. Since my diagnosis, I can honestly say it hasn't been an issue whatsoever. I was never medicated, I've never once had a panic attack, and I've never taken long periods of time off school (my attendance was/is pretty good, and I've never had to take time off of school because of anxiety).As a kid, I was quite shy and timid, and as I've grown up I've grown out of that a lot. I feel like the military has a lot to offer to me. What do you think of my chances? [info] None [info] 1453078113
livs4drpepper [info] Prozac causing paranoia? I was diagnosed with anxiety with minor OCD tendencies and was given a prescription for Prozac. I’ve been on it for about two weeks and suddenly have started to feel almost “paranoid” for lack of a better term. I feel worried my friends are all lying to me and that there’s something going on and that people aren’t being truthful with me. Anyone else have a similar experience? Should I wait it out (I know 2 weeks isn’t long enough for it to be therapeutic and that my side effects may pass) or is this a red flag? [info] None [info] 1551974533
LokisPrincess [info] I was 19 when I was diagnosed with anxiety and I was put on Buspirone and another thing. I was fit and active with a great metabolism until I was put on that. Gained so much weight, became depressed, and I struggled with my anxiety. I am off it now, and I'm on a different set that's working really well, but things haven't been the same since I was on that. I'm still not able to lose the weight, and curb the hunger. Now I'm 5'9 200lbs and feel like a piece of shit for it.  [info] None [info] 1509015683
psychotic_girlfriend [info] i made a post earlier on my experience with the psychiatrist who did in fact straight up lie. And just to clarify I have been diagnosed with several mood disorders, but since my psychiatrist is a liar I know that these diagnoses aren't accurate. For example, I was diagnosed with anxiety when I have literally no problems with anxiety, and I don't need a doctor to confirm my own experiences that I know are true [info] None [info] 1541279084
gotskott [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and migraines, so it's hard to get taken seriously sometimes ("Oh, that's just you're anxiety causing that.")  I have a weird pain that seems to come from near where I had a root canal or close to my sinus cavity.  Dentist said it's probably a sinus infection.  Doctor said it's probably a dental issue.  Eventually, was given antibiotics, and the pain has gone, but I have no energy and my knees hurt like the bugger.  I feel like an old man walking around the house.Going to see my primary again today, as he said my symptoms show that something else is at work here.  But it's Kaiser, so I'm not holding my breath. [info] None [info] 1443467865
firespitter [info] I have very similar tics, but also all over my body. When I was diagnosed with anxiety my psychiatrist just assumed that the tics were a manifestation of it, should I look into tourettes as well? [info] None [info] 1471396354
Dschulz72 [info] Quick Question I was diagnosed with anxiety(panic disorder) almost a year ago. I have been stable on medication for about 7 months. Today I was stripped of my duties as range coach(TAD) because of this. I’m now heading back to battalion. Is there anything I can do to fight this? And if not, is there a way I can request a medical review board for medsep, due to being unable to perform duties?**i am a seabee** [info] None [info] 1570576743
trashbasically [info] Want to give phenibut a go but I'm scared I won't be able to keep it in moderation Basically I've read a lot of about phenibut and it seriously sounds like a godsend. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 14 and I'm turning 21. It was always pretty manageable and for a year when I was 16 weed was the greatest anxiety-reliever. For the past (almost) five years I've been toking practically all day every day even though it makes me an anxious wreck and I have no life outside of smoking weed and going to work. So what I want to do is grab a little bit of phenibut online, and on my days off during the week that's when I'd dose. Usually my two days off are different every week, never weekends, and they always feel like such a waste. I always have so much in mind but my anxiety keeps me at my mom's house. I feel like with phenibut I'd be more proactive. But I know that if it's the relief I'm imagining to to be I'll get carried away. And I know that addiction to the stuff is no good and the withdrawals are even worse. How do you guys dose in moderation? Be it phenibut or anything else, how do you do it? [info] None [info] 1469489891
coolerthancats [info] How Can I Study Etiquette Without Feeling Anxious? Etiquette is a topic that interests me quite a bit. I've wanted to learn more about it for several years, but every time I try to seriously study it (or even do a bit of light research!) I get horribly nervous, start hyperventilating, and feel like I'm on the verge of a panic attack. My manners are all right, there have been no complaints, so there is no immediate pressure for me to learn more. I'm pursuing this subject out of my own interest, not because anyone else is making me. I don't have this problem with any other subject: math, science, english, geography, etc. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but it's usually pretty moderate and doesn't affect my studies. I have been diagnosed with PTSD, but this doesn't feel like other triggers and I can't see any obvious connection between my trauma and studying etiquette.It doesn't matter if I'm reading a book, learning from a teacher, or listening to a lighthearted podcast. After a few minutes of study I'll feel too panicky and have to stop (the longest I've ever made it is about a half-hour, and it took me another hour to fully calm down). Can anyone explain what's going on? It's been years, so I'm confident this isn't a fluke. Should I try children's books on the subject? Smoke weed before studying? Give up on learning etiquette? See a therapist? Any ideas welcome. I'd like to get to the bottom of this. [info] None [info] 1584157466
livelifelove13 [info] &gt; Would you say a person taking insulin is looking for attention?How can you even draw equivalence to this? It completely trivializes the DEATHS that occur as a result of people not taking their insulin. And before you come back at me with the deaths that occur from not taking pills for these perceived illnesses, try to remember that they are all suicides and self-inflicted.&gt;I have education in early childhood development and have worked with the 4-6 year old age group for fifteen years. I have seen kids with ADD/ADHD versus neurotypical kids. They are very different.I worked in child care for a significantly less amount of time than you did, and I agree with you, I know the hyperactive kids from the normal ones. Why does it have to be a disease or a disorder, though? ADD/ADHD kids aren't exactly rare. Not in the majority, but certainly not uncommon. That's enough for me to say that this is simply a trait of a sizeable chunk of kids.&gt; It's kinda naive until you live it.The reason I posted this in the first place is because I did live it. My parents were determined to find a reason for every one of my perceived faults, including hyperactivity. So I was diagnosed as a kid--and in high school, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder as well as MDD. It wasn't until later that I found that these perceived issues went away when I actually started trying to care about my life. I was always hyper and never focused, but I later chose to not be hyper and to focus. It's all about choice. You and your husband may not choose to place ADD/ADHD onto your identity, but you can't deny that many people do--especially kids in junior high, high school, and college. The epidemic of attaching one's self to a mental disorder can only have negative consequences. [info] None [info] 1490010015
brokensocialscene [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety this summer. It mostly manifests as health-type anxiety (was absolutely convinced a had a brain tumor for about three weeks in August), but I'll sometimes get a general "something bad is going to happen" feeling. It's never specific, but it's an incredibly hard feeling to get rid of. It's the worst. But I'm on meds now and they seem to be helping so that's good. It makes me feel good to see someone else is doing well :) [info] None [info] 1381025414
throwawawaway9 [info] I'm fucking up at school I'm currently in my third year of undergraduate studies. First year was not as great as it could have been. Second year was far better and I was optimistic that I would continue to improve.I've been really nervous and had panic attacks for some years now but it got really bad last summer. I was diagnosed with anxiety and started medication before school started. My family doesn't know this. The first medication I took made me drowsy and didn't really help. When my doctor increased the dose, it only exacerbated suicidal thoughts. I stopped going to class because I couldn't care anymore, and I was just so tired all the time. Needless to say, my grades took a nosedive.Earlier in January, I switched to a new medication and felt a bit better, but the pressure to make up for last semester is really getting to me. I'm not doing as well as I can be. On Monday, I wrote an exam and even though I had studied for days prior, I blanked. I couldn't think. Today the results came out and I pretty much bombed it. I may be able to pull off an okay grade if I got perfect on the exam.People often say grades don't matter. I want to go to medical school though. In fact, I applied this cycle and have one interview offer. I am happy for that but I'm also feeling this immense pressure. I want to get in this year, because honestly, if I don't, I may not be able to apply again next year if my grades don't make the cut off.I'm trying. I really am. I want to get better and do better and no longer have to wake up with my heart pounding or feeling restless when I'm alone. It's just so hard. [info] None [info] 1426107671
AlexamariaK [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety... and was taking a very low dosage of medication to help with it but I quit cold turkey because I felt like it wasn't really doing anything but making me a very forgetful person.  [info] Female [info] 1471026563
ThugHercules [info] Hey thanks for the comment. Always good to hear experiences.I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on a SNRI. I'm having gradual changes through it and realized that ADD effects I had were more social anxiety (although haven't tried any intense stims while on this but imma do some coke soon and see). I've been thinking about getting into meth and speed. Seems amazing for concentration and way cheaper than study drugs. I know I probably won't get addicted (I'm low energy and prefer shit like benzos and opiates way more), just concerned about the neurotoxicity and to control it. It scared me that meth can damage dopamine receptors. My natural happiness/dopamine levels are already pretty low and I don't wanna risk making my natural level lower. Any experience you have related to changes in dopamine would be appreciated.  [info] None [info] 1466364748
that_gingergirl [info] I realize that I am perfectly safe smoking trees. The only negative effects have been anxiety attacks, but there were only a few, and they aren't just caused by toking. (I am diagnosed with anxiety, so, the fact that I was smoking at the time is likely only circumstance.) But, because they occurred a few times while toking, my mind wants to take that as my experience all around, and I KNOW I've had plenty more experiences where I was incredibly happy and relaxed. It's just this silly mind game I need to work through getting over. [info] None [info] 1324767291
easterbran [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety my sophomore year here. I've always made sure I have an outlet to keep me happy when school gets tough (hobbies). One pitfall I see a lot of GT students fall into is abusing alcohol to feel less-anxious. Be really careful with that stuff, I am still getting over my problem with it.Also, STAMPS psychiatry has been awesome for me. I worked with my doctor to increase the dosage (anti-anxiety meds) until it was worrying to me how little stress I felt about classes/assignments. Then we lowered the dosage a bit to where the anxiety is still there (keeps me a hard working student) but does not interfere with my day-to-day life. [info] None [info] 1556115052
opal_ann [info] I've suffered stomach problems since I was in elementary school and in middle school I was diagnosed with anxiety. I attributed any issues I had to my anxiety. It wasn't until I was in university that I tried cutting out gluten and everything was better. I now think that I'd been suffereing from the same thing as a child but no one around me thought it might be because of food. [info] None [info] 1572890662
pbwarren2001 [info] Well, I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder so it makes sense to me that alcohol would make it worse, and that it would continue throughout my drinking. If I was not constantly in a state of fear about what other people think of me in the moment then I would probably be blackout drunk at that point. [info] :nato: NATO [info] 1558981931
Uma__ [info] Holy shit, thank you. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, but I haven’t had the time to do therapy or medication yet as I’m drowning in school and work (so I can continue to go to school). I’ve been making time to exercise at night every other day because that really helps me, but I’m going to start doing these. Thank you so much.  [info] None [info] 1517447283
CaterpillarRage [info] This hits me so hard. I went to a doctor's appointment a few months ago and I just made a mention that my anxiety was making it hard for me to sleep recently and that could be why my headaches have gotten so bad and the doctor totally dismissed me. She started saying that she doesn't think I actually have anxiety (even though I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 19). This was the second time I ever saw this doctor and she didn't take me seriously until I started to cry and defend myself. It was ridiculous. This isn't the first time that this has happened to me and makes me so angry. I shouldn't have to tell personal, embarrassing details about how I grew up and why I have anxiety to get taken seriously. [info] Ming the Clam. [info] 1527017118
Rambo_One2 [info] A few years back I had a girlfriend, whom I ended up living with. Up till that point everything was fine, but when we moved in together everything went south within a few months. I was diagnosed with anxiety, and so I was not very happy at the time. As the manipulative jerk she was, she would try to pin it as my fault, saying stuff like "You've gone to bigger events, you can go to this one" and "well if you don't come, you're clearly not man enough for me."So I put myself through emotional torture, and whilst we were out somewhere (at a club or party), she'd leave me nervous and sweating in a corner, whilst she would go have fun (usually involving either talking to or dancing with other males.)Once she started getting the scent of my resentment of her, she started manipulating me even more, saying that she was the only reason I'd ever go out, and that she was too good for me, that I'd never find another one as understanding as her. I was terrified, since this was my first real girlfriend, and we'd been together for almost two years. What if she was right? Anyways, I started seeing a therapist, who told me that even though she had never physically assaulted me, she'd still consider this a very abusive relationship. So even though it was the one thing I feared the most (even despite my anxiety), I broke up with her and moved back in with my parents. I think she saw it coming, cause she took it pretty okay. Now I have the most understanding girlfriend I could ask for: she doesn't drag me along to events, and if we go, she doesn't just leave me, we keep each other company when the other person needs it, and we even live together (despite my obvious fear of moving in with yet another woman.) [info] None [info] 1502350847
HollisFenner [info] Entering* Thank you so much for doing this giveaway! I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and have had trouble finding a job that doesn't make me extremely uneasy and it has been rather hard to leave my house as of late. Again, thank you so much for you kindness, it is greatly appreciated! [info] None [info] 1399074132
Smitty89 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I currently take various herbal supplements for it, but is a prescription something I should look into? [info] None [info] 1383775442
JoyfulStingray [info] Yes.  I had one and found a different workplace.For 3 years, I had a job in a very high paced environment with a bunch of military guys.  If they told you that they needed that product in 3 hours, you had better have it done in 2.5 and NOT BE LATE.That kind of anxiety to give a worthwhile product in such short amount of time was crippling.  I went to the bathroom and just cried or tried to calm down from a panic attack.I started medication when my SO said that I wasn't like myself and I was diagnosed with anxiety.  Medication helped, but finding a slower paced work environment worked wonders.  I started at my new job in January where instead of creating a product in 3 hours, I am given an entire month...or longer. [info] ♀ [info] 1445000173
cuhooligan [info] It may.. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder but I don't think it's very strong. Took Lexapro for a bit. Didn't like it so much. [info] None [info] 1379344958
TheSoundOutside [info] You're absolutely right. And I have been diagnosed with anxiety, many years ago as a teen. I guess it's hard to reconcile the pervasiveness of anxiety in my everyday life and the panic attacks I seem to have very rarely now. Therapy is a ways off, at least until I get insurance.  [info] None [info] 1378998665
pwp91 [info] help needed, can't cope with my sister Hi, this may be a long story, so apologies for that.Around a year ago my sister was diagnosed with an eye condition, it left her with sore, red, dry eyes. She managed to get a new job after years of trying just after the problem started and so left her old job, giving her a few weeks break in between to recover. She went into the first day of her new job and was thinking about jumping in front of a train on her way back. At this point, she hadn't left the house in a few weeks and was so self-conscious that she could not deal with being around people she didn't know. This sparked off a massive downwards spiral, and this was in April of this year. Since this, she has not been out of the house socially and only goes out for appointments or maybe to a shop once every two weeks or so. She doesn't dress in anything but tracksuits and does nothing with her days. My mum took the first two months that this was happening off work, as we were terrified to leave her as there have been two other suicide attempts since the thoughts at the train station. The problem is, her eyes have recovered. They may still be slightly more veiny than they were to begin with, but in all honesty they look better than the majority of my family's! We try to tell her this but she doesn't believe us. She just cries and cries. She stays in all day and she genuinely believes that she looks hideous and that people will judge her when she goes outside. This is now having a massive impact on me, I have been diagnosed with anxiety following this all starting and I don't know what to do. I'm crying most days and its never off my mind. I can't tell her, because every time I have tried to it just makes her worse. I'm too scared to upset her in case she tries something again. She is currently having CBT therapy, although it just isn't doing any good. She honestly doesn't believe that this is a problem mentally and therefore she will not try to correct it, all she wants is for her eyes to "get better". Its such a hard position to be in. This has been going on for almost a year now and things haven't got better at all. She is nothing like she used to be and my whole family is feeling a strain that we cannot deal with. I am only 23 and my boyfriend lives on the opposite side of the country, and I am left feeling like I'm not allowed to be out of the house for longer than a few hours because as my parents put it, she is "so much better" when I'm around. It's too much pressure to feel that if she is down and crying when I'm not there then I am being blamed for itI would be so grateful for any kind of advice. If there is something I haven't explained too well then please feel free to ask. [info] None [info] 1417722781
xuchy [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was about 10 years old. Just like Bill, I wish I could have known about mindfulness and had access to other methods back then aside from medication. My attacks were just as crippling as they were numerous - at one point causing me to miss several weeks of school in my senior year. Almost two decades later, I finally feel as though I'm regaining control of myself through daily meditation, exercise, cognitive therapy, and a better dosage of my meds. If you're in the same boat as Bill, myself, and many others in this thread: keep moving forward and remember you are not alone. You are so much more than just your thoughts and reactions. The past is behind you and the future can't be seen - but you have so much power to tap into in this very moment. Anchor yourself to the "gift" of the present. Stay strong, friend. You will get through this! [info] None [info] 1567395145
little_kid13 [info] What is life like with schizo? I saw a psychiatrist due to some of my symptoms were similar to schizophrenia, but it turned out that I was diagnosed with anxiety, and now I take meds for anxiety and feel alot better. But a part of me worries that I might get it when I'm older, (like those schizophrenia stories about a normal college kid that experiences a sudden onset of psychosis and schizo) and I worry that may happen to me. I keep telling myself that it's probably my anxiety just acting up, but then I thought, if I do get schizo when I'm older, how would I live well? I wouldn't be able to attend school, college, uni or work and then I won't be able to do well or sustain my job, then I'll  become a hobo and die early. But for you guys, how do you live with schizo? How do you keep your job and how do you do in school etc? Don't you worry about it? About missing out and losing everything? I know some of you might live with your families, but what if my family dies or becomes poor too? I wonder how you guys cope with it, you guys are awesome [info] None [info] 1519769181
mysweetunvalentine [info] Help? this might be long so bear with me. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 6 years old and I am now almost 20. I had a traumatic childhood and was often put in very stressful situations at a very young age. I haven’t seen a doctor for this since I was very young and therapy really did not help for me. My anxiety is so severe I am unable to get a job or get my license. I have no energy to do anything and I have no motivation to do the things I used to love doing. I often have headaches and get nauseous along with my heart racing and my hands shaking. For one example I can see a fake news article or someone on a show I’m watching could have cancer and my mind would instantly start to worry and panic that I have cancer or that the news article was true and I will worry and worry and make myself sick about that thing until I find something even greater to worry about and it’s a huge cycle of worrying until I find something else to worry about. Even when I have nothing to be worrying about I still feel on edge and almost always have that sick shaky feeling. I am very easily startled by loud or sudden noises and movements and my mind automatically assumes the worst of every situation. My husband works everyday so I’m home alone all day almost everyday and my anxiety has gotten to a point where I’m now terrified to be home alone and I even have panic attacks in my own home over nothing at all. It’s also affecting my sleep, I have a really hard time falling asleep and staying asleep also this sounds so stupid but if I’m worrying about one thing and something I see or hear can in anyway coincidentally be related to what I’m worrying about I think it’s a”sign” that something bad is going to happen.I honestly can’t handle trying to manage my anxiety on my own anymore and I’m lost on what to do, I’m not against medication but I’m kind of scared of the idea. Any sort of advice would be helpful. [info] None [info] 1576833404
shelzmike [info] OK. For starters, I do know exactly the type of experience you had and described. In fact, before my anxiety become a "disorder" I partied...A LOT. And I don't mean drinking bc I never really did that. I mean everything else. I had my first "breakdown", knock down, drug out panic attack and the only time I have ever been rushed to the hospital in an ambulance. That was almost half my life ago, am now 38. I am what one would consider a highly experienced anxiety having person :)Looking back, I have remembered different points where I had panic attacks or anxiety and didn't put 2 and 2 together. I always just chalked it up to being really messed up on [insert drug name here]. I believe my very first ever panic attack was when I was 19 and tripping on DXM. Had done it many times previously, but this time I was just sitting watching some cartoon, like you were, and suddenly became aware of my breathing and then got really hot and had to run outside and felt really crazy. Again, I was able to sort of brush it off as part of the effects of what I was on.Another one I did a lot of was LSD and there were plenty of times where I was just gone and never really had a "bad" trip (except one time after I was diagnosed which was the last time). Here is the thing...what you felt...SO MANY people feel when on LSD, so much so that it is quite normal. What isn't usually as normal is the anxiety continuing on afterward so intensely as you have described. Here are some facts that may help you better understand anxiety and panic attacks. For starters, every single person ever born and lived has had anxiety experiences and a lot have even had panic attacks (more have had panic attacks than have panic *disorder* if that makes sense). The reason why? It is because it is this is a very primal, inherently biological process our bodies go through - animals have these same processes as well and for very good reason...for survival. Problem is, as humans we do not need anxiety and adrenaline in this manner much any longer. We are not running from animals that are trying to kill us for lunch any longer, but we still have it. (Don't get me wrong, adrenaline is still a VERY good thing to have in many life situations).Many people can have anxiety symptoms and even panic attacks and move on from it and not really give it any further thought. There are some people, however, that have a propensity to develop a problem in their lifetime with anxiety. It usually develops in late teens and early 20s and most think they never had problems with it in the past.When you say that you have problems with roller coasters, small rooms, etc. those are signs of anxiety issues honestly. And it boils down to this and the story will come full circle...it comes down to control. Now, I don't mean we are control freaks, because that is not what I mean. What I do mean is that we do not like situations where there is a perception of being out of control of what happens which starts the "what if" thoughts. As anyone with anxiety what their triggers are and I guarantee it will center around things they don't feel in control of (and some of them we validly can't control). Examples are being stuck in traffic, health anxiety issues, elevators, being in the middle of a big crowd, etc. Most likely what caused your spiral is that when you were in the midst of your acid trip, you felt out of control. This starts the anxiety spiral and then panic attacks. Panic attacks suck, terribly. They never get "better", or rather I mean they are as intense when you first start having them  as they are 20 years later. Again, this is by design of our nervous system reactions. They would be less effective in that natural intended purpose if they were. They do, however, get a little easier to deal with since you have perspective. Here is where I see you at currently though. You are stuck in the "cycle" of fear (which is what anxiety really is). You had anxiety...that lead to a panic attack...which was frightening...you are scared of having another one..which causes anxiety...which causes, you guessed it, another panic attack. This constant cycle of fear is what keeps the fear and anxiety going! Whew...that was a lot to take in, I know. (And that is the short version!) Let me tell you this though, if it should help. Seeking knowledge on the subject is SO important. Additionally, seeking therapy, especially so early on in the problem, is very key. Thirdly, and this is just my experience and opinion...if you can possibly do it, refrain for jumping immediately on the SSRI train. They can be helpful for some, but most who have taken them and then stopped are very vocal about why. They are not a cure and should never be presented as such. They are merely a coping strategy that should be used only in conjunction with working with a therapist to learn to understand and cope with the anxiety. They certainly can dampen the feelings, but the side effects, again in my opinion, can make things unpleasant. The thought that you are going crazy? You are not (we all felt this was at one point or another and it simply is not true).Will you be like "this" forever. No, and sort of...what I mean is, this terrible impending doom fear cycle will not last forever. Having the propensity to deal with anxiety more than others...quite possible. I am not going to sugar coat that. Does that mean you will never amount to anything or live a terrible, shuttered, fearful life? Absolutely NOT! There is way more hope than that. My story is a long one, but I will fast forward to now. I am 28, been married for 13 years, raised 3 kids, (2 of whom are out on their own now, and my 9 year old daughter), own a home, three cars, worked my way up from a fast food restaurant job to where I am at now - 2 bachelors degrees later - as an IT Executive for a Global Fortune 500 company. Everything I ever have done meaningful to get to the point I am right now, I did AFTER I was diagnosed with anxiety/panic attacks/agoraphobia/health anxiety. It was not easy, but life is not easy in general. I am here...and I deal with anxiety on a daily basis. But that is just it, I deal with it. You learn as you go and again, the best thing you can do is get as knowledgeable as you can and try everything you can to learn to live WITH it not live in fear of it. It will happen.Bottom line, my experienced thoughts can be summed up like this - anxiety is imagination used the wrong way. Anxiety is a *thinking* disorder mainly. Keep following through with your plans for talking with someone and it sounds like you will be just fine :)  [info] None [info] 1479619371
whoopsimdreaming [info] I was born into a Christian family, but I considered myself an athiest anyways until I was diagnosed with anxiety. I tried many different coping mechanism and praying + turning to spirituality was THE most effective of any I tried. Few monthes later, my therapist told me my anxiety disorder went from severe to very mild!  [info] None [info] 1551662485
IndividualSchedule [info] Good point. I wish people would recognize it more and don’t potentially and maybe unintentionally normalize social anxiety. Me being introvert, I was diagnosed with anxiety and symptoms of social phobia years ago (along some other mental illnesses).Now I really struggle to recognize if it’s me being introverted or me being symptomatic. And it’s so hard to live like this. Sometimes I know when it’s symptoms of social anxiety and when it’s being introverted.And I really wish more people with potential social anxiety would rather seek help than just say “oh I’m introvert, I’d rather stay alone.” it just deepens the social anxiety. In both cases it’s important to get out of our comfort zone, get nice doze of social interaction and then recharge and do it again. Of course social interactions with rather positive energy. [info] None [info] 1554677110
nimaf2000 [info] &gt;Did you ever consider... it's just anxiety?I have considered this but one day I wake up happy and relaxed and the next day edgy and wired. I am in a stressful part of my life but this happens specifically when I go on keto.&gt;As opposed to purely energy or emotional or? I'm not sure how this distinction helps.All I mean is that I don't think it is anxiety. My evidence is that I don't get it when I am on carbs. I was diagnosed with anxiety two years ago but I never took meds as it coincided with the sudden positive changes that I saw when I went gluten free/low carb. But I guess I need to go see a professional as my life is being really affected by this whole thing.&gt;Is your AD[H]D self-diagnosed? If it isn't, then I'm surprised you would be caught unawares about the "being driven by a motor" feeling.It is self-diagnosed. Carbs make me too slow and inattentive and super sleepy if taken during the day but not hyperactive. In the meanwhile I just drank two cups of bouillon so I am set for sodium today :)Thanks a lot for the input [info] None [info] 1499780537
undesirabledesire [info] Does/Can Anxiety Make You Stupid/ Lose Common Sense? Hey guys. I'm new to this platform, and I created an account just to address this issue that has been bothering me for a while; please take time to read and reply, any help would be appreciated. Anyway, I'm a 15 year old female, and a few months ago I was diagnosed with anxiety after going to the psychologist because I was experiencing brain fog and a sort of brain "blockage". This brain fog (which made me feel dumb) noticeably began after I failed a math test and couldn't answer easy questions that many other people could. Throughout my life, I have never had any hobbies, and my only redeeming quality, quite literally, is my higher than average intelligence, common sense, logic, good academic performance, those sorts of things. My hugest goal was always to be admitted to a good university, one on the level of a mid-high tier Ivy. After the brain blockage began, I always was afraid that I was becoming dumb, but my "feeling" of becoming dumb didn't really affect anything. However, recently, I began doing poorly on quizzes and test for summer schools, and got questions wrong that my peers found easy. The mistakes I made were unacceptable, not "careless" mistakes, but ones where my brain literally did not and could not think enough. I also found that I literally had a harder time understanding and processing information. Because of this, (the possibility of me ACTUALLY losing my intelligence/common sense and ability to do well on tests etc), I have been constantly miserable. This may seem a trivial matter, but my life revolves around my performance in school, and the prospect that once I get into a good university, I will be able to be successful and gain a purpose, has always kept me motivated. To lose my entire's life purpose makes me depressed. I'm afraid that I will become/am becoming cognitively impaired, losing my intelligence, logic, and common sense. **Does this seem like anxiety? Is it possible that I am overthinking? I know that anxiety makes people** ***feel*** **stupid, but does my situation seem like its my anxiety that's actually making me** ***think*** **stupid?** I've gone to the doctor, but obviously no doctor would care about a claim of becoming stupid as long I didn't lose my ability to move a leg or speak or something. I'm very very worried. If I actually lose my only redeeming quality, I'm honestly contemplating killing myself, because there would be no other purpose in life. Thank you for reading, and again, any help would be appreciated. [info] None [info] 1533095375
Die-Hard188 [info] How to deal with anxiety Two years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. During that time I had a lot happen to me in the span of 1 month. It took a month to realize I needed help and 4 months to quit the medications. For 2 years I was good now there was some times that I’d get panic attacks but I got through it. Now present day I’m in college (about to graduate in a year) a loving gf new car two jobs I love (main one in the field I’m studying the other as a cook both part time). It seems all fine and I am happy but my jobs kinda cut my hours my main one im on call all the time to fill in shifts for full timers well no one has been taking off that fits my schedule. The cooking job is at a golf course and with the seasons changing I’ve been getting called off. It’s been a struggle to pay for my car phone and insurance and because of that struggle I’ve been losing sleep and slowly the panic attacks have been coming back. My parents say they will help and my gf has tried giving me money but I always feel like a financial burden. The other day I had a horrible panic attack on the way back from a wedding with my gf. She walked into the house and I almost collapsed from not being able to breath and started throwing up. I had to tell her what was going on that my anxiety has been sneaking up on me. She told me get help get on medication. I don’t know if i feel if I go to get help it’s a stigma in the profession I’m going into because I have to be able to take stress (and when I work in the field I can take the stress of that work) or if its something else but I don’t want to. I want this to pass but I don’t know how to get better if I have to get back on medication I will but i really don’t want to. So what do I do [info] None [info] 1569896162
mespdx [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety which I think is a huge aspect contributing to this problem. My therapist is out of town but I made plans to meet with her when she gets back. We definitely had a rough (in a good way lol) sex life before, you gave me some good ideas on how to bring that back. Thanks! [info] None [info] 1510002675
xxsupernova99 [info] Overcoming differences in (phone) communication styles in my (20F) relationship with my boyfriend (20M) that has almost led us to break up So me (20F) and my boyfriend (20M) have been together for almost a year now. We go to the same out of state college and live about 35 minutes away from each other in our home state. When we're together, things are usually great, a couple fights here and there but nothing relationship ending.The problem comes when we're apart. Because of different situations at home we don't get to see each other often, maybe once a week or every other week, which is a big jump from seeing each other for hours every day at college. I have a hard time adjusting to the change over breaks, and especially now that we've been sent home early for the semester because of the coronavirus outbreak. When we can't see each other in person, the only way we communicate is through texting/calling/facetime. I am personally someone who checks my phone a lot and I text everyone back pretty quickly because I don't see the point in not responding if I've read the message. On the other hand, my boyfriend can go hours without being on his phone. I've been diagnosed with anxiety (which he knows as well) and not hearing from him for a long time makes me concerned that something happened to him, even if I reasonably know that nothing did. It also makes me feel like he doesn't want to talk to me or miss me in the same way that I miss him.We've gotten in multiple arguments before that have led to us almost breaking up because I was unhappy with him not paying attention to me (texting or calling regularly) and he didn't see the issue because he just doesn't use his phone like that. I wanted to end things with him because I was tired of feeling like the effort I put into our relationship wasn't being reciprocated. He begged me not to leave him and promised that he would do better. Because I wanted to try and work it out,  we established some basic parameters that we'd call each other every day and that we'd let each other know in advance  if we had something that would be occupying us/make us unable to answer the phone for an extended period of time. This improved our relationship improved a lot, especially during times when we weren't at college together. However, now that we're home again, he's starting to slip back into his old habits of not answering the phone and getting upset with me when I reminded him of what we agreed to. This gives me the same awful feelings it did in the past of him not caring about me and my feelings, even though my boyfriend has promised me that it's not that. How can I reach a compromise with him on talking/texting? I don't want to overreact to him ignoring my calls, but it's the principle that he's going back on what we both agreed upon without saying anything or asking to readjust what we determined that makes me so upset.Edit: Yikes, I don’t expect him to fix my anxiety. I’m on anxiety medication and I see a counselor for it and every day I work with my issues. In no way do I think that my boyfriend is responsible for making all my anxiety go away, I mentioned it as something that we both know impacts the relationship and should be taken into account. I did not mention any mental health issues that my boyfriend goes through because mental illnesses shouldn’t be weaponized in a relationship. They’re something that you have to work with to understand and support each other while you’re also working on improving yourself. Please don’t single that out as the only thing you take away from my post, because it isn’t the main issue. Thanks ♥️ [info] None [info] 1584549102
jimbob320 [info] Anyone else experienced this or have any advice? Hi guys, I have been diagnosed with anxiety and sometimes have panic attacks where I can't move my limbs. I also feel sick, dizzy, and dissociated all the time, but never anxious. I have no feelings of worry or anxiousness in the traditional sense. This makes it really hard for me to target the source of the anxiety and try to tackle my problems. Has anyone had experience with similar symptoms? How did you overcome them? Thanks. [info] None [info] 1557950539
Anxietee [info] Anxiety/self loathing is taking over my life, can anyone please advise me on how to break this cycle I recently posted in /r/sex about how I've been diagnosed with anxiety in the past month and how it's affecting my sex life (inability to get aroused.) This isn't the only problem it's causing but it obviously plays a big part.Let me start by saying that I know I have next to nothing to complain about in my life, I'm a very lucky person and I appreciate everything I've got; whether that be family, friends, my upbringing, opportunities I've been given and so on, I really am fortunate when compared to a lot of people. I am a 22 year old male, in my 3rd year of university studying Biology and anxiety/self confidence is really getting me down.I exercise 5 days a week, don't drink more than once a fortnight and recently (a month ago) stopped smoking weed because I thought it could be exacerbating my anxiety. Now I've started seeing a girl, around 3 months ago and I'm stupidly attracted to her, her personality and looks are incredible. For as long as we've been hooking up I have been unable to have sex due to my anxiety and it's only getting worse. This downward spiral is all I've been thinking about and it's causing me to doubt the strength of her feelings towards me. She doesn't give much away in terms of how she feels and has a very casual demeanour so I feel simply asking would risk putting her off.My self confidence has hit rock bottom recently and I can't see any reason why she would like me if I'm not able to satisfy her sexually, I don't feel like I offer anything else other than negativity and it's causing me to stress constantly. I'm debating telling her I can't see her anymore and giving up because the stress of not performing sexually coupled with the thoughts that I have nothing to offer are far too stressful and I don't know how to deal with it.These thoughts/doubts have left me feeling pathetic and emasculated, I have tried to tell a few people but they think I'm being dramatic/don't really understand. I don't really like talking about it because over the years I've built up a front where people would assume I'm really confident within myself and outgoing. I think this also causes people to assume I'm falsifying what I say because it doesn't seem like me at all.Can anyone please advise me on how to stop this cycle? Thanks.**tl;dr:** 22 year old, stuck in a downward spiral of anxiety and self loathing. Not sure whether to break off a possible relationship because of the stress I'm under [info] None [info] 1425947061
TyphlosionGirl [info] Rant about a liar You're probably going to see this, you're probably going to know this is about you, but you know what, it is what it is. Im tired of it and I've BEEN tired of it.You shouldn't have lied about your miscarriage. You saw a fetus in the toilet? You said you were pregnant for three weeks. THREE WEEKS. Did you really think I believed that?On top of that, then you suddenly had fertility problems? I don't think you understand how angry this comment of yours made me after I realized you were probably lying, because there is a good chance that I WILL. And suddenly: BREAST CANCER. Out of fucking no where. Are you getting treatment for it? No, of course you aren't.And then after breast cancer it's diabetes. And also heart attacks. Which someone calmed you down from. NEWSFLASH: YOU CANNOT BE CALMED DOWN FROM A HEART ATTACK. But it wasn't a heart attack right? It was an anxiety attack, yeah, an anxiety attack because that sounds more believable...until I mentioned that I have been diagnosed with anxiety problems, then you just drank too much caffeine.Then it's Asthma, water in your lungs, and ovarian cysts.You know what you have? MUNCHAUSEN SYNDROMEAS IN, YOU FAKE YOUR FUCKING DISEASES FOR ATTENTION.Y'know, with that many problems in one year with no treatment, YOU WOULD BE DEAD. But enough about your fifty fucking diseases, now we gotta talk about your love life.We both know your main crush. He knows it too. And you know what you did? YOU LIED ABOUT THAT TOO. I FUCKING ASKED HIM MYSELF BECAUSE IWASCONCERNEDFORYOUAND THEN I FOUND OUT YOU WERE LYING THROUGH YOUR FUCKING TEETHCan't forget that you tried to hit on every single guy friend of ours, and our girl friend (Friend who is a girl, not date/relationship, obviously). Oh, and THEN you told her that MY BOYFRIEND AND I WANTED TO HAVE A THREESOME WITH HER? WHAT THE FUCKING FUCK. WHY WOULD YOU MAKE UP THAT LIE? FOR WHAT PURPOSE IS THAT.Better yet, why lie about anything? Why hint that you're dating two guys who we both know you're not dating? Why do that and then get ANGRY when I call you out on it? Well you know what, if i'm on your dark side, fine, i'll deal with that. At least you won't be lying to me anymore. [info] None [info] 1414033603
alrohly [info] Can anxiety result from misophonia? I'm new to this page, so I'm sure this has been discussed previously, but I'm wondering if anyone with misophonia has developed other mental health disorders as a result?I was diagnosed with anxiety in high school (testing anxiety), and fast forward years later, I just started connecting the dots. I'm positive I have misophonia, with my triggers being sniffling and chewing food loudly (especially apple eaters). People sniffling during exams made me go insane, I would cover my ears and couldn't focus, I'd count the seconds in between each sniffle and average it out (8 seconds, in case anyone cares), and I'd be so filled with rage I would literally start to hate the people who sniffled (even though they were nice people). I'm starting to think maybe this is where my testing anxiety came from, which later developed into general anxiety into my adult life. Is this a possibility? I talked to my doctor and my counselor, but neither one had any clue what misophonia was. [info] None [info] 1491940773
BloodEngel666 [info] Concerned I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was younger but it was a bit of a gray area because I have mild autism, so random stuff would set me into a meltdown. As I entered high school my anxiety persisted as nausea, Shakes, and a feeling of total doom. My day would be fucked if one happened but it only happened when faced with emotional stress, like seeing an ex.I got kicked out recently and got my meds filled on the first of October. My anxiety was out of control, it felt, and I burned through my "take as needed" gabapentin in two weeks. They barely helped even though they used to do the job very well, they mostly helped me calm down a bit enough to sleep or stop shaking. But things changed. I stopped getting nauseous and the last three days have been very very stressful on me. I'm concerned because now there's something...else? I think it could be anxiety but its not acting the way it usually does.I got wide eyed, my eyes dilate, my focus hits adderall levels, I get obsessive, my thoughts take a negative turn, I grind my teeth, I talk fast, and I shake very bad. I also can't sleep at ALL. Over the last three days ive gotten maybe 6 hours of sleep. It feels like I'm stimmed out from the adderall but that is not possible, I take my XR dose at 6am every day so it wears off at 6pm and I can eat and sleep.I tried everything to get some sleep, melatonin in huge doses and in super small doses. I tried benadryl, kratom, weed, doxylamine, zzquil, chugging beer...nothing can calm me down anymore. I don't understand whats happening. I fucked up bad yesterday because my Gf relapsed and selfharmed, she came to me for help and I ended up getting obsessive about random shit and pushed it, ending in her blocking me. I didn't even know I was in this strange mental state! I couldn't control it at all and it took my best friend confronting me to ask if I had any anxiety meds.I couldn't control myself, I didnt notice I was like that. Then today I went to go donate plasma and got turned down because my heart rate was stupid high. It wasnt the adderall, I hadn't had any caffeine, I hadn't smoked a cigarette. They literally asked me if I was feeling okay and if I was having a panic attack. I can't feel it at all. The only thing stressful about today was that I had to go talk to my mom about babysitting my grandmother. I don't know what's going on and I'm afraid to mention it to my aunt because when it happens, I look *fucked up*. It suddenly makes sense why they keep pushing if I'm on anything. [info] None [info] 1508355685
twointersect [info] In the wise words of DJ Khaled, "They don't want you to have a [med card]" I am currently a Californian who takes the 5 to work and enjoys the green.  I like to play in the leaves with my friends but I mostly use it to get the creative juices flowing and to level out my emotions.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety and add for a long ass time so I know I would qualify.  I smoke weed about everyday and and I don't have any side effects when I skip a day.  So the real question is, should I get on the 5, go north all the way to the 405 and get prescribed at Venice beach? [info] None [info] 1452577895
Othmaneabf [info] 22M. 63Kg 176cm. Strange heart feeling I feel my heart. It's not a pain but I feel it from time to time. My pulse is normal. I am diagnosed with anxiety.This feeling is amplified when I put my laptop on my chest for hours, and it goes away when I take my Xanax or light up a cigarette (I barely smoke 3-4 cigs a day )Is it an anxiety manifestation or another underlying problem? Last I checked this feeling didn't fit the palpitations description.Thank you in advance. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1587578901
Wannabe_Iceman [info] Anxiety causing anger towards close friends (17 M) So I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago. Occasionally I start listing all these things that my best friend does that makes me mad. She's a girl and I'm a guy and I feel like she's my best friend. Unfortunately when I say these things it really hurts her feelings and makes her want to stop talking to me. Is there anything I can do to calm myself so I don't go off on one of my rants? I really value our friendship and don't want to lose her [info] None [info] 1463499600
WaffleWolf124 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety [info] Plays MineCraft and not FortNite [info] 1574350108
BeambugB [info] My story is similar. I began failing all my classes after being a straight A student at 13. I was depressed and anxious about everything so I just did nothing. I was diagnosed with PCOS when I was 15, put on birth control and told that would help. It helped with the physical issues but not so much the emotional. It wasn’t until I was in college that I was diagnosed with anxiety and given meds. The first meds I was given were for extreme anxiety incidents only and made me a zombie so I never used them. Then when I was 25 I was diagnosed again with anxiety by a different doctor and put on meds that worked for a year but my panic attacks came back and were worse than ever. I learned about yoga and meditation and that helped me mentally calm myself once my panic attack started but it didn’t stop them.Then last year, at age 30, I was diagnosed with ADHD from a new primary care physician, given Vyvanse and changed my anxiety med from Lorazepam to Lexapro, with the hopes that once my ADHD is under control, I wouldn’t need the Lexapro anymore. She also suggested I search for counseling to help me learn how to better manage my adhd. The Vyvanse has helped so much. The first day I took it, I was driving to work and I noticed for the first time ever, my mind was quiet. It was so weirdly peaceful and when I realized my mind wasn’t running wild, I cried because I was at peace. I’m still taking Lexapro and Vyvanse together but it’s been so much better. I’m searching for a therapist to help me with my ADHD since I’ve basically grown up with this impairment and I’m just now learning how it can or could effect my life. My brother was diagnosed ADHD at 8 so he’s always been medicated and aware. There are lots of options out there to choose from. Try CBD oil. It’s helped me some and one of my coworkers uses it to help her handle her PTSD. Look into alternative therapies like using essential oils or even changing your diet. I’m effected by the levels of estrogen and testosterone in my blood streams I have to watch what I eat and drink. [info] None [info] 1539219484
illdoxyou [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety.  I am fortune enough I can support myself to see a therapist each fortnight who has assisted with helping me deal with stressful situations.  My first sessions waere at a public school and was enough to get me my first job.  As far as I'm aware anxiety does not qualify for NDIS and therefore if her condition (often self diagnosed BTW) is anxiety then she would not qualify for NDIS. Would be good to know what disability she aimed to qualify as to get on NDIS and why she was rejected.  Why only apply once over a 10yr period? [info] None [info] 1555817767
Aberforthlikesgoats [info] Could I possibly be a grey-ace? Ugh, I'm sorry. You guys probably see posts like this constantly. I just... I'm not sure where I fall. This is something that has troubled me for years.. I've always felt that I'm right on the line between being considered a grey-ace and being considered sexual.So here are some musings:- I'm 27- I've never been in a relationship.- I've never touched anyone (including kissing, cuddling, et cetera).- I've never tried to enter into a relationship or sexual encounter.- I have been sexually attracted to approximately 10 people (including two celebrity crushes).- However, I do have sexual fantasies, but they're usually faceless encounters. My libido also changes frequently, with no specific pattern. I can be interested for months, but then that can change overnight. - I find a majority of porn repulsive. I don't read smut. However, I do watch other forms of sexualized material (sex positive youtube channels, movies that revolve around sexual relationships, documentaries, et cetera) and I like them.- I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I'm afraid that this is the true cause of everything.- In films and television when people hug it looks really nice, but I always feel incredibly uncomfortable. I hate it when people touch my back. When friends lean on me, the whole time I'm just wondering when they'll get off. I try to hug my family normally, but always end up patting their back until they let go. This has been the case since childhood.- I do wonder if I'm just suppressing everything. That deep down christian anti-sex rhetoric is getting to me, even though 95% of the time I'm an agnostic atheist. - At the end of the day I do want a partner, but I want a partner who would be okay with not being intimate for long periods of time (aka possibly years) and (probably) sleeping in separate beds.So yeah, am I just mentally ill, or am I possibly a grey-ace? (And yes I realize the call is up to me, but I'd really like to hear some of your opinions. This isn't a new idea to me and I'm tired of debating alone.)(Edit: trying to fix formatting). [info] None [info] 1421461042
ShouldHaveSwallowed [info] Thank you for commenting. I dont know but I feel more trapped than ever now that I'm sure. Yesterday i looked into psychologists near where I live but it's surprisingly expensive (to me at least. 95€ per session) and i never had good experiences with them in the past. (I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when i was 16)I'm at work now but maybe I'll chat u up later. Thankyou ♡ [info] None [info] 1563791149
misfortunas [info] Afraid of becoming schizophrenic. Can it come true? Hi! My Name is Tom im 16 years old. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder 2 months ago. I suffer from derealisation and hypochondria. If you don't know. Hypochondria is the fear of getting a disease. Currently it is schizophrenia. I used to read SO much about this disease because I tried to self diagnose myself. (Didn't know I had anxiety at that point) like a lot! I watched videos, documentaries, read about every symptom etc. Right now I feel like developing it. Because I have weird paranoid thoughts lately. For example: if I am outside I feel like people are against me (planning something). Or they laugh about me. My mum told me these thoughts appear because I read too much about them and I focus too much around them. I believe she is right, but at the same time, it doesn't FEEL like that. I want to believe that the world is perfectly fine. But it doesn't feel that way. Please tell me it's all ok. My biggest fear is developing schizophrenia. (Nothing against schizos, everybody has different fears) [info] None [info] 1442053996
FamousBlueRaincoat37 [info] Hi, I was diagnosed with MS on Thursday after roughly 9 years of symptoms. I only went to a neurologist in October last year because I started falling over. From reading people's posts it seems I'm lucky that a diagnosis only took 5 months and most of that was waiting for various tests. I have many o bands in my csf, lesions in my c spine and too many lesions to count in my brain. My main symptom for the last 9 years has been tingling/pins and needles/numbness in my legs and torso. I also had the occasional episode of feacal and urinary incontinence. I just got used to the tingling feeling and buried my head in the sand, not wanting to face up to what was wrong. For years it stayed the same but last summer it ramped up. I couldn't walk without my legs feeling like they were buzzing or vibrating, my arms would buzz or tingle randomly and I had a few falls at work. Looking back, just before all the weird sensations started I got a really painful left eye. If I moved it (can't stop it moving) it caused such a sickening sharp pain. I also couldn't move it to the left and see at the same time. My vision seemed ok, maybe a bit blurry, except for when I closed my right eye and looked to the left I realised I couldn't see properly. I wasn't diagnosed with optic neuritis but I'm convinced it was a mild case of it. I was prescribed glasses with a 2x stronger lens on the left side. I couldn't wear them because they gave me a headache and made me feel sick. Subsequent appointments at the opticians have shown I don't need glasses at all, let alone a different strength for my left eye! The pain went after a couple of weeks and I thought my vision was back to normal. A few years later when learning to drive I realised I couldn't read the number plate in front of me properly, it was all blurry. Since then I've had intermittent   blurriness which is more noticeable at work. Sometimes I can read the patient board, sometimes I can't. Again I just buried my head in the sand and ignored it. So I guess I've been quite similar to you, pins and needles and blurry vision for years. I would ask for an MRI to get started on finding a cause. Its so easy to ignore things that are wrong with our bodies and we start to believe it's just normal or 'just how I am'.Oh, and like you, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and last week I had what my neuro said was a flare up. Numb face, tingling and numbness, burning in my arm, dizziness  and my GP told me it was anxiety! I've known since January that I have lesions in my c spine so I asked " is it nothing to do with my spinal cord then?" And he told me no, definitely not! I wasn't even anxious, just pissed off with waiting for results from the LP and brain MRI!Once you've been diagnosed with anxiety it magically become to cause of all your ailments!Good luck with finding out what's going on with you and push as hard as you can for investigations. [info] None [info] 1553925430
hiding-identity [info] That's how my parents learned of my anxiety. Every few nights I would come out of my room and sit with my dad and watch tv and explain I'm afraid of him or someone else dying. It happened for a few years (with a few different worries) and then anxiety attacks started and soon I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1513950813
Pyrro2525 [info] Therapy for anxiety/chronic illness in hillard area. I've been diagnosed with anxiety which is causing some moderate irritable bowl syndrome and i was also diagnosed with fibromyalgia. I live in the south Hillard area but work near Ohio state. Would prefer something closer to Hilliard but I'd be willing to go to a place near work.My doctor put me on zoloft and suggested therapy as well. The referral she gave me still hasn't called after a month. I finally got the name of the referral (Viaquest) and the reviews they have on Google are disheartening. I searched this board before asking and i saw some suggestions for Providers for Healthy Living but again, their Hilliard location reviews were disheartening. I searched on psychology today and it seems like a lot of the search results were for New Albany area - despite me entering my zip code. Seems like there isn't many search results in my area? I have UHC insurance. Can anyone suggest a place or tell me Viaquest or Providers for Healthy Living are decent? [info] None [info] 1583338046
tOki_Sori [info] [20/F] and [20/M] First time experiencing long distance from my 3 year long boyfriend. Need some advice on how to focus on myself despite how uncomfortable I may feel. The relationship we have is very special. We are very close, we see each other almost every day and although number of times we fight and seem like we're not a good matching puzzle, end of the day and beginning of the day, we love each other and find each other. So far, the only distance I've had with him was when he had to go to fencing tournaments and the longest was about 10 days. Not a big deal right? But I have been diagnosed with anxiety problems this year...and many was caused by the last two years of dramatic events I've never been through in and out of relationship. A little background about my boyfriend: He is intellectual, but lives inside his head and can't seem to put many actions he wants to apply. He is not the most assertive person and he is always genuine and caring for others. However, ever since he started having relationship experiences since about 5-6 yrs ago, he never had a big space of independence -- he was either in a relationship long term and short terms and never had a real break for himself. He met me at a pretty rough time of his life....and at first it wasn't easy for me or him to stick around together but we were the ones who kept each other unbroken. He loved me for my liveliness and it was just what he needed to regain his focus on his life -- to be a better self. But that hasn't been working very well over the years we've been together... No matter my effort and help, and support, he always struggled and would fall back to where he was... Part because he wasn't over his past of the mistakes he made, part because he feels guilty of his life, part because he feels like he doesn't have the independence he wants and possibly more reasons to add on... i see so much potential in what he can do for himself and to the world. He haven't gone to a real vacation in 4 years. Four years ago he went to China for 2 months and lets just say it was the worst and somewhat good time because at the time he was in a relationship before we were together (and i was friends with him at the time when I wasn't really in love with him) and there was a ton of miscommunication.. she broke up with him before he went to China, but he didn't know until he came back and broke his heart even though he deserved it from her. Anyway, he got sick in China through emotional distress and even when he came back home, he lost a ton of weight by not eating and had a lot of mental breakdowns... When he met me though, that started to change very slowly, and he slowly started to accept his mistake and accept that that was what happened. He just went to China on Friday Aug 2nd at 6:15am for a good month. This is my first experience being far away from him and really just having ME TIME A LOT. I am not used to that...last time was all the years before I met him haha... We both don't want to feel like we are holding each other back from doing what we want to do for ourselves to be happy. He planned to re-invent himself in China hoping that he will change appearance and action wise when he comes back. So am I. We hope for a better relationship, a better life. However, what I fear is, what he may truly feel like in the end about me and this relationship... reason I say this is because, the night before he left, I was over at his house, we kind of fought and I started it due to feeling fearful of my own thoughts, and he felt kind of hurt by it and kept saying he didn't love me at all and that for the last year he has been trying to regain back that love he had for me... it hurt but it was also very nice to finally hear his honesty (bc he always had a tendency to not tell me things openly). Then he saw that I was falling apart and it wasn't quite fair on both ends... i want to give him that space and time for just himself and at the same time, I want to be with him. So does he, but he says when he's decided he is with me, he feels like he only have to focus on me which is not true. So instead of breaking up, we decided to try our best this month to become newer-better self. I am just anxious that when he comes back, if he realizes solidly that he doesn't love me anymore, or if he comes back loving me more than before. Because he said he doesn't know what love is, but what he feels for me is truly deep and truly cares about me more than anyone and hates seeing me hurt even by him. He also said that he can't let go of me even if he tries just for the sake of having his space because we are that comfortable with each other as well.  I just want some good advice on how to stay calm and not be anxious or worried that he may not communicate with me even though he said he will. It's almost 2nd day and I still haven't heard anything from him...I know google doesn't work in China. We rely on skype majority of the time to call and IM and we just started relying on Kakaotalk and not sure how that will go either...Please, any advice on how you guys worked it out would be really appreciated.P.S. I am sorry if I went off track somehow and that it is long but I hate leaving off questionable details :/ [info] None [info] 1375575746
ElectricalCheetah [info] "OCD" about shoes &amp; money for years and I can't take it anymore I'm just writingthis to get this off my chest, so this is just a rant. I was diagnosed with anxiety since I was very young and OCD "tendencies" but I don't think I was ever diagnosed with "pure" OCD. But for several YEARS i've had a REALLY bad obsession with shoes. I have some messed up feet so I have to wear orthotics. I've only had orthotics for 3-4 years and while they have been amazing I've had to overhaul my former shoes and purchase new ones to accommodate my orthotics and to help keep my feet comfy. The reason this gives me SO much anxiety is because finding GOOD SHOES has taken me YEARS. I constantly buy shoes then return them. Then today it also hit me that my feet shrank, which makes me wanna suicide (I'm not kidding). I measured my feet today and they are both US size 8. I used to be a size 9 with an 8.5 foot size. But then a year or so ago I noticed that my shoes were getting uncomfortably big even WITH orthotics. Today I purchased a pair of athletic shoes that were a size US 8.5. This was a MAJOR STEP and decision for me, because I haven't ever worn a size 8.5 shoe except heels and one pair of athletic shoes several years ago. Even with the orthotics, the new size 8.5 shoes felt slightly too big? or maybe it's just me feeling anxious because I've measured my feet today around a size 8 (I think).I honestly feel like I'm going to throw up. I can't take this anymore. I just want to feel confident in a few pairs of shoes. Fall/Winter is also coming and last year I got several pairs of boots size 9, only now I may have to ditch them and waste my fucking money. I'm so freaked out right now that I may have a panic attack and want to die. I'm so sick of my feet feeling discomfort and searching for the "perfect" pair of shoes. Anyone else have this issue? [info] None [info] 1533246161
Help_Me_Reddit01 [info] If I don’t stop, I’m going to allow my anxiety to ruin my relationship. Hi everyone! I’m a 24 year old female. I am diagnosed with anxiety and take Wellbutrin for it. I don’t have the best dating history, I’ve been screwed over more times than I can count and I’m now extremely guarded. This now just leads me to overthink every little thing and say what it to every single situation. Within the last week or so, I reconnected with a 27 year old male who I went to college with. He’s always tried to pursue something with me but we wanted different things at the time. He texted me this week asking me to just give him a chance after we had a brief conversation on Snapchat. We went back and forth for TWO days about possibly trying something out. He lives two hours away right now and really it’s not ideal. He asked me to meet him halfway to grab dinner, which we did last night. We now text just about 24/7 some of its sexual but for the most part it isn’t. We ate dinner and it was fine. Afterwards, we sat in my car for over two hours talking about everything. He explained how he’s 27 now and really just needs to get it together and settle down. He admitted he has feelings and such. I overthink things so I was skeptical of everything. He basically told me I’m in a huge emotional hole that I really need to start climbing out of because it’s just going to push people away. I brought up the idea that maybe he’s just putting on a front to get into my pants and honestly he wasn’t too happy that I said that and basically said if I wanted you for sex, I wouldn’t have driven over and hour for dinner and then sit here talking about a relationship with you for a couple hours. Overall the talk was good and now I just have thinking to do. Ultimately after hearing me ramble for over an hour he flat out asked me if I was even ready or could handle a relationship?I really said I don’t know more than I could count. I’m pretty sure that’s all I could say. I told him I really just needed to think about things and seemed a little confused/disappointed because he was putting it all out on the table and the only thing I could say was “I don’t know”.  We did kiss, he played with my hair and kissed my forehead. It was all fine. He asked to see me again today but, I’m leaving for vacation tomorrow morning for a week so I needed to pack and so on. So I’m supposed to see him when I get back from my trip. He asked which part of Florida I’ll be in, which is Miami. He’s concerned I’ll find a guy in Florida and that Miami is completely unsafe (he’s a cop). I’m constantly thinking everything he’s saying and doing are all a front but I have nothing to support that other than he was only into casual relationships in 2015, which I did also address yesterday. How in the hell do I allow myself to chill the hell out without reading into or overthinking every single thing he does or says. I’m driving myself nuts and I really don’t know how long he’s going to remain patient with me. [info] None [info] 1563224902
Boon40 [info] How to tell recruiter I want to go the waiver route So I was diagnosed with anxiety in 2014. Ive been in good shape for about a year and a half now, and have been off Citalopram for 6 months. Every time I try to bring it up he tells me I'll be fine and dont worry about it. The job I want has a security clearance requirement, which means a more extensive backround check. I want to make this my career and dont want that lie to hang over my head obviously. How can I tell him without getting into an argument basically? One more question, I go to MEPS to take the ASVAB 8-8-19. Do I turn in the packet he gave me then, or do I turn it in when I do the physical? [info] None [info] 1565034742
Cassi333 [info] At 22 I've been diagnosed with anxiety though I (and a few I know with AS)  suspect that's not all it is. Haven't gotten a doctor to take me serious though -.- [info] None [info] 1391367939
Anapepper3 [info] Why is there not a ADD medication that only works on dopamine?? The extra norepinephrine causes anxiety, and all the bad side effects! I find this very frustrating, I've tried almost all stimulants and while I get some relief for short windows of time the norepinephrine effect causes me to give up on medication every time. I tried Wellbutrin first and that was a complete nightmare because of it being a snri, I can not tolerate any kind of med that has effects on norepinephrine, adrenaline or induces flight fight mode.I'm diagnosed with anxiety and inattentive ADD. The ADD is probably the most debilitating which then induces anxiety.The most effective drug I've been prescribed by my psychiatrist OFF LABEL for treatment resistant ADD/anixiety was Percocet/oxycodone 5 mgs two times per day. It helped with my focus, motivation, mood and anxiety. Unfortunately, this is a very slippery slope because of tolerance and addiction but I guess that's an issue with all scheduled drugs.(stimulants, benzodiazepines) I successfully stayed on this regimen until I became pregnant and then just stopped all meds.Is there something out there that targets dopamine without norepinephrine interference aside from opioids? By the way before anyone judges or starts on the whole opioids are evil talk I'm talking about fentenyl, OxyContin, morphine or herion, there has to be some brilliant scientist out there that can come up with a treatment opioid based but with a chemical mechanism to decrease the chances of abuse. [info] None [info] 1503270517
buggaz [info] Right. I kind of fathomed that.I did have my condition worsen during several months so I can relate to 'not getting how conditions are changing' making it so much the worse the longer it takes. I do not envy people with such problems. I can only imagine.I was diagnosed with anxiety and resulting mild case of psychosis. The rapid cycling/mixed state (you say?) was during the most intensive part after few months of buildup through paranoia and then the hallucinations broke loose. The cycling part lasted only a few days (3) although the hallucinations continued still after six months but with decreasing intervals (or are they? :).So, as much as my experience provided insight, it's definitely only a guess of a metaphor at best to what it must be like to be a Bi-polar.I wonder if in some time in the future there will be a ranking system like in the military for various mental illnesses? "You've been through paranoia and have an excellent record of a 5 year duty in Bi-polar. Here's your silver medal and a purple heart, Major!" [info] None [info] 1262624879
kolpinoc [info] a sign of PPD/postpartum anxiety? MIL issues? WALL OF TEXT SORRY :( I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder recently - I've been this way my whole life but it was nice to have the medical community acknowledge it finally. I had Logan on the 8th of this month and have found myself getting... angry lately. Not angry at him, no. Angry when he's away from me. It started during our 2nd day in the hospital. He had to spend some time in their nursery and I asked to have him brought back to my room. They took their time doing so and I was starting to get heated. It's gotten worse since then. SO's mother wanted to hold Logan and in my mind it felt like an hour (it had been maybe 15 minutes) and I demanded him back into my arms. If he isn't within a few feet of me at all times I can feel my pulse quicken and breathing becomes rapid. Has anyone else experienced anything like this? Am I just becoming an extreme Mama Bear?I've had issues with my other two children and SO's family. It felt like I birthed my daughter's FOR his family. They overstepped all kinds of boundaries before I grew a backbone - but now the girls have a tight bond with SO's Mom because I was a pussy. Maybe I'm just trying to prevent that from happening to my last child and only son. I guess I want a Mama's Boy, not a Nana's Boy. During our first night home she came to visit. She asked my oldest, "is this your baby or my baby?" to which I pointed at SO and said, "sorry, THAT'S your baby."It's stuff like that. Overbearing, possessive, passive aggressive. I feel like this is my time to do it "right", I guess - show his family how strong my backbone is. [info] None [info] 1473782899
adam_c [info] My story, a long read but I welcome the comments if you take the time... January 2012 I was diagnosed with anxiety and have been living with it ever since....I was told by my psychologists yes more than 1 that they think it stems back to when I was very young, I can remember back to about 3 or 4 and my parents being divorced. I remember my mom always being sick and never really knowing why (she didn't at that time either but finally found out when I was about 12/13), I remember always worrying about her and whether she would stop breathing at night (she would always snore very loud and choke like sleep apneia) I would lay in my bed at night and hope to god that she would live to the next morning, when I would get sick I would get worried and scared that I would die. I've always had a fear of death as long as I can remember. When I transitioned from Elementary to Jr. High School I remember my mom getting very sick to the point of needing to go to the ER where she was finally diagnosed with Chrones disease and due to the many years of her living with it, it had become very advanced and required multiple surgeries. Growing up my mom also worried about my safety a lot, needless to say I was very sheltered and rarely got to hang our with friends or play outside very much as a result I was also one of the fat kids growing up and was teased and made fun of.. a lot.. in Jr. High they nick named my butterball.. this was incredibly hard on me and started my path of destruction as I call it, I remember always trying to diet even in Elementary school so I could be a skinny kid and have friends.. I've always been a person who wants everyone to like them and would change myself in order to do it yet after all those years I never had any panic attacks or anxiety as I know it today. In High School I started dieting to the point where people said I looked grey and sick but I still felt fat. I wanted to fit in more so I started smoking thinking it was the IN thing, it didn't help that my mother would by the cigarettes for me, next trying to impress people my dad's girlfriend son who was the same age as me was a bit of a trouble kid, one night we took his moms car for a drive and he ended up crashing it, that night destroyed the relationship I had with my dad. I got a job to pay off the damage but in turn ended up getting further into a hole, I tried smoking weed and now that I had money could do it but I didn't like it very much, one night my mother had the drug talk with me that changed my life, she told me about the drugs she did when she was younger and that she said it was fine for me to do them as long as I did them at home to make sure that if anything happened she would be able to help me. Now being a teenager with the invincibility complex I though this was great.... what I needed was a mother and not a friend, with this new found freedom I started experimenting with alcohol and harder drugs.. I tried mushrooms but never got into it, one night after work I was invited to a rave where I tried Ecstasy and that was it, I was hooked, it provided me the energy and the confidence to do what I wanted and get fit at the same time. The drug slowly took over me and I ended up doing it for about 1.5 years with a unknown amount, sometimes I try to figure out how much I did but can't. I also tried Acid but never really got into it. At age 18 while taking 'E' (Ecstasy) I had my first Panic Attack or perhaps a bad pill, I'm not really sure but it was the last time I took E, after that I would get chest pains and thought I was getting lung cancer from smoking and ended up having a couple more panic attacks and ended up quitting smoking too... I saw my Dr. at the time who said it's common for teens to get Panic Attacks and gave me an anti-depressant, I took it the first day and thought I was going crazy and felt like it was a mind control substance, this was caused by a class we had in high school called Career And Life Management where they brought in a speaker who was Schizophrenic and told his story to us. For some reasion this popped up in my head and I swore off medication and luckily for me the anxiety/panic attacks stopped as well. Fast forward to 2009 and my daughter is born, things about me changed, H1N1 was emerging in the news and I got really sick around that time and I had a panic attack that I had the illness and was going to die.... but I would only get fearful if I got sick and never was bothered from Anxiety. Now fast forward again to January 2012, I was out with some friends and decided to smoke weed as it had been quite some time and we were having fun. We were drinking, smoking sheesha and I had a couple hits of the weed but nothing major, I went to sleep and woke up the next morning dizzy, thinking nothing of it I went home and continued to be dizzy for the next 2 days. Still dizzy I went to my dr and told her what was going on, she said it was something viral and it may take weeks to pass, I went home and did what any normal person does, Googled, all the signs and symptoms came up with a brain tumor, now most people can disregard this but what I didn't mention was that  my step-mother died from a brain tumor about 2 years after having my sister, the same age as my daughter was, that was it, that started everything for me, i was in and out of the hospital getting tests. back and forth to my dr to make sure i was ok and then the unthinkable happened, I received a prescription and was extremely cautious to take it but ended up doing so, either I was allergic to it or had an anxiety reaction cause it felt like my throat was swelling and I had a big lump that was getting bigger and bigger. well I went back to the hospital where they loaded me up with epinephrine and a slew of other things to make sure i wouldn't die and ended up diagnosing me with Anxiety. I've been living with the fear for the last 1.5 years now that the drugs have caused my Anxiety, Paranoia and Panic Attacks but my therapists think other wise... There is more to this story but my wrists hurt from typing, maybe I'll continue tomorrow [info] Health Anxiety [info] 1371708708
Whynotsohot [info] Thank you for your reply. I feel that, yes, I can't change him. I wish he was as attentive as he was while I was pregnant. He is a good person deep down, but too focused on money and financial well being to focus on everything else. He is awesome with the kid (when he takes 5-15 minutes of his day, he dedicates them to his son). Not so much to me. I tried to get over our differences and bad communication (I'm at fault here too, it's a chore talking to him now), but I am not sure how long before I get close to depressed again. Lately I've been feeling very unmotivated to do anything (why go to work? Wake up?) and it is started to worry me. I was diagnosed with anxiety about 10 years ago, I am not sure if it still "sticks"? I can get child support, yes! I think it would be enough for food and some basic bills while I wait for kindergarden for the kid and a job. Again, thank you for your kind words. I will need to think everything over. Maybe write it all down and see where I am at.  [info] None [info] 1428690922
imnotpants [info] I’m interesting in applying for the air force but I just found out that when I went to therapy a few years ago I was diagnosed with anxiety. Now I went back to therapy and I was diagnosed with multiple other mental disorders. Do these factors keep me from being eligible for the Air Force? What have you experienced with mental health confidentiality when joining the Air Force? Am I allowed to keep these things a secret? Thanks for any answers! [info] None [info] 1540422404
Sirendimensions [info] I happen to have been hit with a triple whammy due to geneticsAutism runs in my father's familyDepression runs in both my mother's and my father's familyBut my Mom's family specifically my Grandma's family ohhhh boyyy....... every female that has been born (so far and we don't know if gg has it because to be blunt she is a self centered bitch who won't be tested for anything mental. But it's impossible that she doesn't have something.) Has some form of anxiety and I'm a woman so... yeah I was diagnosed with anxiety at 6 yr' s oldI don't know what deity my female ancestors pissed off  XD So no just because someone has more than 1 mental illnesses doesn't mean they are lying to you [info] None [info] 1556240057
raislash [info] Casual player here. I don't post much on reddit but this topic hits pretty close to home, and I just thought I'd share my own thoughts on this.I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and do understand how the game can be rather nerve-wracking, given the amount of uncertainty over random outcomes. Nonetheless, I do enjoy the game a lot, and have managed to reach legend 3 times (mostly during periods when I'm not busy with work, and therefore have the mental resources to stave off game-related anxiety). My most recent legend finish was just last month.To start off, the existing posts here are really helpful for those looking to enjoy the game without worry. I found myself agreeing to most of what has been shared.In my case, there came a point in time where I just wanted to push myself further to see how far I could go. If you ever find yourself having such thoughts (i.e "I'd love to climb to legend some time!") then I'd be happy to share what has worked for me in the few times I've reached legend rank.First, it helps to figure out your triggers are in the game (note that there can be more than one). In no particular order, mine are:1. Bad-mannered opponents: I don't think I need to speak at length about this, or it will turn into an unrelated rant on decency. I basically just squelch the moment they emote, and never accept any friend requests whether I win or lose (after the first few unpleasant experiences, this is necessary for my mental health).  2. Unfavourable random outcomes: This comes in all forms - bad random card effects, bad draws, and even queueing against bad matchups. In these cases, I basically try to fully understand my odds before I play, and it has really helped both my      anxiety and my gameplay.   For example, if I went into a turn knowing that I had a 2/13 chance of drawing a card to win me the game, I would feel better about the outcome as I would have been mentally prepared for it. If I did not draw my winning cards, then I could just tell myself that the odds were not in my favour anyway. On the other hand, if I drew my winning cards, I would acknowledge that I got really lucky with my draw and remind myself that my luck isn't so bad after all. Doing this also helps my mental state when things do not go my way despite the odds being in my favour. Having this mindset also helps me with random card effects.  Regarding queueing into bad matchups, I find that it helps to read up extensively on the current meta and matchups before I even begin my ranked matches for the month (I have found meta-snapshot and data reaper to be 2 great resources for this). Once I have identified a deck that could have an above-average performance on ladder, I just stick to it. Note that this does not necessarily equate to simply picking the "most OP tier-1 deck", especially when opponents are likely to tech against those decks. Read up, and understand what cards you are likely to go up against - once again, it's all about prior mental preparation and understanding your odds. Once you understand your matchup win-rates, you'll be able to mentally prepare yourself for the outcomes of the match.Next, it helps to manage your tilt. There are a few things that I would suggest before you set out to climb the ladder.1. Building resilience to grinding. Prior to laddering more seriously, I played a lot of casual matches and practised a lot of the mental preparation that I was describing before I started taking ladder seriously. Each time I wanted to climb, I would give myself a few weeks of preparation to ease myself into the grinding process.  2. Knowing when to take a break from ladder. I usually do it when I am at zero stars for the rank, or when I find myself making multiple misplays based on the odds of particular turn. At this point, I’ll usually just find something else to do, or just play a random meme-deck that I’d created/found online.You can see though, that laddering as an anxious person takes a lot of mindfulness and mental preparation. I suggest only going into ranked matches when you can muster the mental resources for it. Otherwise, there are plenty of other fun aspects of the game, such as deck-building, playing meme decks, and just enjoying in-game animations, as mentioned in other posts on this thread.Hope you find this helpful at some point! But more importantly have fun! [info] None [info] 1548656282
chewonpebbles [info] I feel like I’m going insane TW: Animal death mentionOver the past two weeks I feel like my mental health has taken a turn for the worse.I was diagnosed with anxiety about a month or so back and I was happy to finally be listened to and was doing well for a while.However, recently I’ve been struggling with self-care (I didn’t shower for a week or more and I can’t bring myself to do much other than sleep) and mood swings. This is nothing compared to the extreme paranoia I’ve been facing.This is just a small part of what I’ve been dealing with:There’s a super busy street by my house, right by my school. I was late one morning and happened to see a dog limp in the grass by the curb. A lady was sobbing and the man was on his phone and not at all consoling her, so of course it’s easy to assume the dog was hit by a car. Then, yesterday I was on my way to a school event and saw a couple of people carrying another dog that happened to get hit by a car. Seeing someone grieving over their dead pet inches away from me was extremely heartbreaking and I feel like the image is imprinted in my mind but that’s besides the point.- What does this have to do with me? My mind is telling me that because I keep seeing animals getting hit by a car, one of my pets are going to die or I’m going to die. I have barely been able to sleep (checking on my pets and setting alarms to make sure I don’t drop dead in my sleep) and processing my emotions is so challenging. I’ve been lashing out at everyone I care about and hitting people, being an overall piece of shit. I’m only fifteen, I don’t know how to find any resources and my only coping mechanism is hitting something. Anything, really. I haven’t hurt myself more than “That hurt enough to bring me back to reality,” but I’m scared. [info] None [info] 1558483752
MadameOddfellow [info] You could definitely have anxiety. Talk to your mom and doctor about getting. Referral in your area. I was diagnosed with anxiety over ten years ago. I'd like to think I'm outgoing and like able, and I definitely love being the center of attention. Having anxiety and being shy aren't mutually exclusive. There are different kinds of anxiety - performance, travel, anticipation, the list goes on and on. My physical reactions were always over the top. I would physically pale to two or three shades lighter, my body should shake uncontrollably with tremors, and I'd get ill. Everyone gets nervous - shakey hands, sweaty palms - but the feeling of being unable to breathe might mean it's more than regular nerves. A doctor can teach you coping mechanisms - how to control your breathing, reminding yourself that you're okay, counting and word exercises for distraction, relaxation. You could have anxiety, or you could be a nervous kid with a less than stellar home life. Either way, talking to someone can definitely help you.  [info] None [info] 1401514087
muffy27 [info] I'm not sure if I'm much help, but you should talk about this with your doctor or a therapist. It sounds like you might have a mental illness. I also know that it isn't easy to talk about this stuff or get help. I was so scared to go to the doctor but when I was diagnosed with anxiety, I felt relieved because I finally knew what was going on with me. I hope you talk to someone and feel better. Stay strong! [info] None [info] 1569365450
sassypantsfromfrance [info] Anxiety and Leadership I've been diagnosed with anxiety since I was eight years old. When I was nineteen, I finished a college exam and immediately recieved my results. I did really well, but still walked to the parking lot and threw up and almost passed out. I am an anxious person. It was then that I finally decided to become get help. I went to my doctor and was prescribed prozac. It helps, but doesn't do everything. I have always tried to hide my anxiety. Only my family and my boyfriend know about it. I hide it from friends and coworkers. I don't know why I do this, but I always have. I'm here seeking advice. I'm currently 21 years old and attending school full time. I also am a full time manager working in the customer relations department for a local business. I enjoy school and my job. If I'm not busy, I over think. My problem is this: I go home from work every night with my heart pounding. I'm stressed. I'm responsible for any mistakes made on my shift (even if someone else made the mistake), and it really gets to me. My mind reels all night about what could have gone wrong. I don't know how to stop it. I don't want to step down from my position or cut back on school, but I need to be able to relax. I really feel that it would harm my career if I asked for less, and if I did that I would have to explain to my higher ups that I have anxiety. I just don't want them to know. What do you all do to calm down? [info] None [info] 1538115321
Sophie_Amelia_ [info] Wait what about the NHS?Does the fact that I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and given anti-depressants exclude me from their treatment? If so then I guess I might as well not delay and just go private. Who needs money right? [info] MtF | Am I really trans though? [info] 1560081618
istayzooted [info] So 200 UG is a good dose for next you guys think ? Gonna wait a while obviously.. I like this headspace it's chill.. and I'm diagnosed with anxiety haha if that's saying something  [info] None [info] 1521511999
canihasnewbf [info] Definitely going to have to listen to that. I was diagnosed with anxiety first and take Zoloft. [info] None [info] 1545939075
YaGirlJade [info] Advice Handling anxiety in a more effective way I was diagnosed with anxiety 3 years ago and I took meds at first but stopped because I didn't like how they made me feel. My anxiety manifests itself in different ways. Sometimes I try to avoid thinking about anything that makes me anxious but if I can't ill get angry and snap at my husband, sometimes I will just cry or feel like I'm going to pass out, and sometimes I just can't do anything like I'm paralyzed and all I can find motivation to do is lay down and sometimes I can't sleep. I don't want to go back on meds, I'd much rather learn to handle it myself but its becoming a problem especially when I start snapping at my husband for no reason. Is there anything I can do so I don't get so bitchy with him? He really does nothing wrong and I feel so bad afterwards when I calm down [info] None [info] 1463026204
throwaway-1648 [info] I got a wave of anxiety and it’s gonna drive me nuts. Help me rationalize my thoughts please I just bought a brand new hoodie from the store. It’s Nike and I bought it from a local mall (a little run down. Not much traffic. Etc) the hoodie was a medium and was behind another medium so I’m hoping nobody else tried it on but- I had this wave of panic and I just feel so uncomfortable. I keep having racing thoughts about “what if somebody wore it before me and now it’s diseased” my body feels dirty from trying on the hoodies but I really really want to wear this hoodie tomorrow. I just got it and would be upset if I didn’t get to tomorrow... I can’t relax my thoughts and can’t stop telling myself that a series of events is gonna lead me to die soon because of somebody else wearing my hoodie. It’s really frustrating. Driving me insane. “What if” this and “what if” that. I had over a month of calmness and now suddenly my anxiety peaked in the most inconvenient time. I’m going between “oh nvm I’m okay” and “fuck I’m gonna die” like I’m flipping a light switch. What do i do? I don’t have time to wash it tonight..Edit- I am diagnosed with anxiety. This isn’t just some random person venting about being nervous [info] None [info] 1569545450
Psychonautics101 [info] Anecdotal evidence: I was diagnosed with anxiety, ADHD, and possible sociopathic symptoms. It's been a couple years since I've tripped and my anxiety is pretty much gone, I'm a lot more focused, and I finally know what genuine empathy feels like. [info] None [info] 1423676146
jigenbabe [info] My SO and I have lived together for 7 years, and he's known me since I was 13. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 12 and severe anxiety disorder at 15. He's never had any anxiety, quite the opposite, and I cannot seem to communicate with him that coping techniques and medication doesn't stop ALL panic attacks. I don't know if I'm not articulating myself well or if he just doesn't get it. Also, he cannot seem to have a single conversation where he doesn't bring up his own emotions and when I ask him to focus on my feelings solely for a  single conversation he gets upset. I don't really know what to do and am in need of advice. We have a counselor but due to temporary financial situations we are currently unable to pay for a session. [info] None [info] 1524154540
hellome1 [info] Strange emotional/mental block? Hi everyone, I'm a 20 year old white female, 5'3", 110 lbs, issues been going on for 6 weeks, no predicting medical conditions (though since this point I've been diagnosed with anxiety/depersonalization but I don't believe this specific issue is very much connected), no medications. I'd really appreciate any ideas/advice/answers you have. About a month and a half ago I took an ecstasy pill that had extreme psychological effects on me (many hours of racing, emotionally-invested thoughts that got more negative as time went on), from which I felt that I never fully recovered, and then, a week later, I moved away to college for the first time, from which I suffered pretty intense adjustment disorder, though I don't know if I would have if not for the drug. I felt so strange and scared that I terrified that I'd caused some kind of brain damage, but now I believe rather than structural damage, it's just something badly "malfunctioning". Basically, when I experience any sort of stress, my emotional coping capabilities go completely haywire. It's not that I simply get some sort of upset, but rather it's as if all of these feelings and emotions and abstract feelings associated with memories come flooding in, but the actual thoughts connected with the emotions/feelings from memories aren't there, and so everything begins to feel extremely foreign, and it's very all over the place and confusing and strange... It is incredibly overwhelming and nonsensical and makes it difficult to reconnect with reality when it happens... it's so out of my control, I don't know if I messed up some emotional/memory process pathway, but I haven't seen anything online of a similar experience, so I really don't know how to approach this. When this happens, I cannot think logically, or really think much at all, it's just a massive wave of strange, abstract, nonsensical emotion; it feels like I'm going insane and it scares me a lot. Sometimes things also appear visually overwhelming and difficult to process, such as patterns with varying light depths. I want to note that while it can make me panic, this is NOT simply a panic attack. I have experienced panic attacks before and it is not the same. Also, nothing like this ever happened before the drug. It's completely dysfunctional; I had to take a medical leave of absence for the semester and so much of my higher-level thinking/understanding of my emotional senses are stifled; overall it's not at all conducive to functioning productively in society and is certainly not sustainable, it's really miserable, actually. Can anyone relate/understand/offer other perspectives? Thank you so much for reading. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1475849394
bunni_momma [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and regularly see a therpist along with medication.  It works - some days it was hard to leave the house, always worried about my relationship and struggling with social activities.But today I just did a presentation in front of 10 people without shaking for the first time in my life!! [info] None [info] 1484931788
Ajo75375 [info] Feel's like something stuck in my throat. Last night I was playing hockey and I decided to take a 7-11 trip before I got home. When I left 7-11 I got beef jerky and cheese, those thick over priced power bars, and reese's peanut butter cups. I was driving home and I ate the beef jerky and the powerbar all at once. I was eating pretty fast, and later had a weird feeling that food was caught in my throat. I later went to the hospital and told the doctor how i felt. He said I may have hurt my throat after eating all of that food really fast. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I tend to get panic attacks. They been better lately. The only reason I've been getting a panic attack was I had a feeling that I could get throat or esophagus cancer. Because I've been back to doing snus(light chewing tobacco puches) for a month. I hadn't done it for years before getting back to it a month ago. The doctor made me drink one of those anti-acid and got home within an hour. My question is, do you think I'm overreacting with the anxiety? Or, it could be a potential sign of cancer? FYI: I tend to freak out over these type of things. I can swallow and breath fine, but I still feel like I have something stuck in my throat. It happened last night. I've been having that feeling ever since that trip from 7-11. Thank you [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1500578390
CoolSquidgey [info] Constant nausea... it never goes away I've had nausea constantly the past... maybe... 4/5 years? before that I must admit i was more nauseous than your average person, I've had a diagnosis of IBS since about 8. Since my "breakdown" and the start of the nausea, doctors have simply slapped me with a confirmation that I was diagnosed with anxiety the year before, and, after losing over half of my weight in little over 4 months, to the point where i was skin and bones, I was diagnosed with Autism. They then proceeded to pat themselves on the back for a job well done, and p*ssed off without meerly a solution as to WHY I'm feeling this asides from the subcontext of "oh, maybe it's all in your head". Once I turned 18 (20 now), which was literally a WEEK after the reality crumbling diagnosis of autism (ya know, realising this whole time there was something mentally different that effects my entire social skills and personal development is a bit of a shocker), it was entirely up to me to orchestrate my support. I've had a camera down my throat and they found nothing. my latest psychologist said that my anxiety causes breathing irregularities which then builds up carbon dioxide around the muscles outside my stomach causing them to contract and jiggle my stomach around = nausea. so I'm to try breathing exercises. I tried Cyclizine, and that REALLY didn't work. I drink gaviscon from the bottle and bulk buy chewing gum. I try to of course heavily regulate my usage of these things, I only have gaviscon 3 times a day at most to correct dosages, and only have about 2-3 sticks of gum if i'm going through a tough stage with my nausea. I'm strict with my medicine taking as you can tell. I tried CBD ONCE, and I think my anxiety at the "holy crap you're taking something that is technically part of an illegal narcotic and you barely even drink" thing kicked my nausea into the ground. But, after I calm down a bit, I think I'll maybe try CBD again.The real kicker about this though, is that since the start of this, i've suddenly been unable mentally to travel. If I feel sick and someone tries to force me into travelling, my body will do anything in it's power to avoid it. meltdowns galore. I've barely left my sh*tty wee town in over 5 years, and being stuck in this place in scotland forever?... oof. I'd rather not go into it.TL;DR: My nausea's been going on for years, docs seem to think it's all in my head, idk if it is, tried all sorts doesn't really work v well. Can't travel or leave my room in general v well because of it. Anyone else got this? Any ideas? If it's something really bad you think it might be that requires a hospital check - don't tell me. I can't travel to get my breasts checked (and the docs are unwilling to sedate or knock me out to take me to the hospital to check despite my explicit consent). If it's something dangerous, I'm just gonna have to... idk... die from it lmao. [info] None [info] 1536223274
AnitainKelowna [info] Not a doctor, but I had quite the experience with a misdiagnosis. When I was 30 I tore an intercostal rib muscle when I slipped hiking. I immediately felt that something was wrong and was in immense pain. Went to a walk in clinic to see a doc about the problem and was told it’s extremely rare to tear that muscle and I probably just had a strain. The pain went from bad to worse and I could no longer exercise (I was currently marathon training and at the gym 6 days a week). I went back to the doc to make sure I hadn’t serious hurt myself but they just continued to ignore my issue. Then, a couple weeks later I couldn’t get out of bed. My back was in so much pain I could barely walk. Back to the doctors to see what was going on and I was diagnosed with anxiety. They prescribed some crazy medicine for pain and sent me on my way. By this time I went from running 50kms a week and strength training 6 days a week to being unable to walk or carry anything more than a loaf of bread.  But, apparently I just had anxiety. A complete wreck, I head back to the clinic to be told there’s nothing major wrong but given more pain meds. Note, at this point no tests are done, no X-ray or check of my body. But they believed me enough to prescribe opioids to me. Fast forward 4 months, I’m finally able to drive long enough to see my family doctor 1 hour away. The minute I’m in his office he sees that something is wrong and sends me off for testing and X-rays. Turns out I had three fractures in my back, a herniated disc, and sciatica. It all happened because of the torn intercostal rib muscle. Turns out, it severely lowered my immune system and caused a whole host of disorders to come out. I ended up with osteopenia, malabsorption problem, iron deficiency, vitamin d deficiency, an autoimmune disorder, kick started peri menopause, and more. If the original doctor had taken me seriously and listened to my concerns it would have never gotten as bad as it did. Now I’m 36 with the body of a 70 year old. Doctors still don’t believe me when I have issues and say I’m too young for this or that. But when I go for second opinions, turns out I’m right. I get that my case is not common, but that doesn’t mean I should suffer as a result. [info] None [info] 1558391594
didi1995 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety but I've been taking xanax a lot recently but it takes me around one bar to feel it. maybe 1mg? [info] None [info] 1567168724
kittlekattle [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety for longer than I have with hEDS, and I know where some of you all are coming from with the chicken and egg scenario.  I sometimes will feel "anxious" physically without a trigger, which can then lead to my brain running with it, desperately trying to figure out what's wrong and getting panicky as a result. (Thanks, brain. It's not helpful, but I know you're trying you're best, poor thing.)  Though I haven't been formally diagnosed with POTS, I'd be astounded if I don't have it.  (Feeling like you've been slammed in the head by a two by four during yoga because of position isn't normal, is it?)  &amp;#x200B;Anyway, my docs have been semi-helpful.  After ruling that my heart is ok structurally, they prescribed beta blockers off label to help control heart palpitations.  That's been pretty good, but I've now been receiving bio-feedback for the last few months and that's really starting to help.  If you have access to that at all, I'd recommend giving it a shot.  It's lessened my panic attack frequency, and also has made it possible for me to help slow my breathing and heart rate.  During my sessions, they also record hand temp, and sweat response as well as look at muscle tension.  Basically, I meditate and the sensors and recording equipment let me know immediately which techniques work best for lowering my own stress responses.  It's not perfect and it's not immediate (my therapist says that best evidence shows it generally takes 9 to 12 sessions to work best) between that and CBT, and meds, the anxiety is less.  Not gone, but at least it's getting to the point where it's easier to tell what's just physical manifestations and what's got the mental/emotional component, so I can tell my brain it can chill out. [info] None [info] 1571887191
-what2do- [info] Fear of death I have a fear of death. I didn't before but ever since my grandpa passed away a few months back I've gotten this fear. It's more about if there is or isn't an afterlife. I've done research and the research isn't making me feel better. I am diagnosed with anxiety so that's probably also making my situation hard. I can't seem to be happy lately, because the idea of nothing after death scares me. And I know if theres nothing, there wont be a me to care....but the me now cares....I just love life and all that I get to experience. Is there any research that suggests life after death? Research that there's such thing as a soul? Is there anything to make me feel better? [info] None [info] 1584080550
dinggbatt [info] Thank you I appreciate your comment. So glad to hear your feeling better. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and was given medication to try. I didn’t like it because it made me very tired and just feel weird.... I’ve been trying to heal by meditation &amp; yoga. I’m gonna try cbd and see how that helps with my anxiety [info] None [info] 1572225212
SearchHere [info] It is hard to explain.I was diagnosed with anxiety before I realized I had it.Have you ever been in a public place and someone was playing their music out loud? It’s kind of like that, but the music is much louder and drowning out anything you’re trying to do or think about.It can manifest physically. For me, nausea/vomiting allll the time, especially when going out was a red flag.  [info] None [info] 1538262454
To_a_Green_Thought [info] Thank you very much for posting this.I have a hard time going to the temple.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD, so I think that has something to do with it.  However, even before going to the temple got *really* hard for me (a few years ago), it was always tough.  It's a very stressful experience.  I mean, for crying out loud, I'm going to *God's house*.  That's pretty huge.  I think that, if more people really thought it through, more people would realize the magnitude of what they're doing (and, consequently, be stressed).  For many people, going to the temple is nothing more than going to the meetinghouse for church on Sunday....which is both bad and good.  On one hand, our church leaders have told us to contemplate the importance of the temple, to realize how special it is; based on their comments, it seems many members aren't doing that.  On the other hand, if our members get to the temple and do ordinances for their ancestors, whatever gets 'em there is good, I suppose.I'm rambling, I know.  The bottom line is this: I feel for you, because I feel the same way.  I may not have the exact same concerns as you, but it's hard for me, too.Let me share an experience I had in the temple that helped me.  This happened about a year ago, back when I was really making an effort to attend the temple more often.  (I have a toddler, which only adds to the difficulty of going, and I finally had a moment where I could get away.)  I chose to do initiatories, because it's better for me, I've found.  As I sat, waiting to start, I got a very strong impression that Heavenly Father wanted me in the temple, because it meant that I was closer to Him, and He simply wanted to be close to me.  I really felt how much He loved me.  Obviously, God can visit us whenever and wherever He wants to; I felt that He was telling me that it'd be easier for *me* to feel Him near in the temple.  It was a tender moment.I try to remember that.  It's still hard for me to attend the temple, but I try to remind myself that God just wants to be close to me, one of His children.  I reiterate this: *it's still very hard for me*.  I share this experience not to give you any sense of shame for not going, but simply to share what I've felt.  At the bottom of it all, God just wants to be closer to us, and that doesn't always mean doing an endowment session.  Just go (and, again, I'm telling myself this, as much as you) and be near God. [info] None [info] 1530468462
AguaThrowAway [info] Cymbalta for anxiety? Hey guys,&amp;#x200B;So I was diagnosed with anxiety over 10 years ago, and have been on clonazepam daily since(I know, I know).&amp;#x200B;The first anti-depressant they put me on was zoloft in 2009, and it didn't do much, but I didn't give it much of a chance. I started off with a pretty low dose and just gave up on it after 2 weeks because the clonazepam worked so much better.&amp;#x200B;After that I was put on wellbutrin, and it worked pretty well, I think I needed that somewhat stimulating effect it has. One day I just quit cold turkey, and that was that.&amp;#x200B;I've been prescribed Lexapro, and I never started taking it. &amp;#x200B;I just saw a new psychiatrist, and he prescribed me Cymbalta. Claims he takes it himself.   The thing is, I'm not horribly depressed. I struggle to get certain tasks done, and and by all means lazy, but I don't generally want to die or anything.&amp;#x200B;I've never tried therapy, and I'm finally seeing a psychologist in a few weeks, and starting CBT. Should I just not take the Cymbalta, see if therapy helps, and go from there?&amp;#x200B;I've read some AWFUL reviews on Cymbalta, and some not so bad ones. But I'm torn on what to do. [info] None [info] 1555580550
captainwhiskeytits [info] Mystery diagnosis - recurrent fevers edition Hello all,This past year, I have been dealing with episodes of fevers and fatigue. What it looks like -Notice I feel kinda chilly and off.  This progresses within an hour to a temperature between 99.5-100.5.  Body aches.  If I take ibuprofen, this takes care of the fever, and they have rarely lasted more than a day.  A few have persisted for 2 or 3 days.I regularly experience joint pain (wrists, shoulders, hips), and overall just a dull ache in my body.  I have a good deal of back/neck pain intermittently, but I think that's just because I'm out of alignment.  I noticed with a few of the fever episodes that they happened after my back got out of whack.  I do have some slight difficulties with swallowing, get choked up on water occasionally.Overall, I just feel low energy and tired, but I do have periods of weeks where I feel pretty okay.  I notice that my memory is less sharp.Identified triggers - stress, messed up sleep schedules, potentially back problems.  I don't drink often, but I happened to drink moderately a few times this past week and I'm currently experiencing fever/fatigue.  I am diagnosed with anxiety.I have found that when I partake in a sacred green plant intermittently (1x a week, small dose), that I tend to be pain free and don't have fevers.  I had to stop partaking because of a job search and everything came back.Consults so far - endocrinology (elevated thyroid antibodies), rheumatology (not able to identify anything).  Rheumatology said he's not convinced that I have lupus, but he's not entirely convinced I don't.  Offered to trial a drug that may help, but since I had been feeling well for a month decided to monitor.Negative for scleroderma, celiac's, vitamin B deficiency, thyroid levels are currently normal.  No hepatitis, no Lyme disease, no TB, no AIDS.  Bloodwork during a bad flare was a bit fucky, but my cell counts are back to normal now.Any ideas of what else I may have?  Overall I still function pretty well, but I'm afraid of long-term implications of this on my body and well-being.Edit: 27 y.o, female, no significant medical history, no significant international travel (Canada count?  lol), grew up in the country and have always had dogs.labs done - all normalTSH, T4 FREE, T3, ANA SCREEN RF LATEX QUALITATIVE, CCP ANTIBODY, NUCLEAR ANTIGEN ANTIBODY,NUCLEAR ANTIGEN ANTIBODY, VITAMIN B-12, CREATINE, MB FRACTION, ANTI HISTONE (done during a time when I was asymptomatic).  Did have a positive ANA in July, but it was borderline.Chest X-ray findings: Visualized osseous structures, heart, mediastinum and the lungs appear normal. There is a calcified granuloma in the left lower lobe as well as superior segment of right lower lobe. No focal infiltrates, pleural effusions, pulmonary edema or pneumothorax.I was taking birth control until a month ago, but quit.Edit 3 - more labsSMITH (SM) ANTIBODY - normal rangeRNP IGG - normalCK-MB - normalCCP IGG - normal [info] None [info] 1506354289
ThrowayButNvrForgten [info] Anyone else suffered from retroactive jealousy. Help a brother out. I have been with this girl for quite sometime now, and even if my numbers are way pass anyone else. I am jealous of the past. I cant stop ruminating other dudes fucking her.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I know this problem is also my issue. I’d like to hear some strong RP’er who over come this. Help a brotha out. I’d like to hear your narratives. Its been a year and Im still jealous. [info] None [info] 1564455831
anxiousthrowaway12 [info] Can't deal with an elective anymore RANT/HELP I needed to get this off of my chest. I've been diagnosed with anxiety for years now and it has never affected me socially. I'm at a new school and I've always felt left out socially, but i'm starting to make more friends.Anyway, I like all of my classes except for ceramics. I walk in and I can hardly talk to anyone in there without sweating and shaking. They probably think i'm crazy. I honestly don't know what it is. There's one kid that reaches out to me and she's really nice, but I can't talk because i'm constantly freezing up. Anyway, I was assigned to make a bird house and I couldn't think of what to make until the last day. I decided to make a [Portal](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Portal_(video_game)) themed one but now I feel constantly judged. I put it in the kiln, so it's ready to be glazed and what ever, but I'm terrified that someone will think i'm weird because of the big "THE CAKE IS A LIE" on the top of it. Looking back at the situation, I laugh a little because I hid it behind other people's bird houses. It's been hiding there for a really long time, and I was absent some days before spring break. I'm afraid that the teacher has found it and will talk about it in front of the class or something weird like that. I just feel really stupid. I know. I know it's stupid. I came here for advice though. I'm emailing my teacher Sunday night about how much this class is consuming my life and how i'm constantly worrying about it. I'm going to ask him if I can work on it during lunch, or just simply throw it away. **TL;DR** I made something really stupid in ceramics that I regret making and I feel like the class will judge me.Thank you for who ever read this. I'm sorry if I sounded stupid or made too much of a big deal out of this. I just really need help and advice. Please be kind. **EDIT** I had an anxiety attack and was sent to the guidance councilor. I'm not in ceramics anymore! So happy. [info] None [info] 1364599153
Emerald_Alpha5 [info] I’ve had anxiety my entire life and it is only now effecting me. I have been diagnosed with anxiety for years now, I’m 16 and recently I have been super anxious and paranoid. I have mostly been anxious about my health thinking I have cancer or something bad, it has driven me to having to go to the hospital and getting blood work done to ensure I’m okay, and two doctors have both said that I’m physically fine. I still can’t shake the feeling that I’m dying or something, has this happened to anyone? [info] None [info] 1583889111
missarcadiabay [info] I lost one of my closest friend yesterday. She told me that I am a worthless person to chat. Because I change topics even if she is really serious about it. Which is not and I do not change topics, I just add topics to our boring convo. Some of my friends do that as well and it is no big deal. She told me it irritates her. I told her that she should have told me from the start so I can change my style in chatting her. I know its my mistake but I feel offended, I am a human too. I feel emotions. I am not like that, I care about them a lot, I listen to her pointless convo about her crushes. Even if I do not believe in Astrologies and some sorcery, I still listen. I explain my side. She feels sorry. She told me that she is not good at explaining, She meant the way I change the topics makes our conversation worthless. Not me. But still. It hurts me because I am not aware how I make our conversation worthless because I care for her a lot. But the word “worthless” is on different level for me. She can be honest with me and I’ll accept it but she should say it in a good way and not in a brutal way. Because we’re friends ya know. I did not say anything bad on her. (I swear)This is her like message to me which I translated from English and I prefer to ignore her like forever. I do not want insensitive friends in my life. Please don’t judge me. I have very few friends. But this is too much. I felt worthless ya know.Friend:   ” So that’s why, I said I’m sorry my bad. And you are still not used to me, there are times I have this kind of attitude that I cant control when I say something I will say it even if it is brutal 🙂 no wonder why my groupmate in thesis blocked me cause I’m honest 😂”Idk if you will read this or make a reply. Sorry for being dramatic. I have few friends. I am introvert and social awkward. Making friends is a 100% struggle for me. I have been diagnosed with anxiety way back 2016 when I was 17 years old and my parents wants me to go on a psychologist again because I became easily hot headed. I do not now myself anymore why I am worthless chatter, childish, and so sensitive. [info] None [info] 1586328170
_robynn_ [info] :( I’m so sorry. I didn’t know I was being cruel or that I was hurting you. I just honestly thought that when you said appointment you actually meant an appointment. I didn’t know you didn’t mean what you said. I saw how you got angry and it really does scare me. I don’t feel safe when you’re mad. Sofia was also very scared when you were hitting things with the frying pan. She is too young to understand that you have problems and she blames herself for you being mad. I blame myself for you being mad too, but I know it is my fault. The reason I don’t like getting close to people is because you have convinced me that I’m a terrible person. I care too much about people to get close to them because I’m convinced that I’m a terrible person and no one would ever want to be my friend. You called me cruel for not understanding that when you said “appointment” you actually meant “performance.” I know it’s my fault so please stop yelling and hitting me. It really hurts. Even though I am diagnosed with anxiety you are convinced that I don’t have it so I stopped taking my medicine because if I don’t have it I wouldn’t need my medicine. My anxiety has gotten so much worse because I’m not taking my medicine but I know that I’m faking it so I’ll just deal with it. I’m a pathetic human. I’m sorry I’m not able to help you with shopping and I’m sorry I waste your time because you have to pick me up from school. I know that I’m a burden and that I would be better off dead, please stop reminding me. I know I deserve all of this for coming into your life and costing you a lot of medical bills. I know you want me to die but I’m too scared and selfish to go through another suicide attempt. I know that makes me pathetic. I know I’m worthless. Please please please please stop hurting me. [info] None [info] 1571710491
mello151 [info] Was it a routine blood test our were they checking for this specifically? I have physicals and blood tests always come back normal but I wonder about things like this. I've been diagnosed with anxiety in the past. [info] None [info] 1405967101
Alienz8mypopcorn [info] Yup. I've been diagnosed with anxiety as well. Bad enough to keep me from being a MTI even though the AF is hurting for female instructors. My husband deployed to Afghanistan in 2013, and for the first month, I barely slept, and barely ate. I told myself that to surprise my husband for all his hard work overseas, I'd lose weight so he'd come home to a sexier wife than he left. After I started running 5 days a week, my appetite came back, and I was sleeping on the regular. I was still panicked when I didn't get my scheduled call or if it came a little late, but it was MUCH more manageable than when he first left.  [info] None [info] 1423089765
Happypumkin [info] yeah I was diagnosed with anxiety and am on the road to recovery atm but I'm doing a lot better thanks! [info] Louie [info] 1483470157
AlphaCentauri94 [info] Got this letter edited on an online editing service. Just wanna get your opinion whether they have done a good job? So I got this letter edited by a person who claims to be a professional copy editor and proofreaders working for an online editing website. Please keep in mind that english is my third language and I am not so good in my writing skills. So I really cannot give a proper remark on this letter. And this is why I will need your help.   But if you ask me, I'd say the grammar looks fine to me but I dont know why but there is something in it that looks odd lol.  The letter is huge, so I only posted the first half of it.&amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B; =======================================================================================Dear Sir or Madam,I am writing this letter to explain the purpose of my visit to Canada. But before doing that, I would like to give some background information regarding my previous stay in Canada. In the year 2014, I began my undergraduate studies as an international student at University of Guelph in the bachelor of arts and science program in Guelph, Ontario. Around the second semester of my studies, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, and because of this, I started having extreme difficulties coping with my school work. With the help of medication prescribed by the university physician, I managed to complete my fourth semester (second year). Unfortunately, by the time I was in my third year, my anxiety symptoms started to worsen. And as a result, I decided to withdraw from University of Guelph. As I was still receiving treatment from my physician, I decided to stay in Canada for 4 months after withdrawing from the last semester of university, then I left Canada and only I returned once in December 2018 for a short visit before the expiration of my study permit.My condition has improved significantly since the time I withdrew from my studies, and I belive I will be able to resume my studies sometime in future, maybe in few months. Now since I don’t know how long will it take for me to fully feel mentally healthy to go back to school, I am deciding to apply for just a visit visa for now. I have stated below the reasons for the urgency for my visit to Canada.During my upcoming visit, which I am planning to set for two weeks, I will be collecting some documents from the university (e.g., a letter from my professor, my transcripts, etc.). And though I have not yet booked an appointment with my doctor, I will be visiting her clinic to request some documents and a reevaluation of my medical condition. While in Canada, I also plan to visit my bank, CIBC, to make a few changes to my account (as I still have an active Canadian bank account). I am slowly gaining interest in pursuing business education, and I plan to visit some universities with reputable business programs while I am in Canada. As for the rest of the available time, I plan to tour around the city. I have attached the documents and the daily agenda that I have created for my stay. The attached documents include: 1. my hotel reservation for two weeks, 2. my tentative flight plan (I have not yet purchased the tickets. If my visa is approved, I will make the final payment at that time), 3. my daily agenda, 4. a letter from my university physician, and 5. my personal bank statements for the past six months. [info] None [info] 1552964036
Star_em [info] Any information on Sleep Anxiety? I'm trying to do research on it but I can't find much useful information to determine whether or not I have it. I've seen one person mention it in an interview and I was hoping if I figured out what it is I could finally find an answer to my lifelong sleep problems. Basically ever since I was a kid I've never been able to go to sleep because my mind would be racing, when I was a kid it would mostly be worries about dying which I still get most of the time, but it's also just general anxieties. I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past if that's any help. I'm just trying to find some people who have this issue as well and ways to cope with it. So far I have had to watch/listen to something every single night for 15 years to distract my brain enough to go to sleep. [info] None [info] 1501399858
aislinnlane [info] To-Do Lists Are Ruining My Life I feel so silly even posting this, but I'm not sure of what to do. Also, if this is a poor choice of threads, please let me know.When I look up information about list-making, I just get cringe BuzzFeed quizzes about being organized. My problem with list-making isn't about simple organization and it is slowly debilitating my everyday functioning. I have no money for therapy and was wondering if anyone had experience with this, in any form. I just don't want to feel alone and crazy anymore. I write *everything* down. If I make one error in what I'm writing down (from spelling, to order of thoughts, placement on the paper, or just a thought of "oh, that letter looks weird") I will start again. And again, and again, and again. I do not erase, I will rip the paper out of the book and start again. In the past four days, I have created **261 iPhone notes** about daily tasks, gone through **an entire journal** for my exercise plan, and created **hundreds and hundreds** of google documents detailing future living expenses (for jobs I don't have or want). None of these tasks I have even completed, though I truly believe when I get it down correctly, I will complete them. All of my notes and documents are typically very repetitive/almost identical, but I never really quite get them right. I have had some level of this habit for at least the past 2-3 years now, although it only started getting this bad about 5 months ago. I am not sure if I'm scared of failure, forgetfulness, being unprepared, or all three. Perhaps this is just my way of dealing with stress. Perhaps I'm obsessed with planning. I have no idea, but I am scared of my own mind. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorders as a tween/teen. Perhaps this is just another manifestation of the anxiety? Again, sorry if this seems insignificant or silly, but I would love to know if anyone has any advice, has dealt with anything similar or has any ideas for me to try. [info] None [info] 1574476905
futuristicskeptic [info] Will medication help me reclaim my concentration / grades back? HerroI was diagnosed with anxiety at 17 and it was very severe. I was offered Prozac as I was going from uncontrolled anxiety to depressive and suicidal episodes. I refused it because my parents made me terrified and therefore anxious about medication.It's been four years and I've been to therapy three times, I workout four times a week, I study sports and keep healthy, drink green tea eat well eg... but I'm not better, I don't feel mentally better, I just feel like I'm blindly surviving. I've been offered medication four more times by my GP who thinks it will really improve my life, and refused because of this residing fear.My concentration is terrible. I procrastinate everything and panic. I am failing college and I'm a really bright student. I'm starting to feel cornered and like I've waited long enough to improve, and still get extreme low moods where I feel suicidal.Will medication help me? Is it time to try? I would LOVE to be able to study and concentrate and be happy again... I've talked to my boyfriend who is also on medication for this and he is very supportive of me doing something to help my mental health, which is a pleasant change from my family. I still have my last prescription for lexapro sitting in my jewellery box. Should I just go for it?Tl:dr; wondering after four years of avoiding medication if it's time to try - failing student [info] None [info] 1490969596
PriinceV [info] Lol, I came to this subreddit to ask about this. Had unprotected sex 2 weeks ago, now I have night sweats, a runny nose, and a swollen lymph node in groin area and ofc I'm diagnosed with anxiety lol. This post gave me a bit of relief, thanks. Now let me get back to panicing and searching the web. [info] None [info] 1563670895
Jynx620 [info] The first one I remember having I was pretty young, some time in middle school. I had to give an oral report to my class of about 40 people. When I got up there I felt faint, clammy, dizzy, sweaty, shaky, etc. I felt like they were all talking shit about me in their heads and when one person giggled at their friend I was certain it was about me. I felt suffocated. I was diagnosed with anxiety later on. [info] None [info] 1404457264
bri180 [info] I'm scared to use up my makeup because well, they would be used up. A little background story before I begin: I never really had much money growing up so once I was able to afford things for myself, I appreciate everything I buy and am very cautious. But I've always kind of been this way- never used stickers because I wanted to save them for the perfect spot(ended up losing a lot because I never stuck them any where), never used up pens because I wanted to keep them full(and ended up with a huge bucket of pens). I was diagnosed with anxiety so I have pretty intrusive, unnecessary fears and I guess this just happens to be one of them!Here's the thing, makeup is meant to be used, hence expiration dates. And my collection is still growing despite my not wanting to use it up, especially my eye shadow palettes or any prestige item. I have this irrational fear or something that I won't be able to get them again especially the cute ones. I guess it's kind of like a FOMO in the future thing.I've tried to see if anyone else has gone through this problem but couldn't find anything. Did anybody here have this problem? Any tips to actually make me use my makeup!? Thanks! Edit: I was not expecting everyone to be so understanding and helpful! If you've shared your stories thank you I love that I get to relate to some of you guys and if you've shared helpful tips thank you as well, there are a lot of ideas that I hopefully get to engrave into my brain and I am for sure gonna try out any tricks y'all have told. I wish I could reply to everyone but I was not expecting the amount of comments. Stay awesome guys [info] None [info] 1491528256
3catnight [info] On my phone so have to be short. This is so much like what I've gone through. Memory, concentration, learning, all kept getting steadily worse. I was diagnosed with anxiety but nothing helped that. Years of talk therapy, nada. Changed AED meds, no improvement. Recently went to a psychiatrist instead of the therapist route, got listened to &amp; was diagnosed with ADHD, the inattentive type. Concerta is now helping, noticeably. So is using a physical planner instead of an electronic one. Writing things down instead of typing them in helps.  [info] 200mg Lamotrigine XR [info] 1479747938
part_house_part_dog [info] I developed sleeping problems (I either don't sleep well or I don't sleep at all) right around the time I was diagnosed with anxiety. The only thing that got me to sleep was Xanax. And then I slept like the dead. ETA: Prior to anxiety I slept like the dead, too.  [info] None [info] 1475890194
Tophat_Benny [info] Did I have a panic attack? (ER story) I want to preface this that I have been diagnosed with anxiety but its "mostly" under control as I currently do not take usual anti anxiety meds, just a few for sleeping, trazadone, hydroxizine, CBD oil, though the one that feels does the most is CBD.  I also have been having breathing problems for the last year.  So far it's been mostly allergy related, I'm on a 1 a day control inhaler.  Even though later on my actual Asthma test came up negative, I still take the control because it does seem to help, cold air, dust, are triggers.  So when I woke up today with shortness of breath, dizzy, felt like passing out, I thought it was lung related.  My inhalers did nothing, I felt awful, so I had my wife drive me to the ER.  Blood tests came back normal.  Had a chest CT scan which showed no abnormalities.  My blood is circulating oxygen fine, my lungs are not wheezy.  So they basically sent me home and said to follow up with my primary.  I'm still tired, and little nauseous.  But I'm doing slightly better later in the day.  Is this all in my head?  I've had smaller attacks before but they felt way different, and once I realised I was anxious it went away. They were never debilitating as it was today. [info] None [info] 1579724428
PM_ME_UR_TANNED_BUTT [info] I am diagnosed with anxiety **and** insomnia. Racing thoughts about an exam or a long shift is **anxiety**. When I just can’t sleep just because that’s **insomnia**.I know the difference and can explain both because I’ve experienced both.Could be, like I said. [info] None [info] 1537061806
kateesaurus [info] Honestly that sounds a lot like what happened to me in high school. Teachers called me lazy because I’d miss chunks of class and not know about assignments due to seizures. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD and guess what? I don’t actually have either of those or get medicated for them now. Feel free to pm me if you want to talk further but I don’t want to take up your whole post. [info] None [info] 1549033341
blue_lillies [info] I don't know how much of a communicator you are with your wife, but her amount of contact isn't wrong per se, it may just be not what you're expecting from her or what you/her need right now. I thought I'd provide two examples of opposite ends of the communication spectrum. My partner used to work what is called FIFO here (fly in fly out) which is working away for periods of time regularly (he did 8 days at work then 6 days home mostly, but also did 2-3 weeks away with a week-ish home sometimes). We would talk once a day in the evening when I was home from work and he'd had dinner/exercise/drinks, usually for about 10 minutes, occasionally up to an hour. Our housemates (another couple) on the otherhand, are the complete opposite. When she works away (same kind of work as my partner, but not all the time), they talk every night for 2-4 hours via phone and Skype, and they text all day. When she is working in the office, she and I email back and forth, usually amounting to about 5-6 emails over a day. I shared the above to show that vastly different communication amounts and methods are all 'right', but you may want/need a certain amount of communication that may not being met right now. I also shared to give you a few ideas on methods of keeping in touch rather than just by phonecalls.One other thing I wanted to suggest was that if you're not working right now, could you go spend a more extended period of time with your wife. If you don't have any other regular commitments, I would suggest a week or a few weeks with her. Yes, you'll have to pay rent even though you won't be there, but you would have had to pay that anyway regardless. You can use it to re-evaluate your relationship if you'd like, or simply use it as a time to relax, re-connect and reinvent yourself. My partner is currently home since he's not working anymore, and I'm also home a lot due to an injury, and even though I'm not looking forward to when he starts working away again, this time has been really nice to just spend time with him and hang out casually more. I hope things pick up for you soon. I would second the other suggestions in this thread like finding a therapist (community centre, or even a help call line? I was able to get a reduction in therapist costs because I was diagnosed with anxiety - maybe see if your health providers or doctors can offer anything similar?), finding some new/reviving some old hobbies and activities, getting out and spending time with friends and other people. I would also suggest some exercise - it can have very positive impacts on your physical and mental health and wellbeing. I know a lot of this may sound like generic advice, but it can all work, you just need to find what helps you. I'll be thinking of you. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1396776730
VaLeLaaa [info] How did you beat anxiety? Hey, guys!I've been diagnosed with anxiety a bit over three years ago. I've had it under control and without medication until last week, when my aunt, who also has anxiety as of recently, moved in with my family. She keeps wanting to talk about it and wants to hear about my experiences , which I have shared more than once, but I can't anymore, because thinking/talking about it makes me have attacks and need medication (still in moderation). I beat it three years ago by focusing on family and work and ignoring "the issue". I am still on that same path, but thinking it away does not help now. How did you guys do it? Any advice is very much appreciated. TLDR: How did you beat anxiety? [info] None [info] 1554663154
SaintPhoeniix [info] In answer to your final question, yes. Things like going outside or even being in a conversation can be severly affected, depending on how bad they have it. I turned down every single offer to go out from friends all through my school life, before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I just didn't know why I couldn't face going out. I don't really know how she feels though, she probably wants your support but doesn't want to be treated as if she can't do anything. Maybe try and ask her, nicely, if she wants to go out somewhere that she feels safe and if she says 'No', say "That's fine, we don't have to do anything you don't want to" etc. [info] None [info] 1375318614
megangigilyn [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety around five or so and have been on it or a similar antidepressant since.What is atopy? Is there treatment? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1422478722
commevastu [info] Yeah, you're right it's a shame that it's not compelling. I don't understand why mental health issues (I am diagnosed with anxiety) are not considered as serious as ADHD etc. what about the lower t14, Cornell-Vanderbilt with medians of 167? [info] None [info] 1510238036
moonbby33 [info] Nooo I have a Lilith in Libra. I don’t really understand the Lilith? Can you explain it? And alssoooo this is where I think mental health plays into things because you may be more balanced because I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders since I was little and grew up in a very unhealthy/chaotic household. So you’re probably the more emotionally balanced version of me lol. Also i am sooo happy for you that your loved ones are proud of the impulsive Aries moon nature in you! Funny with the fool card - yep it stalks my readings! are you vocal with your emotions / feelings or do you hold those back? [info] ♑️☀️•♈️🌙•♋️⬆️ [info] 1565626479
decidingtobebetter2 [info] Overcoming anxiety with communication I've been diagnosed with anxiety since 2012. Since then, I've worked very hard to eliminate a lot of my symptoms. Used to not be able to leave the house some days, now I have no problem with most social events. The only thing that I can't seem to handle is maintaining relationships... My friends are constantly calling me, asking me what's up, wanting to talk to me, and I never answer them. I miss them, I love them, and shouldn't be nervous around them, but *I just am.* It's gotten so bad that a friend of mine has been trying to contact me for months and I haven't responded to her. It's a fear of letting her down, I know. *But I'm letting her down just by not answering her*.   Do you guys have any strategies for fixing this? Even curbing it? Any advice helps. [info] None [info] 1531158458
Narit [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorders, so i know all that already hah.  My stomach is super topsy turvey [info] None [info] 1363908951
Guitarguy0393 [info] You're right! I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Problem is, the main thing I overanalyze is what she is saying or doing; not necessarily what I am doing. For example a girl said something to me and the whole weekend I was trying to figure out whether it secretly meant something else, and if she was giving me subtle cues. [info] None [info] 1443799047
affablegiraffe [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety thanks to this video. [info]  [info] 1501882034
MakeupMua16 [info] Has anyone ever had constant itching in one particular spot every day but then it stopped completely once they started taking benzodiazepines? Like I have itching Only or I should say 98% only at night. sometimes it gets really bad that it doesn’t happen till it wakes me up in the middle of the night not going to say where (you can probably guess) it’s too tmi and it only happens every single night (btw already checked by 4 different drs I know and I don’t have a rash/redness visible, no bumps, no hemorrhoids or pinworms). Only maybe 1-3x does it happen during the day a month or not even that. A year and up to about a month or two before the itching started I was on an Ssri (first ever anxiety medication taken) for anxiety called Paxil hated it because it caused me to gain a whopping 50 pounds so I went off and didn’t find that I really had anxiety that bad that I needed a medication just primary dr thought I did for social anxiety. Anyways had panic attack about two months ago my first ever and oddly when I was at the worst of the attack for the first week or two where I would get tremors in my stomach, extreme nausea, couldn’t sleep 4 days in a row the itching stopped randomly (still wasn’t on any medication yet oh wait I did take Zoloft for 2 days the day after my attack happened hated that it didn’t help immediately so cut it off cold turkey) then because this was my first panic attack and I didn’t know it was a panic attack I had went to the ER three times within two weeks and every time I was diagnosed with anxiety reaction I even had blood testing (every visit) brain scans done and ekg and a stomach ultrasound and all came back fine. and the third time I actually got a prescription from the ER doctor for Ativan not just giving me the iv and sending me with nothing home. The Ativan worked good stopped my itching completely but I hate how innorder for it to help my other anxiety symptoms I had to take it every 7-8 hours or it would wear off quite quickly. Now my psychiatrist who I hadn’t seen in a year since being off Paxil switched me to valium 5mg two pills 3x a day and my itching has stopped now we are trying to get off the benzos and onto more of a long term medication like an Ssri. So today we started in the morning to cut down drs orders to taking one pill 3x a day and I could immediately notice the itching came back when I woke up. Do you think then that itching like this is an anxiety related problem if regular and hemorrhoid specialist doctors couldn’t find a medical problem wrong with why I am itching and only at night? [info] None [info] 1541096555
sonicfreak360 [info] Hi op, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and keto have been my life saver! The reason simple Carbs help with anxiety is because of how sugar acts as a comfort food. Keep calm and keto on, because keto starts to be more comforting than comfort foods and simple Carbs!  [info] None [info] 1453137649
Stat-Lord [info] AITA For snapping at my family over a joke A few days ago, I snapped at my mum and my sister. Not like, a small snide comment. I, for lack of a better term, erupted. It all started in 4th grade when I was diagnosed with anxiety, specifically, around the concept of death. I literally couldn't be in the dark because it would make me imagine how permanent death is and how immanent it is for everyone. Around this time my mum and sister had learned that a song they both really enjoyed, which was solely based around the inevitability of death, would send me into a meltdown. Looking back, it was actually causing me to have a panic attack. But my family kept playing it, because they KNEW it would upset me and they thought it was hilarious. They both knew I had anxiety but they didn't understand just how terrible it felt for me to be stuck in tears in the back of the car whilst they sung it out loud on purpose. Fast forward a couple of years and they both recall the song whilst cleaning through some old CD's in the garage. They bring the song up with me in a joking manner. Talking about how terrified I used to be of a little harmless song. I told them I didn't find it funny, that they knew I had anxiety. They scoffed and told me to toughen up. That's when I snapped, I flew off the handle and told them how much I still resent them both for putting me through that when I was just a child. It went back and forth for over an hour before mum called me some choice expletives and told me to fuck off. I'm writing this from my friends place and my family isn't letting me go home until I apologise, but I'll be damned before I apologise for anything that I said. [info] None [info] 1551523581
bananabatm4n [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and adhd.  When i started taking my adhd pills i started eating a lot more and got much fatter.  Now i am really self conscious and i am always worrying about people view me.  Now obviously i don't suffer as bad as your gf but i really can't do anything that is remotely weird in public or else i will start to freak out.  I was gonna write more but i forgot and i hope your gf gets better with her interactions with people [info] None [info] 1560320503
Drifter1000 [info] I suffer from general anxiety disorder. There is no trigger to it, it simply comes and goes. I can go weeks without an anxiety attack, while at other times I can get multiple attacks a day.When I first started getting it, I thought it was something wrong with my heart since my heart would flutter and my nerves would be shot. Went to the ER, they said everything was fine. But they prescribed some benzos the same night since then and there, I was diagnosed with anxiety.I opted out of medication for more natural solutions. I've heard some horror stories about benzos, so I only took them once and stopped. [info] None [info] 1418305814
illliveon [info] Sure! My fiance and I first started dating when I was 18 and he was 20. We are now 24, and 26. I was diagnosed with anxiety at 16. I depend on him a lot. Right now he is the only one working, and I sympathize with the fact you can't figure out why he is with you. It's too good to be true because I don't feel like I deserve it. I also have those moments of panic where I think he is cheating on me with someone, or planning to leave me. After we moved states and lived with my parents for a year or so, he had a breakdown. I had done the same as you and put my anxiety on his shoulders, i would have panic attacks if he left and everything. He said he couldn't handle it. I just listened and let him talk, because it's difficult for him to express his emotions. Then I told him I appreciate all of that, he doesn't have to stay, it terrifies me, but I wouldn't want him to be here unless he wanted. I then started working on my anxiety a little more alone. We also set up therapy time, which was just some time out of the week we both could talk about serious stuff. Before that I constantly talked about those things everyday, and he never talked about it. Relationships are really difficult when you are also healing from mental illness. It's so hard to not just vent to him, because he is so good at making me feel better. I sometimes wish he would talk a little more. I don't know I have come to realize our brains work differently, and more and more now we are starting to understand each other. I'm still working on healing the anxiety. It actually got worse the last year and I am now full blown agoraphobic. Somehow he loves me even more than ever before, and I'm still hopefull I will work through the anxiety stuff. It's a difficult process, and it's really hard to get professional help without money. I don't know if you have to deal with that. Besides that for my anxiety I find its super important I eat well and exercise, consistantly. I meditate, and looked up breathing get techniques that help get me through panic attacks. I tell him how he can help. Before I would just whine, and he would feel helpless. So I tried to change that, and try to find little ways he can help. Like getting me a glass a water when he notices I'm anxious, or little things like that.  [info] None [info] 1458589208
dio_joestar77 [info] I feel like I'm going to die Ok, I don't know how to explain it. Recently, I'm feeling different.  Suddenly I don't feel nervous about the future at all, I don't struggle thinking about life and have calmed down a lot. But now I feel like I'm going to die soon for some reason. I'm really scared of going to sleep because I think I might not come back. I feel like I'm in a nightmare. I think I am going insane, and I can tell this will get worse. I'm feeling spaced out, like my head is empty. I'm posting in this subreddit because I was diagnosed with anxiety,  I take meds and all. But I really don't know what's happening. I'm scared. Please help. [info] None [info] 1514695963
Offthepoint [info] Have they ruled out hyperthyroid on you? I was diagnosed with anxiety and it was treated as such, but found out years later that it was thyroid trouble all along. You really need to have that eliminated as a possibility. Get a full panel done, not just TSH. [info] None [info] 1439304279
iliveinablackhole_ [info] Worry of developing obsessive thoughts causing me horrible anxiety. (Don't read this if you're scared of developing obsessive thoughts. I don't want to put ideas into any anxious minds that might cause them to experience what I am going through.) I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a few years ago, which was mainly caused by a paranoia of stomach bug. I've brought my own anxiety down a whole lot in these past few years and have become less paranoid of the stomach bug. I am proud of my progress, however this flu season has been really pushing my limits. People throwing up at work sick, my sisters children getting sick, and some kid threw up on my carpet. This stuff still bothers me but I have become far less paranoid than I used to be. Anyway I feel like all this stress on my anxiety has caused it to resurface in different ways. A few weeks ago I had this thought "what if I can't yawn?" and for a few days I couldn't! Then I was able to  yawn again for a couple weeks and now it's somewhere in between. I can yawn but I have to try hard. The other night I smoked weed (last time I'm doing that) and I thought "if my anxiety can prevent me from yawning what else can it do to me? What if every time I see this person I think of _____? What if everytime I do this I think of ______? What if everytime I eat I think of ______?" It drove me into a really bad panic attack. The following morning I felt better but the same "what ifs" came back later that night causing me another panic attack. And I've just felt very off and on edge since that last attack. Scared of going crazy...I know its just anxiety but I'm scared it could turn into something worse like OCD. I don't have health insurance so these things are tough for me. I try to stay positive thinking and it helps but there's just this part of my mind that I'm terrified of right now. I'm afraid to go near it or I'll go into another panic attack. I've felt sick all day. Hoping someone might have had a similar experience and could give me advice on how to overcome this. [info] None [info] 1391926894
multifoiled [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety for a couple of years but have been dealing with it since I was a very small child. Radiohead helps me codify it and examine it in a way almost no other band does.  [info] (No no no no no no no no) [info] 1464904355
JohnDivney [info] Not too long at all, thanks, any information I can get is good. I have been diagnosed with anxiety before, and Adderall definitely agitates this, and creates a craving for alcohol. Also, it has, like everything, simply stopped working as well. A long time ago I took Lexapro and while it worked well, I wasn't comfortable not being able to "turn it on and off" so to speak, I prefer taking something when I need it to taking it every day, and this is another attitude I have towards drugs that is at odds with the Medical Profession. [info] None [info] 1305736439
chromakeydreamc0at [info] I recently got a weighted blanket and it has really started to help my quality of sleep. It holds you down firmly in the bed and just feels safe and calming. Other than that, I would suggest seeing a doctor. Do you ever feel anxious? I was diagnosed with anxiety later in life and realized how it affected my sleep as well. A doctor could look into that or any other possible sleep disorders.  [info] None [info] 1545967227
toosassyferyou [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety for a while, and I have these episodes as well. I guess I just always thought it was something that happened with GAD - and from what I've read, I think it's safe to say that a lot of GAD people struggle with intrusive thoughts like that, and it drives them wild.The best solution I've come up with is to avert my attention immediately after an occurrence. I know there's no way I'm able to talk myself out of fear (and usually dwelling on them only makes it worse).I just tell myself it's not worth my time. The intrusive thoughts aren't reality, and they haven't happened, and so there's no use thinking about them.It's a battle, but I've seen progress. [info] GAD &amp; Panic Disorder [info] 1405397307
notewise [info] I feel I'm becoming obsessed with the fear of being diabetic. Don't really know how to stop thinking about it. If this belongs more on r/diabetes I apologize and I'll remove if needed. TL;DR: Been scared of being diabetic since 2016 and got myself tested twice since last year. They found nothing, but because of my anxiety, I can't stop obsessing over it, wondering if i really do have it and they just misdiagnosed me and I don't know what I can do to trust the word of the Doctor or stop obsessing over it all. Over the past year or so, since 2016, I feel I've been fearful over being a diabetic. It's scary to me. Back in 2016, when I was having some frequent urination problems, I went and looked it up(Big mistake, I know...) and saw that they were possibly linked to things like diabetes, anxiety, prostate cancer I think I saw also..and diabetes was the one I started to worry the most about. So I looked into the other symptoms and started to piece together in my mind that I might have it. After some fighting with myself, I went and got myself tested. Blood test showed nothing and I was able to relax and calm myself, and it felt like the frequent urination problem I had stopped after hearing that. The problem came back though in last November. In December 2017, I got myself tested once again for it, this time they gave me a urine test. Saying that they would do a blood test if the sugar in it was high enough. Which did worry me a little because it wasn't what I was used to seeing with diabetic tests, but I did my best to trust it.  They didn't need to do the blood test and said that things were okay.Then this year, I felt i started to doubt it, thinking I was being misdiagnosed, that the test wasn't accurate enough and that I do have it, they just haven't figured it out yet.I feel I'm gonna go back to my doctor's for a 3rd time to get tested because I'm waking up at night to urinate. But I don't know how to stop obsessing and panicking over this. It feels like every time something minimal goes wrong with my body. My mind is sent into overdrive, thinking it's something truly awful going on with me. I was diagnosed with anxiety, I know that much. So much that it feels like it does effect my day to day life a bit. I'm gonna try and get some therapy for it hopefully soon. [info]  [info] 1521343052
AlueMoon96 [info] Suffering in silence So, I'm currently 23 and weight close to 340 lbs. I've been diagnosed with anxiety/paranoia disorder among other things and after getting off my meds (with the advice of my doctor) I found myself regressing back into a panicked eating. My waking and sleeping life is full of food even if I just ate a massive Thanksgiving sized meal. I'm in therapy and working towards slowly tracing the source of my weak will when it comes to food. I hoard food and fall into a food/drugged state and from this I struggle to do anything aside from stuff my face. Is this BED or just something else. I'd like to get more help [info] None [info] 1549767494
beersforfears [info] I don't know whether this would be considered rational or irrational, depending on what your views are (two out of the three people that know of this fear of mine consider it irrational), but after I had my daughter, I have always had a major fear of something bad happening to her. It doesn't help that I am diagnosed with anxiety/panic disorder, so I will every now and then have a moment of weakness and have panic attacks at the mere thought. A major thing lately that I have been working myself up over is the fear of what could happen to her in her lifetime, as far as the conditions in America/the environment. Before I had a child, I never thought about things like this in the depth that I do now, because I was living for myself an had no one depending on me for their well-being, therefore I could worry a lot less. But now that I have her, I'm not living for myself anymore and it is my job to do whatever I can to protect her. I guess just knowing I can't protect her from everything really just scares the shit out of me. [info] None [info] 1313214482
alxbailz [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and a couple of other things, all of which I have almost completely overcome. Of course, they will probably always still be there, but for me, I literally just said “get the fuck over it”. To myself. I just constantly force my logic to be louder than my inner “but what if-“‘s. It works. When you start JUST DOING IT, whatever it is that’s making you anxious, and seeing that there is almost never a repercussion, you get over it. Especially with social anxiety, and especially in the adult world, shit just really really doesn’t matter as much as you tell yourself it does. Majority of people that you could have a potentially awkward situation with, you never fucking have to see again if you don’t want to. Life’s just too short to hold back. Turn your “what if this goes terribly” into “what if this goes really well”. It’s a conscious effort, you have to stop yourself in the middle of the situation, as it’s happening to really make a change [info] None [info] 1535448463
Fartingpenguinhole [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and this bent shelf gives me a problem. So I can't agree more, but anytime I say what you said I get 50 messages about how I'm  the problem with invisible diseases. This picture makes me want to cry. And itch. Very itchy.  [info] None [info] 1552731913
Renee1369 [info] Thank you. I've been to the e.r and a dr and my lungs are functioning great. I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder. Taking buspar which I dont think helps. Haven't started my zoloft yet. Thanks for your info! [info] None [info] 1572478632
bosfton [info] Yeah, I definitely see where you’re coming from. I guess I feel like my friends don’t even offer help maybe that means my friendship isn’t worth much to them. I am very shy and hate public speaking too but I would do it for a friend.  I asked a bridesmaid if she could do the speech instead and she immediately said yes like “If you mean like gush about our friendship and what it means to me to be there then I can totally do that, I’ll write it up tonight”. That was more what I thought a normal friend would be like.   My MOH and I have been best friends for over 20 years, I am diagnosed with anxiety and take medication for it as well I get that, but for me I’d view it as “well this is really scary and intimidating but this is my best friend we are talking about and it would make her happy so I’ll just say something brief”.  Hell I feel that way about the wedding ceremony and the first dance— I am shy and bad at dancing but my fiancé thought that a first dance would be sweet and they are commonly done at weddings so I sucked it the fuck up and learned even though I’m terrified. Part of life is forcing yourself outside of your comfort zone sometimes. I realize it’s not my place so that’s why I won’t force her to talk but it hurts she doesn’t wanna make any effort when I would have for her. Also I think she forgot about the speech because she said “I thought there wasn’t going to be toasts” and when I dug out the old chat log of her agreeing to give a toast she said “yeah I thought I could do it back when it was something in the future” and started saying stuff like “well a MOH speech isn’t required so it’s okay”.  It feels like she decided in her mind she wasn’t going to give a speech and then just never told me. [info] None [info] 1562286619
cas18khash [info] I used to go a lot but usually a psychiatrist. I was diagnosed with anxiety issues and late adhd and the medication I took completely changed my life. If it wasn't for that psychiatrist, I would be living very differently now! I always encourage people to visit a psychologist or a psychiatrist and talk about their problems. Sometimes they're easily dealt with using some professional guidance.  [info] 19 [info] 1362989462
hotstickywaffle [info] Need help with medical marijuana for anxiety and looking for a doctor I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago. I haven't been to a doctor in a while, but have been wanting to look into medical marijuana. I know there have been big changes to the laws recently with more coming, but it seems like step 1 is to find a doctor who can and would be willing to prescribe it. Are there any good resources with doctors that are open to it? [info] None [info] 1559047445
brillantezza [info] I've had this all my life and I've been diagnosed with anxiety. As you said, it's generally when you're alone in bed trying to go to sleep which is the exact same thing with me. I also sometimes worry when I haven't been in contact for my mom or dad or even boyfriend that they got into a car crash, and then my head goes to a very elaborate place like "What if their cellphone got destroyed and I'm not listed with an updated number on their info. It's not totally uncommon to sort of stew on what would happen if a loved one died but it is not normal. This is a symptom of anxiety, albeit a common one. You should really seek counselling because although these thoughts might not be particularly intrusive in your everyday life, they can be very insidious and indicative of an underlying problem. But know that you're not alone, and it's not just you. [info] None [info] 1390920946
AHNOLD86 [info] Wow, shit, I have been diagnosed with anxiety but I didn't know this was even a symptom. It mostly just happens when I'm excited though, and it's so annoying. Like if I'm really into what I'm talking about, my body will start to shake to the point where talking is hard because I can't control my jaw movements. Really does a number on my efforts to be cool and calm in my composure [info] None [info] 1499530109
DarthDadaD20 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I know it's hard. The whole week up to playing I think if excuses to not play, I get angry and say "why do I even fucking play games".I do the same with other competitive games too. I'll drive to go play Pokemon or miniatures or magic and half way there turn the car around and go home.....make up an excuse to tell my wife why I didn't go.But here are a few things I hope helps you.There are "lfg" (looking for group) pages here on Reddit and other social media. post can help you find games in your area.there are also websites like meetup.com. my small town has a huge meet up page for Dungeons and Dragonsif you're ever at a store and see somebody pick up Lord the rings or Star Wars, magic cards or something else nerdy....they might know of or be interested in the game.As for actually playing, know that many, many players actually suffer with anxiety or other mental disabilities, or even just socially awkward so if you find a group you might not be alone.And I'll tell you. At first I hate myself and just want to go home, but while playing, after getting into it I really do forget all about it and have the most fun, then I feel good the next few days (and then unfortunately the whole cycle starts again) [info] DM [info] 1450397028
Wrathchild7 [info] I dealt with an almost identical experience my senior year of college recently. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, had frequent chest pains/ panics attacks/ insomnia was able to tough out to graduation. My advice would be to deal with it as best you can, get as much help you can, try not to put so much pressure on yourself! Just do the best you can! I graduated and am still having issues with the anxiety disorder and finding a good job. However i find peace I'm knowing I'm doing the best I can. Also I was prescribed Xanax which really helped with the anxiety/insomnia may want to talk to doctor about that. Hope this helps!!! [info]  [info] 1511234749
PreposterousMurmur [info] Honestly, I was diagnosed with anxiety and paranoia in my teens and have tried my hardest to work through it. Weirdly, I've never felt calmer about anything in my life than the health and safety of my babies. Haha, I still get startled when the wind hits my front door, but I know deep down inside the babies are okay.  [info] 35 wks with b/g twins [info] 1337781033
hec6340 [info] Hypochondria AND a fear of doctors Hey guys. So here is my dilemma. I was diagnosed with anxiety in college when I started having panic attacks that made me think I was having a heart attack. Back then, I would run to the doctor constantly. About 10 years ago, I went to the urgent care due to another panic attack. My heart rate was elevated and the nurse made a comment about how my adrenal gland would give out if my heart beat like that all the time. Since that comment, I have been terrified of going to the doctor. I have been a few times since, and I always end up in tears at the thought of getting my vitals taken. That is when the fear sets in. I know my pulse will be elevated and I’m scared of the nurse/doctors reaction. I went to the cardiologist once to rule out that it really wasn’t my heart. That was a terrible experience too. He told me that I was too young to be in his office. I’m also somewhat overweight. I walked away from that appointment with only my doctors comments that my knees and back will buckle under my weight and nothing that eased my anxiety. I am also a pretty bad hypochondriac. Any little thing, pain, twinge and I immediately think it’s the end. I also fixate on a fear of dying. If someone I know, or someone my age dies, I constantly think I’m dying of the same thing. I know I have rambled on, but the main reason for this post is to ask for advice on how to get over my fear of doctors. I haven’t been to the doctor for a full physical in 4 years. I am on medication for anxiety because I go to the psychiatrist regularly (they don’t take my vitals there so I have no problem going) I have tried therapy, but haven’t found one that I have clicked with yet. I just want to figure out some sort of balance so I can spend less time thinking I’m dying and more time enjoying my life. Thanks! [info] None [info] 1559869562
clevelanders [info] Cause of excessive sweating? So to start, I've always sweat more than the average person. I'm naturally a stocky / bigger guy (6 foot, 200-220 lb, very broadly built), but not severely overweight by any means. 20lb at my worst, average weight at best. It fluctuates over the years, but it hasn't been too absurd since I was 16 (22 now). In the past, whenever I was at a dance or a concert and I was in a group of people working really hard, I'd sweat buckets. Or if I work out hard and run I'm drenched. That's nothing new and although I've had annoying and embarrassing moments, I've come to accept it. Probably because in those moments I don't stand out too much. However, over the last year it's gotten significantly worse. Unless I'm in a cold room I sweat through my clothes and sheets at night, and if it's hot or humid outside I will sweat just from standing outside. I just got back from a two mile walk and sweat right through my shirt and my hair was soaked. Its so embarrassing and I can't seem to get a hang on it. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I know that could contribute, and I also am not the skinniest I've ever been, but my sweating has never been so bad. I can't figure out if this is a mental thing or a physical thing and how to curb it. It's really getting in the way of me living a comfortable life. Also, I know it's natural and nothing to be ashamed of. It's just something I want to understand about myself! Thanks so much for answers in advance. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1472075883
ElenyaRevons [info] I’m always sick and I don’t know why. I am 22F. I am constantly getting sick. Like, if there’s a bug going around, I get it. If I get sick or even get allergies, I get a sinus infection. It’s affecting my relationships, my job (obviously), and I’m just really tired of being “that girl.” I eat pretty healthy, try to avoid sugar, I don’t do drugs or smoke, I don’t go to the gym but I’m pretty active in general, I’m a healthy weight (5,4”, 130lbs) I drink a lot of water. I take vitamin d, iron, and Zoloft. I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and ADHD.I’ve been to an allergist since I was very little (born early, asthma, mild allergies) and he just put me on Flonase to see if the sinus infections would stop. I had my adenoids removed when I was four because I was always sick, and until later in high school it wasn’t this bad. Anyway, I’m just really tired of this. I know I’m on thin ice with my boss because I’m frequently sick with fevers and symptoms that render me unable to work. Any advice or thoughts? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1583377759
Nbafan12376 [info] Help me I am a 16 year old male and I have been diagnosed with anxiety and feel I have OCD as well. I need help.. my brain feels as if it will explode and I am very scared rn.. i feel I am scared it will just stop working.. I am shaking and I can't sleep. Is this anxiety or could something be wrong!? [info] None [info] 1482996806
GreatGateway [info] Assumed I had asthma until just this week - debilitating symptoms keeping me down. For the last 10 years or slightly more, I have suffered from unusual symptoms that have caused me to lose jobs, money and independence all around. Initially I was diagnosed with anxiety, and then asthma, however I'm finding none of the medication, including rescue inhalers, helps me. In some cases it actually worsens my symptoms!I feel very tight and squeezy in my chest, easily breathless, sometimes nauseous OR dizzy, and I get frequent headaches, vision problems and disturbed sleep. My legs can feel like they're swelling up even when they aren't and I may sometimes get pins and needles in my hands and face.To be honest I'm terrified of it being to do with my heart as it can get worse after some exercise, particularly sexual activity. I have a phobia of heart problems, even mentioning the word makes me anxious, so I beg and pray from the information provided that it isn't to do with that! [info] Patient [info] 1531932379
djeco [info] It really does consume your life.. But hang in there buddy. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years back and it was hell. The thing is I wasn't worried about things like social anxiety, but rather the fear it self. The heart beat, sufication, swetty palms, the feeling of lost. It always started in my legs and build itself out, that tingling sensation. After a time I was done with it. I remembered having a dream of me training, boxing and training MMA. Don't know why I dreamed it, never been into fighting myself, but I liked to watch it. For some reason I woke up happy, happier that I've been for many months. I looked myself in the mirror that day and wanted to take control, like really bad, to a sensation that even got me mad at myself. I started researching, read other stories, tried out things that worked, other things didn't work, started training a little bit, worked on my breathing techniques, etc. When the therapist said that I didn't had to go to therapy anymore because I was healthy was like removing the  biggest chains in my life. I even got to a fuck it, I don't care anymore. You build yourself into this cage, and the only person that can unlock it is you.  [info] None [info] 1547969012
AliceIsCuriouser [info] Newly Diagnosed and Really Confused Hi everyone! I was diagnosed a year ago at age 18, and I feel like I still don't know what's going on with me. My grandmother and my aunt had terrible ovarian cysts and multiple miscarriages but went on to have 3, and 2 children, respectively. My mother recently developed ovarian cysts from going through menopause. I've been told that "PCOS" and "Ovarian Cysts" are two totally different things, and I've also been told that those terms can be used interchangeably. My doctor formally diagnosed me with PCOS eleven months ago, and I honestly feel like I know nothing about my condition. It started my senior year of high school, and I gained forty pounds over the course of December 2012-July 2013. I felt like no matter what I did the weight just kept coming. Visited the doc, after all tests came back normal, she put me on 37.5 mg of Phentermine for weight loss, and kept me on the birth control I was taking for brutal cramps during my periods. I should add, I'm 5'3", usual weight for me is close to 150.A few months later, go back to the doc, realize I'm down from 190 to 170 thanks to the Phentermine, periods are normal, I feel great. April 2014 comes along, I can no longer afford my medication, so I stop taking them. By July 2014 I have gained the 20 pounds back, and more. I continue to eat healthy and exercise, but I get discouraged because all I can ever seem to lose is water weight. Doc decides to run more tests, and have me go for two ultrasounds of my uterus and ovaries. This is when she diagnoses me and says that my abnormal weight gain was most likely caused by PCOS, but doesn't really suggest that we do anything about it.Fast forward to now, I went to the doctor in March and told her that I had been bleeding (flow varied from light to moderate) since November 2014. I expressed that I would've told her sooner but I just figured that the bleeding was caused by a cyst rupturing (it's happened twice before), and the flow wasn't heavy like a normal period so I wasn't too concerned. Doc then suggested I get two more ultrasounds, since a year had passed since the last ones, just to see if my lining was thick and if that was what caused my constant bleeding. She also placed me back on the Phentermine and new birth control, and so far I've lost 6 pounds (woo!) About a week before my scheduled ultrasounds, I started bleeding VERY heavily, to the point where I was going through one Tampax Ultra tampon (15-18 gram capacity) in 20 minutes. I had the ultrasounds done and I go back in 4 days to get the results.My main concern throughout this entire process is that my doctor hasn't suggested putting me on medication for anything aside from my Phentermine. I know no two cases of PCOS are the same, but it seems to me that in this sub there's a running theme that most women are on some type of medication for theirs? I guess I'm just a little worried that there are things that my doctor and I could be doing to help me, and we aren't. I understand that the results from the ultrasounds will ultimately tell my doctor which direction to go, but it's already been a year and I feel like we haven't gotten anywhere. Maybe there are some good reasons why my doctor hasn't suggested anything else. I'm only 19, I'm not interested in having children right now, but I do want them sometime in the future. I've never seen a gynecologist (my first and only exam to date was performed by my regular doctor), I've never been referred to an endocrinologist either. Depending on my weight loss this month I might need to see a nutritionist though.I also have all the symptoms that are common in PCOS; I do suffer from the weight gain, the irregular cycles, the dandruff, the unbearable pelvic pain, the cysts, and I was diagnosed with anxiety two years before being diagnosed with PCOS, so I never thought those two could be related. I don't have the thinning/balding hair, the voice changes, the facial/body hair, or the acne. Sometimes I feel like I don't really belong in this sub because most of you lovely people talk about things that I'm not experiencing, so I often wonder if I really have this condition.Sorry for the really long post, I just felt like you all would know how this feels :) Thanks in advance for any insight! [info] None [info] 1429933623
friendswithknifes [info] She knows I get stressed easily ( I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 9/10) and I suppose I can see what you mean, but she certainly could have worded it better. I got so anxious and freaked out from what she said I nearly threw up, if that's any indication on how stressed these things make me. And she definitely should have. I'm not a mind reader. [info] None [info] 1566252317
the-silencing [info] Anxiety, MDMA and the elusive Afterglow Hello all!I just want to write this somewhere to a group of people i feel will understand. I went out on Saturday night to my favourite place in the world, its a little hub of creative people that like to party together, i've been about four times, and this was my 5th/6th time trying MD. A big room of loved up people giving hugs and just opening up about their lives, also of course having a good dance to some decent psytrance ;-)I went solo this time as my mates couldn't come and I was shitting myself with anxiety beforehand, wondering if i'd have a good time etc. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and also suffer from PTSD symptoms (but haven't pursued a diagnosis for that). This was scaring the bajeesus outta me, But I bit the bullet and did it anyway!Let me tell you it was 100% worth it. It forced me to be social and meet a whole load of new people. I tested my shit, weighed out the right dosage, and just went with it. I opened up about my life and things i've gone through with complete strangers which was so liberating to not feel shamed and afraid. I danced without caring what people thought. I was complimented on my aura and kindness. I felt accepted and loved by all. I spent half the night receiving and giving hugs and massages, which to me was a big deal as i'm still learning to be ok with people i don't know touching me.The main thing was, that i felt 100% safe. No anxiety. Just - nice, content. Safe.I woke up today after not sleeping all weekend and feel like i've done 100 therapy sessions in a row. The pit of anxiety i feel is constantly lurking in the pit of my stomach is just....gone. I feel so relaxed, de-stressed, and at peace. I cannot believe how incredible and rejuvenated this feels. I have been walking around the streets near my home today just content, without that rushing, impending sense of doom i seem to have had in my for as long as I remember. It's just gone. I never realised how wound up I felt. I haven't felt like this in YEARS. The afterglow is unreal.This wonderful drug, if respected, is really a true medicine. Peace and love to you all &lt;3 [info] None [info] 1516656207
TimeWasting992 [info] I have quite bad anxiety, can this lead to other health problems that aren't necessarily mental? For example, I have been diagnosed with anxiety (only anxiety), but I find that I now have other problems, like vertigo (diagnosed today, only happens when I'm calm and relaxed), I've also ended up with pleurisy in the time since the anxiety diagnosis... basically, is my anxiety causing these things or am I just unlucky with my health? [info] None [info] 1570795369
underdogkitten [info] "Well, don't feel [insert emotion here]." My nmom uses this anytime I try to voice a problem, particularly when I use I statements to voice how I feel about a situation. Such as "I feel that you going through my things makes me uncomfortable and it makes me feel anxious (I have been diagnosed with anxiety issues and she knows this)." This would prompt her to brush off what I'm saying with "Well, don't feel anxious. It's not a big deal." [info] None [info] 1421373020
DannyWillSun [info] Should I go back to minoxidil ?? Hi guys, long story short I have been using minoxidil (5%) last year for about 4 months (consistently).Although I am 21 years old, I almost don't have any hair or even mustache so I was determined to grow a beard by any means necessary.I noticed a HUGE difference in the fourth month , but unfortunately one day I just had a panic attack ( I though that my blood pressure is becoming down as a result of minoxidil , and that I will die soon)So I decided to STOP the treatement. When I recall that day I become depressed, especially when I see 18 years old boys with a full beard.Should I go back to minoxidil ? Should I try 5% or 2% to avoid possible side effects ?( I am 100% healthy, I didn't noticed any side-effects except some drowsiness in the first month/ I am diagnosed with anxiety that's all) [info] None [info] 1579776665
hibecca [info] Not a doctor.. had very similar problems and I was diagnosed with anxiety. Didn’t believe it at first, and my problems got much worse. Thought i had an inner ear disorder, brain tumor, etc. When I did finally accept it months after diagnoses, things are getting a lot better (therapy and medication to help). [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1557174147
Prairiegirl321 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder 20 years ago, and my symptoms are ONLY physical.  Except for the secondary anxiety that results from thinking I might be having a heart attack and wondering if I should go to the emergency room. Again. I’ve been to the emergency room and had EKGs/related blood work, chest x-ray, etc,  at least a half dozen times, despite knowing that I have this condition. Because surely some people with anxiety disorder DO have heart attack’s, right? What if it isn’t a panic attack this time? It’s sheer hell. The attacks come on with no warning, no pattern, and are completely unrelated to anything going on in my life as far as I can tell. I’ve been through various periods of extreme stress related to events in my life with no panic attacks at all. Usually when one happens, I will just be sitting there reading or watching TV, life going on smoothly, and all of a sudden my heart starts racing and I feel short of breath/dizzy, chest tightness, basically all the symptoms that we are told may signal a heart attack, and here we go again. They sometimes last 2  days or more. The only thing that really helped for any length of time was when one doctor sent me for a stress test, which showed that my heart function is excellent. I had such an easy time with the treadmill portion that I felt almost embarrassed to be there. So for a few years after that, when symptoms of a panic attack started, at least it wasn’t exacerbated by agonizing about what if it’s a heart attack, and it would pass very quickly. But that wore off. My original doctor tried a series of different drugs over a 3-yr period, but they were worse than useless because of having to deal with the side effects, so I gave up on that approach. Trying mindfulness now with maybe some benefit. At least I haven’t been to the emergency room since I started with it.  [info] None [info] 1544407662
nuralina [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety last year and put on Zoloft. It’s helped me manage my anxiety really well. Since finding out I was pregnant, I lowered my dose and things are still ok. Zoloft is supposed to be one of the safer anti-depressants for pregnancy and I’m grateful as it’s helped me so much.  [info] None [info] 1550237484
kaarrii [info] I'm more open with my mum now I've moved out, we get on 100% better. We've bonded more recently as I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago so I talk to her about it as she has the same.. kinda makes me think sometimes mental illness can be genetic. I see her every Friday after work for a few hours and we chat about everything really. I try to talk to my dad but he's quite self-absorbed and doesn't listen.. so I just talk to him about vapid stuff like games/tv/films etc. [info] None [info] 1571238493
SeaSaltSeaLion [info] I guess I should have mentioned that I have been diagnosed with anxiety and have been on anxiety meds for many years. My psychiatrist “prescribed” the melatonin to me at the beginning of the semester along with upping my meds but it all just made everything worse. [info] NCSU '23 [info] 1569366560
swivel2369 [info] How do I know if my issue is anxiety or not? I've been to a couple doctors and told them I think I have anxiety bit they seem to think it's more of a small case of ocd instead. What medications would I be given if I was diagnosed with anxiety. Probably a mild case. I bite my nails constantly even while telling myself not to. I'm always driving myself crazy about being late to anywhere. Even if it doesnt matter what time I get there and I seem to have no patience at all. For anything. I always seem on edge. I can be in a great mood one minute and the second something goes wrong or didn't go exactly how I planned I'm almost in a rage. Internally anyway. Rarely do I ever explode by hitting something or throwing something but I get so tied up inside and get pissed sometimes in a split second. So I have anxiety or is it something else? [info] None [info] 1473026202
MysteriousNomad [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety, but as they later found out, it was me knowing that i wasn’t going to get XYZ done which was giving me anxiety...gotta attack the issue at the root!! [info] None [info] 1570375584
iloveisopods [info] Help with anxiety So basically I'm a 19 year old female and I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was like 14 and I have tried to get help from doctors in my small town but they are not really helpful at all. I am interested in anxiety medication (I used to see a therapist and I found she didn't really help me and I kind of feel like meds are a good option) and I have seen multiple doctors who have refused to give it to me. I have been told I am to young for it and I should instead do things such as drink chamomile tea, hang out with friends, read books, exercise and use lavender essential oils and though I have tried all those things they don't really help that much and my anxiety is starting to really affect my sleep and the doctors I have seen even don't want to give me sleeping pills. At this point I don't know who to go to for help so that's why I'm posting here. I'm wondering if anyone knows perhaps maybe someone I could call here in nz? Like maybe a good helpline or something. I just want help with my anxiety because it's getting worse and I hate the fact that I can't even trust my doctors to give me help. [info] None [info] 1580344429
dancingfruit [info] PCOS requires 3 things according to the Rotterdam criteria for the diagnosis:1. A/Oligomenorrhea - Minsan lang o walang regla (2 years ako nawalan)2. Hyperandrogenism - Mga symptomas na nagmumukhang 'lalaki' o pagninipis or pagkakalbo ng buhok sa ulo pero nag kaka bigote at pag kapal ng buhok sa mga bahagi ng katawan na di dapat sa babae - chest, belly, back, legs3. Confirmation sa ultrasound (Transv or anal, as previously discussed).What's included in PCOS is insulin resistance. Your body produces more insulin than normal as a result of the increase in testosterone. The consequence is rapid weight gain. I was able to control my PCOS from 180lb to 106lb pero I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder this year. Bumalik lahat ng symptoms ko. Ang laki uli ng tinaba ko ng 3 months (30+ pounds).If kukuha ka ng Ultrasound, dapat OB yung taga gawa hindi yung random radiologist. May training kasi na OB-Sonologist. Meron sa Hi-Precision at sa New World. Sure meron sa mga ospital. :)You can PM for other info regarding PCOS. I've had since I was 12. I'm 28 now.Edit: I haven't heard of 3rd cycle. Anong context conversation nun baka we can decipher that. :) [info] 27 | Oily-Combo+ Allergies | Chinese takeout [info] 1573707025
TotesNotYourStalker [info] Medicated for Anxiety, but I still can't force myself to do certain things. How do I change that? I was diagnosed with anxiety probably 10 years ago. I've been on lexapro for probably 6ish years now, taking 20mg a day (recently upped from 10mg). My general anxiety is alright, I don't get as stressed when I have lots of homework, I have been in a more chipper mood, and I haven't had a panic attack since I started taking my medicine years ago. However, there are still some things I just can't get past:1. I get terrified to answer the phone when almost anyone calls. I'll make exceptions for my immediately family, sometimes dr's, but otherwise, I let it go to VM every other time.2. I almost panic when someone knocks on my door during the day, when my husband is working and my daughter is in school. I still sneak around to see who it is, but still hide until they leave, unless it's immediately family.3. My 7 year old daughter desperately wants to have friends over to play with her toys but I can't fathom the idea of being responsible for someone elses kid for that long. It's stupid though because I babysit my brothers kid, and best friends baby, all the time.How do I get past stuff like this? Is it an anxiety issue I'm dealing with or something totally different here? I feel crazy getting so anxious about someone knocking on my door or wanting to play with my kid. It's exhausting.Help! [info] None [info] 1573354023
MrIngress [info] I need help, I have no idea what is wrong with me So around 8 months ago I was diagnosed with anxiety, which has got significantly worse over that time span, I’ve got into this strange routine where I’ll shower more and more everyday, I went from not showering much at all to feeling irritated if I didn’t have one in the past 4-6 hours or so, I’ll start feeling extremely itchy, infuriated, even angry and then smelling really badly, however I don’t smell at all according to my family, I’m not sure what’s happening but it’s constantly getting worse with me getting up to 6 showers a day at times, if anyone could try to enlighten me to what may be happening that would be nice, thanks in advance. [info] None [info] 1575299548
qieran29 [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety.since 2015..or rather health anxiety...jus 3days ago i had a Severe full blown Panic Attack..wout what so ever reason...thus perhaps my body was constantly stressing dat i have chest pain..pass few weeks...however during dat full blown panic attack occured 3days ago...i was calm..n yet it still happened...my left rib was painin as hell...dat v moment i thought it was a heart attack...went 2 ER..i tol them.pain is bad..thy injected me som morphin 2 ease me down...took my blood samples...ECG twice all were fine ezcept i had som bronkitis...which may have worsen the pain..I knw its hard 2 divert ur attention when ur body feels numb aching or painin...i do watch TREY JONEs on u tube...his videos are good perhps u try chck it out Take care  [info] None [info] 1552762652
SympatheticStranger [info] Tunnel vision. Yes, I agree with that. That is an apt description. Narcissism is general looked at as a bad word, it's a bad thing, a wrong thing. I hate that. She loves people, she cares for people, she has a compassionate heart. It's all there, and her narcissism isn't bad or wrong or immoral, It just doesn't show because of that tunnel vision. Worse... *sigh* I know... and I'm scared I'm not going to be good enough for her (insert personal anxiety issues). I hope she knows that she can always trust me, and I hope that I can hide the pain she might cause me and only see that I will love her always and that even if it hurts in the moment, I  understand and it's ok. Life is fucked up for everyone, I think, mental illness or not. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD (long story), so I understand mental illness, but I struggle to understand illogical behavior. Call me spock, I can't grasp not wrapping my mind around logic and holding on for life, but I'm trying to accept it and work with it. I've accepted it as far as it's uncontrollable and there is a chemical misfire in the brain that blocks logic, but I can't feel it, so I can't understand the feeling of accepting illogic as logic. It's hard to be on the outside, maybe even as hard for the outsider trying to understand the insider.  [info] None [info] 1400037783
LushEnough [info] Hey! Me and my partner used to only trip together, but I’ve been solo tripping for a year now. I have been diagnosed with anxiety since elementary school. I won’t lie to you I’ve had a few trips where I got a little uneasy at times but it’s nothing a good distraction won’t fix lol. Find yourself some good shit to watch on tv, or get some various arts and crafts to do, music is also a must. Solo tripping is very rewarding. You’ll be fine :-) I took 200ug about 20 minutes ago so here I go again! [info] None [info] 1561086866
ModernSocratis [info] I don’t know to be completely honest. I have never experienced ADHD until I was diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1569333114
DinnerMilk [info] How can I properly deal with extreme anxiety that is affecting me both physically and mentally? I just got out of a horrific relationship of about 8 months a couple weeks ago. Initially I was just very upset and depressed that it ended in such chaos, but was just giving it time expecting to move past it and start feeling a bit better.As of the last week or so however, I am an absolute wreck. I've worked from home on the computer for the last decade and for the first time ever, I almost can't even sit still long enough to even do anything productive. It is very difficult to describe but it almost feels like I am exploding from the inside out. The longer I stay in place the more intense it becomes until I have to move. It has been the same with sleeping, I will lay there for hours moving around, kicking off covers, etc. until I guess I eventually pass out.I was diagnosed with anxiety in the past, but in comparison it was extremely mild. Prior to this my mind would just fixate on things and run wild but now its presenting in really problematic physical and mental issues.Alcohol has been the only relief I have had at all. A few drinks and I am able to calm down and feel alright, but I don't want to stay drunk. Is there anything I can do to address this in a more healthy manner? [info] None [info] 1440688201
rufurious [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety by a physician. Will this qualify as a psychiatric disorder under their rules? Also, the physician who diagnosed me practices in Kansas. Would this be an issue? Would I have to be re-diagnosed? [info] None [info] 1561746656
ThrowawayAccount2110 [info] I have an extremely unhealthy crush and its eating me alive I'm working as a camp counselor with a girl who I knew before we worked here and had a minor crush on. But we just started working at this summer camp and it's ballooned into this big, ugly crush. Oh boy.I've had fun, cute crushes but this is not fun at all. I'm worried I'm becoming some creepy obsessed freak. I'm constantly thinking about her, and I get super jealous to the point where I get nauseous if she interacts with male coworkers. I can't sleep. I over-think small things, like if she chooses not to sit near me at the dinner table, I'll get extremely depressed. It's not because I'm putting her on a pedestal, I've known her a super long time and know what her flaws are and that she's only human.Normally if I was in this situation I would tell her that I had feelings for her. But I can't do that because we're at a camp in the middle of the woods with no escape. If she said no, it will really make the rest of the summer awkward for both of us. If she said yes, that would be even worse because I'm afraid the obsession I have now will multiply to self-destructive levels.Fuck. I'm sorry if it seems like I'm whining. I just wanted to rant a little. I just want these ugly feelings to go away so I can be normal.EDIT: I've been diagnosed with anxiety and it's something I'm living with/working on and I believe this may be a cause. But I still can't shake my feelings [info] None [info] 1498630416
GnomeMadness [info] I had the same thing happen to me with the sunlight. As the sun was setting and I was in the shaded area, I felt like I needed to run to catch up with where the light was still shining. Also, the breathing part sounds like minor hyperventilating. I can only say that I was diagnosed with anxiety having experienced what you describe.Don't freak yourself out trying to diagnose yourself with anything further because everyone finds something if they start researching symptoms. It's hard to not think all sorts of things to worry yourself about everything you feel, but do your best not to.  Just talk to your doctor, and if he/she thinks it's anxiety, they will point you in the right direction, probably to a therapist.  [info] None [info] 1531053432
iamaquietmess [info] I was to scared to ask about this too. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ocd and on worst episodes whenever i think back on something i bang my head and or punch myself just to try and get the thought put of my head.But on normal days i get this. [info] None [info] 1564976612
Jperez06 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety a while back. And if I tell them, I have a feeling theyle say its cuz i dont do anything and play video.games all day. [info] None [info] 1564282934
dragonscantfly [info] I've always had anxiety. Kind adults reframed it by telling me I was just "too smart for my own good." I remember being little and standing in a McDonalds Playplace, refusing to climb up too high, because I didn't trust that the structure would be stable enough to hold so many moving children. One of my earliest memories is from when I was about 3, watching my mom stand on a step stool to hang a plant from a hook on the ceiling. I had a "vision" of her falling off the little stool, cracking her head open on the wall, and dying. I was really freaked out by it and kept asking her to "be vay, vay cay-full, mommy." I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 8 or 9. It'd been a part of my life for a long time before that.  [info] None [info] 1428466931
scaredboi_0 [info] hey ok this is a dumb question but how can i tell if i feel envy or actual attraction to a girl i don't think im envious of women, i don't have any desire to be one.i'm very comfortable being a cis guy and would be uncomfortable being any sort of girl. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and my therapist suggests that i might have ocd considering how much i was freaking out about the "possibility" that i could just turn transbut now my brain has moved onto something else and im scared it means im secretly transi'm into girls sexually. no specific body part really, like face is the most important part for me. but after that initial attraction i feel a need to be closer emotionally with them. like its not just sexual feelings its a desire to be with them and spend my life with them. ik its incredibly strange but i just want us to love each other deeply and meaningfully. now i've read some trans people's experiences with this on here as being indicative of envy and now every time i look at a girl i get scared and anxious that like, what if i secretly want to be them and thats why im into them. i literally say to myself every time i see an attractive girl "i dont want to be them" in my head but honestly that doesnt helpthis doesn't mean anything does it?&amp;#x200B; [info] None [info] 1537320748
Speed0c [info] I have had the pleasure of trying this strain. I’m not exactly an introvert, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I remember this strain being one of the better ones. Cheers! [info]  [info] 1560720998
EvilSeaWitch [info] Then I don't.        I was diagnosed with anxiety almost 15 years ago. I don't bend for other people anymore.      The hardest thing for me is going to a doctor of any kind. If the idea of going is too much, I reschedule.           Don't let anyone pressure you. You know your limits. There's nothing wrong with taking a pass to protect your mental health.  [info] None [info] 1544770603
pile_of_hats [info] Hey... Not sure if this is the right place, but for the last several years I've had the lingering thought that I may have ADHD.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety, so I guess my question is:  do anxiety and ADHD have many symptoms that overlap?  For those who were diagnosed as adults, how did you approach the subject with your physician without sounding like a hypochondriac?  [info] None [info] 1355134997
Terradoe [info] I couldn't agree with this more. I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I have always had (undiagnosed) stomach issues. Because of life getting in the way, I have missed 2 weeks of my normal gym routine. I am having diarrhea and mind boggling cramps every day and my anxiety is so through the roof that I'm in a constant state of over stimulation, panic, and feeling like I'm going to throw up. Please note, I do not feel ANY of the above symptoms  (minus very occasional over stimulation and panic) when I work out regularly. Exercise really does make mental health problems significantly easier to manage.  [info] None [info] 1531618875
randomassposting_ [info] &gt; I'm also paranoid and a year ago I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I'm not saying it's all because of the drugs, but I'm pretty sure they've contributed a lot.Fuck. This worries me. The first time I truly felt the power of anxiety was on amphetamines. The anxiety and paranoia the comedown produced was something I dreaded during my high. Didn't know you could *develop* disorders. Good thing I'm cutting back on stim use soon. And the short-term memory thing seems to happen with most drugs, not just weed, like I originally thought. Makes it even more dangerous, shit. Gotta cut down even more because I don't like the way my memory feels now, imagine if I continue. Thank you for your comment and your advice, it was quite helpful. I hope things pick up for you man. Ever consider quitting stims? [info] None [info] 1490527104
icymoons [info] Dear Santas, my 2 children have been awesome this year. First of all. Thank you to everyone out there helping make this Christmas season a good one for so many families.  It gives me a sense of peace inside to see these kind words and actions.  As I write this thinking of the other children I have read about (those who have special needs) our problems seem small.   We have the exact opposite going on here.  I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder a while back and am working on getting better.  Their mom is in the middle of back to back hip surgeries to correct hip dysplasia she has had since birth.  Luckily I have been able to pull it together and do the shopping and bringing the kids to school and things of that nature. We have two children,  Angela  (11) who loves to read and draw, collects rocks and monster high dolls. And Gabe ( 7 ) is into anything Minecraft and Lego, lots of energy and a real ham.   My daughter has really stepped up since her mom had surgery,  helping with dishes,  helping me clean the house and not complaining one little bit since money has been getting tighter and tighter.  Gabe is doing his part too. His energy can be a handful but over all he had also stepped up.     This year is hard, credit is maxed out .. I receive SSDI and it is not making ends meet. As soon as my wife is healed enough I plan to hopefully  get a job until her next surgery to pay down the debt.  It is hard not working, especially this time of year.  Could Santa please come visit my kids?  My wife and I do not want anything except for these kids to smile on Christmas morning. I can definitely provide any proof you would like to see.   Here is the amazon wish list, no way do I expect all of it, just put a few items of each type of thing in case any run out of stock.  Thank you so much for reading this.  https://www.amazon.com/registry/wishlist/18QUHW899KEMK/ref=cm_sw_r_an_wl_o_m1uvwbC17Y8KW [info] None [info] 1448430137
BlueInkSz [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety issues at first. The foundations of my paranoia/"paranoia" are things that are completely possible, even though I have been unable to fathom a true reason behind them. An old therapist of mine said it was anxiety related. Fast forward a few years and I was diagnosed with schizophrenia by someone who had far less information. Of course, I fully realize I've gone off the rails with paranoia at times, which really sucks, because there are certain things in my life that actually happened that no one takes seriously anymore. Long story short, schizophrenia is the convenient excuse and some people are manipulative scum.Of course, since I know people with schizophrenia who believe such things are a dime a dozen, I don't expect to be believed. But yeah, at first it was all anxiety issues. I had some bizarre thoughts that came and went, but for the most part it was believable stuff. C'est la vie. [info] None [info] 1569896304
thelimeshake [info] WIBTA for giving up a music scholarship to protect my mental health? So essentially my parents have been divorced since before I could remember and my life has always been in two parts. When it came time to choose my current place of education my parents had a huge fight over where I should go and I sided with my mum, who convinced me that to “win” the fight with my dad I would have to get a scholarship. She signed me up for a music scholarship without talking to me and as I play a pretty rare instrument I walked up and got a music scholarship pretty easily (the band directors really needed people who played my instrument). I also hate playing this instrument - music is my passion, but being involved in co-curricular bands and playing this particular instrument is awful for me and also particularly stressful as an addition to everything else I do. I ended up getting the scholarship and played in 3 bands for the past 4 years which took up a lot of my time, none of which I enjoyed. Recently I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder which I’m sure I’ve had for years and have started the slow process of trying to fix my defeated mental state and try and build myself back up, part of which seemed to involve removing “stressers” from my life, such as said 3 bands and the attached music scholarship.My parents agreed to pay for the money that would come on top of my education fees if I dropped the scholarship which I’m grateful for and I spoke to the band directors, who all acted understanding but attempted to find alternative solutions because they needed someone to play my instrument and the few who can aren’t very capable. I was quite baffled with how they saw their need for a player in the band as equal to my need to sort my life and mental health out, something which has been damaging my grades for quite some time. Honestly I feel as though they are being completely unreasonable and putting their needs before my own, but maybe I’m missing something? I plan on dropping the scholarship despite their pleas to help myself but WIBTA for doing so? [info] None [info] 1584333961
efarley1 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety, and I've had the same feeling before as well. I think it may just be the relaxing effects of it kicking in. The CBD was from a reputable source, so there wasn't any concern with that. [info] None [info] 1552722310
mwtruro [info] That's your fight or flight response kicking in without a trigger. I have generalized anxiety and a panic disorder. The slow-mo is from the panic disorder when my fight or flight goes off without a trigger. It's happened to me doing laundry, walking in to a room, all kinds of mundane stuff that does not justify the response. The first time it happened, I was 10 and it was accompanied by some auditory hallucinations (an overwhelming buzzing noise). I didn't know it was anything not normal and always just thought it was something cool my brain could do. Wasn't until I was diagnosed with anxiety that we figured out what that was too. [info] None [info] 1566045075
rachiedoubt [info] I struggle with pretty severe anxiety. I have PTSD &amp; generalized anxiety and often experience panic attacks. One of the main symptoms for me is heart palpitations. They are such a normal part of my life now that I often just ignore them. I used to get scared to work out or get my heart rate up too high, because they were more likely to happen then, and having the palpitations would make me worry I was about to have a panic attack (because they often happened before or during a panic attack). I had to train my brain to understand that just because I have a heart palpitation here and there from anxiety doesn't mean I'm about to have a full blown attack. The more I can live my normal life through these things, the more my brain doesn't react in fear when I have these symptoms and other certain ones that usually signify anxiety.I went to a doctor and had an EKG when I first experienced these issues and they told me my heart was perfectly healthy. Later on I was diagnosed with anxiety. I'm not saying that this will happen to you, there's no way to know until you speak to a doctor. But this has been my experience with heart palpitations. I know a handful of people who have had these symptoms and did have another issue that wasn't anxiety, but it can definitely be caused by anxiety and just simply stress as someone else mentioned. I hope you feel better soon. [info]  [info] 1466323720
meowords [info] Anxiety attacks first month within the job? Hi guys! Just another green bean here! I'm 19 year old girl currently in college, been working at Starbucks for about a month (2nd job)We are about the 2nd busiest Starbucks in VA, we have a drive through and crazy rushes with lines going out into the street, so it gets a little crazy!I've worked in food before and am used to the fast rush and long lines. I decided to work here because a long time friend of mine has worked here for a couple years. So far, I think everyone is ok with me, I'm not sure... district manager came in and told our supervisors she loved me which was great! She pointed out my personality and willingness to make things right and how I'm always eager for the next task! It made me a little flustered but honored! I try my best to be as enthusiastic and energetic in my Starbucks as possible. The last thing I'd ever want to do is become a burden to all the hard working staff in my store.Unfortunately, things the past few days have been getting a little bad for me. I mess up little things occasionally, like accidentally turning my back to a customer (at drive thru window) while waiting for a drink or forgetting a few of the duties of my stations, accidentally leaving a rag at my station while trying to multitask.Today, one of my coworkers pulled me aside for the 4th time that day. I was super anxious and nervous about this,They were talking to me about how my customer connection needs to be better and how if the customer is waiting, I need to talk and engage into a convo with them (Which is completely understandable!)I'm just an overall very anxious person, I've been diagnosed with anxiety and have been on medication for it for a few years. I've been working my way on opening up and facing my fears and exercising the better part of my mind! But sometimes my medication can only do so much.After one of my peer coworkers had to talk with me about my performance, I tried to hold in my tears, but ended up completely melting down...I can't help but think my coworkers hate me, or that I'm doing a terrible job.I had a lot of talks throughout the day about some little faults and they all began to add up to that point, and it all finally collapsed on me.This has happened about twice within the month of me being employed, similar situation.I ended up having my meltdown in the back and threw up periodically into the trashcan trying to catch my breath and wipe my tears.I felt extremely suicidal in that moment, all my insecurities and doubts were all reinforced at that very moment at the same time. I felt I was constricted and trapped by my mental illness, I felt that I wasn't normal and that I could never do any task successfully like a normal person....it was an absolute mess, I hated it and I hated myself more than anything.At drive thru window, I always greet my customers and ask them how their day is, remind them their order and total and whatnot and start to get the payment done. I let them know that their order should be out shortly if it isn't already... etc. And I always talk to them and have a conversation with the customer if they bring something up! But after that or if they don't say anything and they're on their phones, I get a little anxious and quiet.... I just have a lot of trouble initiating a new conversation if we have to wait for their order. My coworkers get very mad at me for that, they tell me I need to keep my customers entertained.I was sent home today after my meltdown.I am wondering what I could do to do better at my job? Or if you guys think I'm showing bad signs as a green bean? I am still a little new at this job, I have much more to learn, but I feel my coworkers don't like me.A lot of the things I get talked to about are things I see other employees doing, which of course doesn't make it ok for me to do it, but makes me feel targeted sometimes....Maybe today they were just having a bad day, I'm not entirely sure really! I love my coworkers, they are all super hard working. I just don't want to disappoint them, I'm afraid they hate me.Long time employees, what are your thoughts? What are some things about new employees that you constantly need to remind/things that annoy you?Do you guys have a feeling that I am probably just not built for this job?I'd love to hear your thoughts and get a different perspective on the issue,Thank you guys!!!! [info] None [info] 1564115775
TrainerAbu [info] I'm worried about my leg pulsating I sit/lay down a lot.  I'm on the computer all the time, I have no friends at all so I don't go outside much.I'm 30 years old, and I can visibly see my leg pulsing, right above my knee.I've told my doctor many times that I can feel my body pulsating often, usually with my legs, and that I'm worried that I have a blood clot.  He told me to excercise more often.I'm also extremely amenic, and I don't eat any vegetables.  I worry about my health, but my doctor always says that's just because I was diagnosed with anxiety.Should I be worried about my leg visibly pulsing right where my right knee is?  I can feel it right now.  It really is pulsating a lot.Please help. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1519590955
TeaAndCandles [info] Okay, I know this misery all too well. First off, don't be afraid of conventional medicine, you may need it as a jumping off point. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder several years ago and went on medication for a year. I knew I didn't want to be on the meds forever so during that time I took the opportunity to learn coping mechanisms and tools to deal with my severe panic attacks, through my doctor, support groups and the internet. Now I'm able to recognize and stop an anxiety attack in it's tracks before it ever has a chance to sneak up on me. Some things that helped me besides the meds were meditation (candles, incense and new age music set the mood for relaxation), distraction (a hard work out, doing long division in my head, basically anything that takes focus away from that anxiety thought spiral) and coming to terms with my fears (realizing that yes, horrible things MIGHT happen, but until they actually do, it's just pointless to worry about it). Also, try to stay away from caffeine and other stimulants until your situation is under control. I substituted green tea for coffee for a while and it seemed to help as well. Maybe cut sugar out of your diet, too. Best of luck to you. [info]  [info] 1392679234
derekjlight [info] Running out of options...? Long story short(er). I was diagnosed with anxiety/OCD when I was about 10 year old. About 8 months ago I got off of medication for the first time in 23 years. Very slowly my anxiety levels have been creeping back up. I call it my "coping level". It feels like things affect me much more than before and I feel overwhelmed much easier. A couple of months ago we had a very tragic death in our family, very sudden. This obviously did not help but didn't seem to make things terribly worse for me. Plus side of getting off of meds is that I have lost 70 pounds and am gaining more self-confidence, so that does help some. I have tried several supplements like 5-HTP and Ashwagandha, not sure if either have helped. I am not depressed at all. I just don't feel like myself anymore, and don't get much satisfaction out of the day. [info] None [info] 1558814584
Mephistophellatio [info] Man, I can relate to this so well.  I'm at the very beginning steps of trying to build a reputation for myself in the art community.  As I eventually would like to be able to support myself with artwork.  No plans for anything extravagant, just want to pay the bills with it.  I'd like to think that having three bachelors degrees in various fine-art related subjects shows that I'm not a slacker, and that I'm both talented enough and capable enough to use my art to achieve something.  Even if that's just being able to pay my bills with it.The issue is that I have a full time job now.  And I love it.  Been with the company for almost three years, wonderful benefits, love the people I work with.  But it's like 50-60 hours of my week most of the time, accounting for commute and everything.  And the job itself is really fun, but I've found that I think it's fun because it uses the same...energy? that I use when I'm being creative.  But I don't get the same reward/satisfaction mentally from working as I do from finishing a piece.  So when I get home each night, or on a rare day off, I'm just mentally exhausted, and given that I average 6-8 miles of movement every day also pretty tired physically.  So there's so much desire to work on something productive.  To draw or paint or render something.  I want to do it so badly.  But when the time comes, I just feel like my brain is recharging from work and I have zero motivation or inspiration to complete anything useful.  So I do spend the sparse free time I have getting high and watching Netflix or playing video games.  It's frustrating.  Because ostensibly the answer is "Just stop doing what you're doing and do the other thing" but it isn't that simple.I don't know, maybe it's because I've been diagnosed with anxiety and depressive disorders so my wiring just isn't up to spec or something.  But even with medications, I haven't noticed much of a difference in how exhausted I am after work, or how much spare creative energy I have.And I would love to even just take fewer hours at work and have the spare time to work on personal stuff.  But I can barely make ends meet as is, so making less money and losing part of my benefits isn't an option, at least not until I'm making enough money from art to supplement the lost hours.  But you have to build that kind of clout.  And since for much of the past three years I've been producing a whopping 0 pieces a month, I'm obviously not going anywhere with that just yet.So I feel like it's a weird catch-22.  Like I can either lose the money for a while and not be able to pay my bills until I start making more money on my own.  Or I can give up on the dream that I've had since I was 8 and take a more lucrative, but entirely inflexible, position at my current employer.I don't know.  I'm sure that a comment on a 5 hour old r/quotesporn isn't the best place for me to vent about this, but whatever, it just struck me.If you've read this much, [here's a treat for you](https://www.instagram.com/snoopybabe/?hl=en) [info] None [info] 1471809696
FinalBlackberry [info] Agreed. I was diagnosed with anxiety a long time ago, yet no one would know. I see that same thing with co-workers as well. [info] None [info] 1560524602
Passionofawriter [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was 14. I'm sure if I went in to the psychologists office now, I wouldn't be given the same diagnosis; I have recovered from it, and the reason why is probably tied to a bunch of reasons (some of which I probably am not aware of).One thing that really helped me - I have not suffered from panic attacks in years because of this - is recognising how I feel, and telling myself that I do not have to feel this way. I ask myself if I want to feel this way and why. For example, the other day the fire alarm at work broke, and it was silenced while we were getting a specialist down to look at it. I was going to have to sit for hours in a reception with a repetitive high pitched signal sounding off. That's exactly the stimulus that would normally trigger an anxiety attack for me. I immediately felt tense and anxious, memories of my past attacks flooding me. I realised this, and asked myself why I was feeling this way. Is the alarm going to hurt me? Will worrying about it help to stop the situation?The most important thing in a panic situation is to calm yourself down, and for me that worked by asking myself questions and realising I can change how I feel; I am in control of my emotions. When it came to burdens in my life, I tried only to think of events that worried me for as long as it would help me. It helped to remember that worrying about an event in the past or future would not prepare me or help me in any way for it. [info] None [info] 1506707992
homebythefence [info] I haven't had a proper period since I was 12 and I'm now 22. I was diagnosed with anxiety early 2004 and they put me on BC that I've never been told to stop taking. Wasn't until I started getting ovarian pain that they found out I had PCOS when I was 19.  [info] None [info] 1393313833
moremeds [info] Ever since I was a kid, I knew something was off. I could never put my finger on it. I grew up telling my parents I was sick with something, and I grew up being told off for faking. The pain got worse and worse, and everything started going wrong. I stopped being able to go to school because I was in so much pain. My schools, my teachers, uncaring doctors, my family all yelled at me throughout my childhood. I was forced on antidepressants and anxiety medicine and some other things because everyone was convinced I was faking the pain. My organs were slowing down and I was diagnosed with anxiety. They all thought it was anxiety. Nobody believed me. It took over a decade for me to get any sort of diagnosis, and now I might only have a few years to live. Maybe if someone believed me sooner, I would have been able to have a childhood. I was too sick and in too much pain and all my teachers hated me so my classmates did too. I grew up with very few friends and if someone believed me I would have been able to do so much more. Now I have lived nothing and might die having lived nothing.  [info] None [info] 1521733793
dfuentez [info] She might have a psychological issue. Once my boss drove me to the ER because I was having heart attack symptoms and i was in so much pain i was crying my eyes out (i dont cry for physical pain usually). I was diagnosed with anxiety and didnt even know. Help her find mental health [info] None [info] 1528888113
joyke [info] I'm day 7 on quitting, I've had anxiety attacks just about every single night for the past 6 days. I've been diagnosed with anxiety last year, I grew up as an anxious child but 4 years of daily blazing made it way worse. Anxiety is definitely a side effect of t-breaks and quitting. But i can tell you that it gets better. It's been less and less. On the first three days, my face would twitch and I would have constant muscle spasms (heavy anxiety causes that usually). But on day 6, I stopped having as much spasms. I have crazy thoughts at night but it's been getting abit better. last night at 3AM i had a panic attack, I took a shot of whiskey and fell asleep within 5 minutes haha. good luck to you my friend, it will get better. [info] None [info] 1447784062
Sekoshiba [info] Sleep, water, food, are all really important. Unfortunately I never figured out what caused my migraines, I just sort of "grew out of them". Stress could be a factor though, I suppose, as I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and migraines at the same time. [info] None [info] 1474236142
ChaviChavChop [info] Having heart palpitations when relaxed or laying down. Happens every five minutes or so. Literally just came from the doctor and they ran several tests and all was fine. The doc saw some PAC/PVCs on the monitor but said it wasn’t anything to worry about. But they still happen. Any advice? 23, male, 250lbs, 6 ft tall. Propranolol 10mg, Buspirone 5mgSo, yeah, I was diagnosed with anxiety and I was taking Celexa 40mg but my doc said prolonged use of Celexa can have some side effects she did not like, so she wanted me off it. I was getting tremendously better anyways. Earlier I went to the ER because my heart was “skipping beats” like once a minute. I know it’s not actually skipping beats, PAC/PVCs are really extra beats and twitches of the heart muscle. But you know. Anyway, doc does a short ECG, attaches me to a love heart monitor, does a chest X-ray, and a blood panel. He comes back and says everything’s fine. But while I waited, I got some palpitations and PAC/PVCs and could see them on the heart monitor. Big, pronounced heartbeat lines and they are kinda squiggly instead of sharp and even. The doc said he saw them too, but wasn’t concerned. He told me you can have up to 30 palpitations per hour before it starts to get worrisome (he did say that of course a cardiologist may say 10 per day, let alone per hour, is worrisome for certain people, but my tests are good and my heart is healthy, that’s not worrisome for me.)So he said it’s all in my head, all because of my anxiety. It calmed me down a lot, and the rest of the day was good. I have an appointment with my family doc on Monday, and she’s going to take a look at the test results. But I’m still left wondering. These PAC/PVCs (I say both because I don’t know which they actually are, may not even be those could be something else) but anyway they feel so weird and disconcerting. But my doctor swears I’m fine, and I’m inclined to believe him and my family doc both. But, why are these heart palpitations occurring?Does anxiety really have the ability to cause stuff like this when you’re otherwise fit as a fiddle?Are there medicines I could ask my doc about that could reduce the occurrence of these palpitations?I know I’m not at risk of any serious issues now, but it’s still annoying. Especially when I get an episode of them where it’s like one every other minute. Also, it seems to happen the most when I’m relaxed, or trying to lay down and sleep. What gives? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1567935209
Crimzina [info] Experiencing breathing troubles when lying on my sides Hello, I'm an 19 year old girl and I've been having this problem for about 3 months. Whenever I lie down to go to bed, if i lie on either of my sides I experience breathing difficulties. It's like I'm gasping for breaths and yawning constantly. I can also feel my heart pounding in my chest. However, if I lie flat on my back, the symptoms tend to decrease or go away entirely. I should note that I have had breathing issues similar to this in the past, as I've been diagnosed with anxiety. But the circumstances this time just seems really peculiar. Thanks for the assistance. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1483650425
AwareAerie [info] Yes, just a few seconds, it's gotten a little better today- I was diagnosed with anxiety in December and given a prescription of ten lorazepam tablets, they helped a bit, but made me feel really depressed and out of my head. but haven't gotten any help farther than that, my dad doesn't believe that anxiety is a real thing, and it's made me shy away from seeing a doctor or therapist out of fear that they won't believe me either. [info] None [info] 1562165717
venus7113 [info] I sometimes hate my disabled sibling I know the title makes me sound bad , but hear me out. Also this is quite long , so kudos to you if you can stick it out till the end .I (16F) have a sister (20F) , lets call her Kylie. When I was 8 and Kylie was 12, she was hit by a car on a school trip and hit her head . She was in a coma for a year. From that day , my life was flipped upside down. Kylie moved back home after around 18 months of being in the hospital . For the next 4 years , I slept on a mattress on the floor because my bedroom (which she and I had previously shared) was taken up by the hospital bed.Now to be clear I am not poor , my family is pretty ok. We had two live in nurses with us 24/7 for the next 3 years. There was a plethora of nurses, doctors and 20 different kinds of therapists swarming my house at all times. I was in the 3rd grade , and I only had a vague understanding of what was going on. All my summer vacations were going to different hospitals around the world for her therapy ... and it isn’t very fun for a young child to be stuck in hospital waiting rooms during their holidays .Kylie soon started to walk and talk and eat on her own . Though she has taken great strides , she is not yet completely independent. She has written and published a book of poems and I am very proud of her.Now to the problem . Due to her brain injury , she has odd tendencies. For example repetitive questions . She doesn’t understand social boundaries and will ask even strangers increasingly personal questions making me very uncomfortable. She gets into physical fights and has anger management issues , and has badly physically assaulted not only me but also my parents , elderly grandparents and nursing staff. She obsessively stalks people who show slightest bits of kindness to her online until they are forced to block her . She sends abusive messages to my mother daily . What bothers me most is that outside the house she’ll act like an angel and put on this sickly sweet demeanor , and everyone thinks she’s this generous Mother Teresa , but they don’t know what a nightmare she is . The mood of the house completely depends on her mood. She throws tantrums , yells horrible abuses and even throws things .I’m expected to care about every milestone in her life when she doesn’t care about mine. For example , this year from the beginning of March my 10th grade exams began which are a HUGE deal for me (comparable to the GCSEs in the UK) She didn’t even know that they were starting despite me sending the schedule on the family chat . Keep in mind I’ve been preparing for these exams for 2 years and they go on for a month. On the other hand , I’m supposed to know the slightest progress she makes in any way.Last year , it was the first time I went on a holiday with only my mother and father without her , and I can undoubtedly say it was the best holiday I’ve had in a long time . I didn’t have to worry about pushing her wheelchair (she uses it when we’re on holiday generally because we walk a lot) , and helping my mother get her showered and changed , putting on her shoes and a million other things . Since my country is not very good in terms of education for a disabled person , my parents are looking for universities abroad . My mother will obviously have to go with her as she can’t manage alone. I’ll be starting the 11th grade in July and basically have to be OK with my mom leaving me for the next two years (before I go to college myself )? I done really have a choice , but it sucks. These are the last two years I have with my parents before I go abroad to university , and probably the last time I will ever live with them (assuming I get a job abroad after college ), and it’s being taken away from me.I LOVE my parents . Yes we have our disagreements sometimes (especially with my mom) but I don’t know what I would do without them . I’m still a self proclaimed ‘baby’. They’ve been great throughout this whole thing . Yes , I’ve received less attention than Kylie over the years but I understood the reason. One thing which really hurt me , though was when they used to leave me with my grandparents for 1-2 months when I was around 10 till date so they could take Kylie for therapy abroad during my school time . Not that I was mad at them , just hurt because I missed them.My grandparents love her much more than they love me , and it’s always been this way . The one day which I look forward to in a year is my birthday , because it’s the day when everyone is focused on me and not Kylie. But even then whichever birthday gift they get me , (last year it was some headphones I wanted specifically ) , they’ll get her the exact same gift . I understand they’re sorry for her , but all I’m asking for is ONE DAY where they can atleast pretend like they care about me more ! In comparison , Kylie got diamond earrings for her birthday , and I got nothing then. And if I ever call Kylie out on her abusive behavior , like being badly behaved to our paid help for her (one poor caretaker even filed a police complaint after Kylie beat her up) , I’m instantly reprimanded by my family .I’m just sick and tired of this . It’s been half of my life , literally . The only bright spot is my dog . Shes the only one , who I can say with certainty , prefers me over my sister . I love her with all my heart , and she’s very much ‘my’ dog , even though she loves the rest of my family members. She’s my rock and I’m so grateful that I have her. I can’t help being secretly happy that my dog never warmed up much to myself sister , despite my sisters best efforts .Another thing is how she constantly overshadows me . I love to paint , play piano and write . Her hobbies have always been more sports oriented , though obviously she can’t do them anymore so she started doing everything I did . No matter how many art prizes I won , piano exams I got good grades in , and writing prizes I won (I won 1st place in my entire country for an essay) , as well as getting distinctions and honors in ALL my exams since the 5th grade , I never get any recognition compared to her. I’ve been working on a book for a long time , and have decided that when it gets published down the line , I want it to be under a pen name because if my family and friends find out it’ll just be compared to my sister.In truth , her accident has affected me deeply mentally . I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 14 by a clinical psychiatrist. I’ve developed acne due to stress (though it’s better now). I’ve also suppressed my memories from the ages of 8 to around 10 because I was traumatized . I’m serious - I can remember the first time I visited her in the hospital , and after that , nothing . Zip. Zero. Zilch . I straight remember the day she came home from the hospital. It’s like those 18 months between didn’t exist. I’m understandably scared about not being able to recall 18 Months of my life , but my therapist told me it was normal for children to block out traumatic memories. My social anxiety makes me deeply embarrassed if something remotely awkward happens to me in public , and it’s ten times worse when I’m with her . Even though I know it’s not her fault , I can’t help but resent her at times for turning my life upside down and behaving so badly half the time . She’s been the cause of many physically and mental breakdowns for my entire family . Not to mention that whenever she beat me up in a fit of rage when I was younger , I was asked to lie about it in school and say I got hurt some other way .Another thing is if I ever complain about her to my friends , they treat me like the devil himself . They can complain about their siblings all they want , but the minute I say something (even jokingly ) they jump in to defend her. I’m tired of being know as ‘Kylie’s younger sister’. I want my own identity . This is why I don’t like to bring up the topic unless someone specifically asks me.A major moment was a few years ago I was alone with her , my parents had gone out. I was 13 or 14. After getting her changes into her nightclothes (this included her diaper) and helping her brush her teeth and putting her in bed , she started to yell at me because I told her to stop writing abusive messages to our mother at that time . It was the first time in a long time my parents had gone out and I wanted them to enjoy their night . She immediately pounced in me , calling me an ugly (slur) with acne , and a bunch of vile insults . This is one of the few times I LOST IT at her . I flatly told her that if she touched me I would punch her or run away and released a barrage of insults at her. At the end I just remember asking her , Do you even care about all the sacrifices we’ve made for you ? Are you even grateful? And she just responded by saying she was not. Now I have a very detached relationship with her . We live in the same house , we speak and once in a while do some activity together on our moms insistence . But I really have no motivation to spend time with her of my own accord . Any sisterly bond we have was broken a long time ago and is now reduced to obligation . I have accepted the fact that whenever I get a job , I’ll send her money every month to help her (even though we haven’t discussed this arrangement yet) But I don’t even want to live in the same country as her when I grow up . On the other hand , I do want to live close to my parents , so I’m not sure how this will work out .I look at my friends with normal siblings who am go to college , who give them advice , play with them and talk to them , and can’t help feeling envious . I’ve always placed expectations and pressure on myself to be perfect because I knwo my sister can’t be , and do have some guilt that I didn’t get up and hug her or say something to her before she left for her trip that day because it could have saved her life . In one of my mother’s nastiest moments , she said she wished I had been hit by the car instead and it cut deep. I’ve forgiven my mom , she was going through a lot at the time but it still hurts.If you’ve read upto so far , thank you . This issue has haunted me for years and it feels good to finally talk about it . Am I a bad person for hating her and wanting to live away from her when I grow up (but send her money )? [info] None [info] 1584995746
throwawaylady3121 [info] WIBTA If I asked someone who was sick not to come to my birthday celebration? I’m having a birthday celebration tonight with a few friends at a local bar. I made a FB event for it and one of the people who accepted my invite has said on numerous fb statuses this afternoon that he is sick to his stomach and has been vomiting. I would hate to come across as a total bitch but I wouldn’t want myself or anyone getting sick from him. I don’t believe in just uninviting someone for something that can’t be helped because that’s just shitty. I mean, he can’t help being sick with a stomach virus but he doesn’t have to spread it to the bar. I’m at a dilemma here because I don’t wanna be the bad guy.So, Reddit...lay it on me. Would I be the asshole for asking him to please stay home if he is sick?Edit: to clarify, I have been diagnosed with anxiety so this situation is making me rather nervous. [info] None [info] 1583018836
Mollyu [info] 1. I go to therapy twice a month for the anxiety but that's about it since that's all my insurance wants to cover.2. I was diagnosed with anxiety and social anxiety at ten and the other ones at 12 and I'm 14 1/2 now. [info] None [info] 1476284341
Romainvicta476 [info] An interesting interaction For a little background, I'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder and I'm also high functioning autistic. Grew up in an offshoot of an offshoot of Mormonism. Anyway, my faith crisis is finally nearing it's end with me comfortably finding a home in atheism. I have a friend. This friend is rather special to me. She understands me so much better than anyone else. I'm able to be open with my anxiety and autism with her. She's the same way with me, able to be open about her experiences. It's not my place to share more details than that. As part of my faith crisis, I started to join the Catholic church. The historian in me loved it. But, last night I had a thought I never had. "What does normal look like for me?" I'd asked many times "how can I ever have a normal life?" But I asked that different question last night and it changed how I looked at things. I have an incredible opportunity to define what normal is for me, from the bottom up. And the first step in creating that is to leave religion behind entirely. I told all this to my friend, who is Catholic, and explained my reasoning. I told her the big points of my faith crisis and what drove me away from Christianity (shared experiences of emotional rises when witnessing moral behavior, all too uncanny similarities between Jesus and the other man-made gods, and god being more akin to an abuser than an all loving deity). I told her all of this and she responds right away with "Well what if god gave you those things to impact and change the lives of others?" I went right back to saying that was more like an abuser than a loving deity. I went into more detail about how my upbringing with religion stole away so much of my life and prevented me from even thinking about professional psychiatric help when I needed it when I was a kid.  We've hit a lull because she's at work, but of all the people. I thought she would at least understand why. I never expected her to like that change, she was very supportive of me in joining the Catholic church, but at least be understanding. Just an interesting interaction today. [info] Atheist [info] 1576453566
miss_delaney [info] Do you think that is related to misophonia or that it's closer to anxiety? I'm interested because I can remember as a kid being VERY self-conscious in church while taking communion - chewing that damn cracker seemed like the loudest, rudest thing I could do! Of course I didn't understand then that my chewing sounded much louder in my own head. Now, as an adult, I have been diagnosed with anxiety &amp; while misophonia is anecdotally connected, I wonder where the separation of the two lies, if indeed it does at all.  [info] None [info] 1420833191
dragon__eggs [info] My medicine is working! A month ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and given medicine for it, during the week I didn't notice anything different. But yesterday something changed! When I embarrassed myself I laughed it off instead of freaking out about it. Also Im less scared to talk to people! Im sorry but I just had to post this because Im just so happy! &lt;3 [info] None [info] 1567281997
ZT20 [info] 5 visits to the ER later: Healthy EKG, Blood Test, and X-ray indicating no heart problem... But my palpatations are now occasionally waking me up, and this morning I felt a non-painful but paralyzing sensation in my chest for about 2 seconds. (31/M) Height: 6'0" Weight: 302 lb Race: WhiteSo this is something I am continuing to battle, I had previously posted about this before but its continuing to worry me. This morning at around 7 AM I woke up to a single, noticeable heart palpatation but no other signs or symptoms of anything. I felt fine, and quickly calmed down. Since I was wide awake, I went on with my morning as normal before deciding to lay back down around 10 AM. After drifting in and out of consciousness multiple times and having a number of very brief "dreams" of getting up or talking to my roommate (which I quickly realized was a dream as I came to), I finally had this weird feeling, almost like a very pronounced tingling in most of my chest. I couldn't move or say anything for about two seconds, and then it passed completely. Heart rate after both incidents seems normal, though the wave pattern on my heart monitor app is occasionally weird looking when I hold it for 60 seconds (I have no idea if this is normal or not). I feel absolutely fine now, a few hours past, and as I said in the title above, the ER has run 4 EKG which all indicate no abnormalities, 2 blood tests that didn't pick up anything, and an X-ray that showed no signs of heart damage. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and given  0.5mg Lorazepam for it, which I've been taking irregularly because they only gave me 20 pills and was instructed to take "as needed".Again, I feel completely normal now, and had several days where I felt fine all day, but when this happened I was quite shook, to say the least. Could anxiety induce some kind of sleep paralysis or anything of the sort that could feel like this? [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1572627395
hrhashley [info] Thank you for posting - as you mentioned, I have been diagnosed with anxiety issues (hence the sertraline). I've definitely had anxiety/panic episodes before in the past that have stemmed from a health standpoint, but I've been taking my medication regularly and I don't necessarily feel like I'm having a long-winded anxiety episode, though I'm sure that could be a part of it. I've just never had chest discomfort and bouts of shortness of breath last this long since before my last heart surgery.I guess my biggest concern is that I've read one too many things on the internet about how people, especially women, go in and all of their tests look perfectly fine so they're sent home and then 2 weeks later they're having a full on heart attack, which again, I know sounds like anxiety, but it's more of me wondering 'what's the likelihood that this could actually happen' question.  [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1542059610
MightyMagpies [info] Keep getting diagnosed with anxiety Just went to the doctors for strong symptoms and again got told I look fine and it’s just anxiety. Since coming home, it still feels like vomit is coming up the back of my throat but going back down and my head feels very heavy as well as my lungs, and I just want to lie down. Is this just anxiety? Just feel like the doctor doesn’t take anything else I say seriously since I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1579181805
Costume_fairy [info] I wouldn’t call it teenage angst since I was diagnosed with anxiety before I was a teen but okay. The rest of your point stands [info] None [info] 1559699771
aliencheese555 [info] If you're female, that's LITERALLY the norm for the way adhd presents itself. I should know XDI did fine/pretty well in school, Bs and As. But HOO BOY did I have trouble with remembering shit and doing homework and organization. AND I was diagnosed with anxiety. So I feel ya. But, take a look at [this](https://www.researchgate.net/publication/242642028_ADHD_SELF-RATING_SCALE_FOR_GIRLS). It might help you a bit in convincing doctors. Kathleen nadeau is the bees kneesAlso, if you can, find a new psychiatrist.  [info] None [info] 1553705883
WitchoftheWasted [info] Hi all, I was diagnosed with anxiety about 8 years ago and I've had peaks and troughs with keeping it under wraps. I'm much better than I used to be. Sometimes I'm good for a few weeks (as in I only have minor panics about little things) and other times less so (major panics that result in private meltdowns). I'm here because the world is scaring me at the moment and whilst there are small things I can do, the anxiety nags at me saying, 'It won't make a difference really. You can't actually change anything. It'll all go to hell whatever you do.' The thought paralyses me so I don't do the things I probably should, which deepens the anxiety. I'm worried about potential world conflict, about global warming and the massive effects on the planet, I'm worried that I can do next to nothing for refugees because all aid requires money (I'm a charity worker - don't have much) or a house (I live in one of the most expensive cities in the world - no chance of that), that we're all going to wind up in some Margaret Atwood-type society and then I've got my family asking when I'm going to get married and have kids. Sounds ridiculous but that just heaps more fear on - as much as I'd love that to happen - I'm single so nowhere near married and even then how can I have kids when I can't guarantee the world will be safe for them? And that makes me so fucking sad because I'd love to be a parent but what kind of planet would they get? See? That's how it spirals...I live in a different country to my family and whilst I have a fantastic support network, I'm aware of how exhausting I must be for them sometimes so it would be next to have a separate place to vent and talk and just try to find quiet ways to cope. I've had a couple rounds of therapy/CBT over the years and I'm aware that my anxiety is impacted by things like my diet, tiredness etc. (which is probably why my habit of staying up late on weekends is bad - damnit!)  but I've found sharing helps a fair bit so I'm pleased to have a place to do that. I've always been prone to anxiety, it makes everything from career stuff to relationships to just existing sometimes really exhausting and upsetting. I work very hard to stay on an even keel but lately it's all been a bit much. Please tell me other people feel this because I feel like a whining special snowflake... [info] None [info] 1485650843
AMFYOLO [info] My story's similar to yours. I'm 24. I am diagnosed with anxiety and OCD (and, only recently, depersonalization disorder). Have had hallucinations, have been stuck in the same awful fucking fear loop. God I feel for you. Only recently have I begun to accept what doctors told me for years: I have severe anxiety, which goes into overdrive when I feel that my ego-construct is fundamentally threatened (e.g., by imaginary "psychosis"). All I can say is that I went to many specialists (by the way, keep going), had all the tests, and doubted them all nonetheless. I demanded to be put on antipsychotics (for no reason besides my extreme panic) and they were both unneeded and awful. Been on every med / diet / plan in existence. Your post certainly sounds to me like extreme anxiety; especially considering its coherent sentences / Aristotelian logic / and, your **textbook** disjunctive comparison between you and another, unrelated sufferer. It's true. Most people do not reach *this* level of anxiety; however, I have, and I reassure you, you will not go "crazy," "insane," or "lose it." That is not how psychotic breaks present. It took me a long time to accept that, myself.That is not to say that things won't get difficult. I have never felt a pain in my life like that when I felt *sure* that my inexplicably intense symptoms meant I was losing my mind / life.I implore you to be vigilant; reach out to your support network; and, to remember that you are *not* in danger of losing your mind. The hardest thing is the fear; in 2yrs., this nearly existential fear took me from young professional with a Master's to unemployed drug addict. It helps to surrender yourself to it, and deal with it as mindfully (not frantically) as possible. You are not totalized by your emergent thought patterns. I know it sounds like BS. I know all that. I'm fairly sure my protestations were similar to what yours will be. Nonetheless, try. At some point, this will improve. Also, don't let doctors give you long-term meds or limiting diagnoses without a second opinion. Oh, and, *please* **don't** try to 'figure this out for yourself.' It's not a problem that can be reasoned. I spent 2yrs plus stuck in a torturous thought loop ('oh does that technically constitute anxiety or paranoia?'...'what would the DSMV say?'...'oh is this prodromal schizophrenia?' etc. etc.) That fear generates the worst fucking feeling ever, though, man. I wouldn't wish it on anyone. **p.p.s** severe anxiety is incredibly underrated as a disorder. Besides affect, concentration, mood, etc. symptoms also affect sensory systems.**e**: sorry for the rambling / length, but just had to respond. (edits for clarity / good lord I was in a hurry) [info] None [info] 1450380224
Ryuutorak [info] I take the same medication I took when I was diagnosed with anxiety, even though that diagnosis has been overturned and replaced with ASD and ADHD.It doesn't matter that they misdiagnosed my sensory agitation as anxiety-- the sensations and issues were still decreased by taking Effexor, regardless of what they were labeled. [info] None [info] 1471141355
MealwormMcGee [info] Is this even anxiety? (And was this therapist right to do this?) Two things--   I'm diagnosed with anxiety, but sometimes I wonder if it was a fluke. I don't *feel* nervous. I never think about what's going to happen. If my doctor hadn't told me that my physical symptoms is just the was it manifests I never would have thought I had it at all. I think I have some Cry-y Avoidance Disease. I can't even tell if I'm nervous, I have to wait until I'm short of breath. When they ask me if I'd be comfortable doing this or that I can only think "let's find out". I don't know why I cry. It's like if you go a cut in your leg and you don't feel pain, you only see the blood when it's already happened. Does anyone else feel like that?  The second thing is that I was popped into a daily outpatient program to help me "cope". Straight away they told me I had to go to the cafeteria to eat lunch. The cafeteria had almost 100 people who all knew each other and I'm sure didn't have open seats. I told my tour guide I couldn't handle it and she said "Ok, go talk to X" and introduced me to him. Then she left.   Right away X said I had to go eat. I said I couldn't. He said "you're going to, come on" "you have to" and variations of that while leading me to the lunch room. Of course, I cried. And I couldn't stop crying. And he continued saying I HAD to go until I was sobbing so hard i couldn't talk. Pissed off, he snapped "Ok! get in the office!" but I didn't move--I was petrified of this guy. I know I'm being silly but holy shit this is what my nightmares are made of. He opens his mouth and barked:  "Do I have to call a code?! Do I have to get people in here to MAKE you go!?" He said it over and over again. Finally, I got over myself and got myself in there. The next two hours, no one could get me to go anywhere, I was in pieces.   Is what he did normal? I know my reaction sure wasn't, but if that's how hospitalization is going to go I don't think I can handle it. It's such a small thing, but it set me right off. No buddy, you don't have to call a code. Give me a second. I'm gonna have a heart attack. They said I have to do with exposure therapy. It might kill me. Later, X said that I had to bear it "just like jumping straight into a pool and bracing the cold water." I don't know. I think it's more like curve balling a fancy goldfish into an unprepped bowl. [info] None [info] 1481758085
nrrrdgrrl [info] You're not alone. I've had this for as long as I can remember, and when I was diagnosed with anxiety, I understood where it came from. Still not sure what brings it on, as it seems to be random, but I'll just absolutely not be able to get a deep, satisfying breath no matter how hard I try. I've found that thinking about it and being conscious of the issue does nothing to fix it, but simply ignoring it, and thinking about something else for 5-10 minutes, and then trying to take a deep breath again usually helps.  [info] GAD, Social Phobia [info] 1397589490
shhsunshine [info] I’m the same way. Honestly, when someone argues or debates with my I go full defensive. I don’t mean in an angry way, I just mean I get really worked up. Probably because my NMom made EVERYTHING an argument so I constantly had to be prepared for an emotional battle. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago and I get the same symptoms. I get extreme heart rate, I start panicking and can tell I’m getting upset. I’m sorry you go through that. (Not saying you have anxiety I hope it didn’t come across that way I’m just stating that’s why I think it happens to me)  [info] None [info] 1523029477
lowsodiumcrackers [info] I guess I read that as minor children acting out, but maybe Therapist doesn't see any difference between little kids and grown adult children. I've seen two other therapists, one for several months, within the past few years. Neither of them mentioned PTSD to me, but I was diagnosed with anxiety. I can't think of any reason why if they thought I had PTSD, they wouldn't have told me.  [info] None [info] 1514180455
CaptainBudLight [info] No more anxiety attacks! I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was a kid and have dealt with high anxiety and anxiety attacks throughout my life. My mom didnt want to to put me on anxiety  meds as a kid. However as an adult I've been on medication but it still wasn't helping much. In the last 2 years my anxiety seemed to keep getting worse until I tried CBD oil and vape! I've been taking CBD oil for a month now and I have not had an anxiety attack! Not only that but my anxiety overall has been low to none! Anyways, just thought I would share [info] None [info] 1555046860
coverwatch [info] What you describe are panic attack symptoms. I am talking about anxiety symptoms. I've never had a panic attack in my life but I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder without any heart symptoms. [info] None [info] 1554289305
kaykorvid [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety at 12, so I'm no stranger to it, but I control it really well nowadays. [info] None [info] 1558357984
Chillie43 [info] Not true anxiety can be a diagnosisSource: I have been diagnosed with anxiety by a medical professional [info] None [info] 1574622344
omar1327 [info] always feeling anxious before meeting my girlfriend So, I've been in a really good relationship with my girlfriend for 3 years now, she's my exact type, she's supportive, we get along pretty well, I care about her more than anything, I never feel so comfortable with anyone as I do with her and I'm really at ease when I'm around her, but whenever I know I'm going to see her tomorrow or in a few hours I get very anxious and uneasy, even after 3 years of being together, the kind of anxiety most people here (I mean people with anxiety) have before taking a final exam or before an interview, heart pounding anxiety, loss of appetite, etc.    We see each other often, like a couple of times a week and every time I get this feeling, even if it's just a regular meeting not a real 'date'.    This isn't normal, is it?    PS: I was diagnosed with anxiety and OCD two years ago.  EDIT: I'm a guy. [info] None [info] 1476031362
Oldgillreed1 [info] Explanation of certain symptoms? I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I regularly get panic attacks. I'm a little concerned about certain symptoms however, such as ear ringing, dizziness and a rumbling sound in my ears that I can hear clearly if focus on it. Occasionally, my ears will also feel blocked. I also found blood in my earwax a few weeks ago, although I haven't since and my family assures me that I just got a cut in my ear. I had an mri brain scan in late August and the results were that my head was perfectly fine. So are all these symptoms just related to stress and anxiety, or something to be more concerned about? [info] None [info] 1447641489
anasasis0321 [info] Is it normal to pretend that the worst possible outcome is happening/has happened even though there are no real signs of it being true? I’ve noticed that I work myself up, thinking about the worst possible outcomes of situations. For example, I pretend my mom is dying/dead, like she passed in a terrible way, and believe it’s true for a few moments and end up crying for a while. It’s like I’m preparing myself so I won’t grieve as much when it actually DOES happen, and I won’t be totally surprised. Its like I catastrophize everything. I think about my boyfriend leaving me, although our relationship is very calm and comfortable. We communicate extremely well, and there’s no “red flags” that indicate even in the slightest way, that our relationship is headed down a bad path. I think that isn’t a very good thing to do, because it means I’m telling myself lies, and I’m not paying attention to reality, and I don’t want my fears to dictate how I really act in real life. I have been diagnosed with anxiety, so maybe this is normal because of that? I have no idea, I’m just wondering if anybody else does the same. [info] None [info] 1553704167
Daniel-Tigers-Dad [info] I’m going to take a crack at answering this; not because our situations are necessarily analogous, but because my anxiety and self-doubt are on such an extreme side of the scale and TRT has helped in some ways.I am diagnosed with anxiety and Obsessive Compulsive Disorder, which itself is an extreme anxiety disorder. I got on TRT while recovering from a significant mental breakdown which lead to my OCD diagnosis and subsequent treatment.  They call OCD the doubters disorder because it manifests in extreme self-doubt making you question whether anything and everything you do is the right move. I had always been able to manage my OCD until my 30s when due to a variety of possibilities my T levels tanked and after some research I found there are correlations in studies between low T and OCD. Once I got tested my dr put me on T Cypionate and I have had mixed results; likely due to estrogen spikes.To answer your question my anxiety is less, but not inherently. I have the same amount of stress and anxiety, but what changed is my ability to say, “Fuck it. This is hard, but I have what it takes to push through and make shit work.” I was always able to do that before my T levels tanked and all the sudden I felt myself paralyzed and feeling like a victim instead of a warrior going to battle. Stressors come, but I kick into gear, refocus and go to war with life. Additionally I have found myself not doubting my training and knowledge which has helped me make quick, correct decisions at work. I have also found myself standing up to people more when appropriate as where before I would have stayed quiet. Not picking fights, but standing up for ideas that are important.Sorry for the novel of a response, but I felt the back story would make the explanation make more sense, especially having gone from normal T to low and back to normal. [info] None [info] 1531067243
pseudoserious [info] I feel almost constantly foggy in my head. Is it my anxiety? I've been diagnosed with anxiety my entire life, along with other health issues I'm currently battling and have had most of my life (sleep apnea, and my new one, pre-diabetes). My main concern though is how I almost always feel "dizzy", my head feels foggy, I feel like I'm in another dimension or something and lately especially my vision has been a big part of it. These symptoms feel more figurative than literal concrete things I can give examples of, and I have had tons of testing done for years.My question is, could it all "be in my head"? Is it maybe my anxiety? Anyone else have an almost constant feeling like this? Also, I am on 20mg fluoxetine and have been for a few months. [info] None [info] 1401944606
Vegan2321 [info] Anxiety and women’s period I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder I get panic attacks and I know this is not an anxiety forum I believe my periods really make it worse, the first day of my period I feel like I’m going to die, I feel like my vagina and lower back are going to fall off and I feel like im fainting the first day does anyone who does struggle with anxiety notice it’s during their period [info] None [info] 1565387859
deplorablewhitey [info] No, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety and you just triggered it [info] None [info] 1563672572
ClassBShareHolder [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety. It was really cool having the same symptoms as you until I worked myself into a pit of sleep deprivation. I was then willing to risk addiction just to get some sleep (prescription.). Once I got a couple good nights sleep (it was like waking after a year of fog) I then pursued non-addictive alternatives. Ended up on antidepressants. I miss not waking up at night with great ideas. I don't miss the feeling of my brain wading around in water up to it's knees. It took 20 years to get to the point of utter exhaustion though. And that was after I stopped ALL caffeine intake. I guess to answer the question, it could be. If it's not affecting you negatively then it's not a problem, it's a "feature."  And, a lack of sleep can exacerbate minor problems until they become big problems.  [info] None [info] 1493466357
FAM0USL0SER [info] I just found this subreddit. I am diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks. I’ve bitten and picked since I was a kid. Why do we do it? [info] None [info] 1562703546
Rapcher [info] Changing and improving my social skills is a lot harder than it seems. Been going to therapy again for the past 5 weeks, 2-3 times a week with my old therapist to practice improving my social skills. She's recommended me a lot of books. I'm currently reading 2 at a time. During lunch or during the gym in between sets. Writing down notes and practicing small things with people at the gym and at work. It's a lot harder than I thought it was going to be. My therapist told me to inform a few people about me going to therapy so I could have a strong support system. People who can tell me when I'm doing something rude, or come off too strong. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and what my therapist thinks is OCPD (Obessive Compulsive Personality Disorder). Which she also attributes to my temper, anxiety, and OCD like behaviors.My therapist thinks I keep strong guard so I don't get hurt given my childhood. When I let people in. I get nervous and anxious because I don't know how things will turn out. I've had anxiety attacks and they aren't the best. To the point of passing out, hyperventilating, losing sensation in my face legs and arms. I guess I'm just looking to expand my support system a little more. Some days feel hard, other days feel really hard. Sometimes I feel like I might slip up and say something mean, or someone might get misinterpreted, or I wasn't clear enough in expressing my thoughts. Sometimes I feel like I'm not making progress. Recently, I've been avoiding confrontational topics or subjects. Things I know I might sound too assertive on. [info] None [info] 1454521398
katiethephoto [info] Having Bad Trazadone Side Effects I take Lexipro for normal day time anxiety which usually helps me until bed time. So at night I can't sleep for my life because of that darn hamster wheel. I was diagnosed with anxiety induced insomnia and first prescribed Trazadone. But I have a slow metabolism so if I take any amount of Trazadone at 9pm, I won't feel drozy until 3am, then get caught in this fog of grog for the whole day. After telling my doctor, she then gave me samples of Rozerem. After taking it, within 20 minutes I could fall asleep and it didn't leave me groggy. But Rozerem is extremely pricey and I can't afford it. After a few weeks of no sleep medication (money and time problems kept me from getting anything), I went back on Trazadone. Now I have no drozy effect whatsoever and it doesn't help me sleep through the night either. Also when I wake up and through out the day I have horrible mood swings. Usually I'm grouchy person, but with this stuff I'm demonic (boyfriend's words). Also I believe I have gotten hives around the start of re-taking the meds. I have a doctor appointment on Tuesday about this. Has anyone else dealt with a similar issue? Does anyone have advice?TLDR: Prescribed Trazadone for insomnia, now I can't sleep well, have horrible mood swings, and hives. I would like advice. [info] None [info] 1454748959
susandeschain9 [info] I definitely think pelvic PT can help you retrain that clenching over time, I hope it works out for you with insurance this next year. For anxiety I’ve found help with Cognitive Behavior Therapy and Dialectical Behavior Therapy. I still clench my pelvic floor sometimes during times of high stress (&amp; I am diagnosed with anxiety as well), but I’m able to notice that it’s happening and try to implement skills and therapies to relax it again (and to also try to de-escalate the anxiety in general). Good luck  [info] None [info] 1543023713
ronnwell10 [info] My mother is a narcissist; I need help! Hello r/raisedbynarcissists!I am 17 years old (I turn 18 in September) and I have been diagnosed with anxiety which was the factor of me ultimately leaving the 8th grade. I have obtained my high school equivalency however but "family" matters have gotten even worse.My mother has been narcissistic ever since I've been aware of what a narcissist is. She calls me volatile names and has even said that my grandfather, who passed away in November, "only saw the potential in her and not me." I live with my grandmother at the moment but in a week, we'll all be moving in together at my mother's 1 bedroom apartment. My mother lost her job due to budget cuts and she's unable to get one now b/c Children Protective Services has found her guilty of child abuse; she worked in human resources.Sometimes, I get caught up in the hell that I'm in and I reciprocate the name-calling towards my mother. My grandmother is also verbally abusive but from a legal standpoint, she's not particularly involved. My father is deadbeat and I have no other part of the family that I can move in with. We are in the midst of starting a Family Preventive Service and I've made it known that all I want from her is to sign the FAFSA. My mother ends up getting mad b/c I don't like her even though she treats me like s***.I deal with yelling, cursing, and condescending comments every day and I can't take much more. Any advice would be greatly appreciated. Thanks.TL;DR: Mother is extremely controlling and verbally abusive, Grandmother is verbally abusive; 17 y/o needs help on what to do. [info] None [info] 1529875160
RockSmash7 [info] It's a bit like Marmite. I started socially then went into doing it full time after I was diagnosed with anxiety. It helps me when I feel under pressure to have a smoke and calm down a bit. I do realise this is a placebo effect as smoking actually increases your heart rate but if it works it works. [info] None [info] 1410111649
complexsimplicity90 [info] Those things might in fact make you a great psychologist.While you do need to relate in order to build a rapport with your clients, you don’t want to be overly concerned to the point where you are an empath and bringing it home with youPersonally, while finishing my Masters in counseling, I was diagnosed with anxiety. I thought that disqualified me but in all actuality it made me better. 1) because i know from personal experience about anxiety so i can diagnose, recognize the signs and relate and 2) i go to therapy (when needed). I am better able to understand myself and triggers BUT also use what i learn in therapy in my therapy sessions with othersAs a therapist it is HIGHLY suggested that you have a therapist yourself anyway so you should be good  [info] None [info] 1519866240
kiwiiwik [info] Do you suffer from anxiety? This reminds me of me when I was younger, before I was diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1390032102
Squiddytick [info] I have anxiety medication that I'm meant to take every day, but I never take it, which caused me to eventually attempt suicide. Saw this sub on top growing communities and thought I'd share my story.So I was diagnosed with anxiety at the age of 12, I'm now 14, by my therapist which I am still going to now. I have medication for it. It started out as 25g of medication, which I took fine. When they started increasing the dosages is when I started to stop taking the medication. They brought up the dosage to 50g, I still took it fine. It was when they took it to 75g that I stopped taking it. You see, they didn't have a 75g pill. I had to eat 1 and 1/2 pills, which meant breaking the pills. I got lazy and just stopped taking it. I'd flush an estimated amount of pills down the toilet each week, and lie to my doctor and my therapist about how much I've been taking. Now, apparently suddenly getting off anxiety meds can cause some problems. It was about a month or 2 after I stopped taking said pills when I tried to commit suicide. I tried to slit my wrist, but thank god the object I was using was pretty dull, and not very sharp, because if it was a legitimate knife, I wouldn't be here right now. I started bleeding, but it was way too painful, so I realized what I was doing and stopped. The next time I went to the doctor to check up on my anxiety, I told them what happened, so they increased my dosage to 100g. They had a pill for 100g, which meant no more breaking pills, but since it was already out of my routine to take them, I haven't been taking them either. I'm still flushing the pills down the toilet and lying to my doctor and therapist. I'm not sure what might happen in the future as a result of this, but definitely not good. I'm trying to get back into the routine of taking them, but when I forget, I still have to flush them down the toilet, which is most of the time. My parents are getting on to me about not taking my pills because it seem like there's too many in the bottle (which there is), but I just act like they're crazy and I've been taking them daily.Just something to eat off my chest. I'm sorry if anyone was disturbed. [info] None [info] 1573439083
paincoats [info] To me, that sounds like anxiety. I get that to a lesser degree, and I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Intrestingly, the counsellor initially thought I was on the spectrum. I wouldn't be surprised if anxiety was commonly comorbid with autism. [info] None [info] 1423107859
Ky303 [info] Any tips for anxiety dreams? I apologise of this is a bit long...I have been diagnosed with anxiety for 4 years now and within this past year I noticed I've gotten a lot of anxiety dreams. Now I'm not talking about  nightmares but really bad one can be. Some of the dreams I've had included things such as being late to things, being ignored when warning people of a dangerous situation, not being able to escape a room or building, not being able to get ahold of someone, ect. Every time I have one I'm mostly able to handle it but it mostly sets in anxiety for the rest of the day. It's never bugged me too badly till last night when I had one that included me having multiple anxiety attacks and a family member getting hurt. Does anyone else have this? If so does anyone know some tips on how I can calm down after waking up from one? [info] None [info] 1534226943
Dev_57 [info] yeah pretty safe to say it was no surprise when I was diagnosed with anxiety xD [info] 🎉 1,000,000 Attendee! 🎉 [info] 1559446624
chair328 [info] My story Hi. So it’s my first time posting on this app but I think it’s been helping at the beginning of this year I was fine until I had my first panic attack when it first happened I’ve never been so scared about what was happening to me at the time I was not diagnosed with anxiety. I went to my schools health center and had an immediate appointment with a counselor there, there they told me I had anxiety and it didn’t really surprise me because before hand I would show the signs I’ve just never had a panic attack before  and this is the first time I was more aware of myself. I do know what the triggers are for my attacks and it’s from a lot of changes since last year that have been happening in my life. Lately I’ve been feeling like  a lot of people don’t really believe that I have panic attacks or that I’m just making them up I’ve had people really worry about me as well with these new changes. When I started counseling I really didn’t feel comfortable with what was going on and I kind of shut a lot of people out because my thought was that they wouldn’t understand it took me weeks to tell a friend of mine that I was diagnosed with anxiety. Counseling now ( in the middle of the semester ) has helped me a lot even though we can’t really work on CBT ( cognitive behavioral therapy ) I’ve been working with my counselor on ways to cope with this certain trigger  they’ve been working but a lot of me just wonders why now  and how do I talk to my family about it as well my worry is that the fear of having another attack is still there and my counselor and I have been working on getting rid of the thought but I don’t know if it will ever go away [info] None [info] 1550945988
mmmgluten [info] For me a critical part of getting to that detachment point was therapy and medication. I was diagnosed with anxiety (imagine that!) and started taking medication for it just as needed. I also secretly went to therapy. Therapy taught me what to recognize and medication during arguments kept me level enough to actually see what was happening instead of getting caught up in the whirlwind of bluster and manipulation. Once I had that objective view of what was being done to me the detachment came naturally.  [info] None [info] 1550831722
RetrogradeMe [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder so yes, I do.  [info] 2 days [info] 1519682168
Raimrus [info] It’s completely taken over me. I need advise on how to control this. I’m on multiple medications (can’t remember names off top of my head) to try and control it and none of them are working at all. I was diagnosed with anxiety in 7th grade and it’s just gotten progressively worse. Especially this school year. I get anxiety out of nowhere for no reason and since I have IBS, IBD, and Indeterminate colitis it also effects that too, causing ‘anxiety poops’ as many people call it. Basically if there’s no bathroom or none nearby my anxiety kicks in and makes my stomach super upset. I also sometimes get hot flashes and rapid heart rate/heart palpitations. Just recently for my birthday I went to Chinatown with my best friend and while we were driving there my anxiety kicked in and we had to stop at Dunkin’ Donuts so I could use the bathroom because of it.It’s gotten so bad that I’m afraid to go anywhere in fear of it acting up. It happens out of random with no trigger whatsoever. I’m desperate for relief so I can do things I want to without this constant fear. [info] None [info] 1551073871
masscool [info] I'm on medication. I've been diagnosed with anxiety for 9 years now, it just acts up worse sometimes [info] None [info] 1385238347
ashamedlittlegirl [info] I hate myself for having dated a much older man and I cannot move past it. I am using a throwaway because I am ashamed of how weak I've been in this whole situation. I apologize if this whole thing is a complete wall of text and a total mess. It's finals season. I am stressed. And I want to move past this. I just needed a place to vent. I am 20 years old. I am in college. I am two years away from graduating. I consider myself an optimist, cheerful, enthusiastic and very driven in life. I have my demons but everyone's fighting the good fight. In my teenage years I've always been very attracted to older men (silver foxes, English teachers, you name it). I have never acted on my attractions, except once.In January this year, I broke up with my ex-boyfriend **D**, who I started dating when I was 18. He's 22 years older than me. We both worked in the same restaurant. I was attracted to him. I made the first move. I gave him my number and when I left for college years a few hours away from our city, we began our relationship. I lost my virginity to him. I dated him for just over a year. I am disgusted with myself, at how I behaved and how I stubborn I was. My parents have always been strict with me, and they have always supported my happiness, but they were adamantly against my dating D, understandably. I fought with them for hours on end about this man, who I saw as an understanding, gentle, loving man. Now I realize how stupid I was. How naive I was. I am with the most amazing man (my age!) in the world right now, and he's accepted everything about me. He accepted that I dated a much older man, but I'm afraid to tell him what I'm writing here. I hate myself for putting my parents through that. The thought of a 40 year old man putting his hands on me now makes me gag, it makes me sick to my stomach. I can't get over how disgusted I am with myself-I can't think of a better word than disgust. I actually believed I loved him. Now I think back and I regret every second of that relationship.I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was young and now I've been overthinking the relationship to the point where it's overwhelming me. When he came to visit me the first weekend while I was in school, I didn't have sex with him. However, when I went home on a break, we did. I told him, "if you really wanted to...I wouldn't say no." And he took that as my verbal consent. I understand how he must've interpreted, but I'm disgusted with myself. I regretted doing it afterwards. I hated that it happened like that. I can't get over my guilt for all the fighting with my parents, the grief I created.We had unprotected sex because I was a virgin. He told me that he was safe as he had been tested a year ago, and he didn't like using condoms. He gave me a strain of HPV that put me at risk for cervical cancer. He was incredibly apologetic. But I don't blame him, I understand that men can't get tested for **edit** HPV. The relationship with my parents has recovered fairly well. I am very close to them and I try to tell them everything.I don't know if this is relevant, but in my last year of high school my old English teacher at my school had what could be considered an emotional affair with me, while he was married. I had no idea what his intentions were. I talked to him every day after school because he was a trusted authority figure. I admit, I was attracted to him, but I never intended for anything to happen. While we didn't touch, he gave me lots of books as gifts, and eventually admitted to having feelings for me. When I went off to college, his wife found out and accused him of sleeping with me and they separated briefly. He would get mad at me for not picking up his phone calls or speaking to him. I don't know. Maybe I'm just useless and stupid and I don't see things happening. I cannot forgive myself for these disgusting, ugly parts of my past. I hate myself for it. The truth is, I don't blame him. I don't think he's a bad person. I don't think he's a monster. I think I'm the monster. And I hate that I am the monster. I don't know how to move past this. I don't know how to forgive myself. I don't know if I deserve my own forgiveness. [info] None [info] 1418680775
amkmaker1754 [info] I Was an Anxious Child Hello, citizens of r/NoSleep, I am usually just a lurker here but tonight I wanted to share with you all, my own personal story. Edit: grammar.When I was six, I was diagnosed with anxiety and anorexia nervosa. I found that every time I tried to eat, or felt the slightest pang of hunger, I’d clam up. Refuse to put anything in my mouth. Why? Fear of choking on anything. I sometimes wouldn’t swallow my own saliva. When you’re six years old and suffering from something that seems so silly, so unbelievably childish, it begins to wear down your family. Puts strain on your parents, as they fight to keep you fed, let alone keep themselves sane. My mother and father would take me for walks. It started out casual. We’d dress my baby brother and go to McDonald’s. They’d order my favourite happy meal. Each time I’d cause such a fuss about taking a bite and choking on the nuggets that we’d always leave with the attention of every other customer in the restaurant. It got to the point where my mother couldn’t look at me without bursting into tears because I’d lost enough weight that you could so faintly see the dark shadows of my liver. Seems impossible, right? I’d show you all pictures as proof but we got rid of all the photos and memories of such a dark time so I could forget and move on. Looking back, it’s hard to recall why I’d developed such a fear. Why it crippled me and nearly drove my parents to insanity. Why all of a sudden policemen were showing up at my house out of the blue and questioning my mom and dad about why they were starving me. Surely my teachers at school had something to say. A six year old weighing under thirty five pounds wouldn’t necessarily go unnoticed. I didn’t know why I’d all of a sudden picked up this idea that I couldn’t eat or drink anything. Years passed by. I eventually broke through. After months and months of intense therapy with child shrinks, I defeated anorexia nervosa. Then they readjusted my diagnosis and told me I was plain old anxious. A constant over-thinker. My parents convinced them not to put me on medication. I could suppress it for some time. Eventually I found lots of coping mechanisms that helped when I started feeling the waves of panic flow through my body. At first I’d start going completely rigid on the living room carpet, eyes clenched, and my hands balled up into fists so strong my knuckles were white and my nails would pierce the soft skin of my palms. My nose would bleed. I’d be sent home from school because it would scare the other kids. Then gradually the attacks came on less strong. I would just excuse myself to go to the bathroom, practice my breathing as my shrink would tell me to do. Then after a while I’d find a way to think of other things. Distract my own conscience from itself. Not only was I grateful that there was finally some improvement, but my mom and dad could finally sleep at night. After my seventh birthday, the nightmares and night terrors started. That was a whole new level of torment. It was horrendous; I’d wake up soaking wet from sweating. I never wet the bed, however I did stress myself out so much that several times I vomited and wouldn’t stop until I passed out again. When my mom or dad, even my shrink, would ask me about them, I could never remember a single detail.But there was one thing that always stood out in the corner of my eye. I’d wake up some nights, unable to move, panicking after a particularly scary nightmare. I’d turn my head after struggling awhile to see the same little black thing hiding by the door. It had a sheep’s build—a thick, woolly body with knobbly legs. But it had no discernible face. I guessed at first that it was just so black that I couldn’t adjust my eyes enough before burying my head under the sheets as anyone would do. After all, aren’t sheets the one thing that would save you from the most malevolent of evils?At first I’d only wake up from a nightmare or night terrors once or twice a week. Then it started to get worse. As if it was bad enough that I didn’t eat for months at a time, I didn’t sleep. At all. It really reflected on my grades. To the point where, again, the police would question my parents about possible abuse or neglect. In school kids would avoid me. As if I had some terrible thing hanging over my shoulder. I didn’t understand it back then, but as I grew older, it began to dawn on me. See, this black thing…it would always get closer. I’d see it far clearer in my dreams than I could when I woke up. It was exactly as I previously described it…sheep-like. Jet black, with no face. Only in my dreams it had a face. Of a goat. And it would stand on two hooves rather than four like I originally assumed. It had little curly horns coming from its head. To top it all off, it would whisper things to me I wished I never heard. One day, out of the blue, I stopped having the nightmares. The terrors, waking up in the dead of night, pulling the covers over my head in hopes to drown out the repetitive whisper, “They can’t help you…they can’t help you…they don’t love you…they don’t love you…” Oh, god. I can still hear the voice, clear as day. My hands are shaking so bad right now, writing this. Excuse my rambling, but I’m bringing back years and years of torment and terror. I never expected for it to be this hard.I moved just after the nightmares stopped. I was in grade two. About seven or eight years old. After settling into my new home I stopped all the nightmare bullshit. It was a fucking miracle. I was eight when I finally got a good night’s rest without waking up. My parents, too, were more than pleased. My efforts in school blossomed. I was on cloud nine. And it stayed that way for a year or two. And one day, without having any sort of anxiety at all, it found me again. Only it had grown in size. And its features had become far more distinguished. I want to emphasize day, because that’s when I saw it. Broad fucking daylight, staring at me from down the hall in the doorway of my parents’ room. I darted into my room, slammed the door behind me, and held my dog. She whimpered and barked at the door, but there was no fucking way I was leaving my room. I should have mentioned that my brother and mom were across town at a soccer game. My dad was home but he was in the garage. He wouldn’t have heard my screams. When my mom got home she found me in my closet hiding under a bunch of clothes. At that point she finally started to understand that this wasn’t just some imaginary thing when my dog kept whining at the furnace grate in the hallway. It was nice to know that finally, after all the suffering I’d endured accompanied by the frustration of mom and dad never believing what I “thought I saw”, my mom knew. She wouldn’t tell my dad. He didn’t have an open mind about this stuff. We eventually deduced that it might have been linked to my anxiety. A physical manifestation of the panic inside my mind. Funny thing was that after a while my brother began seeing it too. Except he believed it was an imaginary friend. He’d play with it and I’d watch in horror as this fucking black thing that used to torture me while I slept would frolic around my brother’s room. Eventually I stopped fearing it. I started taking to my brother’s way of looking at it. Thought of it as a friend rather than a foe. Scared the shit out of my mom, honestly. I felt bad for her too, seeing as my dad couldn’t handle all the crazy and took a job overseas to escape it all. We moved again when I was in the middle of the seventh grade. By then I’d gotten my anxiety completely under control. I started to feel like a normal kid again, even though I missed the majority of my memorable childhood. We moved cross-country and I prayed to god that no matter how friendly it became, (we took to calling it “Teddy” and I guess it didn’t seem to mind) I wanted it to stay behind. I got my wish for almost eight years. My brother eventually grew too old to believe in imaginary friends. We both played lots of video games around that time. My parents started making lots more money so we could afford luxuries like that. My dad quit his job overseas, thankfully, so all in all my family had grown whole again, much less sane. In a way, I sort of missed all the attention. It was because of my childhood that I lived a very antisocial teenage-hood. I chose to pass on a lot of opportunities because I felt like I didn’t belong, like I was a freak in my own imaginary world. I mean, for all I knew, out of my whole life so far I was this weird girl who had meltdowns in class, and who would mutter to herself for hours about the things that “Teddy” whispered in my ear while I tried to sleep but couldn’t. I had no one I could relate to. Eventually I let this all go. I grew past all the anger, the built-up emotions. I graduated at the top of my class (since I had all that time to study rather than hanging with friends all the time like my brother did) and won a prestigious scholarship for a university I wanted so badly to attend. When the time came that I finally moved out and went to university, at first it was a bit of a shock. I’d be away from my mum. I didn’t know anyone. And for someone who, throughout their high school years struggled to make friends, I didn’t exactly have it easy. I soon met a boy (we’ll call him Jack) and fell head over heels for him. I started living my teenage years. School became less and less of an importance and more of a hobby. Unfortunately at the time, to my lack of knowledge, falling for this boy would have a disturbing outcome.“Teddy” found me. And boy, was he jealous. I thought at first that it might have been the dorm I was living in. The old building shifting and creaking with all the weight, since I was on the first floor. Then I heard the all-too-familiar whispering. Then the scratching at the door. The small scratches on Jack’s arms and back. They’d always be deeper and bloodier after we made love. Jack wasn't completely oblivious. Soon he became scared out of his mind. He stopped coming around the university, since he had his own apartment anyway. I spent all my time there instead. Stopped attending classes more and more. I’ll admit, it was all going downhill. A year goes by with little to no incidence. Jack and I decided it was time to move in together, as I quit university. I wasn’t prepared for the stresses of university. And I suppose the idea of living with a boy who’d look after me was more appealing anyways, so that’s what I did. I gave up my dream.So here I am, telling you this story. Sitting on my couch at home. Jack is away at work. I’ve no problems being home alone now. My apartment isn’t scary. Sometimes the odd shadow will catch my attention, but I could usually debunk it as my upstairs neighbours crossing the lawn. No worry at all, right? Well, I wish I could say I didn’t have to worry. Because I know he’s here. I know Teddy’s behind me. All I can hear is the whispers. "Jack is dead. Jack is dead. Jack is burning. Jack is burning." [info] None [info] 1426833006
LizzyLemonade [info] I hate that. I was diagnosed with anxiety earlier this year and I'm just getting used to recognizing the symptoms. It's awesome that you caught it quickly! [info]  [info] 1472583127
boylognese [info] Depersonalization/Derealization Hi, friends. I was diagnosed with anxiety about 6-7 years ago. It’s gone largely untreated as it seemed to taper off a bit after high school and hasn’t been a huge hinderance since then. However, in the past month or so, I’ve been stricken with the worst anxiety I’ve experienced so far. On top of that, I’ve noticed symptoms of what I believe to be a manifesting depersonalization/derealization disorder. I feel entirely detached from myself, almost like I’m ghost walking on autopilot. I was driving home from work last night and I completely blacked out. I recognized that I was driving, that I was stopping at lights and making correct turns, but it was almost as if I had no conscious control over what I was doing. Probably the scariest experience I’ve ever had and definitely led to the worst panic attack of my life.I’ve been attempting to get in contact with my primary care doc for a referral so I can get on a medication/psychotherapy regiment, but I was wondering if anyone had any tips or stories regarding this or would potentially like to chat? Greatly appreciate any response! [info] None [info] 1556043792
starpsy42 [info] [Help] and [Rant]: I feel like I might pass out So I put both [help] and [rant] because I mostly need to just type this out but if anyone has suggestions that'd be nice too!So...I was diagnosed with anxiety at 4 years old and have been suffering on and off ever since. It seems to change "form" every few years (ex: when I was a kid, I would vomit whenever I got anxious; not anymore). So it changed again to this new form and I guess I'm having an anxiety attack right now so I just want to sorta verbal vomit here, since I can't physically do that anymore :PMy problem is I can't read certain things without getting really scared. I'm also afraid of typing this stuff out in case I "make it true"...logically I know that would be dumb, but just in case. I read a "theory" maybe 10 mins ago now that scares me, and as hard as I'm trying to calm down and think rationally, I can't.Basically, I read this thing I can't type out because I'm scared to, and I became horrified if it's true. Like terrified. So I got super warm and now I'm sorta dizzy, but it's like a weird sense of I am detached from the world right now and I'm sorta floating around. And my stomach kills like I would have to vomit but I'm not. Now my head is starting to burn and I'm scared it's a tumor and I'm dying.And I'm trying to read the stuff debunking it to convince myself that it's not true but it's not working. And I have shit to do but I can;t concentrate because right now I'm still feeling floaty and my eyes and mind can barely focus on this thread right now. I don't even know my point just now. Help, anyone, please. TL;DR: I read something that scared me so now I feel light-headed and sick. [info] None [info] 1380844054
0bsidian_ [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety for about 7 years now, and I was on an SSRI for 2-3 years I believe. I have xanax (.25mg) for emergencies and might only take a few a year. I've been doing that for the past 3 years, so my situation is pretty similar to yours! I was completely honest about ALL of my medical history, and my doctor cleared me. Anxiety came up as a topic in my interview this year, but in the end, I was shortlisted! I'll be an incoming JET this year. :)My advice would be to explain the circumstances to your doctor so they understand the gravity of the situation, and to NOT LIE on your form. Good luck! [info] Current JET - Awaiting Placement [info] 1461081520
Peach_Muffin [info] All my life I've kinda been super anxious about stuff. You know, the worrying and blowing things out of proportion thoughts. I remember in sixth grade I was being bullied, I then started worrying that it would happen for the rest of my life and that my family might disown me for being weak enough to let myself get bullied. I would become an absolute wreck due to unhealthy thought patterns, the kind of person who would freak out that their partner had died in a car crash because they didn't pick up their phone and were running late. Our worry that every time somebody wants to talk to you that you are in trouble. That stuff might be familiar to some people. Occasionally as a child/teenager I would have trouble getting enough air and supplement my oxygen with deep sighs. This condition (called air hunger) got way worse when I was 24, in 2012. Eventually I was diagnosed with anxiety. For me some days are easy, others I seem to worry about every damn thing. I did everything I could today to avoid a 5 minute conversation with a colleague that would simply involve inserting a USB stick into her computer and running a program. That scared the shit out of me. The air hunger is on and off too. There was one night I thought that I would die, and imagining my parents finding a corpse the following morning didn't help matters much. What helps is meditation when I am exhibiting symptoms; air hunger is pretty good for cuing me into when I'm stressed. Coloring helps me too :) [info] None [info] 1455004475
Toskaboh [info] They're putting me on Celexa, its my first time taking antidepressants. What should I expect? Specifically looking for maybe some other people who are taking this specific antidepressant. I'm diagnosed with anxiety and major depressive disorder. Any advice, things I should know, ect? Or just anyone share their person experience with it here, if it worked for them or not, or other things. Thanks! [info] None [info] 1454323035
xRadio [info] If reading doesn't work, a good TV show probably will! Game of Thrones definitely helped distract me.I was diagnosed with anxiety, so I totally understand having irrational fears. The one thing that has really helped me with it was communicating with my SO. Sometimes I find myself having a mild attack over something stupid, like spilling food on his bed, and he will see me and help me rationalize what it is that is upsetting me, and why it's not as bad as I'm making it out to be: "Why are you upset?" "I spilled a thing..." "Do you think I would be upset by that?" "Yes." "Well I absolutely do not care, there are more stains in this bed than you could imagine. Nothing to worry about."And just like that my anxiety is quelled! So I would suggest talking to him. Tell him about your anxieties and he can try to talk you through them and think about them in a rational way. [info] 3,766 miles USA - UK [info] 1402483866
darnitkelly [info] It doesn't seem like a lot I was diagnosed with anxiety about four years ago. I have never been able to do simple things by myself like go grocery shopping, riding the bus, ordering food at a resturant or cafe, using an elevator, getting things out of a vending machine, ask for change for bills, etc.Yesterday I got two snacks and a drink out of the vending machine. Today I rode the bus to and from the hospital by myself (and I didnt panic when I missed the bus coming back), asked for change for a $5 to get on the bus and even used the elevator by myself. It's not a big deal (especially to my boyfriend) but I am really proud of myself. I didnt think I would ever be independent. :) [info] None [info] 1550348002
lbart00 [info] I [19f] am constantly feeling like I'm annoying my boyfriend [19m] of two months. I apologize all the time, and it is affecting us. Help? TL;DR I ask my boyfriend if I'm annoying all the time, and that's what's actually annoying. I don't know how to stop. It's multiple times within the hour, very frequently.Disclaimer as well: I've been diagnosed with anxiety, so I know it stems from that, so no need to let me know. EDIT: I am not looking for professional help or otherwise lengthy psychological assistance. I would just like some advice or encouragement, or to know if someone has been through this. I know it's a personal insecurity issue I need to work on, but I don't know what to do about it in the everyday.My boyfriend is a great man, and treats me better than I ever have been before. Maybe that's why I'm so insecure about our relationship? I care about him greatly and treasure my time with him. But I always ruin it with my *incessant apologizing*. I've been in some (a lot) of abusive relationships and toxic relationships in the past, so I have some (a lot) of baggage. One ex who particularly messed me up had me constantly saying sorry for the way I said things, the way I did things, the way I unintentionally made him feel, even apologizing for being upset myself. I once had to apologize for hours to *him* because I self harmed. When this ex gave me certain looks, texts, or behaviors I knew I was in trouble and I would start apologizing instantly. It was like when you did something wrong and your parents found out, except all the time if I did *anything*. This has impacted me greatly, likely for life.I've also been bullied in the past and was very suicidal in high school because people told me how shittily annoying I was. This, along with a few other situations and some past friendships, have me in a constant fear of being annoying or rude.I am saying "sorry"s all the time or asking my boyfriend if I'm being annoying (just by existing). I know it takes a pretty big toll on him and our relationship. Still, he is very kind and willing to validate me as he understands I've been abused in the past. He always says "if you were being annoying or I had an issue, I'd just tell you- I promise". I trust him, but I just get a... vibe. Or something. I don't know.I know it's unfair to him, but sometimes the residual fear from exes' "vibes" when they were mad at me think that when he acts that way he's annoyed. Hint: he's not. Sometimes he enjoys just listening, or he has ADHD so he's on his phone instead of looking at me and honestly doesn't know. I know that he is not my exes, but the behaviors that once caused automatic fear still do, even with someone else.What it basically is is that I *know* this is annoying, I *know* it could ruin our great relationship, I am *completely conscious* of me doing this toxic behavior, and I can't stop. It's obsessive sometimes. I apologize for doing things he hadn't even noticed me do, like stepping in front of him. I don't even know how to stop.I care about him so much and don't want to ruin our relationship. I am conscious of my behavior being toxic and unhealthy, I just have no idea how to stop it. I don't know how to believe he would "just tell me" if he doesn't want to be with me or is irritated by me. Help or experience with this is greatly appreciated. [info] None [info] 1553579547
grill_friend [info] I know how you feel! I remember I was talking about this to my psychiatrist and he said I was hiding from something, and that's why these things that can "pull you in" were so attractive to me. Hiding from things like school, job, non-existant social life, etc.I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder, now being treated for a few years this addictive part of me is much more under control. I still play games, but I don't get so into them anymore.So all in all, I think you need to be honest with yourself and find the reason why you like the escape so much. Then you can work towards fixing that problem. This is just how it was for me! Sorry if I am misunderstanding you. [info] None [info] 1495185807
swoollley [info] Has anyone else experienced extreme worry about EVERYTHING while pregnant??? I’m a first time mom, I’m excited as hell, but my thoughts will not let up. I’m worried about everything. (I should note that I was diagnosed with anxiety around age 11/12, so this may be contributing) I’m suddenly so aware of my own mortality, and not in a “live each day like it’s your last!” way, more of an “oh my god every single thing in this world has the potential to kill me, what if baby’s father gets in a horrible work accident today, holy shit is that car gonna crash into me??? it definitely is i’m about to die” sort of way. The best way I can describe it is pure terror regarding pretty much everything. I do plan to bring this up with my therapist &amp; my OB, but I’m wondering if any other moms/moms to be have gone through something similar? I feel so alone and, quite frankly, insane. I’m 13w5d and just really hoping that I can learn to cope with this and enjoy my pregnancy. [info] None [info] 1549590600
interiordesigner1999 [info] Shortness of breath, heart palpitations, minor chest pain. When to see emergency? I am a 20 yr old female, average height and weight. I have been diagnosed with anxiety but I feel as if these symptoms aren’t that as I know what that feels like. I have also been previously diagnosed with iron deficiency about 4 years ago. No longer on supplements. The only thing I am taking is birth control. For the past couple weeks I’ve had symptoms of shortness of breath, heart palpitations and some random moments of chest pain. The shortness of breath feels like I can’t get a full breath and am just trying to catch up with my breathing. Heart palpations I’ve been dealing with for about 6 years and was diagnosed as anxiety. I’ve had a couple moments of chest pain that’s like an ache in my chest on the left side. A few times were during exercise but the most recent was when I was just sitting at my desk. I’ve also experienced some light headedness suddenly while standing. I have a doctors appointment for next week but am wondering if this is more urgent and I should go to emergency. This morning I felt as if I could barely catch my breath and the smallest movement walking from my house to my car wore me out. I don’t know if I’m just overthinking my symptoms or if this is something serious. Any advice would be appreciated thanks! [info] User Not Verified [info] 1573573300
PieShouldBeFree [info] I just wanted to add another perspective to your analysis.  On week 2 you say that you became more social and the paranoia of social situations grew weaker.  For me this is the opposite, as time goes on I become less social and grow to hate social situations all together.  I'm sure this is just because we have different personalities and my normal sober self hates social situations and always has.  Also as time goes on and I become even more sober I turn back into my normal anxious self and start to miss the cannabis even more.  On a side note, directed towards the "fake happy chemicals" statement.  I would also like to offer a different perspective on this if I may.  Now, I have been diagnosed with anxiety before and was on prescription anti-anxiety medication for it before I had ever even started smoking cannabis.  Now that was an addiction, I absolutely despise those things.  They worked for me, but the body has a way of becoming extremely addicted to them even though i hated them and their horrible side effects.  Anyways I could go on about those but I won't as it's not the topic.  I just find it peculiar that you refer to cannabis as "fake happy chemicals".  But when you really think about it, if it truly brings happiness to someone, how could it be considered fake.  If you are happy, then you're happy.  If no harm is being caused to anyone then where does the problem lie.  It changes the normally anxious chemical make up of my brain and adds a some happiness and positivity where it would normally be drowned out, overlooked, and unnoticed.  And it's not fake happiness, it allows me to see all the very real things and people around me that are positive.  Things that before I took for granted and had no time to acknowledge.  I appreciate everything more.  I stop worrying and putting all my focus on mundane negative thoughts.  When I go to bed at night I'm not bombarded with unimportant worries but instead fall asleep quickly and sleep well.  My health improved, my normally high blood pressure was for the first time at normal levels when I started smoking daily to a functional level.  People noticed that I was all around happier in life.  I opened up to people, shared my feelings.  All of this I owe to these chemicals you speak of. They keep the negative chemicals away and let me experience real happiness that I otherwise deny.Anyways, I understand that many people are effected differently from cannabis and respect that it's not for everyone. I just wanted to throw out another perspective to the situation. I wish you and OP well in your journey away from it.  As for me, I'll smoke the next bowl for you.  Good luck. [info] None [info] 1362472941
katiebuggc [info] GAD Pals: How often does it bother you? Hello! So in November-ish, I was diagnosed with anxiety, particularly Generalized Anxiety Disorder (GAD). My psychiatrist mentioned the definition, and how it was characterized by a general sense of anxiety, doom, paranoia, etc. for more than however many weeks, blah blah blah.My question is: How often are my fellow GAD-ers (I'm non-medicated, but both medicated and non-medicated friends are welcome to give input!) bothered by their GAD symptoms? What feelings bother you the most?For example, over the past 9-12 months that I've exhibited symptoms, there's been maybe three or four days that I've felt "normal" (no weird symptoms, no overthinking, no cyclical thinking/worrying, the good stuff), and every day other than those I'm plagued most heavily by dread, irritability, and anxiety. Some nights I'll get very paranoid about some things. Edit: For clarification [info] None [info] 1522207051
Mynipsareonfire [info] Sure.  I was diagnosed with anxiety, and it turns out I have a disorder of the autonomic nervous system.  Is it because doctors see women and think "anxiety" or is it because women are actually more anxious? [info] None [info] 1502253093
kawaiiyummycum [info] You're home alone and you hear a sound, you feel that sinking feeling. You're afraid, you try to calm yourself down, because its all in your head. Right? but you grab onto the closest hard object and listen closer just incase. Your heart pounds and so does your head in unison. It's that feeling but it crawls up on you with no reason. Anxiety is being afraid of nothing, your brain creating chemicals it does not need, your heart beats fast and you feel sick, you sweat and you can't think properly. It's crippling, it's so hard to deal with day in day out. The worst part is few people understand so when you start crying or hyperventilating, people just leave you and point and say things. It's hard, it feels like they are all against you during that small moment. I was diagnosed with anxiety 4 years ago, the medication did not suit my brain chemistry. So I just deal with it. It's difficult, it won't change or go away because I'm sick. It's just who I am.  [info] None [info] 1521952436
motherbitcher [info] Hey, so I'm not a doctor, but I have dealt with almost the exact same symptoms as you. I was diagnosed with anxiety, and put on a daily low dose regimen of buspar. It's a non-narcotic med for anxiety that is not habit forming or a sedative. Within a week of taking it, the chest pain eased up, palpitations went away, and I felt better overall. I'm not saying this is anxiety for sure, and at 300 pounds, I am a little concerned about your cardiac health, but you might see your regular doc and ask about anxiety. You don't have to feel anxious to have physical symptoms (and the pounding heart/rock in your gut feeling is really common in my experience).Good luck! [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1501981719
shreebee2020 [info] Chance me for Virginia Tech Hi, Virginia Tech has been my dream school and I was wondering if it was possible for me to get in for a biology major.Demographic:From NOVA, female and IndianStats:My gpa is a 3.46 weighted ( I know it’s low, but that’s because I was diagnosed with anxiety at the end of my sophomore year and I struggled during my junior year. I also lost a lot of family and friends during my junior year, which resulted in a grade drop)I had a negative trend in grades from my sophomore year to junior year due to the above information.In my senior year, however, I was getting better and my grades are so much better as I have a 4.05 for my first semester grades (not cumulative for all four years).I took my ACT three times and I got a 29 my last time but I got a super score of 30.I took one chem subject sat and got a 700.I took 8 aps (1 in sophomore year, 3 in junior year and 4 in senior year).I got a 2 in ap physics, a 3 in ap chem, a 3 in ap world and a 4 in ap psych on the exams.Extracurriculars:I have been dancing for 10-11 years and I had a solo 3-hour performance the summer of my sophomore year in India. I’ve also competed in other states and I’ve placed in top 3. I have also performed a lot.I am a indian classically trained singer and I have competed and performed for that as well. I have also placed in top 3 in some competitions. I auditioned for a dance performance in the Kennedy Center and I was accepted. Additionally, my dance company partnered up with a non- profit organization and we raised 40,000 dollars.I also shadowed an orthodontist, went to a summer medical program at GWU for a couple of weeks and I am a co-founder of a company. I was on the honor roll in my sophomore year. I teach 10-15 six to ten year olds at my dance school now and I do it with two other people. I am a part of the Spanish Honor Society and I am the Vice- President of the Music Honor Society. I am a part of a South Asian Society Club and Eco Club. I auditioned and got into one of the advanced choirs at our school. Finally, I worked with elderly and, who were abandoned by their families in India.I hope that this is enough information! Thank you for taking your time to read this :) [info] None [info] 1580000692
positive-stuff [info] Good for you for working to get better :) Just a couple months ago I was diagnosed with anxiety and it's much better now. If I can do it, you can too. [info] None [info] 1483316628
PuppyPwease [info] How can I convince my mom to finally allow me to adopt a dog? (Long) I hope I put this in the right subreddit. A little background, I'm a state college student living in a house that my mom owns with two of my best friends (who pay rent) from my hometown. I came from a small town and my friends were two years older than I was, and even after they graduated before me we stayed close. I've been wanting a dog since I was 4, and from then I tried my hardest to convince my mom to let me get one. I researched breeds, basic dog training, costs, and how to handle certain behaviors. My parents divorced due to my father being abusive, leaving my financially stable mom with me and my younger sister. I was mature for my age and while my mom was at work I would take care of the house, cook, and watch over my sister all the time. Over the next 16 years I was promised a dog for all A's, keeping my room clean, being responsible around the house; you name it, I was promised a dog for it. Was I ever allowed one? No.  I found a puppy once and asked her about it, she called the local pound and made me watch it get taken away. I graduated top of my class, and I'm now in my second year of college. I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD, and I believe that has lead me to stay home way more often than I should. I haven't experienced the normal college life because I've been too nervous to go anywhere alone, but I want to experience everything Austin has to offer! I feel like adopting a dog could help me come out of my shell. After talking to both of my roommates we belive we could all benefit from having a family dog, but the only thing in our way is my mom's approval. I am wanting an adult dog who is already house trained, that way we help the local shelter and don't have to deal with puppy stage training. All three of us are up to splitting all of the costs, so... Reddit, how can I, for the love of God, convince my mom to let us get a dog? [info] None [info] 1426878369
KatharineD12 [info] Moral Of The Story I just finished Turtles all the Way Down today.  As I was nearing the end, I had a feeling I might be disappointed.  I had so many more questions, and not many pages left.  But, once I read the ending, I realized what I needed to get out of the story.  This past October I was diagnosed with anxiety, and I began medication in January.  My anxiety isn't as bad as Aza's, but I definitely saw some of myself in her.  I'm 17, a junior in high school, a girl, and I have a best friend who I love but am wildly different from.  I wanted to know where Aza goes to college, if she stays on her meds, if her and Davis ever reconnect, and what happens to Mychal and his art career.  After reading the last few pages where Aza admits that she's writing this as a married adult with children, I got some comfort.  Like any other junior, I'm stressed.  I want to know where I'm going to college and what happens with my friendships.  I want to know what's going to happen to me, and sometimes the suspense can be painful.  Aza, by no stretch of the imagination, has the perfect life, no one does, but that doesn't deprive her of a happy ending.  Like Daisy said, "We make the frames."  The iconic duo of Aza and Daisy helped me realize that I always have the ability to keep going, keep living, keep working, and keep living for my future.  Thanks John, it was worth the wait. [info]  [info] 1521153756
lipstickchic [info] I had anxiety my entire life since childhood and had no idea it was called anxiety I just thought what I felt was how everyone felt part of the human experience till I was diagnosed with anxiety and all the feelings I had along with it. It’s crazy I used to bite my nails as a kid and that was an anxious behavior. I even told my mother like why didn’t you take me to a therapist or why didn’t my pediatrician never said anything. I’m now 27 F and wish I had more time or more tools growing up dealing with it. I feel now it’s worse though. Lol  [info] None [info] 1547677838
ostentatiousbitch [info] I've been having the same issues. I'm a reporter, and as a result I'm glued to my phone. I constantly refresh Facebook and Twitter for breaking news. The thing is that if there were anything happening that was important for me to care about my NY Times app would alert me or my editor would shoot me an email or a text. I've since started blocking my apps with an app blocker. I only get 10 minutes on Twitter, Facebook and Instagram every day and that's it. I'm done after that. What I noticed was that the first week I did that my anxiety was through the roof (I've been diagnosed with anxiety, so there's that disclaimer). My phone was like a pacifier. If I was in an uncomfortable situation, like waiting for class to start or waiting to cross the street, I would immediately grab my phone. Bad habit. I even had to leave my morning class a couple of times because I felt an anxiety attack coming on because I couldn't check my newsfeeds. It sounds pathetic, I know, but after a while I got used to it. The world has always been turning without us having to check out social media. Sorry for rambling, but I guess my advice is this: everything in moderation. Your friends' posts will still be there tomorrow if you don't get to them today. Social media is a part of our lives now, and it's understandable to want to check it, nobody is making you feel bad for that, but you have to know when to stop and realize that you have a life that doesn't need to be posted online. People who care will reach out to you and let you know they got engaged or are having a baby or got that awesome new job.  [info] INFJ [info] 1463506685
TrillionStab [info] I could see it being a result of being anxious or depressed, but not one of the contributing factors of it. My eyes weren't ever dry before I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1501347080
JETMAZER [info] I don’t know what to do rn I was diagnosed with anxiety last year and it’s been hard ever sinceI feel so alone in the world, I only have one new friend in high school (just got into high school this year) but I don’t even know if he’s my friend, he pushed me around physically, like just as a joke but I don’t know if I feel good about it, and the other day he was begging me for money and got annoyed that I didn’t give him any money.I don’t want to stop being his friend because I am so scared about what might happen if I do. I’m so lonely I also went to an abusive therapist that just sat there the whole session whilst I cried and saying stuff like, calm down, take deep breaths, stop acting like a 2 yr oldSHUT UP SHUT UP SHUT UP SHUT UP SHUT UP SHUT UPAnd my mum paid so much money for that therapist and I feel so sorry for her because I know I am a pain in the ass to her and an embarrassment to her and her life would be easier if I were gone.I just want friends to talk to, friends that understand what I’m going through friends that don’t minds the fact my fucking voice hasn’t dropped yet, I sound like a 6 yr old or that that I can’t pronounce my r’s correctly. [info] None [info] 1585054840
IhateSA [info] Can someone tell me what is going on? My entire anxiety story. I'm 23 years old. I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year ago when I was 22. So I want to tell you guys what happened, what medicine I'm on and then I want you guys' advice. I have never had anxiety before. I was the team captain of my football team, I took a public speaking class in college. I was extremely nervous to go out on the field at the beginning of games and when I had speeches, but never encountered this type of anxiety. However, I noticed that I would get a bit shaky when speaking up in class especially if I would drink coffee and not have breakfast. I notice my neck would twitch. So last year, I was gave a history presentation. I had coffee and no breakfast. I stood up in class gave my part of the presentation. During the presentation I got really nervous and just read what I had on my paper instead of actually giving a normal speech. Right after the speech was over I started feeling the blackout feeling kind of like someone has when they get up too fast. Scared that I would pass out, I just walked straight out of the class room. Sure enough right after I made it out of the door and closed it, I passed out. I felt better after passing out. I went back in the classroom. Was my regular self. The teacher fussed me but I told her I was feeling weak and went get some food. I was clowning around with other students after. No anxiety. This was on a wednesday.Fast Forward to Friday. I have school again. Before the history class I have an economics exam. I'm running late to school. Just have the coffee, no breakfast again. Go through with the exam, feel good about it but quite hungry and a little shaky so i buy a candy bar out of the vending machine. I get to history class, people are doing presentations. I'm already done with mine from the previous day and no that I don't have to do anything but something just triggered me. I felt like I was about to pass out again. I put my head down until class is over, I still feel like I'm about to pass out, I'm panicking, so i walk fastly to vending maching and buy another candy, thinking that its my blood sugar or something. I eat it, I get some comfort for a second and start feeling it again, I go to the little store and buy a gatorade scared I could pass out at any minute. Extremely self conscious. I drink it, and head back for my car. As soon as I get to the car, I have my first panic attack, I'm laying down scared I'm having a heart attack. I get through it. I immediately go to the Dr. She thinks it could be something with food, tells me to focus on eating and drinking well over the weekend. I do that, but monday when its time to go back to school, I can't. I'm all panicky thinking that I must be sick. I'm having diarrhea etc. Tuesday I feel great at home. Wednesday when its time to go to school, all panicky having diarrhea again so I go straight back to the dr where she gives me an anxiety test. Sure enough everything on the test I'm thinking wow, this is exactly what I have. So she gives me .5 mg xanax as needed and celexa.I start taking my medicine. Xanax works like a charm. It’s the most relieving thing ever. I feel exactly how I did before I ever had anxiety. I took it only on school days or when I have to get up in front of class. So I take celexa for 4-5 months and it moderately helps. Learning of bad side effects of SSRIs though I decide not to take celexa anymore once my spring semester ends. I go through the summer and summer classes without taking any celexa or Xanax. My anxiety is heightened however, and I have to focus on breathing many times but I did it. I got through the whole summer without either drug. In August, I go to the dr because I have ear problems. She has to clean out my ears (it hurts) and I pass out. I tell her how I quit my meds and after passing out she tells me that I should consider getting back on them. As the fall semester approached, I got nervous and took my dr advice. I got back on the celexa. Man I felt great. Especially after about amonth on celexa. On a scale from 1-10 my anxiety was about 2 at max.  6 weeks into celexa I feel so great that I test my anxiety. On a bus that I was riding I decided that I was going to stand and give a girl my seat….. Bad decision. I begin to feel faint, start wobbling and shaking. I hurry and grab a Xanax as my vision is going black. It instantly saves me. I’m pouring down sweat. When I get to my destination, I try to explain to my gf what happened by my speech is slurred for about 5 min. After this episode my anxiety has been bad ever since. That leaves me to today. I’m on my celexa but my anxiety is very bad. I feel like I want to quit my anxiety meds. I felt great this past summer not being on it. It was challenging but I did it. I graduate in December and start working though and that makes me nervous. I don’t want to have anxiety everyday. I just wish I could go back in time before that history presentation to how I used to be. I’m not depressed, but it’s just extremely annoying how difficult everything is now. What advice do you guys give? Should I opt out of celexa? And just take Xanax as needed with a supplement? Or should I just stay on the celexa? Or should I wait until I start working to quit taking celexa? I have a supplement on hand called "Genius Joy” It has B vitamins, D Sam-e 1000mg, 5HTP, and other stuff in it. Should I get off my celexa and try that? Comments on the entire situation would also be helpful! Thanks so much guys! [info] None [info] 1508080653
free_slugs [info] Is this OCPD? I've always been a workaholic and a perfectionist. But I never realized to what extent until I came to college. Up until then I never had people in my way and I could just do things how I wanted and not worry about anyone messing it up (I know how egotistical and awful it sounds, I just really need things to be my way.) Now I'm in college and I have a roommate. I went home for the weekend and when I came back today I sat down at my desk and my stomach dropped, something was wrong. It was like my subconscious knew it before I could consciously process it. My highlighter was missing from my highlighter compartment on my pencil holder. I ALWAYS put my things in their spots, so I lost it. I went through every drawer in my desk, emptied my pencil cases, searched every inch of my desk while beating myself up for being so sloppy. How could I misplace it?! It has a spot, so you put it back in its freaking spot! Not a difficult concept! I couldn't find it. At this point my heart was racing, I practically had to force out each shallow breath and I felt like if I was able to breathe i would be bawling my eyes out.  Mind you, I have no homework tonight that requires a highlighter, and if I did I have plenty of highlighters in my second pencil case in my desk. I did have a lot of other homework to do, but I could not sit at my desk for a single second, never mind focus on homework, when something was so messed up. I felt like my world was crumbling to pieces and I had no control, all I could do was watch as everything burned. I later found it on the living room couch with my roommates homework. I guess she borrowed it and didn't think to ask. Rationally I realize how dumb this sounds. It's a highlighter, get over it. But I could not take my mind off it. My desk at home no one ever touches so I'm used to it being kept my way. But this?! It just set me off. Once I found it and put it back in its rightful place, I feel okay. Not perfect, but okay. I feel violated, disrespected, invaded. But my world is no longer crumbling to ashy remains. Wtf is wrong with me?! I've been diagnosed with anxiety for years, but this didn't seem like regular anxiety. I don't think it's OCD because I don't really have obsessions. Occasional intrusive thoughts but nothing like people with OCD have. I thought maybe the intense perfectionism was something like OCPD? I don't really care about the label so much as I care about finding someone who can relate. I just want to know if this is something other people experience as well or if I've actually lost my mind this time. Thank you all. [info] None [info] 1508727641
FerisProbitatis [info] Ugh! Retail is the worst! I was diagnosed with anxiety after working in retail for a year. Quitting that job to go to school was the best decision I've ever made.I hope you will find the resources and right circumstances to pull you out of that mess. No job is worth your happiness and your life. [info] None [info] 1571345284
Locke005 [info] Same here!  I've been diagnosed with anxiety in the past and I think this is pretty common for people with anxiety.  If I ever look up some symptoms I am having on the Internet I always think I have the worst possible illness. WebMD is very bad for me. [info] None [info] 1270824107
fobfromgermany [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and breathing control is the only thing I've found to be helpful in controlling the physical symptoms. Even just a few minutes of mediating can have effects lasting a day or more  [info] None [info] 1394818346
xXBesttubaplayerXx [info] Entitled Parent Tries to steal an 8yr olds stuffed animal (Entitled parents) Im sorry about any format or misspelled words or any grammar.This happened 5 years ago and I was 8 so this is gonna be what I mostly remember.When I was 6 I was diagnosed with anxiety. My mom bought my this clownfish stuffed animal and I grew attached to it, brought it EVERYWHERE I went, even to school sometimes. I would also speak to him like he was really real.I lived in front of a park in arizona at the time and my mom let me go to the park by myself, I was thrilled because it was my first time going without adult supervision, so I take my stuffed animal (who I named Nemo). EP= Entitled Parent (Mom)EK= Entitled kidMe= MeD= My dad(My dad is an ex army mechanic and currently works for the Union Pacific railroad, so I don't see him often)As I'm over there this mom and her 3-4 year old kid walks up to me and asks if he can look at my Nemo, I let him, he then looks at him and hands him back. I say thanks, he then rushes over to the Demonic mother.EK-"Mommy, Mommy I want that toy!"EP-"Okay Ill get it for you sweetheart."The EP and EK walk up to me and the EP says"Hey kid can my son have your fish?" As my anxiety started to rise I stuttered "No, go buy one at the Frys or the airport."EK-"Mommy I want THAT one!!!!" The EK starts to cryThis sentence will forever ring in my headEP-"YOU GODD*MN *SSHOLE GIVE THAT FISH TO MY SON NOW!" I start breaking down in tears.Never will I froget the moment when my and drove by in our convertible 2012 Mustang with the top down as he drove by the EP  snatches the fish from me right as my dad looks at me he smiles, then notices. I hear a SKIIIIIRT. Behind me my dad turns on his warning lights and gets put snd walks up to the EP.D-"WHY ARE YOU HARRASING MY SON, WHY DID YOU ALSO STEAL HIS FISH, HE HAS ANXIETY *SSHOLE!"The EK Ran off cryingEP-"But your son hit my son he needs to be put in jail!"D-"How about you (oh one thing I frogot to mention... my dad was a cop at the time) go to jail, so turn around hands behind your back he showed her his badge and he called a pickup for the EP. He pressed charges and it turns out the EP had a very entertaining criminal record.So yeah Cant belive such could happen i could finally get this off my chest. [info] None [info] 1550899468
Datchcole [info] I will look in advance at stats for sure for stat 50. I still have most of my notes and homework, so even though the professor is different, should still help.I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the past by Kaiser, but I'm not sure extra exam time would be necessary, but I'll look into it. Thank you! [info] Computer Science [info] 1527306910
HannahBAnderson [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety in 4th grade my dad came up to me and started ranting about how "all [I] need is Jesus," like I'm some sort of depraved sinner and he (my dad) knows better than me. [info] None [info] 1492320613
alpacameat [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic attacks. For a long while, even after been diagnosed with epilepsy I thought I only had anxiety and panic attacks. Funny thing is that I eventually developed an anxiety disorder cause by my epilepsy. [info] Vimpat 200 [info] 1566440086
Ry-kage [info] Any tips for fast heartbeat and chest pain? So I was just diagnosed with anxiety a few months ago and my main cause is my heart racing and chest pain in my left chest. EKG says I am good and I am on acid reflux meds, but I still find myself dwelling and getting anxious sometimes because of it. Any tips to help against it would be very much appreciated! [info] None [info] 1547088933
38hunnid_ [info] How can I get diagnosed if I can't express myself? I have been seeing specialists about my mental health for a while, I am not good at all at talking about myself and expressing my feelings. I have been feeling like the progress isn't what it should be, I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder (I feel like that is a relatively easy diagnosis.) I feel like there is something more tough. If i bring up autism during one of my sessions, is there some kind of test? Or is it only depending on the way you handle yourself with the person that's evaluating you? thank you for your time. :) [info] None [info] 1564615839
loves_to_shoot [info] Normal to feel very calm/relaxed almost in a meditative state while on low carb/keto? I just started transitioning over to a low carb diet a few days ago and have increased my fat intake significantly. I've noticed that almost nothing can upset me, I have almost no negative thoughts, I feel less wound up and restless, and I feel very clam throughout the day.To put things into perspective I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD and this low carb high fat diet is working EXTREMELY well so far. I wish I would of learned about this sooner.My main sources of fat (in case anyone is wondering) are coconut oil (3 table spoons a day), extra virgin olive oil (probably about 500 calories worth), and about 16oz of nuts/seeds (probably around 700 calories worth). I want to start adding in avocado eventually as well as I love them. Anyone have any thoughts or similar experiences? [info] None [info] 1459121572
MagicHobbes [info] I don't mean to hijack the top comment but I sort of need help myself. I know for a fact I don't have insomnia. I've been diagnosed with anxiety but my lack of sleep goes past that.I spend a lot of time in front of a screen. It's the just the way my life works at the moment with work, school, and free time. I enjoy it, I love computers and I like spending time doing things I enjoy but my lack of sleep is really bothering me more and more.The problem is I've tried different methods (like turning everything off early, taking melatonin, etc.) but nothing seems to work consistently or for long enough. /r/asmr does work sometimes but it's not nearly consistent enough to rely on.I feel like there's nothing I can do to fix my sleep patterns. I'm simply thinking about way too much if I'm just lying there and I get stressed out and NEED to watch a video or something to help me fall asleep. I don't spend all of my time on my computer by any means (and I absolutely love hanging out in the real world with people I care about) but it is both good work and a really important hobby to me so I can't just give up electronics completely.I just don't know what to call my problems and I don't know what I have. I guess I'm just wondering if you have any advice? Sorry for the super long comment.**TL;DR:** I just am thinking about too much if I'm simply lying in bed with nothing happening. It's like I NEED to distract my brain to trick it into sleep. /r/asmr has been the best method but I need a way to get consistent with my sleep schedule. [info] None [info] 1394522336
Poppy-dot [info] DAE feel like they’re faking mental illness? I was diagnosed with anxiety but I still worry about if I’m faking it and just don’t know lol. [info] None [info] 1581994655
koeingtony [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety while in the navy. Afterwards I saw some articles online that really clicked for me and my inability to care for myself like a normal adult, and they were all about adhd! So once I was out of the navy I went to an adhd doc who specializes in adult diagnosis. He gave me a sheet and had me and my mom fill it out, and then interviewed me. He agreed that my symptoms indicated a combo of adhd and anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1527627043
wallflowerintherye [info] Anyone have high functioning anxiety? My studies and work are my life. And since I was diagnosed with anxiety, it's become even more pronounced. I have to work. All the time. I have to take on more, do more, and nothing is ever enough becuase I'm always thinking about how someone else is doing more. They'll get the better job, the better masters program. I can't get over feeling like I'm never enough in the professional space. And it's counter intuitive because the anxiety exhausts me so much that I can't really dive into the work I've taken up. [info] None [info] 1534434110
an_account-1234 [info] Haven't been doing good lately, feel scared Hello all, I'm not good at writing stuff up really, especially when it's about myself, but I'll try my best. Please forgive me if things aren't ordered right or are otherwise incoherent (I'm most worried about forgetting a detail, I always do that). I've always had trouble with paranoia and delusions (I've had many times where I've been convinced I can read minds when I was a teenager and beyond, among other things), but they've been getting worse lately. Stronger, scarier, and harder to break free from them. Just a couple nights ago, after picking up some food, I thought someone who was turning a corner at the same time i was turning out of a parking lot was someone sent to follow me, choosing that night because I couldn't drive fast (because it was raining hard), and the only thing on my mind for a while was "DEMONS CAN DRIVE" over and over again. A few nights before that, when I saw a flashing red left turn arrow, I thought aliens were using it to try to enter my mind, which was why it was flashing. That was the most stressful red light I've ever been at, I almost considered gunning through the red, luckily it changed before that.My hallucinations have always been pretty minor, and although that hasn't really changed (mostly auditory and mostly, like, machine noises) they've become more frequent. I'm genuinely surprised when I hear my phone vibrate and it actually did nowadays, and yesterday I heard the beeping sound the mailman's mail scanner thing makes but when I went to check he hadn't been to my house yet, and he wasn't even in my neighborhood yet as far as I could tell (which then triggered delusions about what that beep actually was). I hear voices sometimes, but they're all internal so I don't know if they're hallucinations. I can also suppress them, which takes them from being loud and scary, to being an annoying buzz that makes it even harder to think, so I don't think that's a permanent solution. Tactile, I sometimes feel like I'm being grabbed, or like bugs are on me or in me. In terms of visual hallucinations, nothing major, just seeing things move or change size (oftentimes like breathing almost). I sometimes think I see things in the dark but I'm not sure if it's just delusions. Still, it's causing a lot of self doubt and fear when anything happens which has sucked. My thinking has grown increasingly scattered, it's getting harder and harder to focus on things that are happening to me, and my train of thought is like, jumping around more frequently. I can look at a sentence and not even understand that's its one connected idea, I have to strain to be able to read it, let alone process it. My memory has gotten worse lately, too. My memory has always been fairly unreliable but it's getting harder to tell which memories are real or not. For example, having to remind myself that a dream I had just 2 nights ago really was a dream, because if I don't it gets added to my memories (and although it wasn't necessarily a nightmare, it wasn't a good dream either, and it's pretty distressing anyways not being able to trust your memory).Most things haven't been giving me the same pleasure they used to lately, like I can still laugh and be happy but it doesn't feel the same? I'm not even totally sure how to describe it really. It like, almost doesn't feel real. It's as if I'm disconnected without dissociating.I have been diagnosed with anxiety, and I'm scared that I'm making things up or something (although I'm MUCH more scared of faking it than I am of actually having schizophrenia, my best friend has schizophrenia and they've helped with my perception of it a LOT). I just turned 21 yesterday if that's relevant. I know you all aren't doctors or anything and that I need to talk to one (which I will as soon as my appointment happens....) but I'd just like some advice, or how you all view what I've said. Also, if you have any questions I'm open to answering them. [info] None [info] 1481971453
poppy1996 [info] I was just diagnosed with anxiety disorder. I finally felt comfortable talking about it with my doctor and since starting medication, I feel amazing. But for a long time I just had so much anxiety because I expected everyone to act like my nmother. Now I’ve realized that’s the minority, and most people I come in contact with are great. Just know it does get better ❤️ [info] None [info] 1568463668
natablee [info] Waking up from nightmares and sleep walking with panic attacks. Any advice? I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic when I was around 12. I'm in my early 20s and still sleep walk, but not near as often as when I was younger. Maybe once or so a month now. When I sleepwalk or have nightmares I almost always wake up to a panic attack. Sometimes I'll just wake up with one in the middle of the night without anything causing it. My dad is the same way, but his only happen once or twice a year.Falling asleep is hard because of it. The last few years I've had to watch old reruns or have some type of background noise to put me to sleep. I usually have a 2 hour timer on my phone to turn it off. It's not playing when I have the panic attacks so I don't think that's causing them.I have made a lot of progress with my panic over the last few months. The right med combo and therapy has helped me not have a full panic attack during the day for 3 months now. I do still have anxiety, but I haven't been hyperventilating or anything lately. I've noticed over the last few months that I'm panicking more in my sleep than normal. Could me not panicking during the day cause me to panic more in my sleep? It's getting to the point where I dread going to sleep because I know what's coming and I'm not sure what else I can do. I'm using the techniques from my therapist and taking my meds every day, but it just feels like I've traded one problem for another. If anyone has experience with this, what are some things I can try? [info] None [info] 1582922487
HaxusPrime [info] Hake taken Wellbutrin/Bupropione for 3 days So I haven't been diagnosed as ADHD yet but will next appointment. I had to fill out a questionaire in order for me to be diagnosed. So I was diagnosed with anxiety and prescribed wellbutrin. The wellbutrin has helped with anxiety, hyperactivity and focus. However, I feel like a zombie on this stuff. I feel tired and don't have the increase in motivation that I think adderall might give me. Due to me feeling and becoming a zombie. My dad literally said I was a ghost or zombie when I took it. I was initially surprised that wellbutrin would help adhd symptoms because I never even heard of it nor it isnt officially an adhd medication. However, it is designed to work on the same exact neurotransmitters as adderall! Norepinephrine and Dopamine! Also, studies show that wellbutrin works just as well as adderall for adult adhd! I was excited when I heard this.At the end of the day though I don't want to feel like a zombie and feel tired yet not feel the need to actually sleep. So I stopped it 4th day in. I believe from my results, adderall will be a better alternative giving me all wellbutrins benefits plus giving me the awake feeling that wellbutrin doesn't give me. [info] None [info] 1526773124
brittybat [info] I feel like this a lot. I feel really calm most of the time, but I'm also at home most of the time, and not much makes me anxious when I'm at home in my comfy bed. But I've been diagnosed with anxiety by two doctors (just my regular primary care doctors) when I went in for unrelated issues and put on medication for anxiety.Also my boyfriend seems to think my anxiety isn't that bad for me to be on medication for it. But also I feel the most relaxed when I'm with him and he's never really seen me in the situations I get anxious in. But does make me second guess myself, my diagnoses, wonder if the doctors are just pushing medications. [info] None [info] 1556174116
sexualcatperson [info] I think I can help! If nothing else, I can let you know you are not alone. I was diagnosed with anxiety a couple of years ago and it mostly only shows itself when I am in some kind of social situation.I've seen things most of my life. Shadows mostly but it has progressed as I have aged. I know what I am "seeing" is not always there. Your mind plays tricks and sometimes shadows are a product of our brain trying to focus on something else.What I have noticed is when I see things that probably aren't there, I have been having anxiety issues that day or am stressed about something that is going to happen the next day. I also have some question of whether what I am seeing is really there or not. I have also found that when I am alone, I often hear footsteps or breathing and then think something is there. I will then see a shadow of something. That is anxiety.However, when I truly see things, there is NO question that something is there. I can sense and see it clearly. Others can sense it along with me. My cat gets upset or a million other things that can show you are not alone in this and it's not in your head.Either way, you should talk to your health care professional because it could be a side effect of whatever drug you may be on. I have found that most doctors are at least willing to humor you. Talking to my psychologist helped me determine that even if I am crazy, what I am seeing is not from my anxiety. [info] The truth is out there [info] 1421479954
Defiant-Homework [info] Just a dry throat, or something more? For the past two-ish weeks I’ve had a dry throat. It’s not painful or sore, just dry.Because I’m a massive hypochondriac, my immediate thought was «It’s HIV. My life is over.»I’m a 20 year old woman, I weigh about 56 kg, and I’m 1.71 in height. I take no medications, but I was diagnosed with anxiety many years back. I have smoked earlier, but quit a few weeks ago. I have never been in contact with used needles either.So I googled HIV symptoms last night, and I have no other symptoms except for the throat. I have only slept with one person my entire life, and that’s my SO. He’s been in multiple relationships and told me in the start of our relationship that he’s been tested, and that the test was negative.So I’m wondering what else could cause my dry throat? I live in a colder climate, so I keep thinking it might just be the cold and dry winter air. My mouth feels dry a lot too. When I breathe through my nose, I feel the spot back in my throat becoming more dry. I cough and sneeze occasionally, and my nose is sometimes runny. I’ve struggled with some acid reflux lately as well. I don’t feel sick though, or fatigued. Except for these things, I feel pretty upbeat and well.Thanks in advance. If it doesn’t pass in a week, I’ll make an appointment with my doctor. [info] This user has not yet been verified. [info] 1580296411
FitzMurkz [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and quite often find myself overthinking and becoming upset over seemingly miniscule situations. The comments I get often are actually from friends who say things like "don't worry" "get over it" etc etc. Despite their knowledge of my diagnosis, no one seems to understand that when you black out, you can't just stop worrying and you can't just get over it. Another huge one is 'stop thinking about it.'I find people fail to realize that with mental illness comes a lack of control. Anxiety literally takes control of your thoughts and you can't stop it. [info] None [info] 1483656848
RobotCasual23 [info] Smoking Weed While pregnant I'm 23. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 15. Since then, I have been to many doctors trying to find the right meds to help me. I always have allergic or violent reactions to anything they have given me. When I was 20, I moved to California where they gave me a medical license to smoke marijuana. It was amazing. After 2 months of regularly smoking, I was no longer having anxiety except a handful of moments a week. I continued seeing a doctor once a week to make sure I didn't start falling again and that it was going well. Last month I found out that I'm pregnant. I stopped smoking. Here's my issue: My anxiety is back and there isn't any medication I can take to help. I've also been to the ER 3 times this past week for morning sickness and was diagnosed with Hyperemesis Gravidarum. Extremely violent morning sickness. Both my OBGYN and my psych doctor want me to start smoking again. They told me there isn't strong enough evidence to say that weed causes problems in pregnancy. And that alot of the studies are null and void bc the women who partake in these studies also smoke cigs or drink alcohol and that is not my case. I know what everyone says "If it solves your anxiety and your hyperemesis gravidarum and you have actual doctors telling you it's okay, then you should." My OBGYN said that I can actually be the cause of a miscarriage by NOT smoking bc my anxiety gets so out of hand. I fear for my baby on both ends. If I smoke, that may harm my child and it's growth and if I don't, that may cause my child to be malnourished and/or die from my extreme anxiety. I don't want to see any comments about meds that work for your anxiety or your personal opinions on weed. I've been working with my doctors for years. I'm just stuck between trusting my doctors on this and trusting results. If you have any personal experiences with weed and pregnancy, that's what I'd like to hear. [info] None [info] 1586720062
Tho3v [info] Am I stupid? I will start with a background of myself and explain myself as a person. -I grew up as a foreigner in Saudi Arabia, and graduated from an American school there. My father paid lots of money for me to graduate from here, but I chose to go study in Russia despite his wishes for me to study in a rich Anglophone country, because I wanted to experience something different. I also did not want my dad to spend so much money on me, because university in countries like USA and Canada are damn expensive and I am not sure my dad can cover the tuition fees without me going into debt. -My father was not very encouragung and I grew up being afraid of looking stupid in front of him, and this makes me unconsciously do very stupid things. I can forget where I put things very fast and have a habit of losing things.  -I was diagnosed with anxiety and ADD but I dont believe that ADD is real. I do have focus issues but it can be resolved by studying in a quiet library. The only real issue is that I think slow and process information slowly. I make the stupidest mistakes. I cannot function properly when someone is being imperative and asks me to do something. For example, my dad gave me his glasses and said something like "wear it on your neck" and I was literally so confused that I was putting it on my neck like how someone puts their glasses on, it took me a couple seconds to realise he meant that I should hang it upon my shirt. Of course my dad cusses me out for stupidity every chance he gets. This has made me so insecure that I do act like a complete dumbass when meeting his friends when they come over. I am 19 and am terrible at socializing. I have a bad sense of humor too. I have long term goals and I do work on them. Just a year ago I felt I was smart, but with every passing day I feel like a dumbass. -I sometimes believe in God and sometimes I don't.-I have already completed a year of uni in a Russia, and right now I am spending the summer with my parents in my home country. I had friends in Russia but I have no one here. It is too hot and dirty to go outside and I spend my days learning Russian at home. -The only thing I am talented in is biology, languages and art. I speak 4 languages, but so can many people. I suck at maths and am bad at socializing but I do have a girlfriend who is a lot like me. So please tell me honestly, am I stupid?Update: Thank you for your beautiful replies. It has been a big help and I am going to take my diagnosis more seriously. I have spoken with my dad and he is being supportive. [info] None [info] 1564254208
KayRayK [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and high blood pressure within the last year and I have had to learn a lot about myself and how to improve myself mentally and physically.  [info] None [info] 1427338577
CrowWithARose [info] Depression, Anxiety, Bipolar? 24 Year Old  Caucasion Female, 5'2, 150 lbsDuration  ~ 2 monthsCurrently taking birth control and thyroid medication (levothyroxine 50MG)WAS taking anxiety medication (Zoloft 50MG) (Not anymore because my doctor left, didn't tell me and no one knows where she now works)I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was around 14. I've been anxious since I was around 5, or at least that's my earliest memory of it. I was always just labeled as shy until I actually brought it up at an appointment when I was 14 (er, well, my mom did)I'm going to the doctor again, but I'm not really sure what I should say or ask.I'm afraid of getting a wrong diagnosis. I'm NOT using this as a diagnosis, I just want to have an idea before I go.Ok, I've been feeling...bad? Not all the time, just about 60% of the time I'd say.It did start somewhat before I had to stop taking my anxiety medication. It has gotten significantly worse thought. I stopped taking it about a month ago. My symptoms include:*Aching-  (kinda like I'm sore) all over*Fatigue - (I could sleep 12 hours and still be exhausted)*Distracted - I start on one thing and get bored or just start doing something else without even really thinking about it*I get a depressed feeling - I don't want to do anything, I feel bad about myself, I feel like I'm not doing enough, Wonder why I'm even trying, Don't want to get up, Hopless *Easily irritated - It's like small things can make me annoyed but things that should make me angry don't bother me as much*Anxiety - Usually a "shaking" feeling inside (I'm not sure how to describe it), trouble breathing, heart racing, racing thoughts, fidgiting *OCD type patters - Counting to 3 before I allow myself to do things, touching random things as I pass, moving objects - all so something "bad" doesn't happen.I feel shitty now that I've actually typed everything and I see all the things wrong with me. I have a very stressful job and I feel like it may have brought this on.Please help. I'd really appreciate it. I haven't told anyone so I'd like anonymous input, as weird as that is. I just don't want my loved ones to know how bad I am mentally right now. I also want to know what to expect. I'm obviously very nervous and don't want to get hit hard by what the doctor may say. [info] None [info] 1542176372
ShakerEdge [info] Nightmares triggered by singular words or phrases? (To preface:I was diagnosed with anxiety due to CPTSD, and a higher than average paranoid personality. So I'm not sure if these dreams stem from CPTSD or Paranoia? Maybe both?)I'm just mildly curious if anyone else has  nightmares like, nightly?Every time I go to sleep I'm basically almost always in for some sort of uncomfortable nightmare.Some are more simply based on experiences:- re-living endless bullying in school- nightmares about being yelled at by my mom- death of family member (trying to keep my great grandmother alive by covering holes in her ventilation tubes. even though I didn't actually see her when she was on the ventilator IRL)Most are a bit more strange:- Dreams of being kidnapped, tortured, abused, pursued- Almost always I am a "fictional self-insert kind of character"And some arise solely out of hearing singular words or phrases in casual conversation:- I watched the funny video of the guy reading all the various misspellings of "pregnant" (pragnat, prefant etc.) Its a FUNNY video. But my subconscious decided to use the phrase "pregnant" in a nightmare where I (as an aromantic, asexual person) had to pretend i got some girl pregnant because she was lying to her family about it but I didn't? And i was really uncomfortable lying to these fictional dream people about it because it's just something that I would never do???Or- my college professor going over my safety training said: "we keep this door locked, but propped open. That way if there is an active shooter, anyone in the area of the building can shut the door behind them and stay safe."And my brain proceeded to use that singular phrase to treat me to a school-shooting nightmare of columbine on steroids.Or- Connor, from Detroit Become Human's infamously famous line: "28 stab wounds!"I then had a nightmare that the only way I could save a child from their abusive home was to kill them by repeatedly stabbing them in the chest while they slept.These latter instances, I have never actually experienced. Yet my subconscious seems to cling to the strangest of singular words or phrases to use as nightmare fuel the following night.Does anyone know if this is more a CPTSD thing, or perhaps more a paranoia thing?I also don't watch Horror movies, and actively have to avoid gore in media because I know my nightmares would just be so much worse for it.My nightmares range from highly realistic to fully fictional scenarios. I write them down daily and have for years. I've got at least 30 of them documented in pretty high detail.It fascinates me, but also kind of worries me a little since everyone ends I talk to seems shocked and horrified by the content when I share my dreams with them. [info] None [info] 1586874953
OW2000 [info] I went to CBT also when I was diagnosed with anxiety. It seemed like just having someone to talk to about things really helped a lot. I had basically hit rock bottom before I decided that something was wrong and I needed help. [info] None [info] 1573067238
cheekyuptowngirl [info] Thank you soooo much!!!! I just had my LO on 7/23....but I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder, panic disorder and major depressive disorder. I have been on so many meds and combinations of meds and we finally found one that worked. Then I got pregnant....I wanted to do the right thing and stop taking my meds and was advised by the psychiatrist on how to ween off of them. Well, I ended up going through withdrawl during my first tri and was in the hospital to get IV fluids because I was so dehydrated.  It was decided in concert between three different Dr's that I would stay on my meds as the benefits outweighed the risks for me.  I got a bunch of unwanted flack from people about continuing my meds and that I was hurting my child. It made me angry...I should have kept it to myself, but I wear my heart on my sleeve.  You are so brave.....you are empowering other women who are pregnant or may become pregnant by letting them know that it's ok to get depressed, it's ok to ask for help and it's ok to take the meds if the benefits outweigh the risks! Thank you, thank you, thank you!  [info] ~*Ruby Fae 7/23/15*~ [info] 1439680331
ramonetothebone [info] help me get rid of this I'm a 17 year old male. I was diagnosed with GERD when I was 11, not long after I was diagnosed with anxiety. At first I took prilosec and other random pills that pharmaceutical companies probably pushed my doctors into giving me, and I realized they didn't work so I stopped taking them. My stomach always hurts and adds to my anxiety, and it makes everyday life more stressful than it has to be. I'm going to cut out chocolate and spicy foods out of my diet, and significantly cut out meat. I'm going to start exercising. I want to do anything to murder my acid reflux. Any tips for certain things i could do would be appreciated. Just tell me how to start and maintain this new lifestyle. I'm not looking for moral support, I'm skinny and tall so just tell me stuff about diet and exercising. [info] None [info] 1562718638
srqnewbie [info] Agree!  My only documentation for my anxiety was the doctor visit recaps for the past 5 years (they pulled it up for me at the doc office, no appointment necessary) that basically just state your vitals and any meds you're on.  Nothing I gave DocMJ stated WHY or WHEN I was diagnosed with anxiety, just that my doc was continuing the anxiety med prescription I've been on forever.  I saw Dr. Glider at DocMJ in Bradenton and was in and out in 2 hot seconds.  Good luck and I agree that their refund policy is the only way to go on the off chance that you don't get approved. [info] None [info] 1568043503
newham99000 [info] Introverted/socially anxious person with ADD or aspergers? I have been diagnosed with anxiety and ADD, and I am naturally introverted meaning I am somewhat socially awkward and socially anxious, due to lack of social experience.However, social anxiety + ADD symptoms almost match Aspergers symptoms.Where is the line drawn between these two? Could I possibly have undiagnosed Aspergers? Help would be appreciated as I have been pretty depressed thinking about this lately. [info] None [info] 1461048336
YourBoinLoins [info] Yeah it started as getting turnt once in a while, then I started selling, then it turned into self medicating because I was diagnosed with anxiety but the Lexapro they put me on didn't help at all. Now I stopped selling and just mostly self medicate but I still get pretty fucked up off them once in a while. It's a slippery slope but I think I'm ok for the most part right now. It hasn't effected my job or education so far.Edit: I just realized typing out a paragraph trynna explain and rationalize my use is kinda fiendish... [info] None [info] 1463545599
cant_bust_a_nut [info] [M 23] Can't ejaculate while masturbating I've been having an issue on and off for the past few months where I haven't been able to cum while masturbating. I use to be able to do it every day, but when I wasn't finishing every time (or really struggling to) I cut it down to masturbating every two to three days.I tried masturbating this morning and I could not cum, two days prior I tried (after not masturbating for around two days as well) and I couldn't cum.I think there are two factors I think could be leading to this. -I am diagnosed with anxiety &amp; OCD, and I know I can get in my own head and I'll be trying to achieve orgasm to hard. -I'm not 16 anymore and I can't bust them like I use to. I found myself getting bored of my hand and the porn I watch.The last time I had sex was around 8 months ago. I did not finish then either. That's when my anxiety was a lot worse and I totally psyched myself out. (plus the girl didn't smell that clean, if you know what I mean)So I guess my question is, "How can I start cumming again?"I've been thinking of buying a flesh light or something else that can help me cum faster. That's kinda going back to the rushing thing. I use to be able to cum in 5-10 minutes when I was younger, now when I can cum it tales around 30-45 minutes and sometimes even an hour! I love jacking off as much as the next guy but I want it to be quick.I hope this opens up for discussion and let me know if any of you have some insight on my problem or know any solutions! Thank you! [info] None [info] 1465140984
GorillazFanGirl [info] Constant Anxiety Attacks I've been diagnosed with anxiety for almost a year now. I've been getting more anxiety attacks lately and the things that helped me calm down no longer help me. I've even tried new things and nothing seems to help. If anyone knows something that can stop or calm an attack could you tell me. [info] None [info] 1498851774
808snhrttbrkk [info] 20 years old and afraid Before I start I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder at 14 and have had hypochondriac anxiety issues for a few years now I don’t take any meds. I’ve been having some issues with the fear that I might have colon cancer. Earlier this year I began having weird pains in my chest and side and back which caused me to believe I had heart issues. I went to the emergency 3 times a week for 3 weeks and called the ambulance plenty of times. I received an entire set of blood test CBC, full pallet counts chest x rays the works. They told me they thought it was anxiety and said I was completely fine. Well i went to Vegas for a weekend for a concert but before I left I noticed I was a little nauseas. But never minded it. Well like 2nd day into the trip I got diahhrea not too much nausea but I had diahhrea. So I come home feeling fine just had diahhrea. I then became ill and was throwing up all day with a stomach ache and nausea. But my family had all experienced this during the trip so I kinda tried to keep that in mind. Well for the past few days I feel like a dull pain on my left abdomen it kinda aches then goes away and I’ve been really gassy with bad gas. I’ve noticed tho everytime i get anxiety I start to have bowel issues. I’ve noticed for a few years a little blood on the paper but never in stool or never in bowl. I then began feeling fatigue not too much outta breath just feel a little less energetic than i was before . I never noticed any lost of appetite but a few family memebers have said I’ve been thinning out. Not drastically but they said they noticed a small change. I’ve just been down in the dumps about this because I feel death approaching me in way, my family knows I have anxiety and they’re telling me it’s just anxiety it’s just anxiety but I feel like it’s a bit more. I also feel like the goose bumps sensation on my rear at times. And sometimes small little stings and pains around the hole and sometimes in my cheeks like deep in the tissues. Any one experienced this feeling. I’m 20 years old overweight male. I would assume if something was truly wrong they would’ve found something in my blood a few months back. Agree ? I never had Black stool , never really had constipation but my stool will vary from days sometimes it’ll be mushy and watery other days full and solid. Also my farts really smell badly like rotten but Its kinda always been that way and I have fart breath at times. Like I could brush crazy for an hour and my breath would be cool for a few min then boom back to bad breath. Could this be my anxiety ? I would figure that this pain would last and not come and go. I’m setting up a doctors app this week to talk further detail. I will ask for colonoscopy even tho they might to approve I’d rather be safe than sorry. But the pain isn’t bad at all and happens only on occasion . If you google colon cancer the picture pops out of a dude holding his stomach and the colon has a bright indication of where the cancer is . That’s where I feel my pain it’s very sudden and very short lasting. It doesn’t interfere with my daily life it could be described as a dull pain. Also dr google stays messing me up but I can’t help to google everytime i feel a symptom ya know. [info] None [info] 1573688042
ZoeZoemomo [info] Am I paranoid? So my dad has paranoia. He convinces himself that every girlfriend he has cheats on him and every ex he has stalks him and wants to hurt him. I've been diagnosed with an anxiety disorder but I'm starting to wonder if the diagnosis is correct. I don't think I'd have the same kind of as my father, I'm not even sure its hereditary. I have a boyfriend I've been with for over three years now and never had I had issues worrying he's cheated on me or anything.But the things I struggle with are  things like I'm afraid people are going to hurt me or I'm worried mythical creatures exist and I might see them or something. I don't hallucinate but sometimes I hear sounds and I convince myself its something bad. I think that the average person might hear a scary story and think about it at night every now and then or maybe once but when I hear something I think about it all the time. It haunts me and its always there. I can't really say I'm afraid of just the dark or loneliness because I'm scared all the time.If I'm not distracted enough I'll begin to think something outrageous like "What if that thing I read about in Greek Mythology two years ago actually exist and comes to get me tonight?" or *sounds of house settling* "It HAS to be a ghost! The house cant possibly settle that much or be THAT loud!"These aren't my only issues because the ones I described when I was diagnosed with anxiety were the tactics I used when I'm out in public. I'm worried strangers will hurt me so I often do things to avoid people like if someone is walking behind me on the same sidewalk I'll cross the street and if they follow they must be trying to stab me or something. Sometimes I look at the reflections on housing/ building's windows as a way to always know where every stranger is at all times rather behind me or around a corner.I hate being scared and constantly worrying but I seem to have an addiction into looking up things I'm scared about which I don't understand. If I'm so scared of irrational things like monsters then why would I look up stories about monsters? Opinions? Thoughts? [info] None [info] 1434727074
SpanIchabod [info] YOU DID WHAT?! (Part 1) *First post, and on mobile so I apologise for formatting errors*This is going to be a little bit long, so I'm going to split it up into parts. The first part won't have the bad people in it, it's mainly to set the scene.When I was 16, I was diagnosed with anxiety after a particularly nasty panic attack. I received a therapy session every fortnight for almost a year, medication to level me out, and for when it got a bit rough as I was older, Valium. The catch 22 on the Valium being that I only ever had it with me when I was at home, where I was comfortable in my surroundings, so there was no need for me to ever take it. After about 2 years of dealing with "My Condition" as my therapist called it, I decided that I wasn't going to let anxiety and pharmaceuticals run my life, so I decided to stop using the medication with guidance from my doctor, which was basically to exercise and eat better food. So I joined a gym and decided to better myself. Now this could be the ending of the story, but I wouldn't be posting it here if it was.I joined a small gym near me, run by a guy we will call Jim (original, I know). Jim was an ex-soldier in his 40's who still worked out like he was in his 20's, the guy looked like he could punch a hole through you if he wanted. Funnily enough, he is one of the most caring people I have ever met. After a month, Jim noticed when I was working out, if the crowd was in one end of the gym, I was at the other end, out of the way of everyone else. One night he invited me into his office and asked what the deal was.  I told him about my anxiety, how I was trying to kick the meds, and how I figured exercise would help me stay balanced and not freak out in public, as I was used to doing. He totally understood, and said if I felt like I was going to lose it, I could let myself into his office to calm down, and when he could, he would come over and help me train. He also promised never  to speak a word of it to anyone, unless I gave permission. The man was an absolute saint.This arrangement worked out well for me, I was really enjoying going to the gym, and I was seeing a lot of progress. And everything seemed great. I was putting myself into social situations more, and leaving the house more often. [info] None [info] 1421155754
claireylouise [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety by an actual physician. [info] None [info] 1572468575
ExcitingPanic [info] I'm not exactly sure why I am depressed. I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago and it's definitely more under control than it used to be, I suppose maybe one reason could be I'm studying on a demanding course, but I still feel these emotions even during the summer holidays. Other than that, I have a very nice life, good family and friends, I should be more grateful for that [info] None [info] 1562515007
calebinator42 [info] As a kid, I went to a really religious school. That shit fucked me up. They refused to teach me science (this was lower school so it didn't matter too much, I had my first science lesson age 9 at my middle school) and were very strict. Apparently I used to preach to my family about jesus when I got home.My life started to go downhill age 6. I was diagnosed with anxiety, I was getting bullied, I hated school, I started to realise I had a crush on a girl (I was female at the time) as well as thinking that I was a boy. I prayed so hard to god every single day, and he didn't do shit for me. As I grew up, around 10/11, I gave up on faith. I felt betrayed. My cat ran away, I became depressed because of my brain and bullying, I tried to kill myself, I felt so lost and alone. God was never there for me when I needed him to be, so I soon came to the conclusion that there was no God.Today, I still don't believe. I researched and came to the conclusion that there was no evidence of God, rather than just being an atheist out of spite. If I were to believe in God, it'd be via Judaism, as that's my family's religion (I was taught Christianity at school though). I respect everyone's beliefs, but religion is not for me and it makes me uncomfortable. When people are super religious and blindly make statements about God's power and grace, it makes me uncomfortable. Religion feels like a gross cult scam to me, and I personally think that people raised in religions, especially children, are brainwashed. But hey, that's just me. [info] None [info] 1566861791
Lavender_macaron [info] Definitely go see a professional. Mental illness still has a terrible stigma so if you even suggest it to an Asian parent, they will probably just scream, "No you're not depressed! You're just lazy!" It's like they think that if you ignore it and deny it exists, it'll go away on it's own. When I was diagnosed with anxiety and given antidepressants my mom's first words were "Don't kill yourself okay?" Gee...thanks for the support. [info] None [info] 1455744290
IThinkThingsThrough [info] Ugh, this is always my dilemma. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I know that catastrophic thinking is a symptom of it. That makes it really hard to distinguish between "Anxiety-driven hypochondria" and "important alarm bell I'm ignoring."  [info] None [info] 1552179705
zosiaaaa [info] How to get diagnosed I have been diagnosed with anxiety and some neurotic disorders a year ago. I started a relationship just a month or two before my diagnose. He totally wrecked me. I have had suicide thought for last few months because of him and the things I have done that I didn't really understood. I stared looking online what was wrong because my therapist just said to meditate and when I told her that I was sexually abused for the second time she just said that I should stop drinking at a parties so I don't really trust her anymore. I started reading about BPD and I thought it was it. Mood changing, my mind being separated into two all the things. My therapy said that it is very likely but as I am only 18 my mind is still developing and we can't be sure. I am pretty certain that this is it and I want really bad to start working on it  or just be sure what is going on with me. Should I see a psychiatrist or a doctor? Or maybe my therapist is right? [info] None [info] 1564929426
kjm7 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety but I infrequently have panic attacks. When I do have one though it's generally right when I wake up. Pretty shitty way to start the day.  [info] None [info] 1423861688
aregularwaterbottle [info] Yeah, I have been diagnosed with anxiety too.  I've been to a couple therapy sessions but they weren't so helpful. I'm quite durable, so generally, I can maintain my anxiety quite well on my own. It's only in social situations that I start to feel really self-conscious and shitty about my anxiety. I've considered medication in the past, but there's still that stigma attached to it that I'm wary of. I don't know if they will actually help me in the way they ought too.  [info] None [info] 1525612478
Seandonjuan [info] I really have nobody to talk to about this situation so I feel like I can get some understanding here. Hello! I started therapy and psychiatrist sessions around November 2018 (3 months ago). My therapist is also my psychiatrist. I personally feel like he has NO idea what he’s doing. Is this normal, or pessimistic thinking? I feel like a lab rat and I can’t even hold a conversation with the guy. He doesn’t even try to talk to me or assist me in breaking me out of my shell during sessions. I said I had an issue with something personal and he literally stated “ see, I don’t have that issue.” WTF??? I felt completely disrespected. He doesn’t engage any conversation, and when he does it’s just about himself... is this what therapy is? Because if it is, it’s definitely not helping. I’ve explained to him the traumatic experiences in my life and the stress I deal with on a daily basis and all I hear from him is “okay we will up your dosage.” Their office is completely disorganized with scheduling on top of this all. I was forced to pay $75 for an appointment I never scheduled. Going to him has literally caused more anxiety and stress than before. I was diagnosed with anxiety but that’s it. The medicine he prescribed made me break out into hives. He won’t return my calls. WHAT DO I DO? I’m honestly losing all trust for anyone in the medical field at this point. [info] None [info] 1550627927
HexManiacLola [info] Despite my sex drive being at an all time low, I feel worthless if I go without having sex for more than two days. I've been really depressed recently, because of multiple things, and as a result I haven't wanted sex for normal reasons for months. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and I've noticed that it flares up significantly if my boyfriend doesn't want to have sex with me at least once every two days. He has a high sex drive but he'll play video games and we won't have much interaction while he's doing that and he plays pretty much everyday for hours. I really haven't been in the mood for anything sexy lately but I feel the need to when there are pauses in our love life. It makes me feel physically ill when I think about it, so I initiate to get rid of that feeling. [info] None [info] 1476340368
Throwaway89086553 [info] I realised how bad my anxiety is getting and I can't do a thing about it I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 16 (17 currently) it's been a year. I was having anxiety attacks but not panic attacks. My best friend had killed himself three months before my diagnosis and my mum blamed it on that. Gcse's happened, I then got like 2 months off school cause that's what happens in England after exams. Mum thought my anxiety was better and to be honest so did I.I then started college. Anxiety attacks again but only in Physical Activity lessons. I signed my self up for councilling and my mother knows none of this. My attacks at home are a night or in my room. She hasn't seen an attack since I left secondary school.Then I was sexually assaulted by a close friend last month. I had my first panic attack. They have been happening often now. I went on an activity camp thing and I got them so often. One day I was crying constantly. I hated it there. I was so scared and stressed and upset about the situation.Then friends tell me they have been hurt by my friend too. I was the worst case but people know about him. I even told my counciller. My attacks are still bad and my friends are trying so hard to help. Nothing works. I just have to cry it out. I'm too self doubting.Christmas holidays. I am still awake at 1 in the morning and that doesn't happen. I'm someone who sleeps at 10/11 and wakes up at 6/7/8. Now I'm going to bed at 1/2 and waking up at the same time.Then my phone gets a notification. Saying how my laptop has connected to my phone. My laptop isn't on and it's downstairs. My immediate conclusion? Someone has robbed my house and turned on my laptop and my phone gets a notification. No joke my brain thought that and I got scared in case I was going to be murdered. My parinoia has always been bad but not like this. I think my friends hate me every other second then I'm fine.My mental health is so bad but my mum knows none of this. I can't tell her cause our relationship is horrible right now. My parents are divorced and my dad lives somewhere else so that's out of the picture.I think I need meds for my anxiety. Councilling helped for a while but now I'm scared to go. I've tried self help but it just doesn't work.I'm so sick of this. I just want help but I can't ask for it or my mum will find out [info] None [info] 1577064272
Michelle_ma_belle16 [info] Ongoing, mild hallucinations related to anxiety I can’t find anything online about this, but I believe I’m experiencing mild hallucinations during anxiety attacks. This has been going on for years. I was diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD, but the hallucinations aren’t related to what I have PTSD from as far as I can remember (childhood abuse).When I’m in high stress and anxiety and I try to go to bed, I can see and feel my flesh being sliced open. If I open my eyes, it moves to my face and cuts open my eyes too. I tried to imagine my boyfriend holding my hand as a comfort, and I watched his hand being sliced open. The only thing that helps is time and touching where I’m being “cut” if it isn’t too severe. No matter how hard I try, I can’t reason myself out of it. It’s terrifying, and I’m not sure what else to do. This has been happening for about three or four years now, and isn’t improving. I’m not getting used to it.Does anyone have any info? Thanks! [info] None [info] 1544512133
meow91meow [info] I feel like no one is taking my anxiety seriously. I have been diagnosed with anxiety for a few years now. I am able to cope with it for the most part. I have my bad days but I can get through it. The past three weeks I have been in a constant state of anxiety. It is understandably higher. But I’m starting to feel exhausted from it. I have tried to talk to my normal support system and I feel like they just think this is my normal everyday anxiety. They tell me that normal everything is going to be okay stuff. And maybe it’s true but I am not okay right now. And I just feel like even after telling people it’s not being taken seriously. [info] None [info] 1585239169
spookybabyy [info] Unsure I do think I have rOCD but haven’t been diagnosed with OCD, although I have been diagnosed with anxiety. I constantly will worry about death and other awful things that are out of my control. I’ve been with my boyfriend for almost a year, 5-6 months long distance and now I live with him. I do love him and I don’t want to break up with him but fairly recently (around 2-3 months ago) I started to obsess over whether or not I loved him, If he was “right” for me all the typical things someone with rOCD deals with. Whenever we get into an argument I immediately think I don’t want to be in the relationship and that it’s just not going to work. I want to stop thinking these things anytime we get into an argument. We’ve never even fought about anything serious it’s always trivial things. I also will get paranoid that theres “red flags” in our relationship but can’t actually tell. If anyone has advice for me I’d love to hear it. sorry for the short novel [info] None [info] 1511266843
vehiclesshockme [info] My mom has some meds that helped a little bit not a whole lot. I feel like my body has just trained itself to wake up whenever I hear her move (her room is next to mine) especially after the incident in March which is where most of my sleeping stopped. It doesn't help that I was diagnosed with anxiety and have been on and off meds for that basically since I was a teenager. [info] None [info] 1558622346
Anxiousant123 [info] My [22/F] boyfriend [22/M], 4 years, is getting fed up with my anxiety. What should I do? My boyfriend (22M) and I (22F) have been together for four years and living together for three. Overall, things have been great but recently I have noticed that my boyfriend, Paul, is becoming frustrated with me. I have been feeling extremely anxious over my university results and am under immense pressure to get high grades in order to get into the post grad program that I want. Yesterday I had an exam (worth 6.75% of my total grade) and it was covering topics that I absolutely struggle with. The night before I was studying and asked if he could explain one of the concepts to me (he has covered the material before in one of his courses). He ignored me for about an hour (he was watching TV) and then when he finally came to help he was really angry. He told me to "shut the fuck up and just listen" when I asked him a question while he was explaining something. Throughout the time he was explaining things to me he said phrases like "don't be such a fucking retard" and "it's so simple, how can you not get it". I told him that I didn't want him to speak to me like that but he was in such a bad mood and was annoyed that I was making a big deal over the exam. He also has a cold (which he got from me) and was unhappy about that. Just as a side point I have been diagnosed with anxiety and feel intense anxiety over every exam. I can understand how it would be draining for him to listen to my fears about failing and my concerns about my future. Anyway, I then studied for a few more hours and got into bed with him around midnight. He was sneezing and not feeling well. I again said how I wished he had been more supportive and didn't talk to me like that. He told me again "to shut the fuck up and to stop going full retard". He also mentioned how he wouldn't be able to drop me off at the exam as he was too sick and I would have to make my own way (takes 2 hrs by public transport and he needed the car later so couldn't use it). The conversation ended, I cried and struggled to sleep.Fast forward to the exam. I know I failed. I couldn't answer most questions, freaked out and have never done so poorly before. I came home and completely fell apart. I went into the bedroom and cried. He told me that other people might hear me and I should be quiet (I wasn't sobbing, just quietly crying into my pillow). I told him that I didn't do well and I felt like the program I was hoping to get into may no longer be an option. He got very frustrated, saying how I was not being logical as the exam was worth so little and that I was "fucking crazy". I could see his points but felt overwhelmed with disappointment and stress, so again repeated how I need to get over a certain mark and how it would be difficult now. He then told me how he wanted to spend time away from me and do his own thing because I was bringing him down. I then spent the night by myself (he was in the other room but we did not interact in any way) and have never felt so alone... I feel like a lot of our relationship issues are caused by my anxiety. Initially he tried to "fix" my problems (eg spending hours explaining how I was being irrational) but last year he gave up and is now being less emotionally supportive. He still tries at times and when he does it is so helpful. Am I being unreasonable expecting him to be encouraging and supportive whenever I get anxious? Am I the cause of these fights? I've seen a therapist previously and did not find it helpful at all, but am considering making an appointment this week. I know that at the very least I need something to help me to stop catastrophising this exam and to manage my anxiety. **tldr** My boyfriend (22M) was rude to me. I (22F) believe that I failed an exam and he is also not being supportive. [info] None [info] 1431733383
dirtyhippyguy [info] anxiety help Hey everyone I've been following a few anxiety subreddits for awhile now and I've been having a rough couple of day, I just want to know if anyone else has had a similar experience and how they dealt with it.  I was diagnosed with anxiety at a young age and it has recently become more of a problem. so in short as ive said ive had a rough couple of days, if I had to boil it down I'm terrified that I'm not going to make anything out of my life, I'm scared I'm going to end up in a dead end job, with no one to love me and be just an over all disappointment to my parents. Today I've been so paralyzed by my anxiety that I couldn't leave my house accept to at least try to get something to drink (nonalcoholic). I'm 24 in my 7th year of undergrad and I'm scared im too dumb to do what i want to. I'm scared I don't know how to be an adult. does anyone else have similar experiences? how did you cope and push past them? [info] None [info] 1539989200
marie1192 [info] Not yet diagnosed with OCD but experiencing intrusive thoughts and I have been diagnosed with anxiety recently. F you OCD/Anxiety. 🙌🏼 [info] None [info] 1547047247
ClovisBlack [info] For a bit more context, I used to be considered a gifted student, but I've struggled monumentally with school as I've gotten into my teen years. I've been agonizing over being told by adults that if I don't pull it together, I'll be stuck working jobs that won't satisfy me. I've been slowly and sadly accepting the fact that I may not graduate with grades that qualify me for a college education.There's absolutely nothing wrong with non college requiring jobs, but I've had dreams of being a psychotherapist ever since I was diagnosed with anxiety :) this is a huge deal to me. I thought I'd bomb the test.  [info] Glad [info] 1547097267
ariel529 [info] Hey how's it going. Hopefully it's not too late to add to this post, it took me a while to finally work up the nerve. I was diagnosed with anxiety &amp; ptsd as well. I live in katy but I'm here if you want to talk/vent, I'm free most days.  [info] Katy [info] 1432678237
acajacks [info] I'm 21 and was forced to be diagnosed (I was smoking weed about eight times a day by myself, totally unaware that the benefits eg: I GOT TO CLASS ON TIME!!! in focus I received was in all actuality self-medication... my parents forced a legal alternative) my sophomore year of college. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder as well as an IQ of 140. I'm now a senior, I have a job, off-campus, and a puppy (for stress-relief/exercise/forces-a-schedule... MY NONDRUG MEDICATION!).Soooo I was forced with a diagnosis, placed on a stimulant, and set out into the world; apparently ready and treated, now able to solve my own problems.If I knew how to do better at doing what I know, I'd totally be doing exactly that. Running across this last night was the first time I've actually felt like someone really got what my problem was, and he finally explained for me the recursive essence in a parent proposing that the kid with ADD should go and find their own help, in order to learn to be a responsible problem-solving adult. I had never understood why self-help books didn't help me, given that I had read it cover to cover about my EXACT problem... and nothing changed, nothing was helped. That I can't seem to get help on my own creates this strange issue between my mom and myself in that, to her, it really must mean that I'm lazy, yet I know I'm not. [info] None [info] 1354590555
SheepHarem [info] Yeah, go ask your GP about it, they should refer you to the local mental health services. If they do a phone interview, be careful what you say. I was diagnosed with anxiety because they decided to do my phone interview the day before my exam :)))) Didn't even get to see a psychologist.Also, if anyone knows how to get a second opinion about mental health stuff that'd be real nice. [info] None [info] 1499407548
Redsebir [info] I wasn't diagnosed with PTSD. I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1443206009
notsoimportant1010 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 9 or so. This year I’ve noticed it’s been very bad. I’ve had just anxiousness all the time and I had my first BAD panic attack yesterday.  [info] None [info] 1543620696
nsngww [info] It's terrible to hear that your psychiatrist isn't taking you seriously. Before I was diagnosed with OCD I was diagnosed with anxiety, and major depressive disorder, when I finally got that diagnosis of OCD it finally felt like someone understood me and could put a name to how I was feeling. Hopefully you will be able to get your psychiatrist to believe you and you can feel the relief of a diagnosis. I'm really hoping for you! [info] None [info] 1554778228
fuckingconor [info] Hoping to find some answers: therapy didn’t work The reason I am reaching out for help here is because I have heard Reddit is a good way to get lots of peoples opinions. I also fear that my anxiety will exclude me from many social events in the future as it has done in that past and lead to more problems developing.Background: I am 18 years old, male, 5 foot 4 from the UK and I go to university. I have had one girlfriend for over 1 year now. I have a group of around 10 friends with 2 that I am a lot closer with. I come from a nice household with no immediate problems. I live both at my house and my girlfriend’s house as we live close to each other and always sleep in the same bed at night.I had “self-diagnosed” anxiety from the age of 15 and suffered when it came to parties, exams, women and getting into fights (I never actually got into any, just the thought of getting into it). My mother always used to say that it’s a teenage problem and it will go away as I get other, therefore she got me Kalms sleeping pills as an attempt to calm me down.I finally went to see a therapist at the age of 17 while I was studying at university and this was where I was diagnosed with anxiety. I was told many techniques such as breathing and thinking but they never seemed to help. When I am having a panic attack I try to think of these techniques to this day but nothing works.At this point, I talked to my mother about some stronger pills but the most she could have access to was anti-sickness tablets and slightly stronger sleeping pills.I met my girlfriend when I was 17. I tutored her in the library, when we were in there I was never scared or anxious. However, when I knew that she was talking to other men (as I hadn’t expressed that I liked her yet) it angered me and sent my anxiety levels very high. As we got closer I went to her house and even then I had to tell her that I was frightened and had to go to the toilet often to vomit or breathe. After a lot of work she became my girlfriend and a lot of the anxiousness went away when I was around her in my general life. However, I still to this day have to prepare and get very scared when we go to nightclubs. I have never been once without her and I get frightened when I am not with her (e.g. if she’s at the toilet). For this reason, I have never been out on a “Lad’s Night” with my friends and continue to miss social events with them to the point where they barely know who I am. I do drink with my friends but only really the 2 close friends that I spoke to earlier and this would be in-house drinking.I was driven to write this post due to an event last week. I went to a pub/restaurant in the city centre with my girlfriend, her close friend that I also know very well and my friend that I know very well. I assumed I would be comfortable in this situation as these are people that I am close to, even if I have never been out to a pub before. I was okay and didn’t experience anything except from the odd shiver over the first 30 minutes. However, when I got to my second drink I could not stomach it and kept going back and forward to the toilet. We went to McDonald’s after this as I ruined the night slightly and wanted to get out of the pub (my girlfriend also wanted to leave the pub as the bar staff kept staring at her as they thought her friend was underage). In McDonalds I did not eat, I only drank water. My girlfriend knows I am bad in these situations so she tries her best to calm me down and swing the night in my favour. So after this we went to one more pub and then home. At this last pub I left the table every 5 minutes to either the toilet or outside (even though I don’t smoke). I would hear things in my ear from other people at the pub complimenting my girlfriend or asking if she was actually my girlfriend (this is because she is very beautiful). But this made me panic even more.At this point, I can’t even go to a small social event such as this without making a massive deal out of it. I am known in my group to be a “ghost” and I am rarely invited to events as I will say no anyway. I want to break this habit and be a social butterfly and enjoy all of these events like all my friends do. I don’t want to panic anymore. I have had enough.My anxiety will give me effects based on the situation such as:• Shivering• Vomiting• Complete Loss of Appetite • Sweating• Fear of No Escape• Headaches• Panic Attacks• Loss of BreathThank you to anyone who gives me help, I am in desperate need of help as I haven’t received anything that has helped so far. I am getting older and with time I will be missing more and more social events and potentially missing important career opportunities as I can’t make new friendships or go to work events due to my anxiety also. [info] None [info] 1565127074
TAanx81063706586 [info] Struggling to break through mental noise I feel like I'm constantly battling mental noise (and actually noise) and getting distracted by unimportant thoughts. I'm hoping for some advice on how to manage this. I find myself fixated on 1 or 2 thoughts when I'm in an argument or someone is telling me something important. If there is other noise in the room (TV), this gets worse. If I have a song stuck in my head (which I usually do), it's even harder to think beyond the 1 or 2 thoughts I'm fixated on.I feel like this has slowly been getting worse. For example, I'm fighting with my significant other (SO) right now. A week ago I was fixated on the idea that I had been improving my communication and he just wasn't recognizing it. I argued that pretty extensively. Now I'm fixated on the idea that my SO is right that my communication and coping skills have gotten worse.In both cases I feel like I've gotten stuck on whatever thought/perspective was in my head, and it was all I could think about and talk about. My SO then get frustrated because I'm repeating myself and then I appear to suddenly switch my opinion when another thought finally breaks through.I get frustrated that I'm repeating myself, my SO gets frustrated that I'm repeating myself, and I can feel these frustrations making me more anxious and less able to think clearly. I feel like this problem is making me less observant, less empathetic, and more forgetful. For reference, I was diagnosed with anxiety 6 years ago, and I've been on 50mg/day of Zoloft since then. I have a therapy appointment scheduled for two weeks from now to talk about this problem and my Zoloft dosage, but I need some relief from this feeling much sooner.Any advice for dealing with this? [info] None [info] 1542213900
thepinklemur [info] This sub feels like a guardian angel right now. Thank you I had no idea this sub existed. I'm crying right now because of how supportive and beautiful this community seems. I love the top posts, I relate to the resent posts, I think I've upvoted almost everything!!I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 12 and I've been getting pretty good at dealing with it. I don't have social anxiety like a lot of you guys seem to but I have chronic panic attacks that can be triggered by issues or by things that are as simple as being in a room with too many people or being in a room where things are too loud. Been on lexapro, Xanax, some other less common SSRIs...I'm sure this is not unfamiliar to most of you. I decided a few years ago to deal with this issue medication free and it's hard but I've gotten okay at calming myself down. Anyway. I had a panic attack today and I'm overseas and I felt so alone- I couldn't handle it by myself. I felt Like no one could help me. Hadn't been on Reddit for a while and just decided I should since I couldn't sleep... I'm so glad I did. Now I'm crying again but in a good way! Lil cheesy but Thank you for helping me feel a little less alone [info] None [info] 1578547985
julietonnes [info] I get the same way with noises in my apartment.  I'll literally go from having a normal conversation to screaming and crying the next second all because I heard a couple thumps from the apartment above me.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety rather than misophonia, but it sounds like we react the same way. [info] None [info] 1353598337
Rahila_indigo [info] Seriously just found the word "misophonia" on the internet a few days ago.  Always been googling noise anxiety instead....so yeah.I have been seeing a counselor for about a year now and I was diagnosed with anxiety and went on medications and crap (which kinda work, but made me feel like the walking dead). My noise triggers are;-sniffing (the absolute worst)-coughing-throat clearing-pants dragging on the ground-muffled sounds in my apartment from my neighbors-heavy breathing-high pitch girly talk-chewing/smackingCan't remember when it started, but it makes going to my college classes a living hell. I leave in the middle of class if people are making too many noises. Left during movies, dinner at restaurants, etc. Anytime I hear these noises I get crazy heart palpitations and think about wanting to hurt that person so bad.Today, I was sitting in a class of about 25 students and one or two sniffed/coughed every five seconds and I nearly burst out into tears three times. IMMEDIATELY went to the university's counseling center to get an appointment. And of course, they are booked for three weeks so today I have had two emotional breakdowns from a few noises. Sure yall can relate!!!!!!Trying to figure out what to do now...   :/ [info] None [info] 1329802710
Succ-on-that [info] Should I push to be medicated? I've been diagnosed with anxiety but since I'm 16 the doctor is reluctant to prescribe medication. I didn't mind at first and I thought of meds as a last resort but I have tried everything and I can't live like this for much longer. Counselling does nothing for me, it gives me little to no help and I find it hard to meditate and keep myself busy like the doctor recommended. I have ADD and I'm on medication for it but the medication worsens my anxiety but it is the only thing that motivates me to do work and without my ADD medication I'm anxious AND depressed. My doctor said I should get my dosage lowered but I personally think it's more important to treat my anxiety, I had no problems before with my meds until I developed anxiety and I think anxiety medication is the only way to help with the frequent panic attacks and constant sense of dread. How do I get my doctor to prescribe medication to treat my anxiety? [info] None [info] 1516751695
Lady_borg [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety and a few other things, but nothing huge in particular that happens in the mornings. yes I have a toddler but even when he isn't causing me any stress it still happens. I am thinking this wave of anxiety is very tightly connected to my anxiety in general but not sure how to combat this.  [info] ADHD and Parent [info] 1411991560
Combine5 [info] Medication? Hi, I was just diagnosed with anxiety even though I've had a feeling for about 3-4 months now. I'm going to talk the a psychiatrist soon to talk about medication I might take. Just wanted to ask if anyone knows any medication that doesn't make you feel weird? Feeling unusual is one of my big stressors. Thanks! [info] None [info] 1389297871
Evane18 [info] Request for an advice on topic of reintroducing antidepressants  Dear Doctor Peterson,  I realize you must be very busy, but if this email will by any chance reach to you, I will be very gratefull for your response. I consider you as a competent person in following matter. Also I would like to apologize for grammatical imperfections as I might have not been paying enough attention in some English classes.I am 24 years old and live in Czech republic. I would like to ask you about my consideration of getting back to antidepressants, which I have been using since 2015. In 2015 I was so low mentally, that everything from getting out of bed to buying a bus ticket was difficult and frustrating. I could have not stop my thoughts and these toughts were mostly negative and inapropriate for the situation and the place, resulting to social embarassment and following social isolation. Everything was a problem for me. I also have stopped studiyng at the University at that time. I would like to add, that nothing too bad have occured in my life, that could be causing that.  After some research I have realized I need to seek a professional mental help and found nearest psychiatrist. After quick description, I have been diagnosed with anxiety disorder and been prescribed antidepressants, specifically SSRI's called Cipralex. So I did start taking them. I would like to say that these medications were suprprisingly effective for me. When they kicked in I started to feel much better. Bad mood and overthinking were gone. I was able to enjoy all the small things which usually bring some sort of happiness. After a while I was able to reprograme my life. I found a job, hobbies, new people and so on and I was able to focus on things that brought happines to me.  After three years on Cipralex, I have decided to stop using it. It was from day to day and I came across pretty severe side effects that lasted for aproximately 3 months. These included dizzines, headache, and pain behind the eyes but eventually I have got rid of them completely. The transition down from feeling good and mentaly balanced was slow but visible. It took half a year for me to develop some of the previous symptoms. It is not as severe as it was 4 years ago, but sometimes, it is pretty similar. I can certainly tell there is sort of mood imbalance and overall I am getting more sceptical and pesimistic and sometimes even depressed. Anxiety and discomfort when interacting socially are also coming back. And they are starting to cause me trouble again. I would like to mention that recently I have decided to improve my daily routine, eating frequency and sleeping time and I can see on myself that these things improve my mood and thinking. However I am not able to comply them properly because of the nature of my job. I work 3 day and night shifts 12 hours every three days.   I would like know what You think and would be very gratefull for your opinion whether I should come back to antidepressants or not. Or if there is something else I can do to feel normal. Thank you.  With respect [info] None [info] 1554931871
premiumfeel [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder three years ago. I obsess over and become anxious about the most inane and obscure shit, and excuse you, I don't need coddling. A meme is not going to invalidate my issues, weirdo.I have no idea where the meme came from but I laugh at it when i see it and I don't know why. If it actually bothered me I could be an actual adult and take responsibility for myself and block the posts, but I guess personal responsibility is beyond their comprehension. [info] None [info] 1404215473
45MinutesOfRoadHead [info] Anxiety. When I was in college I would start driving to campus, get to campus, and wind up walking into the student center for coffee and stay there instead of going to class. I never understood why I would do this. I knew I should go to class, and when it came time to actually go I would divert and go somewhere else. I still can't pinpoint exactly what about going to class freaked me out so much, because I like people and I'm a very social person. I wound up withdrawing.It wasn't until I had a nervous breakdown that I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on zoloft. Zoloft helped, and while it kept me from freaking out, it kept me from getting excited at the same time. I eventually came off of it and now live unmedicated, but I still experience invasive thoughts of doom daily. I've decided I won't have more than one child because I don't think I could handle worrying that much. I'm always assuming my son is going to die from anything at any second, and I can't imagine what it'd be like if I had another.Also, I have ADHD. That goes like "The dishes need to be done, start dishes, but wait! There's something sticky on the counter, stop the dishes and wipe the counter. Did I lock the door? Gotta check. Hold up, do the cats have food in their bowl? Go check food, then put the laundry in the dryer. Hold on, you have to pee. The counter is cluttered. Start putting things away. Oh yeah! Dishes! Go finish dishes before you do this. But don't forget to dry your clothes!" [info] None [info] 1481902157
CalmPupper [info] You are right actually...I mean I expected something spiritual..I've been diagnosed with anxiety a year or so...and sometimes i overreact but today i believe its because of the things i've read - i have more things happening to me not voices doe more like when i see light it hurts my eyes - particularly red light don't know why and when i see pictures sometimes i imagine other things, once i laid on my desk and i thought i was gonna fall..i think i am just in a panic attaxk or something because i've never experienced this before and like it is like a pseudo-systom or some shit. My only concern is that sometimes when i see things i imagine other things because they look like other things but it is because of my vivid imagination.  [info] None [info] 1546872501
Hanekawa3 [info] Aah this really puts it into perspective for me! I was confused because I also get anxious when socializing but it's because I want to get back to my thoughts, not because I'm shy or any other avoidant traits. So that's why I was diagnosed with anxiety and SPD, but not AvPD.Thank you so much, this really nailed it for me!  [info] Diagnosed SPD + BPD [info] 1522177805
ilovjedi [info] I’m a 32 year old woman with a 10 year old son we both officially have ADHD. We’re going to get my son started on meds this year. I worry about him taking them because he seems so little but the impact of his hyperactivity at school is noticeable and it makes it hard for him to learn.I was diagnosed with anxiety before I was diagnosed with ADHD both were diagnosed as an adult. Anxiety symptoms and ADHD symptoms can overlap so maybe it would make sense to talk to your daughters doctor about maybe treating her anxiety and seeing if that makes her school problems a little better too. You can also have both. And, would she benefit from talking with a counselor about the anxiety? They have play therapy for younger kids. Also, at school if you’re in the US have you asked for an IEP?I was taking 15 MG of XR Adderall before I became pregnant. I went down from 20 MG because it was too much and kept me from sleeping. [info] None [info] 1545626850
hnsnghyk [info] Recently I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder after resigning from work. Nag-decide ako na mag-stay na lang muna sa bahay hanggang December. Pag nag-apply ako ng trabaho sa January, ano bang pwedeng isagot kapag tinanong ako na bakit mahaba ang bakasyon ko? My psychiatrist said I don't have to disclose my mental health condition kase posible akong ma-reject ng ina-applyan ko. [info] panic! at the office [info] 1570634053
UndeadTana [info] Sleep deprivation = anxiety ? In the past 2 days I’ve gotten 3 hours of sleep . Today I woke up feeling crappy and I’m a bad mood ... fast forward to now currently I am feeling general anxiety and butterflies . I just feel off and anxious for no reason . I am diagnosed with anxiety and OCD . Could I be feeling this way today due to getting no sleep ofor the past 2 days &amp; do you think a decent nap could fix me up . I’m just a little concerned and wanna know if that would be the reason I feel like this today . Thank you [info] None [info] 1559241632
SwampThing72 [info] A little late to the party on this, but writing helps me. Once I was diagnosed with anxiety and knew that it was a disorder and that I just didn't worry to worry, it helped identifying triggers.As I get older and more of life starts to happen, I've found that writing things down helps me manage what are actual problems to handle and what are just unnecessary worries. The notes app on my iPhone where I can make notes private helps out a lot. I will just start immediately listing what is on my mind as to "dump" everything out. From there, I look at the list and evaluate what are things I need to tackle and for a game plan for them and then eliminate the things that I absolutely have no control over. As I'm sure A LOT of people have said, you can't control everything. Once you shift your mindset and don't focus on the things you can't control and are able to identify when you begin to spiral over unimportant things, then you will notice the level of worry will start to decrease. Hope this helps!  [info] None [info] 1477426064
Ediface [info] Similar story here. Except for my wife, people see me as very slow and steady rock. It was necessary to build this up because I grew up in a setting that really sought out vulnerability for torture. And, nature or nurture, I was way too sensitive.The people who know me today wouldn't see me as such a still body of water if they could have seen me experiencing emotional lability (unstoppably laughing and crying at the same time). Or those horrible colds I got? I just couldn't get out of bed without wanting to crawl under it. The weekend before I was diagnosed with anxiety where I called and subtly made my peace with friends and family because I knew - *knew* I was dying after some surprise tachycardia. Years of therapy and medicine help me keep going.Much better now but I hit some good turbulence from time to time. [info] None [info] 1376978755
DaintyGhost747 [info] I used to get that a lot. And I made sure I didn't miss anything, I'd do everything, with every friend, club, group, and family. It didn't go so well, and I went to the hospital extreme exhaustion. That's day I was diagnosed with anxiety [info] None [info] 1553334893
wicked_wisdom09 [info] Help me I have been diagnosed with anxiety . I feel not getting . Shortness of breath . Fear of attack. I have got like three instances when I was rapid breathing like not getting air with rapid heartbeat [info] None [info] 1574543622
bubblesbibbie [info] Diet help I have been diagnosed with anxiety and my doctor and mental health adviser suggested a good step is diet and exercise. The thought of both is triggering. I dont know why in so terrified of getting out of my routine when my routine is hurting me so much. I'm wondering if keto or 21 day fix kind of routine would be too much. Has anyone here had progress with creating a new routine. Should I just do my best to stay positive and push through I just dont know what to do. [info] None [info] 1568066848
OneBadKid [info] I have had two attacks. Both hit without warning while I was driving. I suddenly had an overwhelming feeling of impending death. I was able to pull over and get out of the car. I felt like I had to keep walking/running or else I would immediately die. The first time, my wife was with me and she called an ambulance even though I was asking her not to. I found it very hard to sit still while the paramedics were examining me. They shot me with something to relax me and eventually I was diagnosed with anxiety attack. The second attack happened while I was driving alone a hundred miles from civilization. I just had to pull over and wait it out, pacing constantly for about 90 minutes. It is scary. Fortunately, it has not happened for 5 years.  [info] None [info] 1427477395
faith6274 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and then I guess more [info] None [info] 1586497061
Ellajt [info] Yes!! I have been diagnosed with anxiety but my counsellor and work OHC both think it’s OCD. I’m 100% sure it is. I have had 4 GP appointments in the past 2 weeks and still they won’t send me to a psychiatrist, even though they’ve deemed me unfit for work and signed me off. ArghfjjfjgEdit - I didn’t even realise the ins and outs of OCD until it was mentioned to me by them. So I didn’t say ‘I think I have this’ at all. But it makes complete sense now I know about it! [info] None [info] 1542208346
booksareadrug [info] There's a certain anxiety about not doing things that I have had to unlearn (after I was diagnosed with anxiety). I guess the best advice I can think of, besides maybe talking to a therapist, is to try to set aside a block of time, even half an hour, to deliberately relax. [info] None [info] 1546258422
S0urDrop [info] My Anxiety Story I've been wanting to post about this for awhile, but I'm afraid it'll just sound like I'm whining for attention/ Reddit crypto currency, but I just feel like I need to tell someone, even if it's just Reddit, so here it goes.Before I was diagnosed with anxiety I went to family therapy. See, my older sister has a cocktail of mental illnesses + some sort of sensory illness &amp; that shit isn't the easiest thing to live with. My parents (mostly my mother) had to focus on her to make sure she didn't hurt herself/ anyone else in one of her tantrums. While this was happening the seed of introvertedness was growing inside me. I had trouble standing up for myself, I didn't like talking to people much &amp; I was afraid to ask questions in class. I hated school because not only was I bullied, but my kindergarten teacher was a fucking child hating witch! Why she worked with small children I will never know, but it fucked me up for life. (Thanks Mrs. Beradyl) for half of my life a suffered in my social life &amp; in my academics. Anything would make me anxious, even saying hello to someone. I finally found solace in the Internet &amp; my cats (no regrets there)   I could just lay in bed &amp; relax while the world went on. In 6th grade I was diagnosed with ADD (Or ADHAD whatever it's called) ive been taking med for my many disorders for 3-ish years now &amp; it's kinda getting better. (I still prefer Netflix over people a little) I might continue this later, but momma needs some comfort food &amp; some tv! [info] None [info] 1543885706
macmoosie [info] One night, being a Good Samaritan almost killed me. “Do you think you could give me a ride home?”It was that innocent and seemingly innocuous question that damn near brought me to Death’s doorstep. It wasn’t a hitchhiker on the side of the road or a straggler outside of a gas station. It was a stranger, sure, but it was one who was fairly close to my circle of friends, and I never saw it coming. My best friend always told me that my kindness would be the death of me. I’ve forgiven cheating ex-boyfriends, abusive friends, and betraying family members. I’ve given friends rides to and from and I’ve stayed up all night to talk an acquaintance out of suicide. I ordered a pizza for someone who’d just lost their job and couldn’t afford a meal. I was always blessed growing up and one day, finally having realized the magnitude of my blessings, decided to start paying it forward whenever I was physically and financially able.The incident occurred about four or five years ago on a quiet Friday night. I’d opted for a night in with Netflix and snacks rather than going out for drinks and karaoke. I was living with my parents at the time and my mother was visiting my grandmother, so it was just my father, the pets, and I in the house. I found myself curled up in bed having a little Guy Ritchie marathon, since my dad was sprawled out on the couch watching some classic Batman films from the golden era. I was about twenty minutes into Lock, Stock, and Two Smoking Barrels when I heard the familiar sound of a Facebook Messenger notification chiming on my phone.I reached over and opened the message, seeing it was from someone I knew of, but had never actually met before; his name was Alan. We had a moderate handful of mutual friends and despite never seeing him before in my life, I’d accepted the friend request he sent a few weeks back. He seemed to talk to some people I knew on a regular basis, so I figured he just wanted to expand his circle. He posted some rather funny memes and the often relatable millennial joke posts here and there. I’d never actually talked to him before, but we’ve mutually liked each other’s content. I was a little surprised to actually receive a message from him, especially around 10pm on a random Friday night.“Hey.”Simple and innocent enough, I supposed.“Hey man, how’s it going?” I replied, keeping it chill and casual, plopping my phone back on the bed and resuming my movie.He responded almost immediately. “Good. Hey, listen, I’m at my friend’s house and everyone is drunk and shit. Do you think you could give me a ride home?”Weird. I literally didn’t know this guy whatsoever other than having mutual friends and completely out of the blue, he messages me, of all people, to ask for a ride. I’d be lying if I said I wasn’t a little annoyed at the idea of having to leave the house, but more so for someone who’d have the…audacity…for lack of a better word, to ask me to.On the other hand, it was kind of late and fairly cold outside, buses had already stopped running, Uber and Lyft weren’t a thing in my town back then, and getting a taxi could be expensive.“Where are you?”“55 Spring Road. I live at 93 Juliet Street.”With a quick search on Apple Maps, I saw that he wasn’t too far away and surprisingly lived a couple of miles north of me. I figured it wouldn’t take all that long to do him the favor, and at least he wouldn’t have to walk in the cold or get a ride from someone who’d been drinking and endanger both of their lives.“Give me a few minutes to get dressed and I’ll let you know when I’m there.”“Awesome, thanks!”I had a weird feeling in the pit of my stomach, but I was diagnosed with anxiety and it always made a point to resurface when it came to meeting someone new. I threw on a pair of jeans and a hoodie, slipped into my “going wherever, I need shoes” pair of sneakers, and collected my wallet, phone, and keys before heading into the living room to announce my departure. Despite being an adult, I always made a point out of mutual respect, to inform my parents where I was going and for what reason.As I climbed into the cabin of my SUV, the feeling in my stomach grew stronger and I couldn’t figure out why my internal monologue was telling me to abort mission, go back upstairs, ignore any messages Alan sent, and apologize in the morning saying I fell asleep. I shook the thought and started the commute.When I pulled up to the house and parked across the street, I noticed that the only source of light was coming from one of the windows on the third floor. Even with my windows closed, I could hear the unmistakable sound of drunken youthful banter. I messaged Alan to let him know I arrived and a moment later, a figure appeared in the window and seemed to be looking down at me. In that moment, I was thankful that my windows were tinted as dark as legally possible, so there was no way whoever that was could have seen me staring back, trying to make out his features.A few minutes went by before Alan finally responded saying he was on his way down, but the man at the window hadn’t moved a muscle whatsoever. Eventually, the front door opened and there was Alan, easily recognizable in the now illuminated porch light — probably motion sensors — looking exactly like he does in his Facebook pictures. He hopped down the steps, backpack over his shoulder, and made his way over to me, having been inside the only vehicle on the street with its headlights on.He opened the door and climbed into the passenger seat, dropping his backpack between his feet. He greeted me with an oddly enthusiastic hello and leaned over to give me a hug. Weird, but my masculinity isn’t so fragile as to decline a hug from another guy. I started to drive off and glanced up at the third floor window again to find the man still watching. The fight or flight feeling in my stomach came back twice as hard.“Thanks for the ride, man, I really appreciate it.”“Yeah, no problem,” I replied, forcing a smile.I kept the radio at a low volume and kept an eye on Alan in my peripheral vision. He would occasionally look out of the window, glance at me, and go back to the window. His right leg was bouncing up and down, as if he was nervous about something, and I noticed he kept scratching his thigh. In hindsight, they were obvious signs of nervousness or anxiety, but I had no idea why at the present moment.“Nice car, by the way. What is it, a brand new X5?”I nodded. “Yeah, it is. I just got it a few months ago.”Alan whistled. “Damn, must have been expensive.”I didn’t acknowledge the question. There was something about his tone and the implication of the statement that rubbed me the wrong way. It wasn’t unusual for people to question the cost of the BMW, but there was just something about how he said it that made me think he’d drive off in it given the opportunity.I really wanted to ask him why he reached out to me, of all people, to give him a ride home, but I kept my mouth shut for a majority of the ride. His presence made me incredibly uncomfortable and I couldn’t wait to get him home and get myself home.“I really appreciate you doing this, man,” he said, breaking the silence. “I really didn’t want to have to walk home.”“It’s cool, no worries.”“Do you do this often?” he laughed. “Give rides to strangers, I mean.”I shook my head. “Not usually, no.”Alan laughed again. “Probably for the best. You know, there’s a lot of crazies out here,” he said, in a dramatic, Joker-esque, sing-song manner. It made my stomach turn.Without skipping a beat, I retorted, “Yeah, you’re right. That’s why I keep a gun under my seat. You never know.”I looked at him in my peripheral vision and his expression was emotionless. He looked out of the window and remained quiet the entire remainder of the ride and didn’t look back at me once. As I neared his neighborhood, he pointed out an empty spot a few houses down from his.“You can just drop me off here, man, it’s cool,” he said, hurriedly.I obliged and threw the SUV in park. Alan immediately collected his backpack, said a quick thanks, and practically power-walked toward his house, disappearing into the driveway. I immediately shifted into gear and high-tailed it home.The moment I left his neighborhood, I felt this overwhelming sense of relief. I don’t think he caught on that I was bluffing about having a gun under the seat, but something tells me that the comment deterred him from whatever it was he originally planned to do.A few weeks later, I came home from work and my parents were watching the news. Alan’s mugshot was on Channel 6. He was arrested for brutally murdering a girl in our town after she’d picked him up and gave him a ride home. The girl, Allison, left her Facebook logged in on her laptop and her mother checked it when Allison wasn’t responding to text messages or phone calls. The police went to Alan’s house and found Allison’s grey Toyota, with her body in the trunk. Alan was arrested immediately, with Allison’s blood on his clothes and his hands. Inside Allison’s car on the passenger side was Alan’s backpack, which contained miscellaneous drugs and a bloody machete.I went to the bathroom and barely made it before I vomited. My entire life flashed before my eyes as I was collapsed over the toilet. I didn’t dare tell my parents that he was the “friend” I gave a ride to a few weeks prior. I did send an anonymous tip to the police about the occupants of the third floor apartment of 55 Spring Road, which led to the arrest of a handful of men and a collection of controlled substances.I can’t say what would have happened to me if I didn’t lie to Alan about having a gun under the seat of my car. What I can say is the fact that since that night, I do carry a gun now, and I’ve never given a ride to anyone I didn’t personally know. [info] None [info] 1581023115
ner2773 [info] Unwilling to change I was diagnosed with anxiety four years ago, and have been going to therapy and taking medication ever since. I love my therapist and having someone who I am able to share my feelings with. However, sometimes she gives me coping methods or skills and I never try them. I feel like if I try them then I will change, and I’m scared of changing. I feel like if I try to change my thoughts and habits around my anxiety that I won’t be myself anymore.  I am not sure if I am scared because I have anxiety and change makes me uncomfortable, or if I am scared because I know how hard it will be to truly change myself. I feel like my mental illness is such a huge part of my identity that if I try to change I won’t know who I am anymore. And I know there are things that would be good for me to work on, like opening up to others and working on rationalizing my thoughts, but I am scared that I will also lose the parts of my anxiety that make me motivated to do well in school and at work, and other positive aspects of my anxiety. Has anyone else felt like this? It’s a weird place to be, wanting to better my mental health but also being scared to lose who I am. I don’t know who I am without my anxiety. [info] None [info] 1546213337
fruple [info] Implanon and Anxiety? I got Implanon inserted about a little over a month ago and it's been pretty wonderful.  However, I've noticed over the past few weeks that my anxiety is going haywire.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety for a few years now, and I can mostly keep it under control (I don't use medication).  The past two weeks though, it's just getting awful.  I'm more anxious than ever and I'm getting upset about things and just honestly being a pain in the ass to everyone because of it.So, I was just wondering if anyone had experienced this before.  I don't know if it's from the Implanon or just life in general or I just need to get back into therapy, but it fits the timeline pretty well. [info] None [info] 1408307186
Earthly87image [info] Depends on the person,  first and foremost, weed has all tons of strains, for example I am diagnosed with anxiety and I smoke weed I prefer the medical pot indeed just wanted too share [info] None [info] 1565775857
HobbitLass [info] Yep. I know that feeling to a t. I noticed it maybe 4 or 5 years ago as something that wasn't normal. Like you said, I felt high all the time. Like i had a constant body buzz... But not in a good fun way! Like my limbs felt detached from my body. It comes and goes. I was diagnosed with anxiety back in the fall. The anxiety got to a full blown state this summer when I worked about 1000 miles away from home for 2 months. I missed my boyfriend and my family. Anyways.... I've always had varying degrees of it since I could remember but it wasn't until I had a complete depressive melt down that I put two and two together and realized it was anxiety.... Long story short.... I know that disconnected, out of body feeling!!  [info] None [info] 1365204223
quoth_tthe_raven [info] Twenty-three years of life. There was no intervention when I was a child and then I was diagnosed with anxiety in middle school. I remained under the general "anxiety umbrella" until recently when I started seeing a new psychiatrist. All of a sudden everything made sense and although I have a long road ahead of me it feels better to have answers. Simply saying, "Oh, it's my anxiety making me feel this way," never really added up for me.  [info] None [info] 1447258866
oldpaintunderthenew [info] Oh YES. Perhaps not depressed until hitting puberty (at 9-10, thanks ovaries) but I was anxious literally since birth and I just thought this was how everyone is..? I was diagnosed with anxiety at 16 and laughed at it, me? Anxious? Nooo I am outwardly very calm and don't burden people with my worries so what is the psychiatrist on about? I looked up anxiety symptoms after that and *bam* - it was an embarrassingly high age for me to realize that everyone isn't horrified of everything all the time and doing anything isn't supposed to feel monumentally scary and other people won't obsess about the same little thing for hours a day, every day, for years. [info] None [info] 1530686394
the_gift_of_g2j [info] Nothing too crazy compared to some of the other responses, but how many times I've written something relating to my anxiety and fear of dating again.   I wrote about how I gave a girl my number and I was embarrassed and stressed for the day and a half it took for her to respond.  I'm still a bit nervous and anxiety is trying to make me think she's still not interested or I'm not good enough.  To my family and friends, they think that even though I'm diagnosed with anxiety, I am very composed and happy.   [info] None [info] 1504552638
theloneranger2012 [info] I agree with microwave333, I have been diagnosed with anxiety, body pains are a frequent difficulty for me. Even now typing this has tuned me in to the fact that I have twinges where I don't want them. [info] Sertraline [info] 1325672829
infinitebarz [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and I have to take zoloft [info] None [info] 1403641277
starwish68 [info] I'm sorry I can't offer much help but I know exactly where you are coming from. I am very obsessive with things being organized and done thoroughly. My boyfriend is the total opposite. I have to remind him to shower sometimes... Anyway, I have yet to live with him, but you sound a lot like me. My obsessiveness grew exponentially when I left for college and faced some personal issues that resulted in a ridiculous amount of stress. I was diagnosed with anxiety and unfortunately let it out on my boyfriend more often than I'd like to admit to. Counseling helped a lot. Just being able to vent was honestly a huge factor in my recovery. If you do also have anxiety, I would strongly suggest working out. I've just started and it's helped me relax and sleep better. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1422331531
rdmelo [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder this week. I started taking meds that actually make my crises more frequent and more intense (but shorter, at least). I had my first mid-run crisis yesterday (6 weeks after I started). I don't know about your symptoms, but mine included blurred sight, lethargy, difficult breathing and knee pain. I started jogging anyway, cranked up the volume, and everything went away around the 400-800m mark (I don't know for sure because of the blurred sight). The last 4km were a breeze after it, and I ran on a track instead of a treadmill.My experience might not relate to yours, however. Still, the first thing you should do is setting an adequate mindset for you. Mine is "find a way, not excuses" (I also like the "don't get lazy, get the upper hand"), it helps me keeping motivated. Second of all, think thoroughly about your safety: are you comfortable, have you stretched, are you hydrated, does your phone has enough battery left, do you have a reliable person that knows where you are and what you are doing that you can call if needed, is this person's phone on speed dial. Third, think about who and why are you doing it for. I'm doing it for myself, because I love myself, because I want to be the best I can. I'm not doing it because someone asked me to do it. I'm not doing it for the people around me. I'm not doing it to look cool or sexy in my fitness clothes. And guess what, people around you are doing the same. They don't care about what you're doing, they're just there to do their own thing and enjoy themselves. The first time was hard but it got better by the minute, because I was in control. I knew what I wanted to do, I knew how to do it, I could stop anytime I wanted. Still, check with your psychiatrist if it's ok to exercise. If you control your anxiety without medical assistance, then you can start running, it's a very safe exercise. About your nutrients, download MyFitnessPal (it's an app for smartphones) and it can take care of the calculations. In order to lose weight, you can aim for a 500 calorie deficit, just make sure you eat at least 1200 calories every day. You don't have to eat anything before running, just make sure you're very well hydrated. I like a banana (potassium to avoids cramps) and a whole liter (1/4 gallon) of water about 15-30 minutes before leaving home. After it, it's good to pump in some protein to help your body heal and build muscle. That's it overall. Use the search box and you'll find some more resources. My main advice is to avoid postponing your first run as much as possible. As you progress, your focus will naturally shift from your anxiety to how can you run longer, faster, better.  [info] W9D1 [info] 1433440276
myloxoloto [info] Ive always been described as an anxious child, I hated social situations, even going to town would freak me out. Throughout school  I was bullied, never had any friends, and in work/university I've never managed to have a group I see regularly. That mystical group of friends who see each other every weekend or even sooner? Hmm yeah that evades me. I'm 23, and have just in the last year had cbt. It worked to an extent but I'm noticing myself starting to get a hell of a lot anxious again, and it's getting harder to rationalise stuff, and I keep panicking and freaking out. My flight instinct is in overdrive and I faint incredibly easily. I was diagnosed with anxiety and "obsessional tendencies". I've come to this sub as I don't want to keep burdening my friends with my worries.  I hope this is ok! Are we allowed to ask for advice when we make threads? Or is that what the chat room thing is for? I'm still very new to reddit, apologies. Thank you. :) [info] None [info] 1468013453
needinganescape [info] Literally had yellow bowel movements for 2 weeks losing my mind finally back to normal. Kept re reading the same online articles and forcing myself to believe the worst. I was diagnosed with anxiety at the beginning of this year. Woke up having a panic attack and now it's on my mind 24/7 [info] None [info] 1560139235
abarbz15 [info] Prozac/fluoxetine for Anxiety / Panic disorder Hi,Looking for a success stories about Prozac aka fluoxetine. My doctor wants to switch me off of celexa from taking a genetic test because Prozac was a better fit. I was diagnosed with anxiety specially panic disorder. Had some side effects from the celexa (insomnia, increased anxiety etc) I googled Prozac and it said some scary things so looking for some success stories. Is this medication safe? I’m super scared to take it. Thanks in advance! [info] None [info] 1584646606
frostylakes [info] Anxiety is definitely a different issue, I agree, but I don't feel I can contribute to this particular thread of thought in a constructive way. I'll share my anecdote, though, I guess. I've been diagnosed with anxiety, but it's hard for me to see it as something abnormal and I didn't even realize it would be considered diagnosable anxiety before I was told. Things like new social situations and meeting new people causes anxiety to where I simply don't act in these situations until 'invited in' in some way. It takes me a very long time to acclimate. All that said, even among close friends, among whom I feel no anxiety, I still end up drained and tired and in need of alone time after too long. I need to recharge. The situation of being around people is common to both situations, but anxiety only exists in one. Recharge alone time is needed after both. I can't find the words at the moment, but I hope that I'm getting across the point that introverted/extroverted traits may interact with the causes of anxiety in a person, but are separate things and learning to cope with or get treated for extreme anxieties is a separate matter from one's introvert/extrovert trait. [info] None [info] 1381200818
cryingtoes [info] Pre-med/Med school. I'm terrified but very excited!! Right now I'm a junior in high school, and my senior year is right around the corner. I'm planning on majoring in biology/biochem in college and focusing on pediatrics later on (if that's even how premed to med school works). I apologize in advance for all of the questions😅What I want to ask is:A) Does it really matter where you go for premed (which college/uni), or at least the four years before med school? I've been getting several emails/letters from a good array of colleges from ivy league to the worst of the worst, but does it really matter? I'm looking for the cheapest option, but also good quality. I'm aware several ivy leagues have very cheap tuition (I've done a lot of research this year!), but I'm not going to make it in because I'm very average. What would you guys say?B) If I were to become a pediatrician, and maybe even a pediatric surgeon, how long would that take, approximately? I know already with the general med it's a good amount of time (~8 years?), but I've heard specializing takes you even longer, just because you have to study the specifics of that branch. I really enjoyed the rat dissection we did last year in biology and this med student I consulted told me how they dissect cadavers. I asked her immediately if I could go visit the dissection room and see, but obviously she said no(I'm not squeamish at all😁). I'm leaning towards being either a general/pediatric surgeon, so that'd be another 5 years maybe? How much would you guys say?C) The MCAT. Once I graduate high school and enter college, when should I start studying? I've thought about just try to start studying since freshman year, or would that be overkill?D) Also MCAT. How much did you study? I spoke to a premed student a few months ago, and she told me that typically you study all of your junior year and then take it at the end of junior year (although she's taking it her senior year). Also, she told me you don't have to have an outstanding score on it, you just have to pass. I understand that she's a literal med student and I have yet to become one, but just to make sure, is that true?E) I've heard med school/premed is very cutthroat. I'm very naïve and too polite sometimes, should I try to work on toughening up before entering premed? I've heard stories of students stealing each other's note cards and refusing to study together (which idk why, because studying with someone else has always helped me, especially if they're very focused on studying and we don't stray from it). I'm also maybe exaggerating this all in my head, so forgive me if I'm being too cautious 😅F) For premed, did you have to study calculus? I've asked my pediatrician, the med student, and I've consulted online sources and I think I'm in denial, but all of them have said "yes." I'm in precalculus right now, and I will be moving on to calculus next year, but my B in precalc has dropped to a C (this semester has been a nightmare with all the new material) and I don't even know if I want to take calc next year, but if I'm going to have to take it in the future I may as well take it now, too. I also really like this teacher he's cool, and who knows how college teachers will be.G) Is premed, med school, and all the stress worth it? I know answers will vary from person to person and people will be biased, but I genuinely want to know. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and mdd and knowing how strenuous all of that is scares the absolute crap out of me. I really want to go into the medical field, but I don't want to damage my mental health, I'm trying to stay healthy😊😉H) For tests, how much did you prepare for them and when did you start to prepare for them? I watched this one "premed student vlog" during finals or maybe it was some giant test or smth? Because she set aside an entire week to study for a good amount of medical subjects, like bio/biochem/chem/anatomy/etc.I) Homework. I don't even know how that girl from the vlog was able to set aside so much time for studying, because when I study, it takes me a few hours and I wouldn't even have time to finish my hw. During premed, you still have to attend general study classes, right? How do you get all your work done in one night for your medically related classes and your general classes? It sounds very stressful already..I think that's it for my questions, but I'll make sure to return if I have any more. Thank you so much! I really appreciate any help!! ☺️ [info] None [info] 1556327986
Violinchan [info] Idek if I have disassociation or anxiety anymore I was diagnosed with anxiety, but as long as I can remember there are sudden periods on random days where I feel extremely uncomfortable (like baddd) because I feel detached from people I normally know. For example, I could be sitting in the living room and suddenly I would feel so horrible being and talking with my parents because they felt like strangers and everything felt fake. I also saw the world from the view of “space” sometimes as a child. Right now I also have the weird, weird feeling. Like I’m dreaming and not exactly in my surroundings, but also extremely anxious. Point is, I’m confused. [info] None [info] 1565673427
somebubblegumbitch [info] I’m in a constant state of panic I’m wandering if anyone else has felt this way or has any advice to reassure me (as long as it is allowed on this sub!). I was diagnosed with anxiety many years ago, finally came off all medications a year ago but was put back on them today. A week ago I started getting panic attacks and it’s now just a constant state of panic- heart palpitations, chest tightness, difficulty breathing. I’ve been to a&amp;e twice and admitted to the cardiology ward yesterday.  There’s nothing physically wrong with me and I feel so ridiculous that my brain could make all these debilitating symptoms happen. [info] None [info] 1573752798
auraaxoxo [info] Is what I just experienced related to anxiety? I don’t know if this is the place to ask this, but I was diagnosed with anxiety as a kid (I’m 15 now) &amp; I haven’t been to a psychologist in years cause I was doing pretty well but I think I’m slowly getting more and more anxious as time goes on (i.e. crying nearly everyday about being anxious all the time &amp; constantly worrying about my grades even when I’m doing fine).So today my mum got mad at me, yelled &amp; slammed the door, and I guess that’s when shit hit the fan for me.I burst into tears, but not how I usually do. I was hyperventilating really badly, and because of that I felt really dizzy, got a headache and started coughing while crying. Usually it’s easier to control my tears, but they just came out like a tap and I was crying really loudly as well lol. This went on for maybe 5 minutes, until I calmed down &amp; tried to control my breathing which made me feel much better. The only other time that this happened was maybe 5-6 months ago, when I had a nightmare about my dad dying.Should I be concerned about this? Does anyone know if it could be related to anxiety? [info] None [info] 1585174770
swild89 [info] Maybe some perspective can help you with your anxiety. I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well as panic disorder with agoraphobia. Some days I cannot get past my front door. What do I do? I kick it in the ass. I go to therapy and I follow my medication plan. I have extremely healthy eating and sleeping habits. I have a dog to force me to leave the house twice a day for a walk. Your case of anxiety is not a bad case. Go see your gp to refer you to a general psychologist and look into some cognitive behavioural therapy. Good luck.  [info] None [info] 1372101322
lovemesomezombie [info] Exactly! I will make this long story as short as possible. I was at a very large work related awards banquet. I found myself crying in the bathroom because I felt like I didn't have anyone there that liked me or wanted me to sit with them. A couple girls asked me to sit with them and tried to make me feel comfortable. I was very emotional as this was a feeling I carried all the time. It didn't matter if I had friends, I always felt like I wasn't really liked. There was never a reason from the outside but this is how I felt internally. That night I won the "Rookie of the Year" award out of 200 people and got a standing ovation so somebody liked me. Not long after that, I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder. Your advice to OP of therapy is a really good one. It helped me tremendously.  [info] None [info] 1550700874
purple10115 [info] Anyone Else Suffering from Pregnancy Anxiety? I was just diagnosed with anxiety yesterday. I have an appointment with a therapist for the first time in a month. I have been dealing with TERRIBLE and completely irrational pregnancy anxiety. I have gotten my period and taken tests and I don’t trust anything. I am even on hormonal birth control and take it religiously. I just obsess over my stomach and worry that it is different. Is anyone else struggling with this? I’m really upset because I’m going on vacation and I don’t want to be scared about being pregnant even though I got my period. I try to stop touching my stomach and let go, but in my brain I can’t risk missing anything that could indicate pregnancy. I am having really destructive thoughts because I’m only 19 and a pregnancy would potentially ruin my life right now, I am so scared.Have you ever dealt with anything like this? How did you get through it? Sending good vibes to anyone who is struggling because I know I sure am. [info] None [info] 1531956533
Krankdatsmash [info] Anyone else here get sore arms and fingers from anxiety? I've been diagnosed with anxiety recently and around that same time I noticed arm and hand pains. Anyone else have these kind of things? [info] None [info] 1486650418
PhysAnx92 [info] How do I remove attention from my heart beat? Unfortunately I was diagnosed with anxiety many years ago and it's done well at making my life a living Hell.Often times I will become hyper-aware of my heart and heart beat and proceed to fly into a panic. This is interfering for obvious reasons.What methods can I do to prevent or at least reduce this? I already reduce my caffeine intake. [info] None [info] 1543043036
DrJonathanCrow [info] I have to stop listening to metal for awhile. A couple months ago, I was diagnosed with anxiety, and recently I figured out that when I'm under high stress, metal is a trigger [info] None [info] 1487849899
piclemaniscool [info] That's very important. I was diagnosed with anxiety partly because of my obsession for perfectionism. When I took a summer class in order to raise my GPA (I needed a C to make it an acceptable level) I didn't do one assignment. Even after all the talks about accepting all of this my dad kept asking why I refused to do that particular assignment when I *could*. I showed him my current average and how even if I got terrible grades for all future projects my final grade would be a B. He reluctantly accepted. Point of my story is that it is deeply ingrained in people through generations and it takes some serious introspection to reverse much of the damage it causes. We live in a world where well supported kids are living in fear because they genuinely believe that if they fail it is literally the end of the world. Teaching someone how to lose is twice as important as how to win, I'd say.  [info] None [info] 1382378999
CrazyProudMom25 [info] I don’t think convincing them will work.  Not from what I’ve seen on this sub. And with my nmom, even if she does concede it’s a hollow victory. She ended up convincing me to go to college instead of taking a year off school, and to do it for engineering instead of writing. I. Was. Miserable. Dropped out in a month. Six months later I was diagnosed with anxiety, social anxiety, adhd inattentive type, and got a provisional diagnosis for autism. And it’s only now, 6 years later, that she’s finally acknowledged that I sometimes am not up to doing some things, but there’s still this air of expectation that I’ll do it. I told her ‘maybe’ on something yesterday, and she told me ‘if you’re y up to it of course.’ But it felt like a hollow victory because she was assuming I’d even want to do what she suggested... because she didn’t even ask.So, I’d only try convincing them as much as you feel comfortable with, but it’s not likely to work and if it does it might be a hollow victory- maybe they’ll try to make you feel guilty about the choice but say ‘if you have to’. That sort of thing. See if you can get any friends or family to help out, talk to people, do research. Maybe you can find some easy thing for moving, maybe not. Maybe you’ll need to skip on moving things you’d like to keep but don’t need. Who knows? Just prepare as best as you can and make a lot of plans. [info] None [info] 1564142498
venhedis [info] I'm never sure if I have "real" panic attacks. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and everything, but so far the worse I've ever gotten is sobbing while feeling like I'm going to throw up.My usual panic state is basically being very very uncomfortable while trying to bottle the above. [info] Shitlord [info] 1452397304
bk513 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was about 14. I’m sure I do have anxiety, but it took until my senior year of high school for a doctor to say i might have ADHD. I’ve had trouble with time management and focusing since I was 6 years old, but I was always led to believe I was just a “slow worker.” I’ve never had problems with hyperactivity and I had good grades, so I guess that made it harder to see. Most of my anxiety stems from issues that have been caused by ADHD this whole time. Sometimes I wonder if I would have anxiety at all if I was diagnosed with ADHD as a kid. [info] None [info] 1548874515
Unknown-girl7 [info] I do have to take medication for my anxiety. I was diagnosed with anxiety by a psychologist. I’m also very shy and get anxious when interacting with people. I feel like that fits in the category of social anxiety. [info] None [info] 1550804037
whytofly [info] What my anxiety feels like... &gt;Before I was diagnosed with anxiety, I used to explain to my friend that I was in constant battle with my body. He said that he had no idea what I was talking about and asked me to describe it, below is the explanation of what it feels/felt like for me to live every day. *What I feel every day:** Every morning you wake up feeling like you just **drank three cups of coffee**. Your nerves are **humming** and you feel awake to the point where you are *almost* dizzy. * I want you to take a deep breath in your chest, breathe half out, then another one in that is deeper, the half out again, then in even deeper, then half out again. Now, breathe out all the way and before breathing regularly again, feel what your lungs feel like. They should **feel slightly strained** and maybe you are now more conscious of your heart. You should find it **hard to relax**, like you just ran a short sprint. This is what it feels like for me to breathe **every day**. * Do you remember how your stomach felt when you ate something that **disagreed with you** (or how it felt when you were sick). That's what my stomach feels like every time I eat **anything**. * Now I want you to think of that thing you did the other day or week that you are not proud of. Perhaps you yelled at someone you loved when they didn't deserve it, maybe you accidentally hit a car, reacted without thinking, perhaps you simply forgot to do your homework or made a mistake on a test. Think about what you did. **Keep thinking about it, running it over and over in your head.** If the event was strong enough, you should be feeling some sort of **guilt, shame, or general "bad" feeling about yourself.** Now try to stop thinking about it. If you are having trouble stopping, because of that feeling you are having, that is what I experience **every day**, except the feeling is there without any known cause. *Think about how confusing your world would be to **feel shame** most of the time **without knowing why**.** Finally, you need to be constantly terrified of losing control. **Terrified of the fear**. Afraid that you will get a panic attack again.  Each twitch of your body out of the ordinary scares you because it means that you *might* be panicking. Sometimes you'll hold your breath and wish it goes away, and that just makes it worse. Your **fear of your fear** creates a panic attack, and you sit there helpless watching your body and mind spiral out of control.&gt;If you want to share how anxiety feels for you every day I would love to hear it. Or if you have a better way of describing it to people, because one thing I think most people don't understand is that we aren't making this up. We aren't just "imagining" pain: it actually hurts. [info] None [info] 1314582323
Anonymouse290 [info] Ok, so how do you go about getting a service dog or a therapy dog? I've been diagnosed with anxiety disorder,  runs in my family.  I didn't know about this before I joined the army.   Now my anxiety is so bad it's damn near debilitating.   I know ppl probably think it's dumb,  but I can't get up in the morning without getting sick.  I've gone from 136lb to 112lb.  I have been seeing a doctor,  I've asked about it,  but they just keep giving me pills.   Now,  you have to see a specialty psych dr and there's only one place here.   You also have to sign a consent form,  saying that no one else will treat you for mental issues if you are already being seen. (So nothing from your primary physician is allowed). So  I have one place to go and the only thing they say when I ask about a dog is,  "try grounding techniques. " I'm so sick of that.... obviously it doesn't work. [info] None [info] 1556036602
yellowdayzzx [info] Saying Goodbye to my Therapy Dog as I’m off to Uni. I was diagnosed with anxiety this year and he has been there through every bad day and even worse night. I’m so grateful for Ollie and as a gift my parents got me a pillow with his face on!!!! As everyone knows I shall miss him more than anyone. [info] None [info] 1568239217
justatwister [info] I also went through a similar thing as a kid with the burglar stuff. It occurred during my tween years. I would check the doors and windows in the house several times before bed, and I slept with a bat next to my bed. I was in a constant panic that someone was going to break into our house in the night for some reason. I would often seek reassurance from others during conversations just to hear them tell me my intense fear of this was unlikely to turn into a reality. As an adult, I was diagnosed with anxiety, so a lot of things from childhood started to make sense in regards to my thought process.  [info] None [info] 1550989189
Godofwar512 [info] Like this. I use that app all the time. I have been diagnosed with anxiety as well. This app does the same for me and helps me calm down. Less reliant on Xanax because of it  [info] None [info] 1521908638
burf [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and basically all I felt was physiological symptoms, and therefore thought there was something physically wrong with me, so in my experience it's possible for anxiety to manifest in a purely/primarily physical sense. That said, any weird/new physiological symptoms are worth getting checked out. [info] None [info] 1431406003
svkadm253 [info] I notice this too. Especially at work. I'm in IT and outages are no fun - not life threatening danger but people get pretty mad and $$ gets lost. Everyone panics but I'm like OK let's do this. I recently explained to my boss that I was diagnosed with anxiety and he was like 'what, but you're so calm'. Meanwhile 3 hours earlier I had to shut my office door and hide under my desk for a few minutes to try and calm down and nothing actually bad happened. [info] None [info] 1560667245
anothermanoutoftime [info] Hey buddy-Your story mirrors my own in many ways. I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a few years ago, but it really reared its head in the last 6 months or so as I coped with a great deal of work stress. I would get home, eat supper with my wife, and play Skyrim until bedtime. Usually past bedtime, because I didn't want to leave that world where I was a hero, or a villain, or maybe just a simple leek farmer, who happened to also be Archmage of the College of Winterhold. On the weekends I'd sometimes load the game up after breakfast and only stop for dinner. I know exactly what you mean about the roleplaying aspect- I'd construct a character in my head and really dive into it, and all the worry and stress would slide away. I wasn't me, I was a Nord warrior with a grudge against necromancers, or a Khajiit trying to find redemption for past crimes. But I'm also here to tell you that it gets better- I'm on a new med combo that finally seems to be working, although one of them makes me sweat like a damn pig, and life looks bright instead of terrifying for the first time in a long time. I'm glassing up a bit here, so I'll just say keep moving forward, that's all any of us can do. And PM me anytime you want. And death to the Stormcloaks! [info] PC [info] 1470462618
WallFlower556 [info] Hands tingling? Hey guys, so today my landlord and her husband showed up to my apartment unannounced without and notice and began pounding on both my front door and back door at the same time, they began trying to get in, and looking through my windows to see if I had packed anything (I’m supposed to be out at the end of the month because of our agreement and me trying to leave because this isn’t the first time they have harassed me) their reason being because I haven’t answered their calls of her trying to see if I am all packed up because I was busy packing. Anyway I had heart palpitations galore as I called the police, and my hands started tingling. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD because of past trauma, but the hands tingling was a new one and I didn’t know if anyone else has experienced something like this before. I also have carpal tunnel, but it wasn’t the normal kind of flare up it happened when I started getting anxious, but I’m not sure if that’s a factor? Anyway thank you for taking the time to read this and I hope everyone is doing well. If you ever need someone to talk to and listen I am here for all of you! [info] None [info] 1577575637
dora_not_the_explora [info] During college I went to see my doctor about some stomach pains and breathing problems. She told me there was nothing wrong with my stomach and that it was all in my head, and that I was having breathing issues "because my lungs were resting on my spine and rib cage in a way where a rib would poke my lungs to tell me I needed to sit upright and breathe". Wtf? I was a biology major and took only one anatomy class and knew that wasn't it. I went to a different doctor and turns out I was diagnosed with anxiety and IBS. When I told her about what the last doctor said she had the same "wtf" look on her face I did.Reading everyone's comments, can someone tell me how the hell these kinds of people make it into medical school? And make it past medical school? It genuinely worries me that the med school interview process isn't doing anything to omit these idiots from making it through and potentially killing people from incompetence.  [info] None [info] 1534264057
Madame_Kitsune98 [info] I can have conversations, but sometimes I do draw a blank. It’s a little difficult at times.At the concussion clinic I was finally referred to? It was explained to me that if you had issues with things like anxiety, OCD, or ADHD before the concussion, they’re going to be somewhat worse afterwards. Well. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and OCD. My family practitioner, who is an APRN, and I sat down and filled out a questionnaire, and I likely have ADHD, but we never could get me in to see the psychiatrist to do testing for ADHD. So, I have four thousand browser tabs open in my brain, but jumping between them, there’s lag.I’m easily irritated. I used to have the anxiety dialed in, and between medication and good coping skills, I didn’t have an issue letting small things roll off me. I struggle to do that now. [info] None [info] 1563113641
theyseem [info] I hit a semi head on on the interstate in 2011. I have the same feeling to the point that if one day I was told by a randon stranger "you're dead. You've been dead." I wouldn't doubt it for a second and I wouldn'tfreak out.I feel like I'm dead because my life has gone far too well. Also people just disappear for years at a time, even if I remember them. Im kinda just rolling with it and enjoying my life as best as I can.I've been diagnosed with anxiety but I've never told my doctor I feel like I'm dead. I've never told anyone except my ex husband who was in the accident with me and he said he had the same feeling. [info] None [info] 1547410883
curiouscat1092 [info] I set up my first appointment with a therapist! For context, I'm a twenty-six year old young woman living in Upstate NY. I was diagnosed with anxiety and borderline personality disorder when I was twenty-two. I got out of a three-ish year long abusive relationship almost three years ago and have been rebuilding my life ever since. I spent almost a year single. Got a new job. Paid down debts. Spent time practicing self care.In February of '17, I met a wonderful young man who decided to join me on this journey we called life. We've been through A LOT together in these two plus years: his dad had two heart attacks, his mom has a history of breast cancer and has had other complications as a result. His little sister has had multiple dance related injuries. My grandmother was diagnosed with lung cancer. My brother underwent bariatric surgery. I say all this because the other day, I realized how stressed I've become. I realize that for the sake of my sanity and the health of my relationship, I need a healthy outlet to process my feelings. A place to go to work through my ish. So, I put together a list of therapists in my area, talked with my insurance, sent some emails, and waited. As luck would have it, there is a therapist who's practice is nearby me. So, we've tentatively scheduled a first session for a week from today!&amp;#x200B;Is there anyone else who, like me, took a look at their life and said, "Woah. I'm going to need get some help and get myself in order!"? (I mean, I know there are, it would just be nice to not feel so alone.) Besides seeking professional help, what else did you do to take care of your mental health and well-being? [info] None [info] 1559745308
Tam3DK1LL3R [info] My parents noticed I was caring different a couple months ago and I went to a psychiatrist. I was diagnosed with anxiety and I really felt like lying on some of the tests lol. [info] None [info] 1561870436
Hakunamatata98 [info] Yeah, just not sure if theres much motivation to get back, that's a tough hit to me. Especially since I am diagnosed with anxiety and literally this was killing me when he was trying to "fix" it. [info] https://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561198069233065 [info] 1442816586
MerchantofDeath79 [info] I know what you're going through. I was diagnosed with anxiety almost a year ago and my girlfriend of 5 years left me even before I could tell her about my struggles. The anxiety made dealing with the breakup a hell of a lot harder. I'd have panic attacks whenever I thought of her, which was almost always. I'd run out of classrooms and work, unable to catch my breath. To make things worse, I just kept getting high instead of dealing with my feelings.As cliched as it sounds, it gets better.  If someone would have told me the same a few months ago, I wouldn't have believed them. I feel so much better than I did for a long time. You'll have to work hard to get there. Read, listen to inspiring people, keep a journal, see a therapist and follow their instructions to the dot, avoid drinking and drugs. As amazing as your life was before, it can be better than your wildest dreams if you put your mind to it. Every single day will be rewarding because you'll know in your heart that you're doing everything you can to leave the past behind. That feeling is priceless. [info] None [info] 1540730455
JCashish [info] The comment below by [GoldenBirdSong](http://www.reddit.com/user/GoldenBirdSong) from another [thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/Meditation/comments/1uun8j/effect_of_meditation_on_anxiety/celvr73?context=3) is so damn good that I have to re-post it here. [{I've started meditating after my therapist suggested it to me. I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD, and I suffer from panic attacks.It took a while, but it's helping to the point where if I feel myself getting agitated I'll meditate for a few minutes and get less anxious. I also don't get anxious as often.The trick is not to grab onto any of your thoughts, just let them float by.When my mind is wandering or relaxed, the reason I get anxious is because my mind is latching onto thoughts and it turns into a spiral of obsessive anxiety.TL;DR: Try it. It helped me and you won't know if it helps you without trying.}] [info] None [info] 1390436103
FloBee82 [info] I certainly do! I started suffering from them in my mid-20's. I was diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder and since then I've been able to control it through behavior and meds. I can appreciate the show and T's perspective completely. Panic attacks are awful. I have never passed out but have been on the verge. I literally feel like I'm dying and they would come out of nowhere-just boom! [info] None [info] 1571941717
AfterChadley [info] F21 going bright red around males So, I have no clue how to word the title.   Basically, I am a 21 year old woman who will blush/go bright red around any, and I mean any, male I speak to (between the ages of probably 15-60?). I am unsure what I would class my sexuality, but I do swing more towards women than men, but the attraction to men is there, albeit it is very weak and rare that I am attracted to a man.  The blushing is not reserved for men I find attractive- if it was, I guess that would sort of make sense- it's men who are old, or fat, or bald, or shorter than me, just traits that I do not find attractive in the slightest. Men who I would never, ever consider going for. What I'm trying to say is... men I have zero attraction towards- the blushing is based on the sole reason that they have a penis.  I have major self esteem issues, but at the same time, I do consider myself attractive...   I was with a woman for three years and never did the whole blushing/making a fool out of myself with her. I don't do that with many women. I am a lot more comfortable being in a romantic relationship and platonic ones with women- I just rarely 'click' with men.  When a man starts trying to impress me, like when I saw a teacher of mine and he started flexing his arms and doing all that typical guy crap- I went bright red. Why?!   I avoid saying hello to men at work. If they think I'm a bitch, I get it. I say hello and good morning to every woman I work with, and a handful of men that I have build work-friendships with.  I have been diagnosed with anxiety and avoid social interaction, if that has any relevancy.  This blushing/going bright red thing has been around since I was a kid. My friends and adults would tease me and say I'd grow out of it, but I'm 21, when the hell am I going to grow out of it?! I am embarrassed by it, I do not want to be perceived as unfriendly or snobby and I do acknowledge how immature this whole situation is, but someone, please help me.   How do I get over this? It's really impacting my life and friendships in a negative way. [info] None [info] 1503475276
shaderade [info] I came to this thread to see if anyone answered with this! I've literally never been able to explain it. It happened for the first time when I was going into daycare. I've been reading the responses but they don't seem quite right. It's not because there's danger. It's just a fleeting moment of feeling like I'm in the wrong place, if not the wrong universe. I don't know what triggers it other than sometimes the sun shines a certain way or very occasionally anything dealing with sexuality.I used to call it "feeling like different people" as a kid. Edit: I've seen some comments about anxiety. I was diagnosed with anxiety just before I turned 19 but this started happening when I was 3 or 4. [info] None [info] 1514387572
Inanotherlifetime [info] Well I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder a few years ago when I consulted with someone but had the same "symptoms" growing up. I don't have anxiety around everyone however. I'm actually a very social person and make conversation with people very easily. However, I have anxiety with my relatives since I was a little girl and didn't even know or understand why. I used to make excuses to not see them and still do. I haven't even met my baby cousin yet because I'm afraid to see them. It wasn't until I went to therapy that it was explained to me that I'm in fear of letting in people who I love the most. Because where there is love more, there is more pain. It's a working progress and I hope to overcome this. [info] None [info] 1397458640
Squirminlikeatoad [info] Workout with Anxiety? Hello there, hope you are all well? I have a question about working out. First off, I'm still relatively new to reddit, so if this question isn't suitable for this r/ then please feel free to let me know. :)Now, my question for you. I have been diagnosed with anxiety over a year ago, and one side affect of this mental illness is fake pains (palpatations, random muscle aches and panic attacks) that pose no threat to my body. I know it is just a release of adrenaline, and luckily have learned to control my mental health for day to day activities.However, whenever I work out (that is, anything more than a small jog or a walk) I always fear that my heart is beating too fast or I'm simply going to die (wonderful feeling). I am happy to say that due to diet alone and cutting out bad food (and walking) I went from 18st (252 lbs) down to 16 and a half St (230 lbs). But I do not feel stronger, and I wish I could tone up now.I'm a 23 year old male 6' and have no medical conditions (other than being overweight lol)Any advice, people? Any tips on what to do? I'd love to hear some stories of your own. Thank you, stay safe, and have a good night. [info] None [info] 1587002768
b_port [info] I mean, before I was diagnosed with anxiety they ran a bunch of tests on me to make sure it wasn't something else. I had to pay a decent chunk of change for all those tests, but it was definitely worth it to find out that the only thing that's wrong with me is anxiety.  [info] None [info] 1534266429
NothingButTime1 [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety and stress. I have pretend everything is peachy for my employees. [info] None [info] 1423714933
nightoracle [info] Definitely talk to a professional. I was diagnosed with anxiety first a couple of years ago and I fully attributed all my symptoms to that even though it really wasn’t all due to anxiety (e.g. not being able to sleep wasn’t because i was anxious but because i was so excited and ready to just go go go). But my anxiety got better and the problems were still there so once I looked more into ADHD and remembered how I was still this way before anxiety it led to me getting assessed for ADHD  [info] None [info] 1551642539
pkafan4lyfe [info] Does anyone have any experience with getting prescriptions via tele-health visits? As a child I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and as I grew up I was able to find ways to cope and manage it all on my own. However, with this global pandemic going on I am starting to relapse it seems in terms of my anxiety. It’s getting to the point where the worry of what is going to happen to my loved ones consumes my mind for entire days. At this point I feel like it’s time to talk to my doctor about some sort of temporary treatment but my primary physicians office is shut down for non essential appointments until further notice? What are my next steps here? [info] None [info] 1586800408
BrookieeWookiee [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety before I was diagnosed with IBS, so I had been on 10 mg of Prozac daily for several years. I bumped up to 20 about 6 months ago and think it has really helped with my IBS. I've also found that my fast-acting anxiety med (klonopin) helps as well. My symptoms just aren't as bad when I am calm. [info] None [info] 1465751575
almondsandolives [info] Waiting for 7-week appointment What did you guys do to calm your nerves? I can't take it! It's still two weeks away and I'm driving myself crazy. I am googling every little thing like crazy and am a nervous wreck all the time. I get nervous if I have cramps, when I don't have cramps, when I'm becoming less tired, or my headaches go away. I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 9 and struggle with it often still, though I'm unmedicated and really living my best life, I just don't remember being this anxious when I had my first...&amp;#x200B;Also, side question, I was so tired a few days ago with headaches, and now I don't have them. Is that normal for symptoms to go away like that or is that a bad sign?&amp;#x200B;Sincerely, Super anxiety-ridden mom [info] STM | 3 year old | Due 12/31/19 [info] 1556301954
LindemannO [info] Haha I was diagnosed with anxiety and desperation a couple of months back. It definitely doesn’t help my situation, and in fact, it probably holds a lot of weight as to why I am feeling this way. Thanks very much for your detailed comment - and I’m truly sorry to hear you suffer as well - I hope you’re doing okay. :) [info] None [info] 1528821899
ishotthedeputy9 [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety and ADHD, so my mind requires ritalin in order to work without making me think about monster trucks and explosions all day. [info] None [info] 1411569093
steel-toedboots [info] Kind of a rant, kind of need help Hi everyone, first post and longtime lurker. I've been diagnosed with anxiety for about 2 years now and have had some ups and downs like everyone. In the last few months, my panic attacks have gotten slightly worse but I'm happy to say I'm seeing a new doctor on Monday and am going to talk with them about it and see what they think would be best for me in my current condition. Recently, I've noticed that I can get out a panic attack really quickly by inducing vomiting. I don't want this to be an easy fix but has anyone else dealt with this? I really hated learning this because now when I have a really bad attack, instead of waiting it out and growing from an attack, I know that I can just end it early on by vomiting. This past Wednesday I had a horrible attack when I was out with my parents and had to stay in the bathroom the entire time. I felt horrible but I knew I had to get out of the store soon so I made myself vomit there and we left but I kept vomiting the rest of the night and really just felt like shit. I know that this isn't a cure and Wednesday really proved that to me. I don't really know what I'm asking for in this post, I guess I'm just wondering if anyone else has dealt with this and what you did to stop yourself from gravitating towards an easy out. I'm grateful for this sub for being a hub where I feel welcome and where I'm not the only one who deals with anxiety. Some of my friends have a hard time understanding what I got through and this sub is a great place for me to go to when I feel alone.&amp;#x200B;Thanks for the comments and help in advance. [info] None [info] 1557022302
inthebookcorner [info] I'm not sure, but I have been diagnosed with anxiety (and panic attacks) and I'm a Scorpio.  [info] None [info] 1486587628
EepressoDepresso [info] Panic attacks and anxiety attacks are two different things, I have both.Panic: chest tightness, hyperventilating, dizziness from hyperventilating, feeling likes you're dying, lasts from a minute to an hour or soAnxiety: stressed, easily annoyed, nitpicking, etc I was diagnosed with anxiety and Panic disorder about a year ago [info] None [info] 1571350359
idfkanymore_ [info] My hair keeps falling out when I’m anxious. It has been going on for a while now. I’m not bald (yet) but the amount of hair I lose in the shower is ridiculous. I swear I have accumulated the same amount of hair on my head with the hair I have lost over time. If I stored every clump of hair that sits in the drain after every shower I have had since the moment I was diagnosed with anxiety, I would be able to tell what days I was most anxious.... I could also make a wig. [info] None [info] 1527066005
ramsay_baggins [info] My fiance and I have been together just over five years.In that time he has stood by me as I became physically ill with fear of confronting my flatmates in halls at University, as I stressed and stressed and stressed with Uni work, as I developed anxiety doing my dissertation, as I had really bad worries about getting a job after graduating, as I was diagnosed with anxiety because of the job I got...Just before I graduated I got really sick. Had to go to the hospital at 3am after only developing symptoms about six hours beforehand. He was panicking more than I was, but he sorted transportation, held my hand the whole way through, and then looked after me when I was bedridden for a week, couldn't eat and could hardly move.He held my arm for support everywhere I went when I got labrynthitis and couldn't walk unaided because I had lost all sense of balance.He came literally running to comfort me when I found out my stepsister had been involved in a serious and potentially life-threatening accident.He still talks me down when I had panic attacks and random freakouts.He reads me to sleep every night because he knows it helps me calm down. He even puts up with me when I interrupt him with questions or random observations about the story or character.He always encourages me in pretty much everything I do.He's wonderful. [info] None [info] 1417631451
mathilda420 [info] I could have written this myself about 2 years ago. I didn't actually understand what death really meant until I was 24 - noone in my life had ever died. But in the space of a month my grandpa died, 2 of my friends' mothers both died and a guy who I used to volunteer with died too. All of them were sudden. I was already going through a lot and this totally messed me up. I was like you and unable to understand how people were able to live knowing they might die at any second. It was around this time I was diagnosed with anxiety (lot of other stuff happened at the same time.)Now though, the knowledge that I am going to die one day makes me feel peaceful. It gives my life more meaning than it had before and things are more beautiful and special than they were before. I'm just so happy that I'm alive. I make the most of my time.It didn't take me long to deal with it, a couple of months, but it was hard. But the thing that REALLY brought me peace was getting out amongst nature and the realisation that I am so insignificant in the grand scheme of things, but still a part of the world. I was standing by a river under this huge tree and all these birds were singing and there was so much life all around me. It was beautiful. And I thought "it doesn't matter if I die, all of this will still be the same. The tree will still be there, the water will still run by, the birds will still sing and the grass will still grow." It just really struck me, and I just felt so much better about death after that. I'm like you, in that I have a knack for science but also a very spiritual side. Getting out in the natural world really reconciles the two and gives you perspective.This might not be what helps you, everyone is different, but it's an example. I don't agree with people when they say "don't think about it and just ignore it." It's not helpful, and I think truly accepting and coming to terms with your own mortality really gives you a different, much better perspective of life! Ignoring that doesn't fix it. You are totally not alone in this, if you want to talk or anything, feel free to PM me. I know how scary it is, but it's amazing when you get out the other side. :)  [info] None [info] 1368207586
jamessayshowdy [info] Honestly I really thought for the longest time it was normal to worry about everything and always be stressed out. When I was diagnosed with anxiety I was like "wait wut".  [info] None [info] 1554241591
Mollyisme33 [info] Considering the linx procedure or nissen fundoplication with summary Hi, quick back story, I'm 19 years old I was diagnosed with acid reflux when I was 6 months old I have been on every tablet in the book and I'm currently on double the dose I should be for my rabeprasole and ranitidine and still am waking up with heart burn every night and feeling sick after every meal. Surprisingly i don't throw up very often but if I do I have become a master of just swallowing it and continuing with my day. When i was 8 I moved out of the UK and to China my symptoms worsened due to stress so had a load of tests which were traumatic as the hospital was dirty and there were chickens outside my room. I moved back to he uk to live with my grandfather when I was 17, I was diagnosed with anxiety and my acid got worse again due to stress. I decided at 18 I would move home with my family and try and get my acid fixed.  I go through private healthcare as I need this fixed as soon as possible (I've heard the horror stories of having reflux a long time) after 2 endoscopys and a manometry test all my results came back normal despite me having severe symptoms that night. To be fair i wasn't able to eat during the manometry test as it kept tugging which was very uncomfortable. My local consultant doesn't do the procedure but was hesitant to do either the linx or the nissen fundoplication as I have trouble swallowing sometimes. I haven't seen many cases of acid reflux in a person my age but I'm hoping that I can get some insight from older generations :) On to my main question, I am planning on having the linx procedure with bupa (an insurance company) but I have to be rather sure as the closest surgeon is 2 and a half hours away. I was wondering if people could share their experiences with the procedure. Any experiences with the nissen fundoplication would be most welcome too. Thank you all *summary: 19 with acid reflux all life, difficulty swallowing was wondering if anyone could share their experiences with either the linx procedure or the nissen fundoplication [info] None [info] 1506551295
chmagriff [info] How do I learn to let myself be loved? I've been diagnosed with anxiety and PTSD following traumatic incidents from my childhood. I'm doing so much better than I was, but some days, I fall apart and can't stop crying. I hate myself for being weak, and I apologize so much to my loved ones. My boyfriend just holds me through it, and wipes my tears away. I love him tremendously, and he would do anything for me, but I still find myself asking why he chooses to be with me when I feel like a failure. [info] None [info] 1540672865
Omars-comin [info] Curious..did your doctor(s) specifically tell you that the reason they are skeptical of you is because they have so many other people claiming to have POTS/dysautonomia? Personally, I may have never gotten an official diagnosis if it hadn’t been for my own research and some level of self diagnosing. I’m actually shocked to see that some people have gotten diagnosed quickly/easily because that couldn’t be further from the case for me. I’ve been highly symptomatic since I was 11 years old, but I had no idea that POTS even existed until a few years ago (I’m currently 30). I had a fainting episode and wound up in the ER because I hit my head on my tile floor. I noticed that every time I went from lying down to sitting up in the hospital bed, the heart rate monitor started going off to alert the doctors that my hear rate had gone above 120bpm (no one checked on me). The next day, I typed in “tachycardia upon sitting up” into google, and POTS was the first thing to come up. I have since been diagnosed with EDS and POTS, nearly 20 years after becoming symptomatic. One issue is a lot of doctors aren’t referring people to get the proper testing done. I didn’t have any ANS testing done until I got insurance that doesn’t require referrals to specialists. I was never referred to anyone by my GP. I quite literally was my own doctor and referred myself and demanded the tests that I felt I needed. It’s not *our* job as patients to request specific referrals/tests based on our symptoms, but that’s the experience I had. My primary doctor(s) should have looked at my symptoms and told me **everything** I should get tested for based on those symptoms, but instead I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and sent on my way time after time. I feel that anxiety should only be diagnosed after tests are done to rule out any and all conditions (no matter how uncommon/unlikely said conditions are) that have similar physical symptoms. Unfortunately, that’s not typically how it goes. Anxiety is diagnosed despite no tests for other conditions being done. Actually, if I’m being honest, I don’t think primary care doctors should be diagnosing or treating anxiety anyway. Leave that to psychiatrists. I agree that people who have had *negative* testing should accept the fact that POTS/dysautonomia isn’t their issue and keep searching for other possibilities. I also agree that people shouldn’t necessarily be recommending specific medications to people who are undiagnosed, but at the end of the day, that person is going to have to see a doctor in order to obtain medication(s). I think the majority of POTS treatment is harmless and isn’t going to have any ill effects on people who don’t have POTS. There are *always* going to be illness fakers. There’s nothing that can be done about that. That doesn’t give ANY doctor the right to dismiss symptoms just because an illness is “trendy”. Doctors who are doing that need to be fired by the patient. Period. I actually think part of the reason this particular condition is so popular amongst fakers is because it is *known* to be misdiagnosed and get blown off by doctors. Perhaps if doctors took *everyone’s* symptoms seriously and did a better job at getting dysautonomia patients diagnosed in a timely manner, people would be less inclined to fake this condition. Edited for spelling and grammar [info] None [info] 1566068655
AllRebelRocker [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and major depressive disorder long before IBD. Would that mess with the survey? I'd be happy to take it, but I don't want to ruin your results!  [info] C.D. [info] 1414101483
unfromageluv [info] i'm diagnosed with anxiety disorder. got hospital records-suicide.also got hallucinations in my case files [info] None [info] 1446251311
InnerMattDemons [info] Contrast:I have been diagnosed with anxiety for around 11 years by now. I've been working on managing it for all those 11 years, with mixed effect.I know I'm "wrong" - in that I'm unable to do a lot of things that should be simple. I hate myself for this. Truly, deep down inside hate myself, for being unable to do so many basic things. I don't want to bother people, so when it's bad I have a really hard time reaching out. I just isolate myself and feel lonely, wishing I could get away from the constant bombardment of thoughts about how awful I am, and how many things I cannot do.So, I'm working on trying to accept myself more. Not hate myself for my flaws and limitations. Not hit myself in the head with all the simple things I cannot get myself to do.Stuff isn't always easy to fix. God knows I'd love to not feel this way; I go to weekly therapy, have listened to innumerable audiobooks, lectures, YouTube videos, ... about it.I'd love to be able to fix it that easily. I haven't managed in 11 years.So, I'm sorry for trying to embrace it and not hate myself for once. No one wants to feel this way, and it isn't always easy to fix.---More constructively: If you see someone who is clearly holding themself in a destructive or dysfunctional pattern, perhaps they don't know how to break it. Perhaps they just don't know how to do it in a better way. Perhaps they get overwhelmed by trying to change it. There can be a myriad of reasons.Rather than look down on them for not fixing it, you might consider talking to them about it. Perhaps even offer to help them with it. That way lies progress; not in judging someone for the things they have a hard time with. [info] None [info] 1556531824
my8ponies89 [info] Anxiety as explained to those who don't understand [Rant] I'm sure this has been done before, but I've got to rant and this seems the place to do it.I was diagnosed with anxiety a few years ago at the age of 26. I went through debilitating periods growing up where I had no idea what was going on. My parents thought I was faking attacks for attention. I was never taken to a doctor, never given medication. I dealt with these attacks in very, very poor fashion. First I used sports, and then turned to alcohol and drugs as I got older. I try to mask being petrified about meeting new people, large crowds etc. by acting out, and sometimes attracting negative attention. I will go to a new gym, get to the parking lot, and talk myself out of going inside because I can feel the adrenaline starting to rise. I want to get out and make new friends, but I am terrified at the thought of going to new meetups or social gatherings without someone I already know. I became pregnant last year at the age of 28, and had to quit my medication (xanax) cold turkey. Counseling helped some, but not very much. I married a man who doesn't have the slightest idea of what I go through. He tells me I have a good life, I shouldn't worry about anything etc. When I act out and worry/get stressed/have an attack, he would tell me I'm a horrible person, not nice, worry about stupid things, and a plethora of other comments that never helped.  My mistake was not going back to my doc immediately, putting my kiddo on formula and getting back on anxiety meds. I wanted the best for my daughter and thought that was being breastfed. I wasn't concerned about me, but I should have been. It has ended up with my husband filing divorce paperwork and leaving me and my infant to fend for ourselves.As you can imagine, that did not help things. Of course, my friends are all team my8ponies89, and his are all on his side. But when trying to explain how my anxiety contributed (I say that, because it wasn't all my fault that we ended up at this point) my friends don't understand. They say such things as:* just focus on the big picture* don't worry about anything. You will be ok.* shake it off* get over it (as said by my soon to be ex)Debilitating doesn't even describe what I go through when an attack happens. I can be sitting there, minding my own business, when a nasty thought enters my head. All of a sudden, my brain has torpedoes locked on that one thought, and we are going to fire and make that thought explode into fifty other thoughts about how bad things are, what could go wrong and how it's going to totally fuck me over. Chaos ensues in my mind. Physically, my heart is beating so fast it feels like I am out on a run. I'm sweaty, I'm scared. My chest hurts. I can't breathe. On the outside, I may look only slightly amiss. But mentally, I'm a wreck. I'm helpless. It consumes me. My mind has my body in a jail cell in the depths of hell, and I am a prisoner within the confines of my head.I stay like that for what seems like hours, although it may only be a few minutes. I try to function normally. I have to take care of my daughter. I have to drive. I have to work. I have to do XYZ, but I don't even remember doing it half the time. Then, it starts to subside. I slowly regain focus and composure. I made it through one more. I can go on about my day.Until the next one. I have an appointment today to try Paxil, which is safe for breastfeeding. Wish me luck. [info] None [info] 1383575742
GonnSoares [info] Hey there. If that helps, years ago I have been diagnosed with anxiety by some sort of general medicine professional. When that happened, my symptons were mostly physical and I ended up going to the hospital emergencies because of a panic attack, thinking I was having an heart attack and I was going to die (I made a dozen of cardiovascular exams) . Now, years later, I still deal with those physical symptons (and worse), but emotionally and psychologically I feel just like you described. I can't sleep, I don't feel motivated to do anything and I think about death uncountable times during the day. Are you having any physical symptons (concretely and in detail) that are a constant? I would be glad if I could help you. [info] None [info] 1492483973
CornOnTheKobGuy [info] Dude you aren't alone in that looping. The second time I smoked I hit it hard, didn't realize I had anxiety and then I lost touch with reality only to come back to it which was, in a sense, even more terrifying because I knew that it was actually happening. Since then I have been diagnosed with anxiety. Turns out my mom suffers from it too. I don't really smoke any more.  [info] None [info] 1371277396
MOproblems614 [info] I'm scared they won't be around when I'm old when I was 17 I was with a girl that was 23 she have a script of 120 hydros and 90 blue/purple Xanax I'm 27 now and have never got a constant supply of opioids with back and knee problems and I have been diagnosed with anxiety could not get better than a script of .5 Klonopin I had for 3 years then jerked off of them gave only 2 months to taper down so I'm scared by the time I'm 40 opioids might be a drug of the past [info] None [info] 1561063784
absurdlyastute [info] &gt; ... but dealing with antagonistic people is so commonplace that it doesn't trigger that kind of response.You said that you avoid social situations IRL though. If you get anxiety with your peers, I don't understand how you can avoid anxiety during times of duress--especially after you said you'd push past someone like me to avoid confrontation. I've been diagnosed with anxiety (who hasn't these days) and while what you said sounds good on paper, I don't believe you're being candid.    Why does it have to be something beyond curiosity? You create a theory about someone, and you attempt to validate it directly/indirectly. It does usually have a side effect in that if someone believes there is another person calling them out on lies, that they will think twice about lying. E.g. Someone similar to /u/mvincent17781 used to delete every single one of his comments that scored below 1 for two years. When I asked why, he stubbornly refuted deleting any of his comments. However, in the next week or so 50% of his commentary scored zero or below. I never bullied or upset the guy, but his behavior changed. If you can apply what you've learned to real life that would be an incredible tool to avoid conflict, scams, and unscrupulous sales people. On top of that you can improve others' days or your own. There are women at the grocery store I visit that call me their work son/bf. The guys at the meat counter don't know my name, but they give me free steaks from behind the counter or 50% discounts on their prepackaged meats. Is that not the least bit interesting?I'm not here to fight. I'm only answering the questions you're putting forward.  [info] None [info] 1520004927
sexygrandma10 [info] Fear of Borderline Personality Disorder I have suffered from anxiety all of my life.  Although I am diagnosed with anxiety, I have found from constantly searching the internet that it is likely OCD.  I used to be obsessed with going to heaven when I was little.  I routinely would say three prayers every night.  This turning into ten prayers, then ten prayers three times daily, etc.  I grew out of that.  Then I had health anxiety for many years about cancer and other diseases.  It completely drained me, but I eventually got over that and was able to laugh about it.  Then I experiences ROCD which eventually drove me away from my boyfriend because he got so self-conscious after I would always feel the need to "confess" to him.It got better for a year, but in the blink of an eye it was back.  I am in a new relationship and it is perfect.  Literally everything that I have ever wanted in a guy.  However, my anxiety has taken over my life about guilt from past events.  I feel the need to confess or else I feel like he doesn't know "my true self".Because I have been googling so much I have stumbled upon Schizophrenia, Bipolar Disorder, and BPD.  I am terrified I have BPD (I was scared of the other two, but I relate the most to this one.) I am scared to go to my counseling appointment in fear that they will diagnose me and it will ruin my relationship.I have had symptoms in the past of it when I was like in middle school and high school.  Now I am almost graduated from college and I am much more mature.I wish I had an answer, but I have been googling for the past three hours and worrying and have not been able to do my homework [info] None [info] 1519880528
iloveanimals77 [info] A year ago I thought I had heart problems and saw a cardiologist and nothing came up so I was like huh weird. Also I have been seeing a therapist for about 4 years now. That year specifically was really bad for me emotionally and low and behold I was diagnosed with anxiety and put on lexapro and it does help me a lot I just wish I didn't have to take it due to a lot of negative side affects and for whenever I have to stop taking it like pregnancy withdrawal will be living hell. So I would love to one day be able to deal with my anxiety without medication. [info] None [info] 1459890575
CCarrotTwo [info] Anxious that I'm not actually anxious... sorry about this [rant] guys So I've been diagnosed with anxiety. Or I guess so. A major issue I've run into with doctors is that I don't know when I am diagnosed and when they are throwing out a hypothesis. Is there a paper somewhere that tells me what I'm diagnosed with? (Like asthma, I have an inhaler does that mean I have asthma?)Anyways I guess I've had panic attacks. Moments when I couldn't breathe and broke down crying or started ripping whatever was in my hands without the ability to stop mostly. What qualifies as a panic attack though? And I know I worry about everything. But I always thought everyone did that. It makes sense to worry about what I worry about really. I don't think it's all that strange that someone would worry about buying books for college or a new rug or walking a dog down a busy road. Wouldn't that be along the lines of things that are normal to worry about? I can see why people might think that anxiety has a hold over my life because I haven't been in a movie theatre in four years but that seems like nothing compared to some of the things you guys talk about on here. You know, I don't think staying away from theatres is hindering my social life all that much. Not compared to people who have problems holding jobs or getting out of the house. I don't want to sound like I'm judging those people either. Because we all fight something. I fight movie theatres I guess. But anyways I'm going on medication soon and while I'm not against medication I don't want to be taking another pill just because the doctor wants to appease me or my mom. So now I'm convinced that I sound like the biggest load of bullshit to anyone reading this. I actually sound like a real asshole who is seeking attention but I hope someone understands where I'm coming from here. I work so hard to be as normal as I can be. If I really have anxiety then so be it, but I don't want to be carrying around some diagnosis for someone else's benefit. [info] None [info] 1373525536
exposeyourself2art [info] I've been diagnosed with anxiety, minor OCD, PTSD, and hypothyroidism. Whenever I go on thyroid medication, I get depressed. I tell my doctor this, and I'm always told that the thyroid medication is supposed to do the opposite. Well, it's a very obvious trigger for me, and it makes me not want to be on any medication at all. [info] None [info] 1397736852
allygory [info] * I have two, I was diagnosed with both anxiety and laryngitis for several years before getting a proper diagnosis of hypothyroidism because the doctor(s) I saw thought i was just angling for weight loss drugs* I was diagnosed with anxiety and IBS for, no exaggeration, 35 years before getting diagnosed correctly with Celiac  [info] None [info] 1383583887
oliviabluesky [info] How I cured myself Hi all, my name is Olivia. I am 19 and I live in England. In February 2019 I was diagnosed with anxiety and a panic disorder. In other words hypochondria or Health Anxiety. I can say now that those months were the darkest most horrible months of my entire life. It is the most horrible thing I have ever experienced and I send my love to each one of you who feel this, I know what pain and suffering you are going through and I hope my words help some what ❤️My trigger:I never intended to ever touch class A drugs. I never thought I would. I loved my drink and weed but i’d never step over the “line”. When I met my boyfriend (the love of my life) everything was the best it had ever been. He came back from a festival to tell me he’d tried Ecstasy. I was so angry with him and felt so left out. As I was also friends with his mates too. The way he described it made it sound so appealing. “You’ll have the best night of your entire life” “it makes you feel the happiest you’ve ever been”. I was terrified of trying it because of hearing the deaths from it but I did eventually and it didn’t sit right with my the first time and was so intense compared to your weed high but I wanted to fit in. So I did it again and again. This time it was amazing. I went to uni and did it instead of drinking with the worry still lingering in the back of my mind of how dangerous it is and damaging. It became my life. I had no interest in anything else. When’s the next rave? When am I next doing it? It wasn’t until February where I woke up after a heavy night on it. I felt different. The days that followed after were different. A weird aching in my chest that wouldn’t go away and was gradually getting worse. My stomach hurt too. What if I’ve damaged my heart? What if I’ve damaged my stomach? I kept needing to pee too. What if I’ve damaged my bladder? The thoughts poured in like a cancer to my brain. Fearing my drug use had messed me up. I smoked weed a lot too. Like 4 times a day. As I was miserable because I missed my boyfriend. I got offered it while I was feeling all of this. I went down and smoked it. With the thoughts in the back of my mind being, weed makes your heart beat fast, what if you have damaged your heart. I started walking to the supermarket at night. The thoughts got more intense. My heart pounding faster and faster. My chest hurting and getting tighter. Feeling lightheaded and couldn’t breath. I thought I was having a heart attack. It was actually my first ever panic attack. What came to follow was hell. At least 4 panic attacks a day. I couldn’t relax, couldn’t resist or ignore more thoughts. I got an overactive bladder which would make me pee all the time and make my bladder hurt. IBS too which would have me almost crying with the stomach cramps it gave me. My neck would tense all the time and hurt. My chest the worst, it hurt so bad and I felt it constantly even if I didn’t feel anxious which was fucked up which definitely made me think something was wrong with my heart. Any pain or weird feeling meant I was about to die. I couldn’t sleep. It was hard to eat. I couldn’t go out and do anything anymore. I had an ambulance called from having a panic attack so bad they thought I was having a heart attack. I literally thought I was going to die that night. We’ve all thought we were about to die uncountable times. I was not safe anywhere as how can you escape your own body? I didn’t feel safe in my own skin. The cure?:I thought I was going to be stuck like this my entire life. I became suicidal yet funnily enough fearing death was what my anxiety was centred around. My boyfriend, my beautiful boyfriend stuck by my side every step of the way. The state I was in, he should have walked out, I wouldn’t have blamed him. He wasn’t the best at comforting me but he stayed. He got me through it mostly. I moved home from University. Safe with my family.  No longer worrying that if I died in my sleep in my university accommodation no one would find me. I was on Propanol for a couple months. It helped a little but it made me more anxious being reliant on something that effected your heart. I tried diazepam also but that made my anxiety so much worse. I came off my medication slowly. I found that coming off it helped me so much. I had CBT therapy. It taught me what all these pains and weird feelings were. Now imagine you’re walking in the woods and a bear starts chasing you. What do you do? You run and you are scared of course. It’s the fight or flight response. You’re body is protecting you, preparing you to run. You get scared of something your heart beats fast to get your blood to your muscles so you can get away. Breathing is hard as your heart is beating so fast you aren’t used to it. The chest pains is your chest not used to functioning so highly, like an aching muscle while exercising. The lightheadedness, the sickness and numbness is blood circulation. As everything is being pushed to your muscles to get you ready to run. The need to pee all the time, making your body lighter to get away quicker. Same with being sick. What you feel it’s your body keeping you safe. If you are under stress it upsets your digestive symptom. The mind and your body are so connected. Even if you don’t feel anxious there are still subconscious thoughts causing it. You’ll all be happy to know that if you were having a heart attack your heart would be slowing not beating fast. Your heart beating fast is a really good thing. It means you are alive!!! I stopped my bad habits. Which were googling my symptoms and checking my pulse. I felt something weird I had to know what it was. I’d google it which would come up with , you have cancer which meant panic attack. Google would blow things out of proportion. I started by asking my mum to google stuff instead. Or I’d tell her what I was feeling and she’s give me a reasonable response. Feel free to go to the doctors too. It was a relief for me. I got so many tests done so I had that to hold on to know everything I was feeling was anxiety caused. I stopped checking my pulse. As soon as I weaned myself off. I stopped hearing my heart all the time. It stopped beating rapidly every time I woke up and slowly the chest pains and palpitations stopped too. The voice of reason! Curing your self takes a lot of work! You have to want it and put your all into it. My anxious voice which took the spot light in my brain had to be over thrown. Introducing the voice of reason. You have to battle your anxious thoughts with fact, reason and truth. For example, I was shopping the other day and my vision went blurred and black for a second. Old me would have lost my shit. My first thoughts were eye cancer! You’re going blind! Then the voice of reason says. When had this ever happened before? If you were going blind it would be more obvious. You didn’t get much sleep last night your body will do weird things. You have to battle till the bitter end. Practice even if it starts small. Don’t let the anxious thoughts win. I got this app for my panic attacks called beat panic. It talks you through it and without it I don’t know what I would have done. It’s blissful. I stopped drinking and drugs all together. Therefor had no trigger and allowed my brain to heal. I got a job, it helped distract me so much. It will be hard at first but slowly but surely you’ll see it fade away. I still get the odd chest pain here and there. If I feel really ill it comes out. But I’m myself again. I’m so proud of myself. You can be too. I stop an anxious thought the second it approaches. The voice of reason now has the spotlight. I haven’t had a panic attack in months. After all that worrying, I’m still here. I didn’t die after all. What does that show you? Good luck everyone, I’m always here to talk if you need advice but you can do this, I promise :) [info] None [info] 1572901293
Eeyoreandpiglet [info] For me, I have the life that most people would envy.  I had not a care in the world.  You know that feeling you get when someone runs out in front of your car and you just miss them by a hair?  I had this feeling all the time.  That's when I found out they were panic attacks.  They came out of nowhere and for no reason.  Then the digestive issues....for no reason.  Then the crushing chest pain, shoulder pain, and left sided tingling for no reason. I was at the hospital numerous times for heart attack symptoms. I had all the tests imaginable.  Nothing serious ever showed up.  I hated this!!!!  I was diagnosed with anxiety.  My body produces anxiety for no reason.  So yes, in most cases, it is after you get checked out for numerous other serious ailments that anxiety came to the forefront. So I take anti anxiety medication to keep it under control.  This has been a long struggle.  Thanks for venting. [info] None [info] 1516215417
brearose [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety 14 years ago and with ADHD last week. I was put on citalopram last friday. I've had no problems so far, but it also hasn't helped yet (it takes a couple weeks to start working). My doctor said that ADHD medications can actually make anxiety worse, so it's common to take meds for ADHD and anxiety. I'm not on ADHD medication yet, because my doctor wants me to wait until the citalopram starts working first, but I will be taking citalopram and an ADHD med, so it is safe. [info] None [info] 1521078835
NervousHooleelia [info] 25, no sexual experience, can't for the life of me get a tampon in, just set up my first ever gyno appointment, seeking advice Tl;dr: I think I have vaginismus but maybe it's an abnormal hymen. I just set up an appointment for a pap smear. I was too embarrassed to talk to the receptionist about my concerns and they made the appointment with a nurse practitioner. Should I call back and get it changed to an appointment with the doctor?I tried once to get a tampon in as a teenager, gave up and never tried again til this week. I have been trying every day for the past 3 days. I went out and bought a stand mirror and actually got a good look down there for the first time, and I can't even really see a hole. I did some googling and found that it is possible I have some sort of physical abnormality with the hymen that is preventing penetration. Then I learned about vaginismus and that seems extremely likely to apply to me. I grew up in a very conservative religious household and took the religion very seriously til I was 22. I never explored my body in any way til that point. I have been diagnosed with anxiety in the last year. I was sexually abused one time as a young child. Pretty much all the psychological risk factors. So I did research on nearby OB/GYNs that take my insurance and found a well reviewed clinic  with two doctors that specialize in adolescent gynecology. I figured either of them would be a good fit for me because, although I'm 25, my experience level means I might as well be 14. So I call to set up the appointment, they ask what for, I say I'm 25 and never had a pelvic exam and just thought I should get a check up. They set the appointment for a week and a half from now with a nurse practitioner. I wonder if I had been more open about my concerns with the scheduler if they would have set it up with one of the doctors. What will the nurse practitioner do if they can't do the exam? Will they call in a doctor? Should I call and make a new appointment and make sure it is with a doctor? Any other general advice for a first pelvic exam for someone who probably has severe vaginismus?Thanks in advance for any responses [info] None [info] 1535124523
nimsaywhatnow [info] Lack of anxiety making ADHD symptoms worse I was diagnosed with anxiety recently, with ADHD in the shadows to be dealt with after the anxiety, and started taking celexa 2 months ago. I have been really responsive to the meds and now I honestly no longer feel anxious at all. On one hand, cool, this is what I wanted, but on the other, I feel like anxiety (when it has been manageable) has been the primary motivation towards doing things that I now no longer seem to really worry about getting done, and ADHD that my anxiety used to kind of keep in check is presenting itself more clearly because I’m not constantly worried about the things I need to do, so.. it ends up taking longer for them to get done. I’m not sure if I need to re-evaluate my life and start doing things because I want to do them as opposed to doing them in order to alleviate anxiety or whether I need a lower dose (I’m on 20mg). Am I crazy or is this a thing? [info] None [info] 1574400015
Wooowoker [info] Just found out my 9 year old son with ADHD was bullied and called a retard at school by his brother of the same age. What do I do? Let me explain, because there is more to the story than the title suggests. I was in 5th grade when I was diagnosed with ADHD, and 14 when I was diagnosed with anxiety. From then on my life was way easier and I was able to focus. I promised that with my kids I wanted to get them tested for any disabilities if they showed symptoms. My doctor was happy to do this. He’s helped me since I was first diagnosed and has stayed with me every step of the way. If it weren’t for him I wouldn’t be anywhere near as successful as I am now. We became friends. Not best friends obviously, but we had a good relationship. He even came to my high school graduation. We set up a time and he diagnosed my son, let’s call him Andrew, with ADHD. My other son, let’s call him Benny, was not diagnosed at all. Fast forward and my son is doing good in school. He is steadily improving, although I had noticed him being more quiet and reserved and he didn’t stay with us downstairs and watch TV as a family. At first I thought nothing of it. Maybe he was studying harder and he didn’t want to watch TV. Maybe he had hit his phase of being a Hermit in his room earlier than I did. Either way, I knew how annoying it is to have parents always asking you to be around them when you just wanna do your own thing. I did ask him if everything was okay, and he said it was, So I left him alone. A few weeks later, I get a call from the school saying that a teacher had noticed Andrew had been quiet and decided to investigate. And walking down the hall she saw Benny calling him retarded and calling him weird and dumb. This deeply offends me not only because it is my child who is being bullied by my other child, but also that he would use that word to describe someone with ADHD. It also has caused Andrew to develop social anxiety. So I’m asking you Reddit, what can I do to make sure he Learns his lesson. I’ve grounded him before, but that doesn’t work with him. And I know how anxiety can affect someone, especially a child in their adolescence, so I want to make it more severe. Also, this should be a no-brainer, but no corporal punishment or public humiliation, obviously. There are some people who think that’s okay, and it sickens me. [info] None [info] 1549920258
Drawethree [info] Loud intrusive thoughts.. anyone experiencing this ? Hey guys, I am diagnosed with anxiety disorder not with OCD one, but propably it is OCD. Since I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder I am still aware of that I might be suffering schizophrenia, not anxiety. I have read really much about this disease and almost everything I do, everything I make, in every step i see schizophrenia in myself. My biggest struggle at the moment are loud thoughts. Let me give you few examples. Today I was cleaning up dishes, I was holding a plate really strong and my mind imagined how that plate would break with that "break sound" really loud. I am really aware these loud images and thoughts are driving me crazy and I am developing schizophrenia soon. By meaning "loud" I mean they are really clear,  I also see some light flashes sometimes which too makes me really uncertain about this. I was at my psychologist week ago and he told me that I am suffering from compulsing/intrusive thoughts and I am 100% likely to have no psychosis. What do you think about this guys ? Is anyone here suffering with similar problems ? I would appreciate any reply which would made me certain about this. Thank you and enjoy last few days of 2017. [info] None [info] 1514290770
exponentiate [info] Some things I've tried, with varying degrees of success:* Brain dump - if you can't stop thinking about it, write it down and remind yourself you can look it up/think about it later. This doesn't work particularly well for me, but people who like bullet journaling seem to have success. * Mindfulness/meditation - can help you learn to be aware of your thoughts and practice putting them aside. In the moment, when you catch yourself being distracted, take a few moments to breathe, clear your head, and refocus on your work. Maybe a pomodoro-style structure could help you maximize your time, e.g. work for 45 minutes, break for 10 minutes, meditate/refocus for 5 minutes.* Get your anxiety under control - you may not consider it "anxiety," but you mentioned that "fear" is something you can't always stop thinking about. Your college most likely has mental health resources, so I strongly recommend that you have a few sessions with a counselor/therapist to learn some strategies for letting go of those fearful thoughts. I was diagnosed with anxiety about a decade before I was diagnosed with ADHD, and in my experience it's easier to work through the "I'm bored, I'm bored, I'm bored" of ADHD when you don't also have anxiety yelling "You'll never succeed, you'll never succeed, you'll never succeed".Lastly, to echo /u/dadeluxe, make sure to be kind and forgiving to yourself - you're doing great. :) [info] ADHD-PI [info] 1503861892
catmomof4 [info] Reading this gave me some comfort. I was diagnosed with anxiety issues 3 years ago. It's been about that long that I've experienced an off-balance feeling. The best way I could describe it to my doctor was that I felt like I was walking on a boat, that it was like a floating sensation and I felt like I was constantly moving. So far I've had my hearing and inner ear checked, and of course everything is fine. They want me to see a neurologist now. But after reading your post I'd rather talk to my doctor about anxiety as the cause. I weaned myself off Lexapro last fall and have done great without it except for this balance issue. And it's incredibly difficult to push through it at work. I'm a service advisor so I'm constantly on my feet, running back to the shop, pulling cars around, etc. Some days I have to lock myself in a bathroom stall and just sit still for a moment to collect myself.  Until today I've never read where anyone else with anxiety has experienced this. [info] None [info] 1531357221
cheekybrat [info] Is it anxiety or just plain old worry? I’m going to try to make this quick as I’ve just taken a sleeping pill and I’ll start hallucinating soon.Both of my parents are in the hospital.  My dad, 83, had pneumonia.  My mom, 68, can’t take care of herself.I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 26, and am now 38.  I am on 15mgs of cipralex and have been for the last two years.I am experiencing more anxiety now due to my parents being in the hospital.  Some days are better than others.  Sometimes I feel good.  Sometimes I have a pit in my stomach but try to stay positive.  Sometimes I’m so anxious I can’t eat and have trouble sleeping.I’m seeing my doctor next week and will discuss this with her.  I don’t want to increase the dosage because I feel like this anxiety is warranted.  My mind isn’t blowing it out of proportion.  But if I did increase, would that gnawing sensation in my stomach go away?  Would I still worry, but not wallow?  What can I do otherwise to minimize the anxiety, without medication? [info] None [info] 1570150068
jacksepticeye_nt [info] I'm diagnosed with anxiety reee [info] 15M [info] 1572907019
misterchief10 [info] Success Story: I Landed an Interview A week ago, I was in a pretty bad place. I failed a standardized assessment for an internship I wanted, and I figured an interview I was planning was off the table. Well, now the person I was in contact with at this company said he still wants an interview with me. It feels amazing. I’m really anxious about it, because I have been diagnosed with anxiety and I have really bad social anxiety. And this is really the first interview I’ve had. The one for my previous internship was a friend of a friend at a small publication. This is a formal company interview.I’ve been studying the possible questions on Glassdoor and prepping mentally, now I just to wait.But I have to say, it at least feels great to be this far. I never thought I would get this far. My horrible social anxiety made me fear I would never have what it takes to even get an interview with a big company. I’m not outgoing and my last internship was something that sort of came to me. Even if I don’t get the job, I will still feel proud of myself for the first time in a while, because I’ve proved to myself that I can do it, I can get myself out there. And that’s great. Now, obviously I’d be disappointed if I don’t get it, but this is still a victory for me. Now to try to make sure my anxiety doesn’t shut my brain off during the interview and turn me into a quiet, stuttering mess... [info] None [info] 1520286654
Good_day_sunshine [info] So after my first child was born, I started in this same anxiety cycle as you are now.  I was so worried about me dying and leaving my kid without a mother.   I was diagnosed with anxiety about a year later. Do you think maybe you are struggling with anxiety in some other area in your life, and projecting it into this?  That was the case for me. I still worry about death, but getting a better control in my anxiety overall has helped the negative thoughts.  [info] None [info] 1519355475
Godecapitator [info] It does help! I do know that but I value your response, thank u.  I *just* replied to a post in this sub advising to take their own time w telling a therapist their trauma. I realize now, maybe some background might help this post. I am also a victim of physical &amp; sexual abuse (not rape) I'm 38 &amp; a proud father of a 15 year old daughter &amp; 7 yr old son. I've been diagnosed with anxiety &amp; mood disorders. I've struggled w addiction most of my life but I've been sober for over a year :) I could not have done it w out the help of others, mostly my therapist &amp; now I hope to help others.  I realize now, the gist of my post, is that even though I've been victimized myself, I'm male &amp; want to be very sensitive to the female situation. Yes, I know men are raped also, but I know women are the majority of victims by male predators &amp; I'm hyper aware that I'm the same sex as most abusers. I don't want my sex to be a..trigger, so what can I do to neutralize that?..if that makes sense, any responses would be highly appreciated.Edit for clarity. [info] None [info] 1452372480
sayyoureaguy___ [info] I used to drink caffeine from the moment I woke up until I was trying (and failing) to sleep. When I was diagnosed with anxiety my doc was pretty adamant that I stop any stimulants. It’s been ten years and I haven’t looked back. I miss it sometimes but now I get anxious just thinking about how ridiculously anxious it would make me to drink it again.  [info] None [info] 1545053207
_form_ [info] How do you manage to focus during your games? I cannot seem to and it's effecting my play. Hey guys!I am a Top lane main who plays mostly Riven, I enjoy playing her and currently am at silver 2. I have been bouncing around between Gold promos and Silver 2. I cannot seem to climb higher. I feel that when I play I am unable to focus. I try and try but it seems I always am in a daze. Anyone else have this problem or any tips on how to focus on your game?I have been diagnosed with anxiety but have done nothing about it really not sure if that could be a factor in anything. [info] None [info] 1475872592
logic-v-emotion [info] What should I[18M] do about my crush [18F]??        Tl;dr  I’m posting to try and gain some advice on what do in relation with my crush, and what I can do to improve myself when it comes to my personal insecurities about platonic male relationships with a potential girlfriend. ‘Rebecca’ and I met in a shared college class last semester. We developed a friendship late in the semester when we both went to a study session before a test. Rebecca invited me to eat dinner with her and one of her female friends, ‘McKenna’, in a communal cafeteria on campus. We talked about a shared interest in reading; there was palpable tension and long bouts of awkward silence, but I felt happy to be engaged. Rebecca and I texted occasionally and from then on would eat dinner together about once a week. Near the very end of the semester, I met her after our shared class to watch/help McKenna wash Rebecca’s hair with raw eggs and coconut oil. (It is supposed to strengthen the hair and make it grow faster from what I could gather) I was interested and amused, and agreed to let them use the same hair treatment to me. It was embarrassing, but Rebecca joked that she wouldn’t let any other guy see her like this. I took that as an indication that she was open to creating a serious bond/friendship/something else. Nothing much happened for the remainder of the semester, and we hardly talked over winter break as we live a few time zones away. Upon returning to college, we met up and continued to talk as if no time had been spent apart. We had coincidentally signed up for another joint class for the current Spring semester, and so we see each other at least twice a week, often on Saturdays as well to work on homework. We have met up to go to two free movies on campus, and went out for ice-cream after working on homework yesterday. She will occasionally give me a playful shove or touch, but I think that it is more how she is acts as a person instead of purposeful and continuous flirtations.So as for my personal history, I have been in one very brief and one comparatively long relationship. The first one ended because I was inexperienced and didn’t voice my feelings and expectations for our relationship. My first Ex left me for a male friend of hers. The second, and by far more impactful relationship was an on-again off-again relationship. My second Ex and I were together for three periods of about 4 months each, with two 4-month gaps between the aforementioned periods. I was the driving force to get back together both times. That relationship ended with me finding out that she had emotionally cheated on me with two male friends of hers. This left me with emotional problems when it comes to outside male friendships in a relationship. During that entire relationship I very vocally voiced my emotions to her, and she would not reciprocate in the slightest. There was also intense gas-lighting. In this period, I was diagnosed with anxiety, started seeing a therapist, and started taking medicine. I can elaborate much more if anyone is interested, but it could go on for pages.   So as for Rebecca, I will do my best to paint the picture:  She is extremely connected to her family. They live a few hours from campus and she spends many weekends there. She is spellbound by her older sister’s baby boy. At least twice any shared day she will show me a picture of him, or talk about how badly she cannot wait to go back home to see him. She has an entire wall of her dorm covered in his baby photos.   She is extremely religious. She is a devout Catholic as is her entire family. We have talked about her church’s customs and the meanings of her many crosses, mannerisms, and beliefs. She is eager to talk about them, so we have had many conversations on this topic.  She is an extremely nice person to me, and has gone out of her way multiple times during our friendship to invite me to things and to try and make conversation.   She is intelligent, meets my moral standards.   She is an extremely busy person. Between her heavy class-load, family, extracurricular, and sleeping, I have found it difficult to set up times to meet. This makes me worried that she may not have time for me if I pursue a relationship.   Now for the most important part that I would like to introduce with an aside. I have talked with my therapist about how my insecurities about a girlfriend having platonic male relationships is ENTIRELY MY OWN PERSONAL EMOTIONAL CHALLENGE, and I do not want to project my insecurities onto Rebecca.  She has a large number of platonic male relationships. When we first talked about relationships, Rebecca talked about how she went to Prom with ‘just a friend’, and how she had more male friends than female friends. She also had two failed relationships at the beginning of the Fall semester. I know for a fact that she is not in a relationship right now (I am adamantly against any type of cheating), but she has a consistently large number of male friends.  When we will hang out, she will often bring up other male friends. One is the friend from math that talks with her a lot and makes her cranes she keeps. Another is a friend of McKenna that McKenna tried to set up with Rebecca. Another male friend is the friend that goes to church with her every Sunday. There are many more, but they all seem to bleed together in my mind into a lump sum of ‘other males’. While I recognize this is my personal problem, it makes me jealous when she talks about them. Which makes me subconsciously displeased with her. I would like your advice on what to do to try and work through this personal problem.Now as for me:  I was raised very religious in a non-mainstream religion, and now am trying to escape from religion, at least temporarily. Simply put, I’m putting all efforts into what I see as presently more worthwhile goals.     I feel that I am a ‘needy’ person in a relationship. Along with anxiety, I have a consistent tendency to overthink things in a relationship. I don’t know how this would balance out because she is very busy (In what I recognize to be very worthwhile pursuits).  I have feelings for her. They started developing on one of our first dinners, and have grown unsteadily since then (due to me overthinking and wanting things to move along faster). I find her very attractive, both physically and personality-wise.   I enjoy spending time with her more than with anyone else I have met, and would like to cement my position with her. So, if you have made it this far, good on you. I’m impressed. I am currently infatuated with her, and unsure as to what I should do. On paper, it doesn’t seem like we would be compatible in the long term (different religions, my personal insecurities), but I really like Rebecca. I value my friendship with her, and don't want to ruin it, but feel like I should confess my feelings for her. I don’t know if I should confess my feelings for her, or if I should try and ignore the feelings for her and be a good friend only.  If you feel like I should confess my feelings, please let me know your opinions on how I should tell her and how I should deal with my insecurities as to not let it seriously hurt our relationship/friendship. 	Thank you so much :') [info] None [info] 1519616676
brazilianbabexoxo [info] President of company causing panic attacks I accepted a job with a company doing marketing about a month ago, my boss is great but I was a bit hesitant to accept the job after reading the Glassdoor reviews and seeing that a majority of them were about the verbal abuse the president/owner gives all the employees. I have been diagnosed with anxiety for about five years now. My boss assured me I would not be working with the president which led me to accept my offer. Fast forward to now. He will scream out tasks at me like find flights to here on this day nothing before 9AM, I will bring him a list of the flights and he will ask what about something at 8AM just to fluster me. He can see me start to become anxious and he will keep going asking me questions like “if I’m stupid” “if I am slow” basically doing this on purpose for his amusement and to bully. He does this to everyone in the office and I have substantial proof of the harassment he will even throw objects in his office. I fear him so much because of the way he speaks to me and everyone else that it triggers a full blown anxiety attack where I can’t breathe. My boss also acts as HR and I will be bringing this up to her but my fear is that she will tell me to just sweep it under the rug or deal with it. Do I have any rights in these circumstances? I am in NYC. [info] None [info] 1572579376
Simply_SieSie [info] I don't know what's wrong I know it sounds weird but I feel like I have a mental illness but I don't know what.  I've been diagnosed with anxiety, and I thought it was anxiety but I'm not anxious about this.  I just want to know why I am the way that I am because I feel like something is wrong but I'm not panicked about it,  more so calm and serene. I can't go to a therapist because I'm 15 and my parents don't believe in therapy, even my doctor told me to "wait for my anxiety to disappear." I hate having to water down my emotions so that I don't get "out of control". It's tiring and I just want to know what's wrong with me [info] None [info] 1588236913
skz-paige [info] I have been diagnosed with anxiety previously when I was younger, but my ocd compulsions are checking locked doors, I have to check them at least 4 times (can go up to 12 times) before I can sleep and I have to push curtains back against the window after I check the doors, the whole process causes me to lose a lot of sleep and does heighten my anxiety.I also have some minor counting related ones but they don’t have major consequences like losing sleep. [info] None [info] 1569069676
exhaustedwerewolf [info] When I was diagnosed with anxiety I was privately super dubious about it, even though it was my second diagnosis, and I know I’ve always been a worrier and concerned, I still thought it was an exaggeration. My therapist recommended me ‘Overcoming Worry and Generalised Anxiety Disorder’ and Chapters 8 and 9  included some tests like the Intolerance of Uncertainty Scale (IUS) and some other identification tests. I scored very high for anxiety on everything. I hadn’t realised because my anxiety mostly results in a lot of successful avoidance on my part, so I am not actively anxious as often as a normal person with anxiety might be. But I am beginning to come to terms with the fact that yes, I am anxious. TLDR; yes, you can. maybe look into talking to a profesional or take some self led tests? [info] None [info] 1532389179
_rebacca_ [info] Tips on combatting anxiety while on a plane? Hey there /r/Anxiety!I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder when I was pretty young and my parents opted to keep me off medication. I'm 19 now and I've had spurts of bad anxiety hear and there, mainly brought on by the fear of having a panic attack, which usually itself results in a panic attack. Tomorrow I'm flying on a plane for the first time in a while and I'm really worried about having a panic in such a cramped space and not being able to do anything about it. Do you have any ideas about keeping calm in such a situation? Lately due to the stress of school and increased panic attacks I've also been considering visiting a psychiatrist or psychologist.Your help is greatly appreciated! :) [info] None [info] 1330752806
sadsoccerdad [info] Hi. I'm Dylan, and this is my story. TL;DR: My name is Dylan. My life crumbled into pieces, I'm extremely young and have a lot of responsibilities with chronic anxiety and extreme symptoms that interfere with my daily life, and most importantly, I'm broke without insurance.Dizziness, fatigue, heart palpitations, heartbeat skips frequently, blurred vision, shallow breathing, tension in the neck and scalp areas, disorientation, BIGGEST ONE-&gt; derealization or psychosis, slurred speech, random panic attacks throughout the day. This is what I live with every day. I know I am not alone, and I would not wish this upon any other living, breathing being.My Story:I was diagnosed with anxiety when I was 14. I am now 19. I was on medicine (Zoloft then Prozac, that I can remember) for about three years before moving alone to Arizona from Puerto Rico to try and make someone out of myself when I turned 18 and completely ditched medicine. I was able to control my anxiety, to an extent, for the past two years or so. That is until my disabled mother moved up here after I got a job and my own apartment. I now then had to support two people living under just one roof (a tiny, tiny studio apartment). I lost my minimum wage job (RadioShack filed for bankruptcy). I went through starvation, no electricity, and embarrassment. The government denied my disabled mother of any economic assistance or food nutrition assistance. I had to pawn a lot of my belongings, such as my DSLR camera (my passion is music and photography.), my laptop, etc.My only savior throughout all this was my girlfriend, who was living 1,700 miles away studying in Canada. She lent me enough money to pay rent and some bills. I finally got a job, paid more bills, but even to this day I struggle with basic needs such as keeping food on the table, due to being so behind on basically everything. I realize I fear stability.I fear it because it's so hard to gain it, yet so easy to toss it away.My mind has been trained to expect the worst, and my body now reacts the same way.I feel like I'm losing it.I need help.I really do.Dylan [info] None [info] 1448690466
3xStar [info] I've been dealing with pain + more for years and I'm tired of it being dismissed as no big deal. For three years I've been dealing with pain that is nearly unbearable as well as fainting spells, visual problems, and more. When it all started I went to the doctor and I was diagnosed with anxiety, which I understandably have, but the amount of pain I feel as well with the numerous other problems I have tells me that anxiety is not the only issue I have. Some days I feel like I might need a cane or wheelchair as it becomes hard to walk due to the pain or feeling like a fainting spell might be coming soon. I'm not sure what to do from here since my doctor has dismissed it and my family thinks that I'm too young to be experiencing this and that I'm just over-exaggerating. It takes a toll on my mental health for all my obviously serious issues to be dismissed and to have to suffer through these problems every day. I feel stuck and as though there's no hope for treatment. [info] None [info] 1555742355
MommyNeedsATimeOut [info] SSRIs I have been seeing a therapist for the last month and she is recommending that I start a SSRI. I have no previous experience taking any medication. I was diagnosed with anxiety, OCD and PTSD. I would also like something to help with my lack of motivation and focus. I am afraid of a medication making me not feel/act like myself or lower my already low libido. Any suggestions on what worked for you and why would be appreciated greatly. Thank you lovely BroMos! [info] None [info] 1502489332
ChimpWithAGun [info] You're not stupid or weak. I also have anxiety, and I definitely don't consider myself any of those things. I've always considered myself a smart, friendly guy, with big objectives and a big heart.When I was diagnosed with anxiety, I realized a lot of stuff about myself: I understood why I was so obsessive, and why I felt bad when things didn't go as expected. I developed defense mechanisms (a term that my psychiatrist taught me) very quickly, by reading a lot, understanding my disorder, and applying what I was learning to my daily life. Little by little, I was able to control it (99% of the time).Don't feel bad. Be patient. It can't be fixed immediately, just like any illness. But the good thing is that, contrary to any other illness (flu, cancer, etc.) you can actually fix it... with your own mind!Let me know if you have any questions. I'd be glad to help you. You're not alone. And again, you are not stupid or weak. I've learned that usually the smartest people and the ones that are dealing with hard stuff are the ones that get anxiety. [info] None [info] 1409026516
Pokabrows [info] lol I was diagnosed with anxiety as a kid so I had it then too  [info] None [info] 1548894797
hey_yall_whatsgud [info] I am 15 years old and i have been there. It’s not the fact that people who do his can have great lives, because so do I. It’s our heads. I can’t control how I feel about myself. I hate every part of me, but I was always seen as a girl who was happy with her life and always laughing. When I was twelve I was diagnosed with anxiety and proclaimed anorexic. Everyone I knew had the same question: How? Well, I couldn’t tell you that answer if I tried. People don’t always have a reason for hating themselves, it’s just the way our minds work. I send out my sincerest regards to you and your family and tell your son he is not alone. There is ALWAYS someone there for us, whether we choose to believe it or not. [info] None [info] 1554917005
Bingemyfeelings [info] Sometimes Sam gets angry that I even bring up the fact that his ADHD is affecting his motivation or the decisions he makes. Just simply states that its just the he way he is and I should just be ok with everything he does. For some reason he sees his condition as an accessory to his personality. But like you mentioned I started realizing how serious it was when telling myself “hes just stubborn/ a jerk” wasn’t a good enough explanation for how he was processing our arguments and overall relationship. I try my best to understand because I am diagnosed with anxiety/ptsd. I get that sometimes ill act a certain way that he might not fully get,  and sometimes i wont be acting fair. But I take full responsibility in explaining myself and apologizing for my actions.But youre right about making sacrifices. It has felt more work on my end than his and at this point I dont know how much more im willing to tolerate. Its been over 3 years of us together and im getting very impatient. Thank you for explaining the difference with willpower and feeling ashamed. Youre right. I don’t want him to feel like im carrying judgement towards him and will use different words to explain myself to Sam from now on.  [info] None [info] 1537021484
bacon_to_go [info] When I was 22, my best friend died of an aneurysm in his sleep the day after he tried to hang out with me and I gave him the cold shoulder so I could hang out with a chick I met at work. We found him in his apartment. He had tried to go to the hospital the night before and he had MediCal so they gave him aspirin and told him to fuck off. Turns out his brain tumor came back.  My family also lost their home from the recession, my parents got divorced, my older sister got hooked on drugs and my gf/prior best friend for 3+ years cheated on me.  I was diagnosed with anxiety, relationship based PTSD, ADHD but I still graduated with an unrelated engineering degree.  Programming actually keeps me calm and sane. Since changing to CS, I'm able to fall asleep in less than an hour after lying down, I've stopped grinding my teeth, my brain is so worked out that I don't mind-wander in bed, I've stopped taking Adderall.  The best part is, I do have a lot of "ideas" that I more or less gave up on, but even working on a cool idea for a few hours is really calming. It's really hard to do this in other industries. In Mech E, what are you going to do, manufacture your own tooling component? Engineer your own race car?  But with CS, you have everything you need to not just design, but plan, build, deploy and even release and test an idea right there on your laptop.  It's also very very relaxing to know that YOU are in demand in your industry. It relieves the stress of always feeling like you could get fired, etc.  Having companies sending you emails on LinkedIn begging you to consider their company can be confidence building.  Getting a dog helped too. My dog makes me feel safe, calm, makes me laugh.   [info] None [info] 1473564967
alexaplaydespacito2 [info] frock no. 6th grade year I got A’s in almost all subjects except for math. I understood the math but I just got all C’s and the rare B. It made some really angry because I knew I couldn’t pass if I kept this up. My teacher pulled me over and gave me an oral test which I got 100% on. I was diagnosed with anxiety that year. Now there are people who are just stupid and don’t study, and that’s different  [info] hating kankens is a popular opinion [info] 1544030185
SilverYayFern [info] Check, check, check- my experience has a lot of similarities to those you describe. I have been diagnosed with anxiety and take medication for it, and distracting myself with shopping is one of the few ways I've found that snaps me out of that anxiety spiral. It replaces thoughts with the feel-good numbness of looking at pretty things. Instead of a directionless frantic energy, I have a direction, a mission through which to funnel that energy. I also get very anxious when my surroundings are messy, so, yes, reducing clutter (generally visible or not) is a goal of mine.I read your comment yesterday and thought about it over the course of the day. I journaled for a while too. There were some stressors I was already aware of. Actually, a big reason I'm moving to the other coast is to deal with some of those stressors (they're mostly family life-centered). But actively confronting them did help me realize that a lot of the guilt and conflict I was feeling was baseless. Most of the worry is not baseless, which is why I was afraid to confront it. But it did help me to confront it, and separate the real concerns from the baseless concerns. So. I think I should do this regularly. (I can think of it like decluttering/destashing my mind haha.)TLDR; Your advice is/was sound and helpful. Thank you.Edit: originally posted reply incorrectly. [info] None [info] 1468039717
_clandescient [info] How do you mitigate tilt? I don't know what is up with me. I have been playing video games all my life. I've never had a problem with being salty in video games other than your normal teenage moodiness, but now that I am an adult of almost 30 years, suddenly I get super fucking pissed whenever things go wrong. I don't know where this came from. Maybe it has something to do with the added stress in life that comes with adulthood, or maybe it has something to do with the fact that I was diagnosed with anxiety last year. I just don't know. But now that I have this issue, I can't help but get completely tilted at certain things. When the team just won't work together, or picks bad classes (2 sniper classes on a KOTH map? Really?), or I die to something stupid like Mcree's stun+fan. I take it personal and it just ruins the game for me. I have never ragequit on my team before the round was over because I know how it feels to be on the receiving end of that and I don't want to do it to other people, but boy would I really like to sometimes.I don't know why I get so upset and I don't want to be that way but it's like a fucking reflex with how quickly it happens.Anyone experiencing something similar? How do you deal with it? [info] None [info] 1464172884
tsar73 [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety &amp; depressive disorder as a direct result of my migraines. It’s definitely a thing. Was on antidepressants for about 18 months, I guess they kinda helped but they sucked the life out of me all the same. I weaned off them about a year ago and picked up exercise. It’s definitely improved my morale in general but do understand that there is no universal solution to this problem, but I would think being healthier in general would help for sure. Take care! [info] None [info] 1505180456
leosolon [info] I was diagnosed with anxiety and shoved in a bottle of meds for it. The meds made me a zombie. Years later i went back to the doctor and she prescribed me adderall. It turns out that it was anxiety due to ADHD. Adderall works as stimulant and anti anxiety for me. It works greatly. [info] None [info] 1425412902
diamonds_diamonds [info] Anti- Social behavior with extreme irritability normal towards end of deployment??? I'm not sure if this is normal, or maybe deployment behavior.I'm pretty sure I'm that percentage my unit thinks where I'm gonna throw myself off a building when we get back. These last few months have been HARD, when talking to family and loved ones. I don't want to talk with anyone really and the only person I can tolerate BARELY is my Best Friend back home.Not my mother. Not my father. Not my sister.It takes insane effort just to get through conversations with my fiancé and when I do I'm irritated BEYOND belief. It's almost as if every other thing he says makes a tick go off in my head. I am diagnosed with anxiety and I know extreme irritability is something that surfaces for me with it, but I can't seem to KNOW what I'm having anxiety about. It just seems that people in general are just ANNOYING. Maybe I'm just worried about integrating back into civilian life?No matter what National Guard says, THEY DO NOT LOOK OUT FOR YOU. Will leave you high and dry. I know my Unit isn't worth shit when it comes to solider's wellbeing. Maybe that's what it is??I hold on by a thread with people at work. They can start to tell the smiles are fake. Anytime possible, any free time I have I try and lock myself away so I don't have to interact with people. When I get back, I don't even plan on contacting anyone honestly and just keep to myself for a few weeks.I let my line leader know already what to expect just so no one from my section goes calling the police or putting out some missing persons report. But my head feels like it's about to explode. [info] None [info] 1562367096
frcrobert [info] I'm really starting to feel that, especially since 2 years ago when I was diagnosed with anxiety. [info] None [info] 1552240947
Shinyiest [info] My parents aren't supporting me taking anti-depressants I've been diagnosed with anxiety and panic disorder due to academic issues. So on my counsellor suggestions I went to see my GP and got prescribed an SSRI Citalopram which has been helping with my anxiety massively.I used to have constant negative self talk during down times but this has completely disappeared because of the medication. And because of it I can continue with my studies without having any intense panic attacks.My parents understand and see the positive effects of the meds as I am functioning back to normal but it's their opinion is that since I feel better I should stop taking the medications. Just from doing research I know I shouldn't stop because of negative withdrawal symptoms.I am going to continue taking it but how should I convince my parents that continuing taking it is a good thing?Side note: is there any medication that treat anxiety that also doesn't suppress sex drive? My bf is pretty miffed at the fact that we aren't getting any because of the meds. [info] None [info] 1445518095
foofooonyou [info] I have the same problem.  I was diagnosed with anxiety disorder and PTSD. Have you been through any traumatic events that would cause your paranoia?  Another awesome release on reddit is RAOA for positive friends and random discussion.  Also,  giving/receiving gifts from friends brings an awesome feeling. Also, as someone who suffers and battles these things, you can PM me anytime if you need to talk.  Sticking together as a team to motivate each other I feel is the best thing we can do,  for only we can truly understand those crazy feelings. Best of luck to you my friend. [info] None [info] 1364146762
AceLibertarian [info] Tips to calm down? New to the sub, and I was just diagnosed with anxiety. Any Tips for calming down? [info] None [info] 1585539316
